PART I.
CHILDHOOD.
CHAPTER I.
PHANTASMAGORICAL.INTRODUCTORY.
We
behold a child eight or ten months old; it has brown,
curly hair, dark eyes, fair conditioned features, a
health-glowing
cheek, and well-shaped limbs. Who is it? Whose
is it? what is it? where is it? It is in the centre of
fantastic
light, and only a dimly-revealed form appears. It may
be Queen Victoria's or Sally Twig's. It is God's own child,
as all children are. The blood of Adam and Eve, through
how many soever channels diverging, runs in its veins, and
the spirit of the Eternal, that blows everywhere, has animated
its soul. It opens its eyes upon us, stretches out its hands to
us, as all children do. Can you love it? It may be the heir
of a throne, does it interest you; or of a milking stool, do
not despise it. It is a miracle of the All-working, it is
endowed
by the All-gifted. Smile upon it, and it will smile you
back again; prick it, and it will cry. Where does it belong?
in what zone or climate? on what hill? in what plain? It
may have been born on the Thames or the Amazon, the
Hoan Ho or the Mississippi.
The vision deepens. Green grass appears beneath the
child. It may, after all, be Queen Victoria's in Windsor
Park, or Sally Twig's on Little Pucker Island. The sun
now shines upon it, a blue sky breaks over it, and the wind
rustles its hair. Sun, sky, and wind are common to Arctic
and Antartic regions, and belong to each of the three
hundred
and sixty terrestrial divisions. A black-cap is seen to
fly over it; and this bird is said by naturalists to be found in
every part of the globe. A dog, or the whelp of a dog, a
young pup, crouches near it, makes a caracol backwards,
frisks away, and returns again. The child is pleased, throws
out its arms, and laughs right merrily.
As we now look at the child, we can hardly tell to which
of the five races it belongs; whether it be a Caucasian,
Mongolian, American, Ethiopian, or Malay. Each child on
this terraqueous ball, whether its nose be aquiline, its eyes
black and small, its cheek-bones prominent, its lips large, or
its head narrow; whether its hue be white, olive, or jet, is of
God's creating, and is delighted with the bright summer light,
a bed of grass, the wind, birds, and puppies; and smiles in
the eyes of all beholders. It is God's child still, and its
mother's. It is curiously and wonderfully made; the
inspiration
of the Almighty hath given it understanding. It will
look after God, its Maker, by how many soever names he
may be called; it will aspire to the Infinite, whether that
Infinite be expressed in Bengalee or Arabic, English or
Chinese
;
it will seek to know truth; it will long to be loved; it
will sin and be miserable, if it has none to care for it; it
will die. Let us give it to Queen Victoria. No, says
Sally Twig, it is mine. No, says the Empress Isabella,
it is destined to the crown of Castile. Not so shure
of that, me hearty, it is Teddy O'Rourke's own Phelim.
Nay, says a Tahitian, I left it playing under the
palm-trees
.
What presumption! exclaims Mrs. Morris, it
is our Frances Maria, whom the servant has taken to the
Common. I just bore it in my own arms through the
cypresses, says Osceola.
It seems to be in pain. Mein Gott! gehet eilend hin.
Poor Frances Maria! Paneeweh htouwenaunuh
neenmaumtehkeh
!
Per amor del Cielo! Jesus mind
Teddy's Phelim. O Nhaw nddg erm devishd! W
sucks! my wee bonny wean, she'll die while ye are bletherin
here. Bismillahi! Ma chere enfante! Alohi,
Alohi
!
Ora pro nobis! None of your whidds, dub the
giggle, and take the bantling up. Eatooaa! What a
babel of exclamations! What manifold articulations of
affection
!
But hold, good friends, may be the child does not
belong to you.
The scene advances. Two hands are seen thrust down
towards it, and now it smiles again. Near by discovers itself
a peach tree. Where does that belong? Not like the
black-cap
everywhere. In the grass shows the yellow disk of a
1*
dandelion; the skin of the child settles into a Caucasian
whiteness, and its fat fingers are making for the flower. Be
not disappointed, my friends, your children still live and
smile; let this one live and smile too. Go, Mongolian,
Ethiopian, American, or Malay, and take your child in your
arms, and it will remind you of this, since they are all so
much alike.
Now the child crawls towards the peach tree. Those two
hands, that may belong to its brother, set the child on its feet
by the side of the tree, as it were measuring their heights,
which are found to be the same. Yellow and brown
chickens
appear on the grass, and run under the low mallows and
smart-weed. A sheet of water is seen in the distance, spotted
with green islands. Forest trees burst forth in the rim of
the picture  butternuts, beeches, maples, pines. A
sober-faced
boy, seven or eight years old, to whom the two hands
are seen to belong, sits down, and with a fife pipes to the
child, who manifests strong joy at the sound. A man in a
three-cornered hat and wig, with nankeen small-clothes, and
paste buckles, takes the child in his arms. Where is the
child? A log cabin appears; a woman in a blue striped
long-short and yellow skirt, comes to the door. An
Anglo-Saxon
voice is heard. If you were to look into the cabin or
house, you would discover a loom and spinning-wheels, and
behind it, a larger boy making shingles, and somewhere
about a jolly-faced man drinking rum. The woman,
addressing
the first boy as Chilion, tells him to bring the child
into the house.
This child we will inform you is Margaret, of whom we
have many things to say, and hope to reveal more perfectly to
you. She is in the town of Livingston, in that section of the
United States of America known as New England. And
yet, so far as this book is concerned, she is for you all as
much as if she were your own child, and if you cared anything
about her when you did not know her, we desire that your
regards may not abate, when you do know her, even if she
be not your own child; and we dedicate this memoir of her
to
All
who are interested in her, and care to read about her.
In the meantime, if you are willing, we will lose sight of her
for seven or eight years, and present her in a more tangible
form, as she appeared at the end of that period.
Returning, they came to the greensward in front of the
house, where was a peach tree.
I remeber, said her brother, when you and that
were of the same size, now it shades you. It is just as old
as you are. How full of fruit it is.
Beautiful peaches they are too, said Margaret, when
they are ripe. How did it grow?
I put a peach-stone in the ground one winter, replied
her brother, and it sprouted in the spring.
I was an acorn once, rejoined she, so Obed says, and
why did'nt I grow up an oak-tree?
A dog bounding towards them interrupted the
conversation
.
This animal had enormous proportions, and looked
like a cross of wolf and mastiff; his color was a brindled
black, his head was like the ideas we have of Cerberus, his
legs were thick and strong, and he was called Bull.
Following
the dog, approached the jolly-faced father of Margaret
from the barn, where he had been swingling flax; his hat,
face, and clothes were covered and strung with tow and
whitish down, but you could see him laugh through the veil;
and the glow of his red face would make you laugh. He
caught Margaret and set her on the dog, who galloped away
with his load. They encountered her older brother coming
in from the woods, where he had been burning a piece; his
frock crusted with ashes, his face smirched with coals. He
spoke tartly to Margaret, and contrived to trip the dog as he
ran by, and throw his sister to the ground.
Oh, don't do so, said she.
Let Bull alone, he replied, speaking in a blubbering
washy manner, which we cannot imitate. You'll spile him;
would you make a goslin of him? Here's your sticks right
in the track; saying which he scattered with his foot a little
paling she had constructed about a dandelion. She must
needs cry; the dog went to her, looked in her eyes, lapped
her tears, and she put her arms about his neck. Her brother,
who seemed to be a kind of major domo in the family,
whistled the dog away, and ordered his sister into the house
to help her mother. Her father and older brother wore
checked shirts, and a sort of brown tow trowsers known at
the time  these things happened some years ago  as skilts;
they were short, reaching just below the knee, and very large,
being a full half yard broad at the bottom; supported by no
braces or gallows, and resting on the hips. Neither wore any
coat, vest, or neckcloth. Her father had on what was once a
I can't stop to hear you now, replied her mother. Run
and do what I have told you.
When Margaret had finished the several chores, she went
to the Pond. She was barefoot and barearmed. She wore a
brown linen gown or tunic, open in front, a crimson skirt, a
blue checked apron, and on her head was a green rush hat.
By a narrow foot-path, winding through shrubbery and
brambles, and defiling along the foot of a steep hill that rose
near the house, she came to the margin of the water. Chilion,
her brother, who was at work with a piece of glass, smoothing
a snow-white bass-wood paddle, for a little bark canoe he had
made her, saw Margaret approach with evident pleasure, yet
received her in the quietest possible manner, as she leaped
and laughed towards him. He asked her if she remembered
the names of the flowers, and while he was finishing the
paddle, she went along the shore to gather them. The Pond
covered several hundreds of acres, its greatest diameter
measured
about a mile and a half; its outline was irregular, here
divided by sharp rocks, there retreating into shaded coves;
and on its face appeared three or four small islands, bearing
trees and low bushes. Its banks, if not really steep, had a
bluff and precipitous aspect from the tall forest that girdled
it about. The region was evidently primitive, and the child,
as she went along, trod on round smooth pebbles of white
and rose quartz, dark hornblende, greenstone, and an
occasional
fragment of trap, the results of the diluvial ocean, if
any body can tell when or what that was. In piles, among
the stones, lay quivering and ever accumulating masses of
fleece-like, and fox-colored foam; there were also the empty
shells of various kinds of mollusks. She clomb over the
white peeled trunks of bemlock trees, that had fallen into the
water, or drifted to the shore; she trod through beds of fine
silver-grey sand, and in the shallow edge of the Pond, she
waded on a hard even bottom of the same, which the action
of the waves had beaten into a smooth shining floor. She
discovered flowers which her brother told her were
horehound
,
skull-caps, and indian tobacco; she picked small
green apples that disease had formed on the leaves of the
willows; and beautiful velvety crimson berries from the black
alder.
When all was ready, she got into her canoe, while her
brother led the way in a boat of his own. With due
instructions
in the management of the paddle, she succeeded
tolerably
well. Chilion had often taken her on the water, and she
was not much afraid. It was commonly reported that the
Pond had no bottom, and an indefinable awe possessed the
minds of people regarding it; but this Margaret was too
young to feel; she took manifest delight in skimming across
the top of that deep dark mystery. She toppled somewhat,
her canoe shook and titled, but on it went; there was a thin
wake, a slight rustle of the water; her brother kept near her,
and she enjoyed the fearful pastime. Reaching the opposite
shore, Chilion drew up his boat, and went to a rock, where
he set himself to catch fish with a long pole. Margaret
played awhile with her canoe, and turned into a recess where
the trees and rocks darkened the water, the surface of which
lay calm and clear. The coolness of the spot was inviting,
and birds were merry-making in the underwood, and deep in
the water she saw the blue sky and the white clouds. That
looks like her, she said, calling to mind her dream. She
urged her canoe up a flat rock on the shore, where she took
off her hat and apron; and, simply dressed as she was, the
process of disrobing being speedily done, she waded into the
water. She said, I will go down to the bottom, I will tread
on the clouds; she sunk to her neck, she plunged her head
under; she could discover nothing but the rocky or smooth
sandy bed of the Pond. Was she disappointed? A
sand-piper
glided weet weeting along the shore; she ran after it,
but could not catch it; she sat down and sozzled her feet in
the foam; she saw a blue-jay washing itself, ducking its crest,
and hustling the water with its wings, and she did the same.
She got running mosses, twin-flower vines, and mountain
laurel blossoms, and wound them about her neck and waist,
and pushing off in her canoe, looked into the water as a
mirror. Her dark clear hazle eyes, her fair white skin, the
leaves and flowers, made a pretty vision. She smiled and
was smiled on in turn; she held out her hand, which was
reciprocated by the fair spirit below; she called her own
name, the rocks and woods answered; she looked about her,
but saw nothing. Had she fears or hopes? It may have
been only childish sport. I will jump to that girl, she
said, I will tumble the clouds. She sprang from her
canoe, and dropped quietly, softly on the bottom; she had
driven her companion away, and as she came up, her garlands
broke and floated off in the ripples. Wiping herself on a
coarse towel her mother wove for her, she dressed, and went
back to her brother. A horn rang through the woods.
Dinner is ready, he said, we must go.
CHAPTER II.
WORK AND BEAUTY.  AN IMPRESSION OF THE REAL.
The
child Margaret sits in the door of her house, on a low
stool, with a small wheel, winding spools, in our vernacular,
quilling, for her mother, who, in a room near by, is
mounted in a loom, weaving and smoking, the fumes of her
pipe mingling with the whizz of the shuttle, the jarring of
the lathe, and the clattering of treadles. From a windle the
thread is conducted to the quills, and buzz, buzz goes
Margaret's wheel, while a grey squirrel, squatted on her
shoulder, inspects the operation with a most profound gravity.
Look up the chimney, child, says the mother, and see
what time it is.
I don't know how, replies Margaret.
I suppose we must get the Master to learn you your
a b c's
in this matter, rejoined the mother. When the sun
gets in one inch, it is ten o'clock, when it reaches the stone
that bouges out there, it is dinner time. How many quills
have you done?
The basket is full, and the box besides. Chilion said I
might go and sail with him.
We have a great deal to do. Miss Gisborne's flannel is
promised the last of the week, and it must be drawn in
to-morrow
.
I want you to clean the skans; there is a bunch of
lucks down cellar, bring them up; get some plantain and
dandelion on the smooth for greens; you must pick over
some beans; put some kindlers under the pot; then you may
go.
I had a dream last night.
You are always dreaming. I am afraid you will come to
a bad end.
It was a pretty dream.
I can't help your dreams; here pick up this.
The woman had broken a thread in the chain, and while
Margaret helped her out of the trouble, she looked into her
mother's face, and, as if following out her thoughts, said,
A woman came near to me, she dropped tears upon me, she
stood in the clouds.
three-cornered hat, but the corners were now reduced to loose
ragged flaps; and he wore in addition a leather apron. Her
brother had a cap made of wood-chuck skin, steeple-shaped,
from which the hair was pretty well rubbed off. They went
to the cistern on the back side of the house, washed and
rinsed themselves for dinner. The father discovered a
gamesome
expression of face, shining scirrous skin, and plump
ruby head; his eyes were bloodshot, his cheeks whealed and
puffed, and through his red lips his laughter exposed a suite
of fair white teeth; his head was nearly bald, and the crown
showed smooth and glairy; and under the thin flossy wreath
of hair, that invested the lower part of his head, you could
not fail to see that one of his ears was gone. Her brother
had a more catonian look, and thick locks of coarse black
hair kept well with his dark russet, sunburnt face, and his
lips, if by nothing else, were swollen with large quids of
tobacco.
The dinner-table, appropriate to the place in which it was
set, consisted of boards laid on a movable cross-frame without
a cloth. A large wooden dish or trencher, contained,
flummery-like
,
in one mass, the entire substance of the meal
pork, potatoes, greens, beans. There were no suits of knives
and forks, and the family helped themselves on wooden plates,
with cuttoes. A large silver tankard curiously embossed,
and bearing some armorial signets, formed an exception to
the general aspect of things, and looked quite baronially down
on its serf-like companions. This filled with cider constituted
their drink. They were seated on blocks of wood and
rag-bottom
chairs. Margaret occupied a corner of the table near
her younger brother Chilion, and had a cherry plate with
a wolf's bone knife and fork he made for her. They all ate
heartily and enjoyed their meal. After dinner, Chilion went
with his gun into the woods, the father and elder brother
returned to their respective employments, her mother resumed
her smoking and weaving, and Margaret had a new stint at
quilling.
CHAPTER III.
LOCALITIES DESCRIBED.  THE FAMILY MORE PARTICULARLY
ENUMERATED
.
OBED INTRODUCED.
The
house where Margaret lived, of a type common in the
early history of New England, and still seen in the regions of
the West, was constructed of round logs sealed with mud and
clay; the roof was a thatch composed of white-birch twigs,
sweet-flag and straw wattled together, and overlaid with a
slight battening of boards; from the ridge sprang a low stack
of stones indicating the chimney-top. Glass-windows there
were none, and in place thereof swung wooden shutters
fastened
on the inside by strings. The house was divided by
the chimney into two principal apartments, one being the
kitchen or commons, the other a work-shop. In the former,
were prominently a turn-up bed used by the heads of the
family, and a fireplace; this last, built of slabs of rough
granite, was colossal in height, width, and depth; for dogs or
andirons were splinters of stone. A handle of wood thrust
into the socket of a broken spade supplied the place of a
shovel. The room was neither boarded nor plastered; a
varnish of smoke from tobacco pipes and pine-knots possibly
answering in stead; and the naked stones of the chimney
were blackened and polished by occasional effusions of steam
and smoke from the fire. The room also contained the
table-board, block, and rag-bottom chairs, and little stool for
Margaret before mentioned. In one corner stood a broom
made of hemlock twigs. On pegs driven into the logs, hung
sundry articles of wearing apparel; sustained by crotched
sticks nailed to the sleepers above, were a rifle and one or two
muskets; a swing shelf was loaded with shot-pouches,
bullet-moulds
,
powder-horns, fishing tackle, &c.; on the projecting
stones of the chimney were sundry culinary articles, and
conspicuously
a one-gallon wooden rum-keg, and the silver
tankard, as likewise pipes and tobacco. In the room, which
we should say was quite capacious, hung two cages, one for a
Robin, the other with a revolving apartment for a grey
squirrel
,
called Dick. You would not also forget to notice a violin
in a green baize bag, suspended on the walls, which belonged
to Chilion, and was an important household article. On a
post, near the chimney, were fastened some leaves of a book,
which in examining you would find taken from the Bible,
and consisting chiefly of statistical portions of the Old
Testament
.
There were two windows or wall-openings in the
kitchen, on the south and west sides. The floor of the room
was warped in every direction, slivered and gaping at the
joints; and, being made of knotty boards, the softer portions
of which were worn down, these knots stood in ridges and
hillocks all over the apartment. The workshop, of smaller
dimensions, was similar, in its general outline, to the kitchen;
it contained a loom, a kit where the father of Margaret
sometimes
made shoes, a common reel, hand reel, a pair of swifts,
blades, or windle, a large, small, and quilling wheel, a dye
tub, while yarn of all colors hung on the walls. The garret
was divided by the chimney in a manner similar to the rooms
below; on one side Margaret slept, and her brothers on the
other; her bed consisted simply of a mattrass of beech leaves
spread on the floor, with tow and wool coverlids, and coarse
linen sheets. At each end of the garret was a window, like
those in the kitchen. The ascent to this upper story was
by a ladder. From the back side of the kitchen, a door
opened
into the shed, a rough frame of slabs and poles. Here
were a draw-shave, a cross-cut saw, an axe, beetle and wedges,
an ox-yoke, hog and geese yokes, barking irons, a scythe, rakes,
a brush-bill, fox-traps, frows, sap-buckets, a leach-tub, a small
pile of wood and bark; here also hens roosted. At one
corner
of the shed was a half-barrel cistern, into which the water
was brought by bark troughs from the hill near by, forming an
ever flowing, ever musical, cool bright stream, passing off in
a runnel, shaded by weeds and grasses. On all sides of the
house, at some seasons of the year, might be seen the skins of
various animals drying; the flesh side out, and fastened at the
extremities; silver-grey and red foxes, wood-chucks, squirrels,
martins, minks, musquashes, weazles, raccoons, and
sometimes
even bears and wolves; the many-colored tails of which,
pendant, had an ornamental appearance. The house was on
the west side of the road, and fronted the south. Opposite
the house to the south, across what might have been a yard,
saving that there were no fences, was a butternut tree,  the
Butternut
par excellence
having great extension of limb, and
beautiful drooping willow-like foliage; near this was the Peach
tree which has been noticed. Beyond lay the eastern extremity
of the Pond. On the north was a small garden enclosed by a
rude brush hedge. On the east side of the road was a
log-barn
,
2
covered with thatch, and supported in part by the trunks
of two trees.
The name of the family whose residence we have explored
was Hart, and it consisted essentially of six members; Mr.
and Mrs. Hart, their three sons, Nimrod, Hash and Chilion,
and Margaret. We should remark that the heads of this
house were never or rarely known by their proper names.
Mr. Hart at some period had received the soubriquet of Head
and Pluck, by the latter part of which he was generally
designated
;
his wife was more commonly known as Brown Moll.
Mr. Hart had also a fancy for giving his children scriptural
names; his first-born he called Nimrod; his second,
Maharshalalhashbaz
,
abbreviated into Hash; and for his next son he
chose that of Chilion. It must not be thought he had any
reverence for the Bible; his conduct would belie any such
supposition. He may have been superstitious; if it were so,
that certainly was the extent of his devotion. The subject of
this Memoir was sometimes called after her mother, Mary or
Molly, and from regard to one long since deceased she had
received the name of Margaret. Her father and mother were
fond of contradicting each other, especially in matters of small
moment, and while the latter called her Margaret or Peggy,
the former was wont to address her as Molly. Her brothers
gave her, one, one name, another, another.
Nimrod, the oldest son, was absent from home most of the
year; how employed we shall have occasion hereafter to
notice. Hash worked the farm, if farm it might be called,
burnt coal in the fall, made sugar in the spring, drank, smoked,
and teazed Margaret the rest of the time. Chilion fished,
hunted, laid traps for foxes, drowned out woodchucks, &c.;
he was also the artizan of the family, and with such
instruments
as he could command, constructed sap-buckets and
spouts, chairs, a cart, cages, hencoops, sleds, yokes, traps,
trellises, &c. He was very fond of music, and played on the
violin and fife; in this also he instructed Margaret, whom he
found a ready pupil; taught her the language of music, sang
songs with her; he also told her the common names of many
birds and flowers. He was somewhat diffident, reserved, or
whatever it might be; and while he had manifestly a deep
affection for his sister he never expressed himself very freely
to her. Mr. Hart, or Pluck, if we give him the name by
which he was universally recognized, helped Hash on the
farm, broke flax, made shoes, a trade he prosecuted in an
itinerating manner from house to house, whipping the cat,
as it was termed, and drank excessively. Mrs. Hart, or Brown
Moll, carded, spun, colored and wove, for herself and more
for others, nipped and beaked her husband, drank and smoked.
At the present time she was about forty-five or fifty; she had
seen care and trouble, and seemed almost broken down alike
by her habits and her misfortunes. She was wrinkled, faded
and grey; her complexion was sallow, dark and dry; her
expression, if it were not positively stern, was far from being
amiable; she was a patient weaver, impatient with everything
else. Her dress was a blue-striped linen short-gown, wrapper,
or long-short, a coarse yellow petticoat and checked apron;
short grizzly hairs bristled in all directions over her head. If
in this family you could detect some trace of refinement, it
would not be easy to discriminate its origin or to say how far
removed it might be from unmixed vulgarity.
The term Pond, applied to the spot where this family dwelt,
comprised not only the sheet of water therein situated but also
the entire neighborhood. In the records of the town the
place was denominated the West District. Sometimes it was
called the Head, or Indian's Head, from a hill thereon to
which we shall presently refer, and the inhabitants were called
Indians from this circumstance. An almost unbroken forest
bounded the vision and skirted the abode of this family. They
had only one neighbor, a widow lady, who resided at the north
about half a mile. A road extending across the place from
north to south terminated in the latter direction, about the
same distance below Mr. Hart's, at a hamlet known as No. 4.
In the other course, directly or divergingly, this road led to
sections called Snakehill, Five-mile-lot, and the Ledge. On
the south-west was a plantation that had been christened
Breakneck. The village of Livingston, or Settlement, as it
was sometimes termed, lay to the east about two miles in a
straight line. If a stranger should approach the Pond from
the village he would receive the impression that it was
singularly
situated up among high hills, or even on a mountain,
since his route would be one of continual and perhaps tedious
ascent. But those who abode there had no idea their locality
was more raised than that of the rest of the world, so sensibly
are our notions of height and depression affected by residence.
From the village you could descry the top of the Head, like a
tower upon a mountain, elevated far into the heavens. To
this hill, it being a striking characteristic of the Pond, we ask
attention. Directly to the west of Mr. Hart's house and not
more than six rods distant its ascent commenced. It rose
with an abrupt acclivity to the height of nearly one hundred
feet. Its surface was ragged and rocky, and interspersed
with various kinds of shrubs. From the edge of the water its
south front sprang straight and sheer like a castle-wall. The
top was flat and nearly bare of vegetation save the dead and
barkless trunk of a hemlock, which, solitary and alone, shot
up therefrom, and was sometimes called the Indian's Feather.
This hill derived its specific name, Indian's Head, from a rude
resemblance to a man's face that could be traced on the south
front. This particular eminence was not, however, a detached
pinnacle; it seemed rather to form the abrupt and crowned
terminus of a mountainous range that swept far to the north
and ultimately merged in those eternal hills that in-wall every
horizon. Behind the hill, at the northern extremity of the
Pond proper, where its waters were gathered to a head by a
dam, and a saw-mill had been erected, was the Outlet; which
became the source of a stream, that, proceeding circuitously to
No. 4, and turning towards the village where it was again
employed for milling purposes, had been denominated Mill
Brook.
Mr. Hart had cleared a few acres in the vicinity of his
house, for corn, potatoes and flax, and burnt over more for
grain. He enjoyed also the liberty of brooks, rivulets and
swamps, whence he gathered grass, brakes and whatever he
could find to store his barn. Beyond the barn was a lot of
five or six acres, known as the Mowing or Chesnuts. It was
cleared, and partially cultivated with clover and herdsgrass.
This consisted originally of a grove of chesnut trees, which
not being felled, but killed by girdling, had become entirely
divested of bark even to the tips of the limbs, and now stood,
in number two or three score, in height fifty or seventy-five
feet, denuded, blanched, a resort for crows, where
wood-peckers
hammered and blue-linnets sung. The otherwise
sombre aspect of this lot was agreeably relieved, though we
cannot say its solid advantages were enhanced, by a variety of
shrubs, small green chesnuts starting from the roots of the
old ones, white birches, choke cherries and others.
When Margaret had done her task, she was at liberty to
repair the effect of Hash's spleen and attend to her other own
little affairs. Obed Wright, the son and only child of their
only neighbor, was at hand to assist her. She had beans,
hops and virgin's bower trained up the side of the house, and
even shading her chamber window. To prevent the ravages
of hogs and geese, Chilion had fenced in a little spot for her
near the house. Obed brought her new flowers from the
woods and instructed her how to plant them. He was
thirteen
or fifteen years of age, homely but clever, as we say, a
tall knuckle-jointed, shad-faced youth; his hair was red, his
cheeks freckled; his hands and feet were immense, his arms
long and stout. He suffered from near-sightedness. He was
dressed like his neighbors, in a shirt and skilts, excepting that
his collar and waist-bands were fastened by silver buttons;
and he wore a cocked hat. It seemed to please him to help
Margaret, and he stayed till almost sunset, when Hash came
in from his work. Hash hated or spited Obed partly on
Margaret's
account, partly because of misunderstandings with his
mother, and partly from the perverseness of his own nature;
and he annoyed him with the dog, Bull, who always growled
and glared when he saw the boy. Margaret stood between
him and the dog and saved him from serious harm. In the
present instance, she held Bull by the neck, till Obed had
time to run round the corner of the house and make his
escape.
Margaret seated herself on the door-step to eat her supper,
consisting of toasted brown bread and watered cider, served in
a curiously wrought cherry-bowl and spoon. The family were
taking their meal of bread, potatoes and cold pork in the
kitchen. The sun had gone down. The whippoorwill came
and sat on the Butternut, and sang his evening note, always
plaintive, always welcome. The night-hawk dashed and hissed
through the woods and the air on long, slim, quivering wings.
A solitary robin chanted sweetly a long time from the hill.
Myriads of insects swarmed and murmured over her head.
Crickets chirped in the grass and under the decaying sills of
the house. She heard the voice of the waterfall at the Outlet,
and the croaking of a thousand frogs on the Pond. She saw
the stars come out, Lyra, the Northern Crown, the Serpent.
She looked into the heavens, she opened her ears to the dim
evening melodies of the universe; yet as a child She was
interrupted
by the sharp voice of her mother, Go to your roost,
Peggy!
Yes, Molly dear, said her father, very softly, Dick and
Robin are asleep; see who will be up first, you or the silver
rooster; who will open your eyes first, you or the
dandelion
?
Kiss me, Margery, said Chilion, as she went through the
room,she climbed into her chamber, she sank on her pallet,
she closed her eyes, she fell into dreams of beauty and heaven,
2*
of other forms than those daily about her, of sweeter voices
than either father or mother.
We conclude this chapter by remarking, that the scenes
and events of this Memoir belong to what may be termed the
medival or transition period of New England history, that
lying between the close of the war of our Revolution, and the
commencement of the present century.
CHAPTER IV.
THE WIDOW WRIGHT.
Margaret
was up early in the morning, before the sun.
She washed at the cistern and wiped herself on a coarse crash
towel, rough, but invigorating, beautifying and healthy. She
did her few chores, and, as she had promised, started for the
Widow Wright's. Hash was getting ready his team, a yoke
of starveling steers, in a tumbril-cart, the axle fast in the
wheels, which were cut from a solid block of wood. He set
her in the cart, he desired to show his skill in driving, perhaps
he wished to tease her on the way. Haw! Buck, hish!
Bright, gee up!; vigorously plied he his whip of wood-chuck
skin on a walnut stock. The cart reeled and rattled. It
jolted over stones, canted on knolls, sidled into gutters. The
way was rough, broken, unfinished. Margaret held fast by
the stakes. Good to settle your breakfast, Peggy. Going to
see Obed, hey? and the widder? ask her if she can cure the
yallers in Bright. Margaret was victimized and amused by
her brother. She half cried, half laughed. Her brother came
at last to the lot he was engaged in clearing. He lifted
Margaret
from the cart. She went on, and Bull followed her.
Hash called the dog back, and in great wrath gave him a blow
with his whip. The animal leaped and skulked away, and
joined again with Margaret, who patted his head, and he ran
along by her side. She entered woods; the path was narrow,
grass-grown. She picked flowers, and followed the
cow-tracks
through the thickets of sweet fern almost as high as
her head. She descended a pitch in the road to a brook,
which was crossed by a bridge of poles. The dog stopped to
drink, she to look into the water. Minnows and pinheads
were flashing and skirting through the clear, bright stream.
There were hair-worms fabled to spring from horse-hair, in
black lines writhing on the surface; caddice-worms clothed
with shells and leaves, crawling on the bottom; and boat-flies
swimming on their backs. The water made music with the
stones. She waded in, and sported bare-feet on the smooth,
shiny round pebbles. She looked under the bridge, and that
shaded spot had a mystery to the child's mind, such perhaps
as is more remembered in future years, than commented on at
the time. She pursued a trout, that had shown its black eye
and golden spotted back and vanished. She could not find it.
On she went towards Mrs. Wright's.
This lady had lost her husband a few years before. He left
her in possession of a small farm, and a larger reversion in the
medicinal riches of the whole district. It had been a part of
Dr. Wright's occupation to gather and prepare herbs for the
sick. His
materia medica
was large, various and productive.
He learnt as he could the nature of diseases, and was
sometimes
called to prescribe as well as to sell his drugs. When
he died, his wife came in full possession of his secrets and his
practice. She gathered plants from all the woods, sands and
swamps. She knew the quality of every root, stalk, leaf,
flower and berry. Her son Obed she was instructing to be
her servitor and aid, as well as the successor of his father.
The lady's habits were careful, saving, thriving. She
cultivated
,
in addition, a few acres of land. Her house was neat
and comfortable. It was a small frame building, clap-boarded
on the sides and roof. It had a warm, sunny position, on a
southern slope, with rocks and woods behind. It stood in the
centre of a large yard, surrounded on all sides by a stump-fence,
those of hemlock-trees, with their large, spreading, tangled
roots, like the feet of giants, turned towards the street, making
an impenetrable and very durable barrier. You entered the
yard by a stile formed of the branches of these roots. Within
the enclosure were beds of cultivated herbs, caraway, rue,
savory, thyme, tansy, parsley and other aromatic and medicinal
plants. Obed was at work among the beds. Margaret climbed
the stile. Bull leaped up after her. When Obed saw
Margaret
his dull face gave a recognition of joy which was
succeeded
by an expression of dismay.
Bull won't hurt you, Obed. He's a good dog, said
Margaret
.
Put your hand on his head.
He's a great dog, said Obed. He's got dreadful big
teeth. Hash's allers makin' him bite me.
The dog went and laid down in the sun under the eaves of
the house. Margaret helped Obed pull the weeds from his
beds, while with a hoe he loosened and aired the roots of the
plants. The atmosphere was charged with the perfume of the
flowers. Margaret shook the thyme-bed, and a shadowy
motion, like the waving of a cloud, floated over it. Bees, flies,
beetles, butterflies, were bustling upon it, diving into every
flower, and searching every cup.
What d'ye think of the yarbs, Moll? said the widow,
who stood in the door of her house.
They look pretty, replied Margaret.
Not looks, child, 'tis use. We 'll get a hundred bunches,
this year. The saffron we 'll cut to-morrow, and the balm 'll
be ready soon.
You are not going to cut all these pretty flowers, are
you?
Yes. Them's for medicine. Wait till the flowers is
gone, they wouldn't be worth more'n your toad-flax and bean
vines. They wouldn't fetch a bungtown copper. See here,
that's sage, good for tea. That's goat's rue, good for women
as has little babies. Guess you was a little baby once. I've
known ye ever sen ye warn't more'n so high.
Was I so little? asked Margaret.
Yes, and pimpin enough. An I fed yer marm with rue,
and comfrey-root, or ye never'd come teu this. Ye was thin
and poor as a late chicken. Now sow some sand.
Margaret took the dish, and began to sprinkle the floor.
Well done, said the woman. Ye'll make a smart gal.
Here's some honey and bread.
The Widow Wright was dressed in the costume of the times,
a white linen short-gown, checked apron, black petticoat.
She wore on her head a large brown turban. Her eye was
black and piercing, and she possessed a singular power of
laughter which was employed to express every variety of
emotion, whether pleasure or pain, anger or complacence.
There was a bee-hive in front of the house, a close, well
built shed, open to the south. The little workers were
streaming
through the air like a shower, dropping at the mouth of
the hive, their legs laden and yellow with the dust of flowers.
Margaret stood in front of the range. The bees shot by her
from side to side, multitudes wheeled round her, some lit on
her hat, some crawled over her neck. She watched the
confusion
;
she listened to the hum within the hive. Not one
offered her harm; she was not stung.
A marvellous wonderful gal, uttered the widow to herself,
as she surveyed the scene from the door. Pity 'tis she's
Brown Moll's child.
Margaret had an errand at the place, to get some honey for
a bee-hunt Chilion had proposed for the next day, and stated
her desire to the widow. There was an old feud between the
two families, not affecting intercourse and acquaintance, so
much as matters of interest. The widow received the
message
rather coldly, and beginning in unwillingness, ended with
invective.
He's a lazy, good for nothin feller, Chil is. He's no
better than a peaking mud-sucker. He lives on us all here
like house-leek. He's no more use than yer prigged up
creepers
.
He is worse than the witches, vervain nor dill won't
keep him away. I tell ye, Chil shan't have no honey.
Margaret was abashed, silenced. She could understand
that her brother would feel disappointed; that he was not so
bad. Beyond this she did not discriminate
Chilion is good, she stammered out at last.
Good! what's he good for? rejoined the woman. Does
he get any money? Can he find yarbs? He don't know the
difference between snake-root and lavender.
He's good to me, said Margaret. This was an appeal
that struck the woman with some force. She seemed to
soften.
Ye are a good child; ye help Obed.
Yes, said Margaret, as if watching her cue, I will
help Obed. I'll mind the beds when the birds are about.
I'll go into the woods and get plants. I'll keep Bull off from
him.
Bein ye'll help Obed, I'll give ye the honey. But don't
come agin.
Margaret, taking the article in question on some green leaves,
went merrily home.
We cannot dismiss this chapter without remarking that the
Widow Wright revered the memory of her husband. It was
certainly of some use for her to do so, as his reputation had
been considerable in the line of his practice. The
representation
of the deceased, which she herself bore, she designed
by degrees to transfer to her son. The silver buttons,
which shone on Obed, as well as other articles of dress
he occasionally wore, belonged to his late father. With all
her thrift and care, the lady liked our Margaret very well.
She was so feat and spry, and knowing, and good-natered,
she said, she
could
be made of some use to somebody.
CHAPTER V.
THE BEE-HUNT.  MARGARET GOES FARTHER INTO NATURE.  SHE
SINS AND REPENTS.  THE MASTER.
The
next morning, Chilion and Margaret, joined by Obed,
started on a bee-hunt. Obed was to remain with them till
they should have been successful in this enterprise, then
Margaret
agreed to help him gather such plants and roots, growing
wild in the woods, as could be of use to his mother. They
took with them the honey, an axe, leather-mittens for the
hands, and screens for the face, some brimstone and a
tinder-box
,
a basket, spade, &c., for their several purposes. They
entered the woods lying to the south of the Pond, an unlimited
range, extending in some directions many miles. The honey
was placed on a stump, and several bees, springing up as it
were from vacuity, lading themselves with it, darted off. Our
hunters pursued, watching the course of their flight, and were
conducted by the unconscious guides to their own abode.
This was a chesnut tree, hollow at the root and partially
decayed in the top. Not many strokes were requisite to bring
it crashing to the ground. It was a more difficult job to
possess
themselves of the honey. The angry bees seemed to
spurt out from their nest like fire; their simultaneous start,
their mixed and deepened buzz, their thousand wings beating
as for life, made a noise not unlike a distant waterfall, or the
hidden roar of an abyss. Their persecutors speedily covered
their faces and hands and waited for the alarm to subside.
Margaret said she thought they would not hurt her, as those
at the widow's did not. It is said there are some persons
whom bees never sting. She kindled the brimstone each side
of the tree. The bees within, called out by a rap on the
trunk, and those without, flying and crawling about their nest,
fell dead in the smoke. Chilion cut about the cavity where
the comb was deposited. Margaret, looking in, and seeing
the beautiful well-constructed house of the bees, seemed struck
with remorse. She had eaten honey and honey-comb. She
had seen bees, but she never had associated the two together
in such a touching, domestic and artistical sense. She saw
the bees lying dead in heaps. She had killed them. She had
seen them aroused by a relentless hand from the repose and
security of their house, and sink in the blue flame. Some
were not quite dead, some lay on their backs, their feet
convulsed
and arms quivering. Others were endeavoring to stretch
their wings. She could give back no life; she could set not
a muscle in motion; she could re-form not a filament of a
wing. They would visit her flowers no more; their hum
would blend never again with the sounds she loved to hear.
Whether the reflections of the child were just of this sort,
order and proportion, we are not told. The bees were dead
and she was sad. She had seen dead squirrels, raccoons,
partridges, pigeons. But they were
brought in
dead; she had
not killed them. What is the child's first sense of death?
She would have given all her little heart was worth, could she
render back that life she had so thoughtlessly taken, could she
see them again busy, blithe, happy about their house. Tears
ran down her cheeks, the unconscious expiation of Nature to
the Infinite Life. Chilion and Obed were apparently too much
occupied to notice her agitation, nor would she have dared to
speak to them of what she felt.
The tall, gawky form of Obed went before through the woods.
The lad's skilts, through which were thrust his lean dry shanks,
gave him a semblance to a peasant of Gascony on stilts. His
shovel hat dodged to and fro, bobbed up and down among the
branches. It was, as we might say, a new scene to Margaret.
She had never gone so far into the forest before. She was
susceptible
in her feelings, and fresh as susceptible. The
impression
of the bees somewhat abated, though its remembrance
could never be stifled. The woods,where Adam and Eve
enjoyed
their pastime and sought their repose; where the Amorites
and Assyrians learned to pray, and the Israelites to rebel; where
all ancient nations found materials for sacrifice and offering;
where Hertha, the Goddess of the Angles, had her lovely
residence
;
where the Druids thought everything sent from
heaven that grew on the oak; the religion and worship of
the old Germans, Italians, and Gauls; where Pan piped, the
Satyrs danced, the Fauns browsed, Sylvanus loved, Diana
hunted, and Feronia watched; whence Greek and Saracen,
Pagan and Christian derived architecture, order, grace,
capitals
,
groins, arches; whence came enchantment and power to
Spenser, Shakspeare, Milton, Wordsworth, Scott, Cooper,
Bryant
,
Titian, Rosa, Poussin, Claude, Meyer, Allston; where
the stately castle of the feudal lord reared its head, the
lonely anchorite sang his evening hymn, and the sound of the
convent bell was heard, and the fox and stag-hunter pursued
their game; where Robin Hood and his merry men did their
exploits, and king Rufus was slain; the enlivenment and
decoration of the Feast of Tabernacles, May-day, Whitsuntide,
Christmas; the ward of dryads, the scene of fairy revels, and
Puck's pranks, the haunt of bul-beggars, witches, spirits,
urchins, elves, hags, dwarfs, giants, the spoorn, the puckle, the
man in the oak, will-o'-the-wisp; the opera-house of birds, the
shelter of beasts, the retreat of mosquitoes and flies; where
sugar was made, and coal burnt; where the report of the
rifle was heard, and the stroke of the axe resounded; the
home, manor, church, country, kingdom, hunting-ground and
burial place of the Indian; the woods, green, sweet-smelling,
imparadisaical, inspiring, suggestive, wild, musical, sombre,
superstitious, devotional, mystic, tranquillizing;these were
about the child and over her.
That we must know in order to know, that we must feel in
order to feel, was a truth Margaret but little realized. She
was
beginning
to know and to feel. Could the Immortal
Spirit of the Woods have spoken to her? but she was not
prepared for it; she was too young; she only felt an
exhilarating
sensation of variety, beauty, grandeur, awe. She leaped
over roots, she caught at branches above her head, she hid
herself in thickets, she chased the birds. Yet with all that
was new about her, and fitted to engross her vision, and
supplant
her recent sorrowful impressions, there seemed a new
sense aroused, or active within her, an unconscious instinct,
a hidden prompting of duty; she trod with more care than
usual; a fly, or beetle, or snail, she turned aside for, or stepped
protectingly over; she would not jostle or tear a spider's
webthe wood-spider that strings his lines across from bush
to bush.
It won't hurt ye, said Obed. It brings good weather.
I know that, replied Margaret, but I don't want to kill
it.
Obed was homely and clever, as we have said, simple and
trusting. He never argued a point with Margaret; he was
glad to have her help him, and glad to help her. He held
back the low wiry branches of the hemlocks where she passed,
he assisted her over the round slippery trunk of a fallen tree,
he lifted her across the narrow deep stream of Mill Brook,
running in green spongy banks. He brandished his spade,
and said he would keep off the snakes; Margaret replied that
she was not afraid of them. They came to a sunny glade in
the woods, tufted with black and white moss, shaded by
huckle-berry
shrubs, and sown with checker-berries, whose fruit hung
in round crimson drops, and little waxen flowers bloomed
under
the dark shining leaves. Margaret sat down and ate the
sweet berries and their spicy leaves. The shadows of the
forest vibrated and flickered on the yellow leaf-strewed earth
and through the green underwood; the trunks of the trees shot
up, in straight, rough, tapering stems clear through the branches
into the sky.
The particular patch of woods where Margaret now sat was
of great age, and the trees were very large, and the effect on
her mind was like that of a child going into St. Peter's church
at Rome. But there were no bronze saints here to look down
on her; a red squirrel, as she came in sight, raised a loud
shrill chattering, a singular mixture of contempt, welcome and
alarm. She made some familiar demonstrations towards the
little fellow, and he, like a jilt, dropped a nut into her face.
She saw a brown cat-headed owl asleep, muffled in his dark
feathers and darker dreams, and called Obed's attention to it.
That's an owl, cried the startled lad; it's a bad sign;
Marm says it will hurt ye.
No, replied Margaret; I've seen them on the Butternut
a good many times. Knowing that as Obed never reasoned
so he could never be persuaded, Margaret joined him in
leaving
the ominous vicinage.
That's saxifax, said her companion, striking his spade
into the roots of a well-known shrub. It's good teu chaw;
the Settlers eats ittake it down, and they'll give ye
ribbons
and beads for it. Wisping the top together, and
bending it over, he bade Margaret hold on, while he
proceeded
with the digging. The light black mould was
removed
,
and the reddish damp roots disclosed. Taste on't,
he said, it's as good as nutcakes. He gave her a fibre
fleshy it was, moist, soft and of agreeable flavor, and
rubbing
the earth from the mass, cut it into short bits and
laid it in his basket. Margaret loitered, wandered, attracted
by the flowers she stopped to pick. Marm won't let us,
said Obed, them ant yarbs, they won't doctor, the Settlers
won't give anything for them. Margaret, whether convinced
3
or not, yielded, and ran on before, apparently the most anxious
to discover the plants desired.
That's um! cried Obed.
Margaret was bounding through a wet bog, springing from
one tussock of sedge to another. She, too, had espied it, and
in sight of its beauty and novelty forgot everything else. It
was a wake-robin, commonly known as dragon-root, devil's
ear, or Indian turnip. Margaret broke off the flower, which
she would have carried to her nose.
Don't ye taste on't! exclaimed Obed, it's orful burnin;
put it in the basket. So the plant, flower and all, was deposited
with the rest of their collection.
It was time to go home. They had reached the edge of the
woods whence they started.
That's him! cried Margaret.
It's the Master! echoed Obed, evidently a little flustered.
There appeared before them a man, the shadow of whom
they had seen moving among the leaves, about fifty or sixty
years of age, and dressed in the full style of the times, or we
should say of his own time, which dated perhaps a little earlier
than that of Margaret. He wore a three-cornered hat, with a
very broad brim tied with a black ribbon over the top. His
coat, of drab kerseymere, descended in long, broad, square
skirts, quite to the calves of his legs. It had no buttons in
front, but in lieu thereof, slashes, like long button holes, and
laced with silk embroidery. He had on nankeen small-clothes,
white ribbed silk stockings, paste knee and shoe buckles, and
white silk knee-bands. His waistcoat, or vest, was of yellow
embossed silk, with long skirts or lappels, rounded and open
at the bottom, and bordered with white silk fringe. The
sleeves and skirts of his coat were garnished with rows of silver
buttons. He wore ruffle cuffs that turned back over his wrists
and reached almost to his elbows; on his neck was a
snow-white
linen plaited stock, fastened behind with a large paste
buckle, that glistened above the low collar of his coat. Under
his hat appeared his grey wig, falling in rolls over his shoulders,
and gathered behind with a black ribbon. From his side
depended a large gold watch-seal and key, on a long gold chain.
He had on a pair of tortoise-shell bridge spectacles. A
golden-headed
cane was thrust under his arm. This was Mr.
Bartholomew
Elliman, the Schoolmaster, or the Master, as he
was called. He was tall in person, had an aquiline nose, and
a thin face.
Ha, my Hamadryad! said he, addressing Margaret,
salutem
et pacem, in other words, how do you do, my girl of the
woods?
Pretty well, thankee, replied Margaret.
I thank you, Sir, said he, amending her style of
expression
.
I forgot, she added, pretty well, I thank you, Sir.
He nodded to Obed, who stood aloof in awkward firmness;
besides there were signs of uneasiness or displeasure on the
faces of both.
How came the Pond Lily in the woods? said he.
I came out after herbs, replied Margaret, and I have
some flowers too, added she, taking off her hat.
Flowers, have you? You are a noble specimen of
foliacious
amfractuosityA hortus siccus of your hat! Would I
could send you and your flowers across the waters to my friend,
Mr. Knight, the great botanist, nox semperlucens.
He shan't hurt Molly, interrupted Obed. He'll drown
her, he'll pull her teu pieces. Marm says he spiles
everything
.
He wants to pitch Molly into the Pond.
Don't be alarmed, my glandulous champion, no harm shall
come to this fair flower.
He'll git um all, Molly; don't ye let him have any.
I tell you, responded the Master, Margaret is a flower;
she is my flower.
No, she an't a flower, rejoined Obed, she's Pluck's
Molly.
Obed became quite excited, and spake with more than his
customary freedom. It needs perhaps to be explained, that
Master Elliman and the Widow Wright were somewhat at
odds. He was in pursuit of science, she of gain. They took
a common track, herbs and flowers; their ends essentially
diverged. They frequently encountered, but they could never
agree. Margaret herself became another point of issue
between
them, and the Widow was jealous of the child's
attachment
to the Master. The impression that Obed derived on
the whole was, that he was an evil disposed person, and one
whose presence boded no good to Margaret.
The Master proceeded in the examination of the flowers
Margaret gave him.
I have another one, said she, and thrusting her hand
into Obed's basket, drew out the wake-robin.
An Arum! said the Master, the very thing I have been
written to upon.
Tan't yourn, Molly; it's Marm's, said Obed, seizing the
flower and replacing it in the basket.
Here was, indeed, a mistake. Margaret had unreflectingly
given the flower to Obed to carry, at the same time thinking
it was her own property. She did not know the value attached
to it by Obed, whose mother had enjoined him to get one if
possible, for some particular purpose of her own. At last she
said,
I can get more, I know where they grow.
Can you, can you? said the Master, their habitat is
sphagnous places, what you call swamps. It is impossible for
me to reach themstultiloquent yarb-monger!  he broke
out, speaking of or to Obed; son of an helminthic android!
you ought to be capistrated.
That's hocuspocus, Molly, said the lad; Marm says 'tis.
He'll hurt ye, he'll hurt ye.
I will get some for both of you, said Margaret; I will go
to-morrow.
You don't know the way, rejoined Obed, snakes 'll bite
ye; there's painters in the woods, and wild-cats, and owls.
I'll take Bull with me, answered Margaret.
This allusion to the dog gave Obed more trouble. He feared
his mother, who he thought would not wish the Master should
have the flower; he dreaded the dog, he disliked the Master, he
loved Margaret; he
was
in a quandary. He stammered, he
tried to laugh, he put his hand on Margaret's head, he yerked
up his trowsers, he looked into his basket. He leaned against
a tree, and dropped his face upon his arm. Margaret ran to
him, she took hold of his hand. Don't cry Obed, she said;
poor Obed, don't cry.
The Master, seeing the extremity of affairs, told Margaret
not to care, that he presumed she would be able to get the
flower for him, and took her hand to lead her away. She
clung to Obed, or he to her, wholly enveloping her little hand,
wrist and all, in his great knuckles. Thus linked, sidling,
skewing, filing as they could through the trees and brush, they
soon emerged in the road. The Master went on with them to
the house, and Obed continued his course homeward. Master
Elliman was evidently not a stranger to the family. His visit
seemed welcome. Even the hard, ragged, muddy features of
Hash brightened with a smile as he entered. The dry, pursed
mouth of the mother opened with a pleasant salutation. Chilion
offered him the best chair. Pluck was always merry.
Margaret
alone for the moment, contrary to her general manner,
appeared sorrowful.
CHAPTER VI.
WHY MARGARET WAS SORROWFUL.  DREAMS.  LIVINGSTON.  A
GLIMPSE AT THE WORLD.  ISABEL.NIGHT AND OTHER SHADOWS.
After
dinner, hospitable as it was rude, of which the
Master partook with sensible relish, Pluck proposed that
Chilion should play.
The rosin, Margery, said her brother.
I have some rosin in my pocket, said the Master, at the
same time producing a pint flask, which he set upon the table.
A bibilous accompaniment, he added, I thought would
not be out of place.
Good enough for any of their High Mightenesses!
ejaculated Pluck, drinking, and returning the bottle to the
Master.
Nay, friend, replied the latter; Femina et vinum
maketh glad the heart of man. Let her ladyship gladden her
own.
Mistress Hart also drank.
Now, he who maketh speed to the spoil,
Maharshalalhashbaz
,
said the Master.
Not so good as pupelo, replied Hash.
A rightly named youth, said Pluck, who receiving the
bottle to return it to the Master, perceived its contents nearly
exhausted.
Mi discipula, said the Master, addressing himself to
Margaret
,
you must be primarum artium princeps.
No thankee,thank you, sir, replied she.
Well done, well done! exclaimed he.
What! would you not have the child exhilarate and spruce
up a little? cried the father.
You mistake me, friend, said the Master, I approbated
the girl, not that she did not receive this very genial beverage,
but that she manifests such improvement in speech.
Let her drink, and she will speak well enough, rejoined
the father. She won't touch it! She mopes, she nuzzles
about in the grass and chips. She is certainly growing
weakling
.
Only she sings round after dark, like a thrasher, and
picks up spiders, pismires, beetles, like a frog.
3*
This is none of your snow-broth, Meggy, said the
mother, it's warming, it's as good as the Widow's
bitterbags
.
Don't you touch it, said Chilion, who had been screwing
and snapping the strings of his violin.
Yes, drink, Peggy, said Hash, thrusting his slavery lips
close to her ear. He'll bring some more, he likes ye. He
wants you to.
Margaret started from him, I can't, she said, It won't
let me.
What won't let you, dear? asked her father, drawing her
between his knees, and patting her head.
She's always a dreaming, said her mother, she is a
born bat, and flies off every night nobody knows where. And
in the day time I can't get her to quilling, but she's up and
away to the Widow's, or to the Pond, or on the Head, or
somewheres. She gets all my threads to string up her poses;
she's as bad as a hang-bird that steals my yarn on the grass.
Did'nt I do all the spools? enquired the child.
Yes, you did, responded the father, you are a nice gal.
Hush! Let us hear our son Chilion; he speaks well.
Chilion played, and they were silent.
Now it's your turn my daughter, said Pluck, you will
play if you won't drink.
Chilion held the instrument, while Margaret taking the bow
executed some popular airs with considerable spirit and
precision
.
Now for the cat, child; so she imitated the cat,
then the song-sparrow, then Obed crying.
At this, and especially the last, there was a general shout.
The Master seemed highly surprised and pleased. A
megalopsical
child! he exclaimed. Margaret, with blushes
and tremors, glad to have succeeded, more glad to escape her
tormentors, ran away and amused herself with Dick her
squirrel, whom she was teaching to ride on Bull the dog's
back. The flask having been drained, the keg was brought
forward from the chimney wall.
Here's to Miss Amy, said Pluck, ogling the Master.
Mehercule! exclaimed the latter, you forget the
propitiatory
oblation. We must first propose his Majesty the
King of Puppetdom, defender by the grace of God of
England
,
France, and America; the most serene, serene, most
puissant, puissant, high, illustrious, noble, honorable,
venerable
,
wise, and prudent Princes, Burgomasters, Counsellors,
Governors, Committees of the said realm, whether ecclesiastical
or secular; and the most celebrated Punch and Judy of our
worthy town of Livingston, Parson Welles and Deacon
Hadlock
,
to whom be all reverence.
Pluck
. Amen. I stroke my beard, and crook my
hamstrings
as low as any one.
The Master
. Your promising daughter, Mistress Hart.
Mistress Hart
. Long life to you, and many visits from
you.
Hash
. I say yes to that; and here's for Peggy to Obed.
The Master
. Miss Sibyl Radney.
How you color, Hash! exclaimed his mother. Hang
your nose under your chin, and it would equal old Gobbler's
wattles. Put you into the dyetub, and Meg won't have to get
any more log-wood. There now, Meggy must go down for
some copperas this very afternoon.
Odzbodkins! You won't spoil our sport, cried her
husband
.
Your crotchets are always coming in like a fox into
a hen-roost.
I have work in hand that must be done, replied his wife.
Panguts! she exclaimed, raising her voice and her fist at
the same time, what do you do? lazying about here like a
mud-turtle nine days after it's killed. You may whip the cat
ten years, and you won't earn enough to stitch your own rags
with.I have to tie up your vines, or you would have been
blown from the poles long since.
Dearest Maria, began Pluck.
Don't deary me with your dish-cloth tongue, said Brown
Moll; you had better go to trencher-scraping, and I'll take
care of the family.
While Mistress Hart was entertaining her spouse in this
manner, for it seemed to be entertainment to him, the Master
called Margaret, and asked her to spell some words he named
to her, which she did very correctly. You must certainly
have a new spelling-book, said he. And now I want you
to repeat the Laplander's Ode. She began as follows:
I.
Kulnasatz, my rein-deer,
We have a long journey to go;
The moors are vast,
And we must haste;
Our strength I fear,
Will fail if we are slow;
And so
Our songs will do.
II.
Kaig, the watery moor,
Is pleasant unto me,
Though long it be;
Since it doth to my mistress lead,
Whom I adore:
The Kilwa moor
I ne'er again will tread.
I think I must go, said the Master.
And I will go with you, said Margaret.
Here are the eggs, added her mother, Deacon Penrose
must give a shilling a dozen. One pound of copperas, six
skeins of No. nine, half a pound of snuff, the rest in tobacco.
Margaret, wearing in addition to her usual dress, a pair of
moccasins, which an Indian who came sometimes to the Pond
gave her, called Bull and started off. Hash, in no unusual
fit, ordered the dog back.
Woman! woman! cried Pluck, the keg is out, it is
all gone.
Let the yarn go, said her mother, and get it in rum.
She will bring home some of the good book, said Pluck
to Hash, the real white-eye, you know. Let her take the
dog.
Her brother yielded and she went on with Bull and the
Master; the latter, having grown a little wavering and
muddled
by liquor, taking the child's hand.
There were two ways to the village, one around by No 4,
the other directly across through the woods; the distance by
the former course was nearly four miles, that by the latter, as
we have said, about two; and at the present season of the
year, the most eligible. This they took; they went through
the Mowing, traversed a beautiful grove of walnuts,
black-birches
,
and beeches, and came to the Bridge so called, a
large tree lying across the small brook Margaret encountered
on her way to the Widow's. This stream, having its rise
among the hills on the north of the Pond, and descending to
the village, at the present point, flowed through a deep fissure
in the rocks. The branches of the tree rose perpendicularly,
and a hand rail was fastened from one to another.
Danger menaces us, my child, sighed the Master.
Give me one of your hands, said Margaret, hold on by
the rail with the other, shut your eyes, that is the way Pa
does.
How it shakes! exclaimed the Master. It would be
dreadful to fall here! How deep it is! My head swims, my
brain giddies, I am getting old, Margaret. Tempora
mutantur
et nos. When I was young as you I could go anywhere.
Facilis descensus.
You can hold on by Bull, he'll keep you steady. Here
Bull.
The well trained dog came forward, and the Master leaning
on this tri-fold support, the child's arm, the rail, and the
animal's head, accomplished the pass. They descended
abruptly into a broad ravine, and came up on the higher
banks of the stream. Their course was downward, yet with
alternate pitches and elevations, now by a sheep's track, now
across a rocky ledge, now through the unbroken forest. The
fumes of the liquor subsiding, and the path becoming more
smooth and easy, the Master spake to Margaret of her dreams.
Master
. Dreams come of a multitude of business, says
Solomon.
Margaret
. What, Solomon Smith? He says that great
folks come of dreams, that children will die, and some be
rich; and people lose their cows, and have new gowns, and
such things. I dream about a great many things, sometimes
about a pretty woman.
Mas.
A pretty woman! Whom does she look like?
Mar.
I don't know, I can't tell him.
Mas.
You;
always say you to me. The juveniles and
younkers in the town say him. How does she seem to
you?
Mar.
She looks somehow as I feel when Ma is good to
me, and she looks pale and sorry as Bull does when Hash
strikes him.
Mas.
Where do you see her?
Mar.
Sometimes among the clouds, and sometimes at the
foot of the rainbow.
Mas.
That is where money grows.
Mar.
Not money, it is flowers, buttercups, yellow
columbine
,
liverleaf, devil's ears, and such as I never saw before.
Mas.
Arum, the Arum! Your covetous friend Obed
won't like it if you get those flowers.
Mar.
His mother wants to know what the woman does;
if she makes plasters out of the flowers, and if they will cure
worms.
Mas.
Caustics of aures diaboli! The Devil is no
vermifuge
,
tell the widow. Ha! ha!
Mar.
But she don't speak to me; she stands in the
flowers
,
and breaks them off, and they fly away like little birds;
she pricks them into the rainbow, and they grow on it.
Mas.
Are you not afraid of her?
Mar.
She tells me not to be.
Mas.
You said she did not speak to you.
Mar.
She don't speak, but she tells me things, just as
Bull does. He don't speak, but he tells me when he is
hungry
,
and when there is anything coming in the woods.
Sometimes
she kisses me, but I don't feel her. She goes up on
the rainbow, and I follow her. I see things like people's faces
in the sky, but they look like shadows, and there is music
like what you hear in the pines, but there are no trees, or
violins. She steps off into the clouds. I try to go too, and
there comes along what you call the egret of a thistle, that I
get on to, and it floats with me right into my bed, and I wake
up. So they discoursed until they issued from the woods,
in what was known as Deacon Hadlock's Pasture, an
extensive
enclosure reaching to the village, which it
overlooked
.
The village of Livingston lay at the junction of four streets,
or what had originally been the intersection of two roads,
which widening at the centre, and having their angles
trimmed off, formed an extensive common known as the
Green. In some points of view, the place had an aspect of
freshness and nature; extensive forests meeting the eye in
every direction; farm-houses partially hidden in orchards of
apple trees; the roads rough, ungraded, and divided by
parallel lines of green grass. Yet to one who should be
carried back from the present time, many objects would wear
an old, antiquated and obsolete appearance; the high-pitched
roofs of some of the houses, and jutting upper stories; others
with a long sloping back roof; chimneys like castles,
large, arched, corniced. Here and there was a house in
the then new style, three-storied, with gambrel roof, and
dormar windows. The Meeting-house was not old, but
would now appear so, in its slim tall spire, open belfry, and
swarm of windows. There were Lombardy poplars on the
Green, now so unfashionable, waving like martial plumes; and
interspersed as they were among the spreading willow-like
elms, they formed, on the whole, not a disagreeable picture.
South of the Green was the Mill, on Mill Brook, a stream
before adverted to; this was a small distinct cluster of houses.
Beyond the village on the east you could see the River, and
its grassy meadows. Livingston was the shire town of the
county of Stafford. The Court-house was a square yellow
edifice, with a small bell in an open frame set on the top of the
roof; the Jail was a wooden building constructed of hewn
timber. The Green contained in addition, a pair of Stocks, a
Pillory, and a Whipping Post; also one store, a school-house,
one tavern, known as the Crown and Bowl, one joiner's,
blacksmith's, shoemaker's, and barber's shop. The four streets
diverging from the centre were commonly called the North,
East, South, and West Streets. A new one had been opened
on the west side of the Green, and received the name of Grove
Street. Let us observe the situation of the principal
buildings
.
The Meeting-house stood at the north-west corner of
the Green; in the rear of this were the Horse-sheds, a long
and conspicuous row of black, ricketty stalls, having the
initials of the owner's name painted in a circle over each
apartment; at the east end of the sheds was the School-house;
and behind them terminated an old forest that extended
indefinitely
to the north. The Tavern stood at the corner
formed by the junction of the West street with the Green,
a few rods from the church. Below the tavern, flanking the
west side of the Green, in succession, were the Court-house,
Jail, and Jail-house, the jail-fence being close upon the
highway
.
The Pillory with its companions stood under the trees
in the open common fronting the Court-house; the store was
on the east side of the Green. The West street, that into
which Margaret and the Master entered from the Pasture,
ascending in a straight line about one hundred rods, curved
to the north, thereby avoiding the hills on which the Pond
lay, and became the main-road to Dunwich, a neighboring
town.
Master Elliman lodged with the Widow Small, who lived
on the South Street. Across this street, and not far from the
widow's ran the small brook, over which lay the Tree-bridge
above-mentioned. To this stream, we may add, the Master,
from some fancy of his own, gave the name of Kedron; and
the path by which they came through the woods he called
Via Dolorosa.
Children were playing on the Green, the boys dressed in
tongs, a name for pantaloons or over-alls that had come
into use, and round-a-bouts; some in skirt coats and breeches;
some of them six or eight years of age were still in petticoats.
The girls wore checked linen frocks, with short sleeves, and
pinafores. All were bare-footed, and most of them
bareheaded
.
He's coming! The Master! was a cry
that echoed from one to another. They dropped their sports,
and drew up in lines on either side as the object of their
attention
passed; the boys folding their arms and making short
quick bows; the girls dove-tailing their fingers and squatting
in low courtesies. Margaret, with Bull at her heels, came on
at a respectful distance behind. Moll Hart, exclaimed
one of the boys. A Pond Gal. An Injin, an Injin.
Where did ye git so much hat? Did your daddy make
them are clogs? So she was saluted by one and another;
but the dog, whose qualities were obvious in his face, if they
had not been rendered familiar in any other way, saved her
from all but verbal insolence.
The Master's was a ground room in an old house. It was
large, with small windows; the walls were wainscotted, the
ceiling boarded, and darkened by age into a reddish
mahogany
hue. The chairs were high-top, fan-back, heavy
mahogany. A bureau-desk occupied one side, with its
slanting
leaf, pigeon-holes, and escutcheons bearing the head of
King George. On the walls hung pictures in small black
frames, comprising all the kings and queens of England, from
William the Conqueror to the present time. Margaret's
attention was drawn to his books, which consisted of editions
of the Latin and Greek classics, and such school books as
from time to time he had occasion to use; and miscellanies,
made up of works on Free-Masonry, a craft of which he was
a devoted member; books of secular and profane music, a
science to which he was much attached; various histories and
travels; the works of Bolingbroke, Swift and Sterne; the
Spectator and Rambler; Milton, Spenser, Shakspeare, Ben
Jonson, Darwin, Pope, and other poets; Wolstoncraft's
Rights of Women, Paine's Age of Reason, Lord Monboddo's
works; Tooke's Pantheon; Burton's Anatomy of
Melancholy
;
the Echo, by the Hartford Wits, the American
Museum
,
and the Massachusetts Magazine; Trumbull's
McFingal
,
The Devil on Two Sticks, Peregrine Pickle; Quincy's
Dispensatory; Nurse Freelove's New Year's Gift, the Puzzling
Cap, the World turned upside down. He gave Margaret,
as he had promised, The New Universal Spelling Book, by
Daniel Fenning, late School-master of the Bures in Suffolk,
in England.
The Store, to which Margaret next directed her steps, was
a long old two-story building, bearing some vestiges of having
once been painted red. The large window-shutters and door
constituted advertising boards for the merchant himself, and
the public generally. Intermixed with articles of trade, were
notices of calves found, hogs astray, sales on execution;
beeswax
,
flax, skins, bristles and old pewter, you were informed
would be taken in exchange for goods, and that cash and
the highest price would be given for the Hon. Robert Morris's
notes. One paper read as follows: You Josiah Penrose, of
&c., are hereby permitted to sell 400 gallons W. I. Rum,
do. Brandy, 140 Gin, and 260 pounds of brown Sugar, on all
of which the excise has been duly paid, pursuant to an Act of
the Legislature.
(Signed) William Kingsland,
Collector of excise for the County of Stafford.
There was also on the door a staring programme of a lottery
scheme. Lotteries, at this period common in all New
England
,
had become a favorite resort for raising money to
support
government, carry on wars, build churches, construct
roads, endow colleges, &c. There was one other sign, that
of the Post-office. Entering the store you beheld a motley
array of dry and fancy goods, crockery, hardware, and
groceries
,
drugs and medicines. On the right were rolls of
kerseymeres
,
callimancoes, thicksets, durants, fustians, shaloons,
antiloons, ratteens, duffils and serges of all colors;
Manchester
checks, purple and blue calicoes; silks, ribbons,
oznaburgs, ticklenbergs, buckram. On the left were cuttoes,
Barlow knives, iron candlesticks, jewsharps, blackball,
bladders
of snuff; in the left corner was the apothecary's
apartment
,
and on boxes and bottles were written in fading gilt
letters, Arg. Viv. Rad. Sup. Virg. Ens Veneris,
Oculi Cancrorum, Aqua ris fixi, Lapis Infernalis,
Ext. Saturn. Pulvis Regal. Sal Martis, &c. On
naked beams above were suspended weavers' skans,
wheel-heads
,
&c., and on a high shelf running quite around the
walls was cotton warp of all numbers. The back portion of
the building was devoted to a traffic more fashionable and
universal in New England than it ever will be again; and a
row of pipes, hogsheads and barrels, indicated an article the
nature of which could not be mistaken. Above these hung
proof-glasses, tap-borers, a measuring rod, a decanting pump;
and interspersed on the walls, were bunches of chalk-scores
in perpendicular and transverse lines. Near by was a small
counter covered with tumblers and toddy sticks; and when
Margaret entered, one or two ragged will-gill looking men
4
stood there mixing and bolting down liquors. Had she looked
into the counting-room, she would have seen a large fire-place
in one corner, a high desk, round-back arm-chairs and
several
hampers of wine.
Margaret sat waiting for two young ladies, who appeared to
have some business with the clerk. These were Bethia
Weeks, the daughter of one of the village squires, and
Martha
Madeline Gisborne, the daughter of the joiner. The
clerk's name was Abel Wilcox.
For my part, said Miss Bethia, I don't believe a word
of it.
He has kept steady company with her every time he has
been in town, responded Miss Martha Madeline.
As if every upstart of a lawyer was to Captain Grand it
over all the girls here, added the clerk.
I don't think the Judge's folk are better than some other
people's folk, said Martha Madeline.
Susan is a nice girl, rejoined Bethia.
I should not be surprised if they were cried next Sabbath,
said Martha Madeline.
I guess there will be more than one to cry then, added
Bethia.
Now don't; you are really too bad, rejoined Abel.
This conversation continuing some time, was unintelligible
to Margaret, as we presume it is to our readers, and it were
idle to report it.
How much shall I measure you of this tiffany, Matty?
at length asked Abel.
Oh dear me suz! I don't know, she replied. Perhaps I
shall not take any now. You give three shillings for cotton
cloth, and this is nine and six a yard, I declare for't I shall
have to put to; and I must get some warp at any rate. We
have been waiting for some we sent up to Brown Moll's to be
colored, and I don't think it will ever be done.
There's young Moll now, said Abel, pointing to
Margaret
,
who was seated behind the ladies.
Has your Marm got that done? asked Martha Madeline.
No, she has not, replied Margaret.
A book, a book! exclaimed Martha Madeline, The
Ingin has got a book. She will be as wise as the Parson.
Can you say your letters? asked Bethia.
Yes, replied Margaret.
Who is teaching you?
The Master.
Pshaw! ejaculated Martha Madeline, I never was at
school in my life. Now all the gals is going; such as can't
tell treadles from treacle have got books. And here the Master
goes up to that low, vile, dirty place, the Pond, to larn the
brats.
Margaret came forward and stated her errand to the clerk.
Yes, I dare say, she wants rum, added Martha
Madeline
.
Daddy says there is no sense in it; they will all come
to ruin; he says Pluck and his boys drink five or six times a
day, and that nobody should think of drinking more than
three times. Parson Welles says it's
a sin
for any family to
have more than a gallon a week. There's Hopestill Cutts, he
has been kept out of the church this ten months, because he
won't come down to half a pint a day.
Never mind, interposed the clerk, I guess they will
find their allowance
cut
short this time, ha! ha! Here ain't
eggs enough, gal.
Marm says you must give a shilling a dozen, replied
Margaret.
Perhaps your Marm will say that again before we do,
rejoined the clerk. Eggs don't go for but nine-pence in
Livingston or anywhere else.
Margaret was in a dilemma;  the rum must be had, the
other articles were equally necessary.
Pa will pay you, she bethought herself.
No he won't, answered the clerk.
Chilion will bring you down skins, axe-helves, and
whip-stocks
.
I tell you, we can't and won't trust you. Your drunken
dad has run up a long chalk already. Look there, I guess
you know enough to count twelve, twelve gallons he owes
now. You are all a haggling, gulching, good-for-nothing
crew.
I will bring you some chesnuts and thistle down in the
fall, replied Margaret.
Can't trust any of you. What will you take for your
book?
I can't sell it; the Master gave it to me.
If he would teach you to pay your debts he would do
well.
A little girl came in about the age of Margaret, and stood
looking attentively at her a moment, as one stranger child is
wont to do with another, then lifting Margaret's hat as it were
inspecting her face, said; she is not an Injin; they said she
was; her face is white as mine. This little girl was Isabel
Weeks, sister of Bethia.
Ha, Belle! said the latter, what are you here for?
I came to see the Injin. Have you got a book too? she
said, addressing herself to Margaret. Can you say your
letters?
Yes, replied Margaret, but they want it for rum.
That's wicked; I know it is. Ma wouldn't let me give
my spelling-book for rum. I have threepence in my pocket
you may have them.
Save a thief from hanging and he will cut your throat,
said Martha Madeline.
Can't bore an auger hole with a gimlet, interjected
Abel; two threepences won't be enough, Miss Belle.
Judah has got tenpence, I'll go and get them, answered
Isabel.
The dog at this moment seeing the trouble of his mistress
began to growl, and the young ladies to scream.
Out with your dog, young wench, and go home, cried the
clerk.
Lie down, Bull! said Margaret. Here, sir, you may
have the book.
The bargain being completed, Margaret, taking her articles,
left the store; and Isabel followed her.
The lower classes are very troublesome, said Abel, we
have to take odds and ends, and everything from them. If
we didn't favor them a little, I believe they would take the
store by storm. Deacon Penrose says it is a mercy to
ourselves
and the town that we have liquors to sell. The other
day when I had been drawing a keg for Parson Welles, Ike
Tapley, because I wouldn't let him have the lick of the tap,
was as mad as a March hare. Precious little profit do we get
out of these folks.
Isabel walked on with Margaret across the Green in
silence
.
She said nothing, but with her pinafore wiped the
tears from Margaret's eyes. She was too young, perhaps, to
tell all she felt, and could only alleviate the grief she beheld
by endeavoring to efface its effects.
Margaret, happy, unhappy, fagged up the hill; she had lost
her book, she had got the rum; herself was miserable, she
knew her family would be pleased, yet she was wholly sad
when she thought of the Master and then of her book. She
left the highway and crossed the Pasture. The sun had gone
down when she reached the woods, she feared not; her
dreams, her own fresh heart, and Bull, were with her. The
shadow of God was about her, but she knew Him or It not;
she was ignorant as a Hottentot. She came to the bridge;
the water ran deep and dark below her. Who will look into
her soul as she looked into the water? Who will thread the
Via Dolorosa of her spirit. For the music, the murmurs of
that brook there were no ears, as there were none for hers.
Yet
she
looked into the water, which seemed to hiss and race
more merrily over the stones, as she looked. She heard owls,
frogs, tree-toads; and she might almost have heard the tread
of the saturnine wood-spider, at work in his loom with his
warp-tail and shuttle-feet, working a weft which the dews
were even then embroidering, to shine out when the sun rose
in silver spangles and ruby buds; and her own soul, woven as
silently in God's quilt, was taking on impressions from those
dark woods, that invisible universe, to shine out when her
morning dawns. Alas! when shall that be; in this world, in
the next? Is there any place
here
for a pure beautiful soul?
If none, then let Margaret die. Or shall we let her murmur
on forever, like the brook, in hopes that
some one
will look
into her waters and be gladdened by her sound. She ran on
through the Chesnuts, the strange old bald trees seeming to
move as she moved, those more distant shooting by the others
in rapid lines, performing a kind of spectral pantomine. Run
on Margaret! and let the world dance round you as it may.
When she reached home, she found the family all a bed,
excepting
Chilion, who sat in the dark, patiently, perhaps
doggedly
,
waiting for her.
Is she come? cried the father, waking from his sleep.
Give us a nip.
None of your sneaking here, old bruiser! broke out the
mother, rising in bed. You are a real coon that would
suck the biggest cock dry.
They both drank, and Margaret, having eaten a morsel
Chilion kept for her, went to her bed. She had not been
long asleep, when she was awakened by a noise below. Her
father was calling her name, Molly! Molly! She started
immediately to go down.
Never mind, Margery, spoke Chilion, from his own
chamber, as she descended the ladder. He will come out of
it soon.
Her father, overcome by his liquor, had fallen into a sort
of delirium. Bite, will ye? spit fire, ram lightning down a
babe's throat, Molly! Molly! She seized the convulsed
4*
arm of the old man, and rubbed it. There, there, she
said, it will be over soon. Her mother lay trussed and
frozen in sleep.
Sweet angel, said the father; hold on, put their tails in
the stocks and let them squirm,Ha! ha! ha! he laughed
out, changing his tone. There's pitch-forks, and swingling
stands, and two Bibles dancing a hornpipe, and Deacon
Penrose
playing on a rum-hogshead.
I shwum, cried Hash, swaggering down the ladder, if
they an't a toping the whole. Why didn't you tell me you
had got back, Peggy? He took the keg to make sure of
what remained.
Hash! Hash! cried Margaret, he thinks he's falling
off the bridge, I can't hold him.
Let him fall and be  and you too, was the reply.
The paroxysm began to subside, the old man's arm relaxed,
his breathing became easier. Margaret reascended the stairs,
whither Hash had already preceded her, and returned to that
forgetfulness of all things which God vouchsafes even to the
most miserable.
CHAPTER VII.
RETROSPECTIVE AND EXPLANATORY.
At
this day of comparative abstinence and general sobriety,
one is hardly prepared to receive the accounts that might be
given of the consumption of intoxicating liquors in former
times. In the Old World, drinking was cultivated as an Art;
it was patronized by courtiers, it fellowshipped with rustics;
it belonged to the establishment, and favored dissent; it
followed
in the wake of colonial migration, and erected its
institutions
in the New World. Contemporary with the foundation,
it flourished with the growth and dilated with the extension of
this Western Empire. Herein comes to pass a singular
historical
inversion; what we rigorously denounce as distilled
damnation, the Puritans cheerily quaffed under the names of
Strong Water, and Aqua Vit, Water of Life. While
we expel rum from our houses, as a pestilence, an earlier age
was wont to display it with a picturesque effect, and render it
attractive by environments of mahogany and silver.
In Livingston there were five distilleries for the manufacture
of cider-brandy, or what was familiarly known as pupelo.
There was also consumed a proportionate quantity of alcoholic
liquors of other kinds. The entire amount annually drank
among a population of about twelve hundred, could not have
been less than six thousand gallons. It found its way into
every family, loaded many side-boards, filled innumerable jugs;
all denominations of men were alike under its influence. In
the account kept with Parson Welles at Deacon Penrose's,
rum composed at least one half the items. Master Elliman, as
we have seen, was not exempt from the habits of his age. He
drank constantly and at times excessively. To the cheer
prevailing
at the Pond he was no stranger; but, on the other hand,
it afforded him no small satisfaction to become a sharer in
their potations. His botanical excursions were enlivened and
relieved by the humor of Pluck and the liberality of his
entertainment
.
In addition to this there were other causes operating
to bring together these two persons of qualities and manners
in some respects so apparently opposed. On these we must
beg the patience of the reader, while we briefly delay. The
first permanent settlement in Livingston was effected in the
year 1677, at the close of the war of King Philip or
Pometacom
,
the chief of the Wampanoags. The original
inhabitants
came partly from the old colonies; and were
reinforced
by migrations direct from Europe. A one-story
log-house
,
with thatched roof, was the original church, and stood
on the same spot with that to which the attention of the reader
has been called, a tin horn, in place of a bell, summoning the
people to worship. What is now known as the Green early
became the centre of the town, and on the four streets
before-mentioned
many of the planters established themselves. The
town underwent and survived the various incidents and
vicissitudes
that belong to our national history; Queen Anne's war,
Lovell's war, the Seven Years' war, incursions from the Indians,
drafts of men for the frontiers, small-pox, throat-distemper,
Antinomianism, Newlightism, Scotch Presbyterianism, an
attempted
visit from Whitfield, settling ministers, the
stamp-act
,
succession of sovereigns, kings in England, governors at
home, earthquakes, tornadoes, depreciation of currency, taxes,
etc. etc. A period of more exciting interest approached. The
question of a final separation from the mother country engaged
all minds. An organic system was instituted throughout the
country, embracing the states, counties and towns. Committees
of Safety, Inspection, Vigilance or Correspondence, whatever
they might be called, were formed in every village; these
cooperated
with the County Committees, which in their turn
became auxiliary to those of the State. The towns, say
our historians, assumed, in some respects the authority of an
individual community, an independent republic. The
Committee
met daily and acted in a legislative, executive and
judicial capacity. All suspicious persons were brought before
them, and if found guilty were condemned. Numerous
arrests, imprisonments and banishments were made. The
Committee was impowered to use military force. Many tories
and their families were expelled the State, and others
required
to give security to reside in prescribed limits; and
occasionally the jails, and even the churches, were crowded
with prisoners, and many were sent for safe-keeping to the
jails of neighboring States. An Association, as it was
termed, covenant, or oath, was prepared and offered for the
signatures of the people of Livingston. The sessions of the
court, which had been interrupted elsewhere, received little or
no disturbance in this town. Judge Morgridge, a resident of
the place, who received his commission under the king, and
faithfully administered the old laws of the State, was equally
devoted to the interests of the people. News of the battle of
Lexington had arrived; Tony, the negro barber, fiddler and
drummer, had gone through the streets at midnight, sounding
alarms from time to time. Court week came, and in addition
to such scenes as for many years had characterized that
occasion
,
trading, huckstering, wrestling, fighting, horse-racing,
multitudes thronging the streets; at the present moment there
assembled greater quantities of people, from Livingston itself,
and the neighboring towns, who were animated by unusual
topics. There was little business for the functionaries of law,
and more for the officers of the people. The County Committee
was in session. Numbers of delinquents were brought from
various parts, and lodged in the jail. The Crown and Bowl
was filled with people, among whom was Pluck. While others
were drinking to the Continental Congress, he toasted the
king; when rebuked, he replied in some wanton language.
This, in addition to other conduct of a suspicious nature,
exposed him to the action of the Committee, before which he
was taken; that body consisting in part of his fellow-townsmen,
Deacon Hadlock and Mr. Gisborne the joiner. The
proceedings
in his case may be known by the subjoined extract from
the records.
Livingston
,
August
28
th
, 1775.
Didymus Hart being summoned to this Committee, on the
information of sundry witnesses, that the said Hart on the
27th day of this month, had violated the laws of the Continental
and Provincial Congress, and done other acts contrary to the
liberties of the country, appeared, and after due proof being
made of said charge, the said Hart was pleased to make a full
confession thereof, and in the most equivocal and insulting
manner attempted to vindicate said conduct, to wit:
1st. Working on the Public Fast recommended by the
association
of ministers.
2d. Speaking diminutively of the County Congress, in
which they recommended to the people not to take Hick's and
Mill's paper.
3d. Not sufficiently encouraging people to sign the
Covenant
.
4th. Saying that his wife had bought tea, and should buy it
again, if she had a chance.
5th. At the Ordinary of Mr. Abraham Stillwater, with a
bowl of grog in his hand, drinking to the success of the king's
arms.
6th. Saying, `by Gd if this people is to be governed in
this manner, it is time for us to look out; and 'tis all owing to
the Committee of Safety, a pack of supple-headed fellows, I
know two of them myself.'
These charges being proved and the Committee having
admonished
said Hart, but he continuing his perverse course, it
was voted that said Hart is an enemy to his country, and that
every friend to humanity ought to forsake said Hart, until he
shall give evidence of sincere repentance by actions worthy of
a man and a Christian.
(Signed)
James Gisborne
,
Clerk
.
The next day an event occurred that aroused the people still
more against Pluck. Another individual in town had rendered
himself obnoxious to public sentiment. This was Col. Welch,
a brother-in-law of Judge Morgridge, who had derived his title
for services against the French in the Seven Years' war. He
occupied a large house at the head of the West Street, near
Deacon Hadlock's Pasture. He refused to sign the
Association
,
and used language which gave the people cause to doubt
his patriotism. He declined also accepting a command in the
Continental armies, and intimated that his present commission
could not be supplanted or displaced. He had already been
summoned before the Town Committee, where his replies were
not satisfactory. Further measures were proposed. At this
crisis of affairs, late in the evening, Judge Morgridge, with
some of his family, visited his brother-in-law, and informing
him of what was in progress, suggested that he had no other
alternative but recantation or flight. The Colonel replied that
the former he would not do, and if it came to the latter, that
should be done; and with his family made hasty preparations
for departure. In the middle of the night, he left Livingston,
went to New York, whence he ultimately sailed for
Nova-Scotia
.
When the two families had indulged those tokens of
regret, speedily finished, which were natural to the occasion,
and the Colonel was on the point of starting, it was discovered
that one horse delayed, and the cause was as soon obvious.
Csar, a servant of Judge Morgridge, was found clinging
passionately to Phillis, the servant of the Colonel. Such a
moment for the expression of what they might feel, was
certainly
most inopportune, and the two lovers were
unceremoniously
separated. The next morning Pluck understanding
from Csar what had happened, and withal as we say
now-a-days
,
endeavoring to make capital out of the fellow's distress,
appeared again on the Green, and more than half in liquor,
made boast of toryism, applauded the conduct of Col. Welch,
and declaimed on the cruelty practised towards the negro.
Already sufficiently odious, he would have done better not to
trifle with an indignant populace. He was declared not only
inimical but dangerous, and by order of the Committee was
confined in jail. Among a multitude of fellow-prisoners he
found one of whom till that moment he had known but little;
this was his townsman and subsequent acquaintance, Master
Elliman. This gentleman, inveterately attached to olden time,
without reverence for the people, and, as his subsequent
conduct
would indicate, with no other regard for kings than
consisted in a preference for an old and long-established state
of things over any new projects that might be proposed,
possibly
unwilling to have his quiet disturbed, perhaps averse to
receiving dictation from those whose children he had flogged,
or who themselves may have been under his thumb; certainly
not, we have reason to believe, from any conscientious scruples;
this gentleman, we say, received the Committee, who waited
upon him, with an irritating indifference, and refused to sign
the Association. It was considered unsafe to have him at large,
and he was thrown into prison. Here commenced an intimacy
that in the result proved not unfavorable to one as yet unborn,
Margaret. Whatever points of resemblance might exist
between
Pluck and the Master, became strengthened by their
confinement together, and their contrarieties were forgotten in
a sense of common calamity. The cells of the jail were
crowded, comforts were not abundant, and whatever relief
could be had from an exchange of sympathies, the convicts
would naturally betake themselves to; and in the result it
appeared that Pluck and the Master became very good friends,
and the visits of the latter to the Pond, originating in the
double cause which has now been related, were in after years
not infrequent. Add to this a deep and ingenuous interest in
Margaret, and we shall understand why he came so often to
her house, and exerted himself so readily for her instruction.
The durance of these two recusants lasted no more than two
or three months. Pluck, as being of less consequence, was
released almost on his own terms. In the Kidderminster
Chronicle appeared the following which relates to the Master:
Whereas I, the subscriber, have from the perverseness of
my wicked heart maliciously and scandalously abused the
character and proceedings of the Continental and Provincial
Congress, Selectmen of this town, and the Committees of
Safety in general, I do hereby declare, that at the time of my
doing it, I knew the said abuses to be the most scandalous
falsehoods, and that I did it for the sole purpose of abusing
those bodies of men, and affronting my townsmen, and all the
friends of liberty throughout the Continent. Being now fully
sensible of my wickedness, and notorious falsehoods, I humbly
beg pardon of those worthy characters I have so scandalously
abused, and voluntarily renouncing my former principles, do
promise for the future to render my conduct unexceptionable
to my countrymen, by strictly adhering to the measures of
Congress, and desire this my confession may be printed in the
Kidderminster Chronicle for three weeks successively.
Bartholomew Elliman
.
Test,
Abraham Stillwater,
Josiah Penrose,
Nathan Hadlock.
Livingston
,
Nov.
23
d
, 1775.
CHAPTER VIII.
MARGARET'S OLDEST BROTHER, NIMROD, COMES HOME.HE PROPOSES
A VARIETY OF DIVERSIONS.
Nimrod
made his annual visit to his father's. Where he
had been, or what he did, none asked, none knew. His
appearance
would indicate the sailor and the horse-jockery; he
wore a tarpaulin and blue jacket, a pair of high-top boots with
spurs and leather trousers; he flourished a riding stick,
commonly
known as a cow-hide, a pair of large gold rings dangled
in his ears. He rode a horse, a cast-iron looking animal, thin
and bony, of a deep grey color, called Streaker. He seemed
also to have money in his pocket, as he evidently had brandy
in his saddle-bags and humor in his soul. He brought one or
two books for Margaret, to whom he showed great attachment,
and whose general management seemed surrendered to him,
while he was at home. These books were Mother Goose's
Melodies, National Songs and Bewick's Birds with plates.
He gave her, in addition, a white muslin tunic with pink silk
skirt. Nimrod was tall in person; he had bluish, lively eyes,
light hair and a playful expression of face. All the family
seemed delighted with his return; Pluck, because his son's
temper was congenial with his own; his mother, for some
presents
;
Hash, because of the brandy; Chilion was happy to see
his brother; and Margaret for obvious reasons. He leaped
from his horse, as he rode up to the door, and ran to Margaret
whom he saw working on her flower-bed; raised her in his
arms, kissed her, set her down, took her up again, made her
leap on his horse, caught her off and kissed her a second time.
Can you spell Streaker? said he, which she did. Ah,
you little rogue! he added, you are spruce as a
blue-jay
.
Has the Indian come yet?
Yes, he was here last week.
An't you afraid of him?
No. The little girl that was with him gave me some
apples.
That's you, for a broad joe! Never be afraid of any body,
or anything, two-legged or four-legged, black, white, blue or
grey, streaked or speckled, on the earth or in the air. I have
learned that lesson. How is our other Margaret, the Peach
tree?
Don't you see what beautiful red peaches there are on it?
Yea, verily, as the Master says, this is like a
woodchuck
in clover. These are sweet and luscious as your cheek,
Margaret.
Nimrod ran into the house, and out to the cistern, and
towards the Pond, and up the Head. He shook his father's
hand heartily; to his mother he made a low bow; Hash
chuckled and grinned at sight of him, and Nimrod laughed
harder in response. Chilion greeted him cordially, but said
little. Bull he held up by his paws, made sundry bows
and grimaces to the dog, and talked to him like an old friend,
so that Margaret declared the animal laughed.
If Nimrod were enjoying a furlough or vacation, or anything
of the kind, it seemed to be his purpose to make the most of it.
He talked of the meeting in the woods, a turkey-hunt the
next moon, a husking bee, thanksgiving ball, racing and a
variety of things. In whatever he undertook Margaret was made his constant attendant; and at some risk even, he
carried
her into all scenes of wildness, exposure and novelty; nor
can it be said she was loth to go with her brother.
The meeting in the woods was the first in order of time.
This practice, imported from England, began to flourish
incipiently
in our country. From the suburbs of old cities, from
church-yards, court-yards, gardens, the scene was transferred
to pine forests, shady mountains and a maiden green-sward.
Heptenstall Bank was revived in Snake Hill. The scoffing
Kentishmen appeared in the Injins, No. 4's and Breaknecks.
What lived in Europe must needs luxuriate in America. The
jumpers of Wales were outdone by the jerkers of Kentucky.
The meeting was to be held in the district we have before
spoken of as Snake Hill, lying four or five miles north of the
Pond. Nimrod started off horseback, with Margaret behind
him on a pillion. Hash and Bull went afoot. At the Widow
Wright's, they found that lady with her son mounting their
horse,a small black animal resembling the Canada breed,
called Tim,and just ready to proceed on the same excursion.
The Widow was solemn and collected, and she greeted Nimrod,
for whom she had no strong affection, with a smile that a
susceptible
eye might have construed into coldness. Tim, the
horse, had a propensity for dropping his ears, biting and
kicking
,
when a stranger approached. He began some
demonstrations
5
of this sort as Nimrod came up. Whether Nimrod
regarded this an insult on Streaker, or was nettled at the
manner of the woman, or to gratify his own evil taste, he
dealt the horse a smart blow with his cowhide. Tim darted
off at a full jump; insomuch that Obed and his mother, with
all their use to his back and manners, had much ado to keep
their seats. Nimrod ambled forward, about a mile, crossed
the intersecting west road from the village, and came to a
house known as Sibyl Radney's, where he overtook the Widow
and her son, breathing their horse. Sibyl lived alone with her
mother in the woods, cultivated a small farm, kept a horse and
cow, mowed, cut wood, and did all her work without aid.
Her face and neck were deeply browned, her arm was like
that of a blacksmith. She was also getting ready for Snake
Hill. Nimrod contrived to stimulate the three horses into a
race, which was executed in a manner a fox-hunter might
have envied, through brambles, over stumps, across ditches.
The spot to which these riders directed their way was in a
forest on the crown of a hill. A circular opening had been
cut among the trees for the purposes of the meeting. At one
end of this amphitheatre was the pulpit, constructed of rough
boards; about the sides were arranged the tents or camps,
made for the most part of hemlock boughs. Seats of slabs,
logs and stumps were strown in front of the pulpit. In the
centre of the whole was a huge pile of wood to be kindled in
the evening for warmth, if need be, or for light. There were
also booths on the outside for the sale of cider, rum,
gingerbread
,
and the practice of various games. Here were
assembled
people from twenty different towns. Nimrod fastened
his horse to the trees amongst scores of others. The Widow
reminded Nimrod of the circumstances of the place,
admonished
him of his recklessness. I kalkilate God is here,
said she, and you had better not be pokin your fun about.
Compassionating the dangerous situation of Margaret, she
requested that she might be delivered to her care. Nimrod,
who thought he should find entertainment in a manner that
might not possibly be agreeable to the child, consented to
yield her to the woman. He and Sibyl went towards the
booths, and Mistress Wright, leaning on the arm of her son,
leading Margaret, entered the encampment. Three men in
black occupied the pulpit, their heads powdered, with white
stocks and bands, and straight square-cut collars. One of them,
a tall bronze-complexioned man, was addressing the people,
hundreds of whom filled the seats. The Preacher was
proceeding
in the way of narration. The sacred flame, said
he, has spread in Virginia. Brother Enfield, the assistant
in the Brunswick Circuit, conjectures that from eighteen
hundred
to two thousand souls have been converted since the
middle of May. Twelve hundred experienced the work of
grace in Sussex; in Amelia half as many more. Many
christians
had severe exercises of mind respecting the great noise
that attended this work of God. Some thought it was not
divine; yet from its effects they dare not ascribe it to Satan;
but when the Lord broke in upon their own families, they saw
it at once, and began to bemoan their own hardness of heart.
Many gospel-hardened, old, orthodox sinners, have, as mighty
oaks, been felled; and many high-towering sinners, as the
tall cedars of Lebanon, bowed down to the dust. As many
as fifteen or twenty commonly gave up in a day under
Brother Staffin's preaching, who is indeed a Samson among
the Philistines. It is no strange thing now for children
down to seven years of age to give in.
The Preacher then digressed in a strain of exhortation
designed to reproduce effects similar to those he had
recounted
.
A thunder cloud gathered in the sky, and buried
the woods in darkness. That, said he, is the shadow of
hell. It is the smoke of torments that ascendeth up forever
and ever. The thunder burst upon the camp, its hollow
roar reverberated among the hills. Behold! he exclaimed,
God proclaims his law in fire and smoke! It began to
rain, What! continued he, can you not endure a little
wetting, when you will so soon call for a drop of water to
cool your parched tongues? The lightning flashed upon
them, it blazed through the trees. The great day of the
Lord is coming, he went on, when the elements shall
melt with fervent heat; the heavens also shall pass away with
a great noise, the earth also shall be burned up. There was
a movement in the congregation; some shrieked out, some fell
upon their faces, some flung their arms wildly in the air.
Oh my soul! Lord have mercy! Jesus save!
Glory! glory! rang from seat to seat. It is the Lord's
doings and marvellous in our eyes, exclaimed one of the men
in the pulpit. Nimrod and his confreres from the booths ran
in to see what had befallen. There sat Obed waving to and
fro on his seat, groaning, and calling upon his mother. Yes,
my son, exclaimed the latter convulsively, its an orful
time. God has come, we are great sinners. I han't done my
duty by ye. Parson Welles would let us all go teu hell
together
.
What a mercy, exclaimed another, we can
come where the gospel is preached! O Lord, forgive me,
cried a third, for going to the Universalist up to Dunwich;
I do believe there is a hell, I do believe there is a hell.
I have been down among the Socinians, echoed a fourth.
God be praised I have found where there is some religion
at last. Glory, glory!
The Preacher, the storm and the effect increased. Some
fell away, some foamed at the mouth, some lay on the ground
in spasms, the faces of several grew white, others purple and
black, one appeared to be strangling and gasping for life,
another became stiff, rigid, and sat up like a dead man on his
seat; there were groans, sobs, shrieks, prayers and
ejaculations
.
There came a terrific crash of thunder, as if the
heavens
had split and the earth would give way. There was a
stifled groan, a retreating shudder among the people; the
Preacher himself seemed for a moment stunned. Margaret
shrieked and cried to the top of her voice, which sounded for
the instant like a clarion over an earthquake. Nimrod
impulsively
rushed among the people, dashed Obed from his seat,
seized Margaret and drew her out. The Preacher recovering
himself as he observed this movement. Son of Belial! he
broke forth, thinkest thou to stop the mighty power of God?
Will he deliver that child into thy hand as he did the children
of Israel into the hand of Chushan-rishathaim? Stop, on thy
soul, and repent, lest ye die.
I guess I shan't die before my time, retorted Nimrod,
nor any sooner for your croaking, old Canorum. The child
is gittin wet, and she is sca't. I han't lived in the woods to
be skeered at owls, I snore.
A scoffer! A scoffer! one or another exclaimed.
The people began to look up, and about them. The tide of
feeling was somewhat diverted. Oh! there will be
mourning
,
mourning, mourning, &c., was pealed forth from the
pulpit, and a full chorus of voices chimed in. The Preacher
renewed his exhortations, and the attention of the
assembly
was restored to the subjects that had occupied them.
The groans and sobs were renewed. This beats the
Great Earthquake all hollow, exclaimed one of the
congregation
.
Yes, echoed the Preacher, what a rattling
among the dry bones. Oh Lord! cried one of his
assistants
,
send an earthquake, shake these sinners, send it quick,
send it now. There were near four hundred converted at
the last earthquake in Boston. Oh! what a harvest of
souls we should have, brother! rejoined the Preacher.
Help me with your prayers brethren, as Aaron and Hur did
Moses.
In due time these exercises closed. After supper, in the
evening, the pile of wood was kindled, pine knots were lighted
at the corners of the pulpit; the horn blew and the people
reassembled. Margaret ran off into the woods with Bull and
laid down under a tree, her head resting on the flanks of the
dog, and her feet nestling in the soft moss. Nimrod was
drinking and roistering at the booths. Hash was beyond the
reach of influences spiritual or temporal. After the evening
service was over the people dispersed to their tents. A
middle aged man, Mr. Palmer, from the Ledge, happening in
the woods, saw Margaret asleep under the trees, took her in
his arms, carried her into one of the tents, and gave her in
charge of his wife. The good woman with one hand patted
Margaret on her head, while with the other she tended her
own with a pinch of snuff, and asked her if she didn't want to
be saved. Margaret replied that she didn't know.
The spirit is here mightily, said the woman, taking a
fresh pinch, won't you come in for a share?
It won't let me, replied Margaret.
You may lose your soul.
I havn't got any.
Mercy on me! exclaimed the woman, Don't you know
the devil will git you if you don't come in?
No it won't, replied Margaret, Bull won't let it.
What will you do when all the little boys and gals goes up
a singing?
I'll stay at home and hear Chilion play on the fiddle, and
read my new books.
Luddy mussy! can you read? Where do you live?
Down to the Pond.
Han't they got any of the religin at your house?
No, Marm, they drink pupelo and rum.
A born fool! ejaculated the woman with herself.But
she can read, she must be knowing. Wonder if the power
an't in her? She will certainly die, and she an't no more
ready than our Rufus.
The people began to crowd into the tent, among whom was
Mistress Wright and her son Obed. The Widow made
immediately
for Margaret, who with Mistress Palmer, was sitting on
the straw in a corner apart. She heard the latter lady's
soliloquy
,
and added, Oh no, I'm afeered she an't.
5*
What's the matter of the child? asked Mistress Palmer.
Don't know, Marm, replied the Widow. I wish sutthin
could be done for her, she's bred in orful wicked ways.
Any sick up your way, Miss Palmer? I've brought a few
yarbs with me. If we could only keep the poor sinners alive
long enough for um teu save their souls it would be a great
marcy.
The speakers were interrupted by noises in the tent into
which a large number of people had found their way, who
began to sing, exhort and pray. They had Obed down flat on
his back. His mouth was open, his eyes shut; he shook
spasmodically, he groaned with a deep guttural guffaw. Men
and women were over and about him; some looking on, some
praying, some uttering Glory! The Preacher came in,
a bland smile on his face, rubbing his hands; Good! he
ejaculated with a short, quick snap of the voice. The Lord
is here, Miss Palmer, said he.
Yes in truth, you told us we should have a great time,
rejoined the woman. But see this gal, I wonder if anything
can be done with her.
Ah my little lamb, said the Preacher, taking Margaret's
hand and drawing her gently towards him. Hope you have
found the Saviour, you are old enough to recent. Margaret
wrested herself from him. Why what's the matter, dear?
enquired the man. You are not one of the wicked children
that reviled the prophet, and the bears came out of the woods
and tare them in pieces?
I an't afraid of the bears, replied Margaret, pettishly.
A mazed child! a mazed child! exclaimed Mistress
Palmer.
Don't you want to be converted? asked the Preacher.
I don't like you, I don't like you, replied Margaret.
You hollered so and scared Obed, he's scared now. They
are hurting him, she said, pointing where the youth lay.
Darting from her company, she penetrated the crowd and
knelt down by the side of Obed. Poor Obed! she said,
don't make such a noise, Molly is here.
I am going to hell, hoarsely and mournfully replied the
boy.
The arrows of the Almighty are thick upon him,
ejaculated
the Preacher, approaching the scene.
If the Lord would only grant him deliverance! said his
mother, looking through the crowd.
Pray, brother, pray, sister, said the Preacher, addressing
one and another. Jacob wrestled all night in prayer with
God. The Ark is now going by. Three have already closed
with the offers of mercy in Dunwich tent.
Don't cry so, Obed, said Margaret. They shan't hurt
you.
The devil is in that child, take her away, said the
Preacher.
Some one endeavored to pull her off. Let me alone, she
exclaimed, I can't go, I won't go, and she adhered to the
boy, whose arm had become closed about her neck as a man
in a fit.
There was a jarring hubbub of voices; men and women
reeking with excitement, and vieing one with another who
should pray the most importunately.
What the devil are ye doing here? shouted a still louder
voice over the heads of the crowd. It was Nimrod, who
half-intoxicated thrust himself among them. Bite um Bull,
bite um, he rubbed the dog's ears and holding him between
his legs, teazed him into a piercing yelp and howl that
startled
the people.
Bull! Bull! shrieked Obed. He's comin, he'll bite
me. The lad sprang to his feet and stared wildly about.
Satan has come in great wrath, cried the Preacher.
Yes, and I guess you know as much about him as
anybody
,
old cackletub! rejoined Nimrod. You set them all
a going, and then snap them up like a hawk.
Hoora! shouted another of the scoffers from the other
side of the tent. I hearn him comin down from a tree jest
now; look out or he'll be in your hair, white-top.
I've cotched him by the tail, said another of the fry,
twitching the dog, who thereupon renewed his roar.
Pray, brethren, pray! said the Preacher, and the people
began to pray more lustily. As with the sound of rams'
horns the walls of Jericho fell down, so shall these sinners
tremble before God.
Where's Sibyl Radney? cried one of the opposers.
She's got the bellows pipe for ye, and will let ye have some
of the broomstick too, if you want.
Oh! oh! screamed Margaret, you hurt me. They
are treading on my toes. Nimrod! Nimrod! I can't get
out.
Margaret, are you in there, like a mouse among cats?
hallooed her brother.
Yes, and Obed is here too.
Let Obed go to Ballyhack. Come along out.
Cast him out of the synagogue, cried the Preacher.
Back with ye, said a man making up to Nimrod. The
Lord is here.
Guess you will find somebody else is here too. Take
yourself back, replied Nimrod, at the same time rendering
the man a blow that nearly levelled him with the ground.
I can't stay here, said Mistress Palmer.
Hope the Lord won't leave us yet, responded a woman
at her side.
I fear the spirit will be grieved to depart, said another of
the company.
How many souls will perish for this man's wickedness!
sighed the Preacher.
Sibyl Radney rushing forward, seized Margaret, whom
she held like a pup, under one arm, and with the other
cleaved her way through the people. The lights were
smothered; there was a surging to and fro; the props of the
tent broke asunder; some ran one way, some another; others
were trodden under foot. Margaret found herself in the
woods supported by Sibyl. Nimrod presently appearing, said
they must go home. Sibyl helped him mount his horse, and
Margaret contriving to keep her brother in equipoise, they
returned to the Pond.
CHAPTER IX.
MARGARET SUCCESSFUL IN A NOVEL ADVENTURE.
A few
days afterwards, there came to the Widow Wright's
Mr. Palmer from the Ledge, the man who found
Margaret
in the woods and delivered her to his wife. He
purchased
of the Widow a prescription for his daughter Rhody,
who he said was not in strong health, and then stated that his
family had been troubled for want of water, and intimated a
conjecture of his wife that Margaret was one in whom resided
the faculty of discovering it, and asked the Widow if she
would accompany him to Pluck's, and aid in procuring the
services of the child for the purpose indicated. They went
to Margaret's house, where Mr. Palmer gained the consent of
the family to his object, and especially that of Nimrod, who
evinced a positive delight in the project, and even volunteered
to be Margaret's gallant on the occasion. They all proceeded
together, accompanied by the Widow, who suggested that her
personal attention might be of some benefit to Rhody. The
Ledge was six or seven miles from the Pond; it was properly
speaking a marble quarry, and belonged to Mr. Palmer, who
with his sons, in addition to a large farm they cultivated,
sometimes worked at gravestones and hearths.
Mr. Palmer was in popular phrase a forehanded man, his
house and barns were large, and his grounds indicated thrift.
He had three sons, Roderick, Alexander and Rufus, stout,
vigorous boys; and one daughter Rhody about eighteen, who
evinced a sickly temperament, but was otherwise a
fair-looking
,
black-haired girl. This family were obliged to bring their
water from a considerable distance, not having been able to
find a spring near the house. Agreeable to the doctrines of
rhabdomancy, formerly in vogue, and at the present moment
not entirely discarded, a twig, usually of the witchhazle, borne
over the surface of the ground, indicates the presence of
water, by immediately moving in the hand. The number of
persons would seem to be small in whom this power is lodged,
or through whom the phenomenon exhibits itself. It appeared
that the neighborhood had been canvassed for an operator, but
none succeeded. It occurred to Mistress Palmer, at the Camp,
that Margaret might be endowed with this rare gift, and the
child was accordingly sent for. The family at the Ledge
showed great joy on the arrival of the party from the Pond.
Mistress Palmer took a pinch of snuff, and helped Margaret
from the horse, and even received Nimrod kindly, although
his pranks at the meeting might have operated to his
prejudice
.
The large pewter tankard of cider was passed round,
but Margaret refused to taste, saying she should prefer water.
Dear me! we han't got a drop of decent water in the
house, exclaimed Mistress Palmer. The gal shall have
some milk, the best we have; Rhody get some of the
morning's
;
pour it out cream and all. Of this Margaret drank
freely. Poor thing! ejaculated the lady, she don't know
as she has got a soul, and our Rufus is nigh as bad, for he
won't do nothing to save his.
I tell you what it is, Marm, rejoined Rufus, her youngest
son, about twelve or fourteen years of age; I an't a going
to have that old preacher whining and poking about me. I
believe I can get to heaven without his help; if I can't, then I
am willing to stay away.
Well, well, child, replied the mother, I shall not care
how, if you get there at all, only I want you to be a good
boy. She took a large pinch of snuff. These preliminaries
being settled, and Margaret having received her instructions
to hold the stick firmly and tell when it moved, proceeded on
her duty. She made sundry gyrations, she traversed the
grounds about the house, she tried the garden, but effected
nothing. It is too wet, said one; it is too cold, said a
second; it is too dry, said a third; it is too warm, said
a fourth. Mistress Palmer took a pinch of snuff. Another
trial was proposed. The child went farther from the house,
she perambulated the orchard. All looked on with a
breathless
interest; she moved about slowly and carefully, the stick
held horizontally forward in her two fists  a little diviner,
in a green rush hat and Indian moccasins; the wind shook
her brown curls, her blue checked pinafore streamed off like a
pennon. Did they do wrong to use a little creature so? Yet
is not God useful? Is not Utility the sister of Beauty? At
last she cried out that it moved. Mr. Palmer hastened
forward
and struck his spade into the spot; Margaret ran off.
The boys came up with hoes, crows and shovels, and began
to dig. Presently there were signs of water, then it bubbled
up, then it gushed forth a clear limpid stream. Mr. Palmer
praised God. The boys hooraed. Mistress Palmer took a
pinch of snuff.
Taste on't, Alek, said Rufus.
No, replied the father. It belongs to the finder to be
the first taster. The gal, where is she?
Rufus was despatched for Margaret. He found her at the
quarry trying to get a hare-bell that grew far above her head.
The boy crouched under her, and she stepping on his
shoulders succeeded in reaching the flower. When she would
have descended Rufus fastened his arms about her, and bore
her off on his back, papoose-like. Approaching the spot
where the water was found, she leaped down and scudded
around the house, Rufus pursued, she laughed, he laughed, and
full of frolic, he brought her to the spring. She said she was
not dry and would not drink, and would have run away again;
when Nimrod prevailed with her to the end desired. Then
they all drank, and pronounced it excellent water. Mistress
Palmer said it was soft and would wash well; Mistress
Wright declared it was nice to boil mint in; Alexander didn't
care if he hadn't to lug any more from the brook. All were
satisfied, and Margaret became a wonder.
A sumptuous home-made dinner, with a suet
Indian-pudding
and molasses for dessert, was served on bright pewter
plates with stag-horn knives and forks. After this, Rufus
brought Margaret a marble flower-pot he had made, also a
kitten very well executed, which he had cut from the same
material. Rhody gave her a root of the Guelder rose. Mr.
Palmer paid the Widow handsomely for her visit to his
daughter, whose case she elaborately investigated. He offered
money to Nimrod, who refused it. Mistress Palmer made
Margaret a present of linen cloth of her own weaving, enough
for two or three entire under dresses.
Thank Miss Palmer, said Nimrod to his sister.
Oh no! exclaimed the lady. Take it and welcome,
and anything we have got. But do, my young friend, she
added as he was mounting his horse, do think on your ways,
strive, strive, who knows but you may find the good thing at
last. And the little gal  she is a good child as ever was. It
was very kind of her to come all the way up here, and do us
a service. She is worth her weight in gold. I hope she will
have a new heart soon. Here, she continued, let me help
you on. Margaret scarcely touching the woman's hand
sprang to the pillion. Why, how she jumps! She is as
spry as a cricket. How pretty she does look up there behind
you; I must have a kiss out of her,  there,  remember thy
Creator in the days of thy youth  and don't you forget, my
young friend  good day.
I want Rhody to kiss me, said Margaret.
Run Rhody, said her mother. So Rhody went forward
and kissed Margaret.
Did Rhody kiss you? asked Nimrod, when they had
rode on awhile without saying anything.
Yes, was the reply.
CHAPTER X.
THANKSGIVING, OR NEW ENGLAND'S HOLIDAY.  MARGARET HAS
HER DIVERSION.
It
is a noticeable fact, that we of the present age have
fewer holidays than our puritanical ancestors. The King's
Birth Day, was formerly celebrated with great pomp; in
addition
there were enjoyed Coronation Days, the Birth of
a Prince, Accessions and Burials of Governors, Victories in
War, Masonic Festivals, to say nothing of Military Reviews,
Election Days, Ordination of Ministers, Executions for
Murder; and at a still later period Washington's Birth Day,
now almost forgotten, The Fourth of July, at present diverted
to a Sunday-school or Temperance Festival. But of
Thanksgiving
;
a day devoted to mirth, gratefulness, hospitality,
family love, eating, drinking; a day sometimes externally
snowy, rainy, benumbing, drenching; internally so elastic,
smiling, lark-like, verdant, blithe; it is not sanctified or
squandered like Merry Christmas in the Old World; it has no
gooding, candles, clog, carol, box, or hobby-horse; it has no
poetry or song; it does not come in the calendar, only by the
Governor's proclamation; New Englanders can sing with Old
Englanders, mutatis mutandis:
Now thrice welcome Christmas,
Which brings us good cheer,
Minced pies, plum porridge,
Good ale and strong beer,
With pig, goose and capon,
The best that may be,
they cannot add,
With holly and ivy
So green and so gay,
We deck up our houses
As fresh as the day,
With bays and rosemary
And laurel compleat.
Our houses and churches are brown and sear as the gardens
and orchards about them. The cedar may be green in the
woods, the box-tree, the fir and the pine together, we never
use them. In both cases, there is, or was, an abundance of
wassailing, dancing, gaming, shooting, and if one pleases to
say, Heathenrie, Divelrie, Dronkennesse, Pride. We have
no budding oak or holy-thorn, which sprang from the staff of
Joseph of Arimathea, and bears milk-white blossoms every
Christmas day, in the forests of Glastonbury; although we
have no doubt such trees might be found in our woods.
Unlike
Christmas, bread baked Thanksgiving Eve moulds never
the slower. Yet, bating ecclesiastical days and a few calendar
superstitions, which the dissenting Colonists left behind, how
much did they not bring with them from their native soil!
We owe, says the Democratic Review, our political
institutions, and nearly all the arrangements of our public,
social and domestic life, to our English ancestors. In
addition
to religion, language, habits, costume, fashions, science,
art, architecture, agriculture, the military and naval art,
horses, carriages, cows, sheep, grasses, bells, knives and forks,
crockery and glass ware, apples, pears, peaches, etc. etc.,
there floated across the sea, and has descended the stream of
time, idiosyncrasies of temper, idioms of speech, rhetorical
figures, colloquial metaphors, an entire dialect of vulgarisms,
ballads, madrigals, maxims, apologues, saws, witticisms, jokes,
snibs, witchcraft, bigotry, omens, signs, a thousand and one
fanciful calculations on the moon, the weather, beasts, birds,
persons,  a whole argosy. Some of these may be traced to
the Saxons and Britons, in unbroken succession. They still
exist in England, Germany, Sweden, nay, everywhere. We
must look perhaps for some great Oriental centre, some
fountain
head beyond the Indus. The fathers of the Sanscrit,
the authors of the Vedas, the original Brahmins, whoever they
may have been, possibly the step-sons of Noah, seem to have
given population, language, law, philosophy, superstition, and,
saving Christ, religion to the world.
John Bull and Brother Jonathan, a North Briton and a
Yankee, have the same flesh and blood, the same corpuscular
ingredients, the same inspiration of the Almighty. The latter
differs from the former chiefly in this, breadth; his legs are
longer and his feet larger, because he has higher fences and
steeper hills to climb, and longer roads to travel; he is more
lank because he has not time to laugh so much, since it takes
him so long to go to mill, to pasture, to his neighbors; he is
less succulent and oozy because he gets dry and hardened in
the extensive tracts of open air he has to traverse; he is
6
more suspicious because in his circuits he meets with more
strangers; he is more curious for the same reason; he is
more inventive and calculating for this same breadth, that he
has not aids at hand, and must depend on himself; his eye is
keener because he sees his objects at a greater distance; he
is more religious because he has farther to go for his religion,
that is to say, to meeting; men valuing what costs them
much;  the whole difference is breadth, interminable forests,
rivers, mountains, platitudinous farms, families reaching from
the Madawaska to the Yazoo. The same cause operates to
distinguish the Kentucky hunter from the Yankee, cypress
swamps, alligators, catamounts, the Indians, the Mississippi.
Sam Slick is an elongated and skinny John Browdie, and
David Crockett is the same critter, knobbed and gnarled.
Thanksgiving was an anti-Christmas festival, established as
a kind of off-set to that. Yet both are a fealty paid to the
universal gala-sentiment. We cannot always work, we cannot
always pray. So say young and old, grave and gay. Hence,
Hindoo Doorga, Celtic Juul, Jewish Succoth, Japanese
Majira, the Panathena, Fte des Fous, Volks-fest, Carnival,
Halloween, Christmas, Thanksgiving.
Thanksgivings have been observed  what do we say?
The first Thanksgiving must have been of God's own ordaining
about the beginning of the new year 1621, that is to say, the
25th of March, at New Plymouth, after a dismal winter of
destitution, disease and alarm, when the snows were melting,
and brooks of sweet fresh water broke loose, the children
found a new May-flower peeping from the dead leaves, the
buds of the dog-wood began to swell, and the birds to sing,
the sick and lame recovered apace, and the Colonists saw
something that looked like living and home. The first
Thanksgiving
by authority, was, if we are agreed, June 13, 1632.
We can hardly call this a New England Thanksgiving,
inasmuch
as it embraced but a handful of the people. The Indians
must have kept it as a Fast.
Thanksgivings were appointed for the removal of
sickness
,
the precious life of our Sovereign; success of
the king of Prussia, the conquest of Martinico, that God
had been pleased to support our most gracious Queen in the
perils of childbirth, for success against the Indians, so that
scarce a name or family remain in their former habitation,
the suppression of rebellion in Great Britain, the near
view of peace. Fasts, the antipodal holiday, were
proclaimed
by reason of the small-pox, earthquakes,
inundations
,
and other calamities in Europe, distressing Indian
wars, that we may be preserved against the rage of the
heathen, the great number of insects, drought,
unseasonable
rains, divisions in our churches, the Ranters
and Quakers, the low estate of the people of God, some
heathen yet in hostility, the great distresses of Ministers,
their salaries being paid in depreciated paper.
Thanksgiving was at hand for Livingston, the Pond,
Nimrod
,
Margaret. Its succedanea, as respects the latter, were a
turkey shoot the next day, and a ball the following night, at
No. 4. If Margaret had lived in the village, or almost any
where else than at the Pond, she might have enjoyed the meeting
of families, parents and children, grandparents and
grandchildren
,
uncles and aunts, nephews, nieces, cousins; she
might have partaken in the consumption of pigs, turkeys, geese,
ducks, chickens, plum-pudding and plum-cake, pumpkin,
mince and apple pies, beer, cider, flip; she might have gone
to church and heard a discourse from Parson Welles on the
distressing state of the times, and the imminent danger from
French influence, and learned what a Philistine Napoleon
Bonaparte was; she might have gone to a party of boys and
girls at Esq. Weeks's, and played blind-man's-buff, run
round the chimney, and button, button, who's got the
button; but she did not. Yet she was quite busy at home.
Two or three of the preceding days she spent riding about
with Nimrod to invite company and arouse interest for the
ball. They went to Mr. Pottle's at Snake Hill, and Mr.
Dunlap's
at Five-mile-lot, where they also encountered the camp
Preacher sedulously disputing the field with them. They went
also to the Ledge, where the Preacher followed. But Mistress
Palmer decided the question by saying that Roderick, her
oldest son, had professed a hope and would not think of going,
but that Rhody had not come forward at all, and she thought
it would do her good to have the exercise, and that Rufus, if
he had been serious, had lost his impressions, and it would not
do him any harm to go. They went into the various districts,
and left some invitations in the edge of Dunwich and Brandon.
The party was designed to be select, and all people of a certain
caste and character were carefully omitted. Thanksgiving
Eve was kept at the Pond in this wise; their candles were pine
torches, which they flourished about the premises, under trees,
in the shed, in pursuit of hens and turkeys; their clogs were
large clumps of wood, stumps, twigs, &c. crowded into the
immense fire-place; their carol consisted of oaths, smirks,
songs; for ale they had an abundance of pupelo. No St.
Nicholas watched about the chimney during the night, or filled
Margaret's stocking in the morning. Who is the patron saint
of Thanksgiving?
Only Chilion made her a present of a beautiful
blue-painted
sled to coast with when the snows came. It was
framed of the best materials, put together in the form most
fitted for speed, shod with highly polished steel, and named
Humming Bird. They had stewed chicken and crust coffee
for breakfast, and for dinner chickens roasted by strings
suspended
before the fire, potatoes, brown bread and cider. Pies
and cakes were wanting. The remainder of the time was
occupied in preparing for the events of the next day, scouring
guns, brushing shoes and coats, polishing buckles, &c.
Nimrod
took occasion to renew his instructions to Margaret in the
dancing art, and Chilion intimated some of his best tunes.
No. 4, to which the attention of the family was now directed,
lay in a valley below the Pond, formed by the passage of Mill
Brook, and was enriched by nature with fine intervals and
excellent drainages. The approach to the place was by a
narrow
,
woody, rocky road or lane. Opposite you, on the south,
rose a gradually ascending eminence and range of hills that
jointed the horizon. Through No. 4 ran the highway from the
village of Livingston to Brandon, a town on the south-west.
Here was a large tavern, known as Smith's, and a distillery
owned by the same gentleman. In the language of a writer
of the times, this hamlet presented a spectacle of houses
without windows, barns without roofs, gardens without
enclosures
,
fields without fences, hogs without yokes, sheep
without
wool, meagre cattle, feeble horses, and half clad, dirty
children, without manners, principles or morals. The people
were loungers about the tavern, which seemed to have
exhausted
the life of the place, and to have diffused over it
instead
,
dearth, indolence, dreariness and sterility. This was a
large two-story house, having a long stoop in front. Between
it and the Brook was the Still, a long black building, surrounded
by barrels and hogsheads of cider. Near the tavern was held
the turkey shoot, the day after Thanksgiving, to which Nimrod
took Margaret, and Hash carried one or two turkeys. It was
chilly and drizzling, and Margaret was deposited in the kitchen
of the tavern, where she had a chance to become acquainted
with Mr. Smith's daughters, the Gubtail's, Hatch's, Tapley's
from the neighborhood, Paulina Whiston, Grace Joy and Beulah
Ann Orff from Breakneck. The bar-room was filled with men
and boys, fumes of rum and tobacco, and a jargon of voices;
the air about was charged with the smoke of powder; the
turkeys were perched on a stump and tied by the leg: there
were the report of rifles, the running to and fro of men and
boys; disputes about the shots; wrangling, wrestling; in all
which Margaret had no share. Thus passed the fore part of
the day.
In the evening, Nimrod, as one of the masters of
arrangements
,
with Margaret, came early to the tavern. Soon the
ladies and gentlemen began to assemble. Of the number
were Pluck and his wife, the Widow Wright and Obed, and
Sibyl Radney; among the spectators were several elderly men
and women from the neighborhood; among the loafers were
Abel Wilcox, the clerk, Hancock Welles, grandson of the
Parson, from the village. The hall was a long unfinished
upper room; the naked timbers, joists and sleepers, were
garnished
with branches of pine and hemlock, laced with wreaths
of ground laurel. Tallow candles were supported in wooden
blocks on the walls, and rude benches were fixed to the sides
of the room. The ladies' dresses presented considerable variety;
some had made requisition on the wardrobes of their
grandmothers
,
some had borrowed from their neighbors, servants
from their mistresses; in some appeared the latest style of the
cities; several wore gowns of their own manufacture, striped
or checked linen, with flowers elaborately wrought with the
needle. There were sacques, trails and one or two hoops.
There were corsages long and pointed, round and medium,
high and narrow. Sleeves were tight, short and bordered with
ruffles. All had necklaces of gold, glass, or waxen beads.
The coiffures were equally diversified, ringlets, crockets,
twists, tye-tops, crape cushions, toupees, sustained and
enriched
with brass and gilt clasps, pins, silk and velvet fillets,
feathers and flowers. The shoes were striped with a white
welt. There was an agreeable intermixture of old and faded
brocades and damasks, rustling padusoys, shining lutestrings,
changeables, embossed linens, and plain white muslins. Many
wore ear-hoops of pinch-beck, as large as a dollar. On the
side of the gentlemen was a similar blending of old and new
patterns. If Joseph's coat of many colors had been
miraculously
enlarged, and cut up into separate garments, it would
form the appropriate suit of this assemblage, in which red,
blue, yellow, chocolate, butternut, green and all hues but
black, were represented. Some wore a costume resembling
that of the Master's, we have before described. The hair of
most of the gentlemen was powdered, and some had it done in
6*
tyes, queues, frizzes. Of buckles there were silver, plated,
brass, iron, steel, pewter and paste. Most of them sported
ruffle cuffs. Margaret wore the new dress Nimrod bought her,
and her moccasins. Pluck retained his leather apron, his
wife had donned a clean long-short. Chilion, the chief
musician, wore a pearl-colored coat, buff swansdown vest,
white worsted breeches and ribbed stockings. Tony
Washington
,
the negro barber from the village, and assistant violinist,
had his head powdered, wore a crimson silk faded coat with
long skirts, ruffle cuffs and white smalls. It was a singularly
freaked and speckled group. There were burly, weather-beaten
faces under powder and curls; broad, hard hands in kid gloves;
thewy, red elbows that had plied brooms, shuttles, cards,
frisking lace ruffles; there were bright eyes, smiling faces and
many pleasant words. Chilion, whose general manner was
reserved and obscure, grew animated when the dance began.
Margaret, omitted at first, was presently called up by Rufus
Palmer. None were so young and small as she; but she
enacted her part with vigor and precision. Her father asked
her for a partner, and it gave her new life when she saw she
pleased him. She was, for the most part, among strangers, in
a strange place and strangely occupied. The lights, the open
fantastically shadowed garret above, the evergreens, the
windows
shining with the dew of so many breaths, the mystic
motion, steps which one takes and comprehends not, balancing,
gallopading, confusion harmonized, oiled intricacies,
ploughboys
graceful and boors mannerly, earnestness of participation,
so earnest that even in the height of the game no one smiles;
and then above all and in all, the clear, exhilarating,
penetrating
notes of the violin, and Chilion's violin, that she always
loved to hear, played in its best way; the life of all this life,
the motion of this motion, the inspirer and regulator of this
maze,she felt grateful to her brother, and for the rest, she
seemed to enjoy it with a deep unconsciousness of joy. One
might have noticed her brother Chilion peculiarly employed.
He not only controlled the action, but seemed to gratify
himself
in varying and modifying it. He evidently fantasied with
the company. He made them move faster or slower as he
pleased. He might have been seen watching the effect of his
viol, or his own effect through it. Whatever power he
possessed
he exerted to the utmost. He seemed to be playing
more upon the dancers than upon his instrument. In the
midst of a figure he would accelerate the parties, drive them
from point to point with the wildest rapidity. In a
contradance
,
to the Campbells are Coming, never did plaided
Highlander leap down his native rocks with a more headlong
step than those same pied bumpkins sprang over that hall floor.
He slackened the motion at the close, and dismissed them
quietly to their seats. In one of the intermissions, might have
been seen entering the place the indefatigable Preacher. He
stole through the crowd, erected his tall dark form on a bench,
and taking advantage of the pause, broke upon them like a
thunder gust. His loud, guttural, solemn voice, rang through
the room.
Thus saith the Lord God, thy pomp shall be brought down
to the grave, and the noise of thy viols!
A sermon! A sermon! cried Abel Wilcox.
Preacher
. You look fair and seemly, but you are stench
in the nostrils of the Almighty.
Crowd
. Another set, who'll lead off?
Preacher
. The Lord will take away the bravery of your
tinkling ornaments, your cauls and round tires like the moon,
your chains and bracelets and mufflers.
Pluck
. Let us praise God in the dance, praise him with
the stringed instruments. Let us, as David did, dance before
the Lord.
Preacher
. This place shall be as God overthrew Sodom
and Gomorrah; owls shall dwell here, and satyrs shall dance
here.
Crowd
. Peggy and Molly! The Haymakers, Here's
Zenas Joy and Delinda Hoag want `Come haste to the
Wedding!'
Preacher
. You stand on slippery places, your feet shall
stumble on the dark mountains.
Crowd
. Chorus Jig! Hoa! Chilion, where are you?
Chilion
. Take your partners.
Preacher
. Rhody Palmer! Sylvina Pottle! Myra Dunlap!
are you in this scene of noise and confusion? Didn't you
come forward to be prayed for? Myra, didn't you profess to
have submitted? Oh! oh! God has been at Snake Hill,
Five-mile-lot
and the Ledge, and he would have gone clear through
Breakneck and No. 4, but for this dance! And here I espy
the arch-adversary of souls, the contriver of your eternal ruin,
the very devil himself in your midst.
Nimrod
. The devil you do.
Preacher
. Young man, you will have your portion in
hell-fire.
Nimrod
. I go to hell if I do.
Preacher
. The deep damnation of God is prepared for
you.
Nimrod
. I be damned if it is.
Preacher
. What profanity! what blasphemy to add to the
catalogue of your sins.
Chilion
. All ready.
The words of the Preacher, as not unusually happens, were
disregarded. He pitched his voice still higher. They danced
the faster, Chilion played with the greater energy. The
Preacher himself exhausted, or discouraged, became at length
a listener, and finally his eye was rivetted to the scene before
him. Chilion played on almost wildly. Tony seconded the
purposes of his master to the best of his endeavors, his teeth
and eyes shone with a terrified whiteness, and the powder from
his hair sprinkled his face. Chilion was unmoved in the storm
he raised. Curls uncurled, ruffles were ruffled, trains trailed;
but the dance went on. Margaret revelled in the movement;
she danced as to the winds; she knew her brother, she loved
his power, she leaped out his spirit and tones. She sprang
through the figure like a shuttle, she spun round and round like
a top. Chilion, in his own time, softened the measure, and
suffered the piece to glide away in the gentlest pulsations.
The night waxed and waned. The Preacher, the elderly
people and children, and other spectators had gone; most of
the dancers left.
Here we must recede a moment to relate that in the
forenoon, Hash the brother of Margaret, and Zenas Joy, a
resident of the place called Breakneck, had a serious
misunderstanding
about a shot the latter made at a turkey set
up by the former. Numbers came forward to the arbitration,
and in the result it happened that the interests and jealousies
of all parties became joined in issue, and the strength and
prowess of the several neighborhoods were arranged under the
respective standards of the Pond and Breakneck. It was
proposed
to adjust the difficulty by a champion from each side in
a wrestling match. A rain, however, separated the
combatants
,
and broke up the ring. At the supper-table in the
evening, the subject was renewed. Again at this late hour of
the night, there were not wanting causes to stimulate the feud
in such as remained. Mr. Smith, the tavern-keeper, brought
forward a fresh supply of liquors, of which both gentlemen
and ladies freely drank; and the two young men from the
village had no other business than to foment and egg on the
rivalships of the several districts. A final dance was called
for; but there appeared little self-possession, either in respect
of temper or limb. Chilion played a while, and then
relinquished
his instrument. Zenas Joy seized Hash by the
collar; Joseph Whiston tripped Obed, who, poor youth, was
already nearly down with liquor; Abel Wilcox spurred Rufus
Palmer to tread on Beulah Ann Orff's trail; Grace Joy taunted
Nimrod with a false step Margaret had taken; Sibyl Radney
rushed into the fray, pounced upon Zenas Joy, and sent him
whirling about the room, as she would a spinning wheel. So
one and another were engaged. Margaret, who had left the
floor, was standing by the side of Chilion. She looked at the
quarrellers, and then at her brother. He snapped his viol
strings, and was silent.
Sing, Margery, at length he said. He began a familiar
tune, Mary's Dream,  he played and she sang. This
twofold melody, sweet and plaintive, seemed to touch the
hearts of those excited people. They stopped to hear, they
heard to be won. They moved towards the music; they were
hushed if not subdued, they parted in peace if not in
harmony
.
Thus ended their Thanksgiving, and we must end
ours, and turn to other times and scenes.
CHAPTER XI.
A REVISED ACCOUNT OF NIMROD AND HIS DOINGS.
We
shall omit the wild-turkey hunt of a bright autumnal
moon-light night in the woods, exciting and engaging though
it was, and the race with Streaker, in which Margaret bore no
part, while we proceed to enumerate some particulars of her
eldest brother, that have a relation to herself. Nimrod evinced
a volatile, roving, adventure-seeking habit from his boyhood.
The severe waspish temper of his mother he could not abide,
the coarse, dogged despotism of Hash he resented; Chilion
was only a boy, and one not sufficiently social and free; with
his father he had more in common. At the age of fourteen
he became an indented apprentice to Mr. Hatch the
blacksmith
at No. 4. But of the different kind of blows of which
he was capable, he relished those best that had the least to do
with the anvil. He liked horses well enough, but preferred
their hides to their hoofs; and became more skilful with the
fleam than the buttress. He left his master in a rage, himself
in good humor. He next let himself at the Crown and Bowl
in the village, where one might fancy he would find his
element
.
He was hostler, bar-tender, wood-bringer, errand-boy,
chore-doer, farrier, mistress'-man, waiting-maid's man and
everybody's man by turn. He entertained travellers at the
door, girls in the kitchen and boys in the stoop. He was
quick but he always loitered, he was ingenious yet nothing
was well done. It would not seem strange that he should
prove a better auxiliary to every one's taste and fancy, than to
Mr. Stillwater his employer's interest. He hung a flint stone
on the barn-door to keep the devil from riding the horses in
the night; but this did not prevent indications of their having
been used at unlawful times and in unlawful ways, which
their owner was disposed to charge upon Nimrod. He was
dismissed. While he served others at the bar he must needs
help himself, and he became at an early age an adept in what
an old writer denominates the eighth liberal art. At the close
of the revolutionary war, it became more difficult to fill
vacancies in the army, than it had been originally to form
companies. There were Classes in Livingston, as
everywhere
else, whose duty it was to furnish a certain number of
soldiers, as exigency required. By one of these, Nimrod, not
yet fifteen years of age, but of due physical proportion and
compliance, was hired. He joined a detachment ordered on
the defence of our northern frontier.
But even military discipline was insufficient to correct his
propensities, or reform his habits. He deserted, and crossed
the Canada lines. He connected himself with a band of
smugglers that swarmed in those quarters, and during the
spring of the year 1784, we find him in New York in a sloop
from up river. The vessel was anchord in the stream not far
from the Albany Basin. She had a deck-load of lumber, and
wheat in her hold, the ordinary supply of the country at the
time; her contraband goods were stowed in proper places.
Government, both state and national, was pressed for means;
the war, taxes, suspension of productive labor, had heightened
necessity, and diminished resource. Duties were great, but
legislation was irregular. The city held in its bosom many
who had suffered during the late contest. The general
amnesty
while it retained the disaffected, failed in some cases to
reconcile them. Hence smuggling, while it grew to be a
most vexatious practice, was one of tolerably easy
accomplishment
.
Laws were severe, but there was wanting the force to
execute; the police was more numerous than energetic. Still
the business demanded skill, caution and prudence.
Late in the evening, the cabin of the sloop was visited by
an elderly gentleman in buff coat and breeches, having an
eagle holding an olive branch wrought on his left breast. He
was addressed by the Captain as Mr. Girardeau. He
complained
bitterly of the times, the rise of taxes, financial
depressions
,
the decline of real estate and sundry misfortunes.
He said that his clerk, meaning thereby his daughter, had
eloped, and that his old servant Simon was dead. He had
evident connection with the private objects of the vessel, and
under his supervision preparations were made for carrying the
contraband articles to his own store in the city. These,
consisting
of silks, ribbons, laces, &c. were laid in coffin-shaped
boxes, and Nimrod with another of the crew was detached as
porters. They rowed, in a small boat, as far as the beach in
Hudson Square, threaded a lane along the woods and hills of
Grand Street, came down through the marshes and fields of
Broadway, till they reached a small wooden house lying under
a hill back of the City Hall, which was the residence of Mr.
Girardeau whom they found waiting to receive them. They
encountered several of the police stationed on the skirts of the
city, one of whom they frightened by intimations of the
small-pox; another they avoided by slinking into the shadows
of trees; another they succeeded in stupifying by drafts of
rum, a supply of which they carried in their pockets. Nimrod
recounted his adroit passages to Mr. Girardeau, who seemed
pleased with the success if not with the character of the
youth; and, in fine, hearing him highly recommended by the
Captain, he the next day engaged him, under the assumed
name of Foxly, to fill the place recently held by his deceased
servant Simon. Nimrod was nothing loth to exchange
masters
,
and enter upon new scenes. Mr. Girardeau's quarters
comprised both his store and dwelling-house. The building
was one of the old style, having its gable to the street. In
the rear of the shop-room was a kitchen, and above were
sleeping apartments. In the first instance, Mr. Girardeau
intimated to Nimrod the necessity of a change of apparel, and
that he must wear one of a color like his own. He himself
had been a resident in the city during the war, while the
British had possession, and at that time wore a scarlet coat,
with the arms of the king. At the peace, he changed his hue
and badge. In the next place, he undertook to indoctrinate
his new servant in the secrets of his business, and to impress
upon him a sense of the responsibleness of his vocation.
I  I should say we,  'tis all one concern, one interest,
so his employer unfolded himself, we are poor, we are
embarrassed
.
You, Mr. Foxly, perhaps know how awful a thing
poverty is. You can understand me. We are opposed, we
are maltreated, we are vilified. Enemies beset us night and
day; even now they may be listening to us through the
walls.
Nimrod, who was not without a tincture of the superstition
of his times, notwithstanding his ordinary display of
fearlessness
and daring, started. They won't take us off in the
night, will they? exclaimed he.
Yes, in the night, replied Mr. Girardeau.
Then I may as well be a packing, said Nimrod. I
can't stay here. I thought you hadn't any of them in the
city.
Why the city is full of them, rejoined Mr. Girardeau,
hence we see the necessity of care, confederation and
secrecy.
But they come in anywhere, answered Nimrod. They'll
whisk you right out of your bed. Aunt Ravel had seven
pins stuck into her in one night. Old uncle Kiah, that used
to live at Snake Hill, was trundled down hill three nights
agoing, and his skin all wore off, and he grew as lean as a
gander's leg.
Mr. Foxly! interrupted Mr. Girardeau, you
misunderstand
me,  I see you are from the country, a good place,
but you misunderstand me. It is men I mean, not spirits.
We have no witches here, only hard-hearted, covetous,
ignorant
,
griping, depraved, desperate men.
Sho! its humans you are speaking of, replied Nimrod;
I an't no more afraid of them than a cat is of a wren. I
like them, I could live among them as well as a fish in
water.
Mr. Foxly! continued Mr. Girardeau, solemnly. We
have
something to fear from men. Here likewise you
mistake
.
I fear you are too rash, too head-strong.
Anything, Sir, answered Nimrod, I will do anything
you wish, he added, more soberly. I will serve you, as
they did the troops in the war, work for nothing and find
myself.
You may well say so, added Mr. Girardeau, Simon was
faithful, he spared himself to provide for me. We are in
straits, we must live frugally. Persecution surrounds us.
We have enemies who can do us a great injury. I can be
made to injure you, and you to injure me. We need
circumspection
,
we are, if I may so say, in one another's power.
There are those who might take advantage of my necessities,
to compel me to surrender you to the rigor of unjust laws,
and you might end your days in a prison. My whole life has
been one of exposure and want, labor and toil. Thus was
Nimrod addressed. In the third place, added Mr. Girardeau,
I must admonish you, Mr. Foxly, and most rigidly enjoin,
that on no account are you to have conference, or hold any
relations with a certain young woman, that sometimes comes
here, whom I will point out to you. Nimrod found upon the
premises a little black-eyed boy eight or nine years of age,
whom he took for the grandson of his employer. This boy
was sent to school, and when at home played on the hill back
of the house, and slept in a room separate from Nimrod's,
with whom Mr. Girardeau did not seem anxious that he
should have much intercourse. These three constituted the
entire family. Nimrod became cook, washerman, porter, and
performed with alacrity whatever duty was assigned him.
How Nimrod relished his new service and new master
for a
while
, we need not relate. He could not fail, however, to be
sensible that his food was not quite as good as that to which
he had been accustomed, and to find that his master did not
prove exactly what he expected. He found Mr. Girardeau to
be, to say the least, harsh, arbitrary, exacting; he began to
suspect something worse than this; he believed he told him
falsehoods; that he had money, and that in abundance. As
he lay on the counter, where he usually slept at night, he was
sure he heard the sound of coin in the room over head. Of
the young woman, respecting whom he had been cautioned,
he saw nothing, till one day, he heard voices in the chamber.
He listened at the foot of the stairs, and distinguished a
female's voice. There were sharp words, severe epithets.
Presently a woman came hurriedly down, and passed into the
street.
Did you see that girl? asked Mr. Girardeau, descending
immediately afterwards.
Yes, Sir, replied Nimrod.
She is my daughter, added Mr. Girardeau. Yes, my
own flesh and blood. You know not the feelings of a father.
She has been guilty of the greatest of crimes, she has
disobeyed
me, she has violated my will, she has endangered my
7
estate. She has married to her own shame, and my grief.
I have borne with her, till forbearance becomes a sin. She
would strip me of my possessions. The author of her
degradation
she would make the pander to her cruelty. I am
doubly beset, they are in a conspiracy against me. Heed her
not, listen not to her importunity, let her suffer. I have no
feelings of a father; they have been wrenched and torn
away; I cannot own a viper for a child.
Nimrod thrust his fists in his waistcoat pockets, where he
clenched them angrily. He was silent. He listened as to an
unanswerable argument; he believed not a word. In the
mean time let us refer to some events wherein his own
interest
began to be awakened; and which we shall embody in a
new chapter, with a new title.
CHAPTER XII.
THE STORY OF GOTTFRIED BRCKMANN AND JANE GIRARDEAU.
Among
the Mercenaries, popularly known as Hessians,
employed
by England against America during the war of our
Revolution, was Gottfried Brckmann. He was, properly
speaking, a Waldecker, having been born in Pyrmont, an
inconsiderable
city of that principality. From what we know of
his history, he seems to have shared largely in the passion for
music, which distinguishes many of his countrymen. To this
also he added a thirst for literary acquisition. But, being a
peasant by caste, he encountered not a few obstacles in these
higher pursuits. He became bellows-boy for the organ in the
church of his native town, and availing himself of
chance-opportunities
,
he attained some skill on that instrument.
He played well on the harpsichord, flute and violin. In
the French language, at that time so much in vogue
among the Germans, he became a proficient.
Nevertheless
,
he fretted under the governmental yoke that was laid so
oppressively and haughtily upon the necks of that class of the
people to which he belonged. His conduct exposing him to
suspicion, he fled into the region of country described as the
Hartz Mountains. Whatever of romance, literature, poetry,
descended into the mass of the population; whatever of
legendary tale or cabalistic observance was cherished by the
common heart; whatever of imaginative temper, ideal
aspiration
,
or mystic enthusiasm has ever characterized any portion
of his countrymen; Brckmann possessed; and in the vicinity
where he now found himself, there was a supply of objects
fitted to animate the strongest sentiments of his being, and
scenes and associations that were congenial with his
inclinations
;
forests of oak and beech, fir and pine; every kind
and conformation of rock; birds of all descriptions;
cloud-piercing
hills, unfathomable chasms; lakes embosomed in
mountains; waterfalls; mines and smelting-houses, with the
weird and tartarean look of the workmen and their
operations
;
gorgeous sunsets; dense and fantastic fogs; perennial
snows: points of local and traditionary interest; the Altar
and Sorcerer's Chair, the seat of the festival of the old Saxon
idol, Crotho; the grottoes Baumanshole and Bielshole; a cave
reputed, at the time, to have no termination; wildness,
irregularity
,
terror, grandeur, freedom and mystery, on every side.
In addition, were little villages and clusters of houses in
valleys embowered in forests, and overshadowed by mountains,
into one of which Brckmann's wanderings led him, that of
Rubillaud, through which runs the Bode. Here in the midst
of almost inaccessible rocks and cold elevations, he found
fruit-trees in blossom, fields green with corn, a small
stonechurch
surmounted with a crucifix, a May-pole hung with
garlands, around which the villagers were having their
Whitsun
dances. In this place he remained awhile, and was
engaged as a school-teacher for children, the parents of whom
were chiefly miners. Here, as we subsequently learn, he
became warmly attached to one of his pupils, Margaret
Bruneau
,
daughter of the Pastor of Rubillaud, who was a
Lutheran. In her he found tastes and feelings like his own.
With her he rambled among mountains, penetrated caves,
sang from rocks; and had such an intercourse as tended to
cement their affection, and prosecuted whatever plans were
grateful to their natures. But in the midst of his repose, came
that cruel and barbarous draft of the British Crown on the
German States. Some of the inhabitants of Rubillaud, who
were subjects of the King of Hanover, were enlisted in this
foreign service. Requisition was made on several provinces
then in alliance with England, Brunswick, Hesse Cassel,
Hanau, Anhalt and Waldeck; and on Brckmann's native
town, Pyrmont. The general league formed among these
princes against the peace and liberty of their people, would not
suffer that Brckmann should escape. He was seized, as if
he had been a felon, and forcibly taken to Rotterdam, the
place of embarkation. The reluctance with which this body
of levies contemplated the duty to which they were destined,
will be understood when it is told, that they were obliged to
be under guard on their march to the sea-coast; that many of
them, bound hand and foot, were transported in wagons and
carts; some succeeded in deserting; others making the
attempt
were shot. Brckmann, for some instance of
insubordination
,
received a wound at the hand of his own Captain, from
which he never entirely recovered. Swords ruled souls.
Their avaricious and tyrannical lords let them out as slaves,
and had them scourged to their tasks. Brckmann and
Margaret
parted in uttermost bitterness of spirit, and with the
fondest expressions of love. They wafted their adieus and
prayers to each other across the bridge of the Bode, over
which he was rudely snatched, to see her in this world no
more forever.
We shall not follow him through the fortunes of the war;
but hasten to its close, when he was stricken and overwhelmed
by the news of Margaret's death. A strong bond, and
perhaps
the only one that attached him to his native country, was
broken; and, in common with many of his countrymen, he
chose to remain in America after the peace. These
Germans
,
such as survived,more than eleven thousand of their
number having perished during the war,scattered
themselves
;
some joined the settlements of their brethren in
Pennsylvania
,
some pushed beyond the Ohio, some were dispersed
in the New England States. Brckmann took up his abode
in New York. Those who returned to Germany he bade
plant Margaret's grave with narcissus, rosemary and thyme,
and visit it every Whitsun Festival with fresh flowers; while
he would hallow her memory with prayers and tears in his
own heart. He was disappointed in purpose, forsaken in
spirit, broken in feeling. Contrary to the usual maxim, he
loved those whom he had injured, and was willing that whatever
of life or energy remained to him should be given to the
Americans, while he remembered the land of his birth with
sorrow, upbraidings and despair.
Owing to our numerous and profitable relations with France
at this time, the French language had arisen in the popular
estimation, and was in great request. He would teach it, and
so earn a livelihood, and serve the land of his adoption.
Music too, the musical spirit of Margaret and of his native
country, that which survives in the soul when everything else
is prostrate, came over him. He would live again in song.
He would recall the scenes of the past. Margaret would
reappear in the tones of their love and their youth; her spirit
would echo to the voice of his flute; in song, like night, they
would meet again; by an invisible pathway of melody they
would glide on to the grave. Poor Brckmann! Poor
America! What with his deficiency in our tongue, and his
former services against our liberties, he obtained but few
scholars. Superior and more agreeable Frenchmen were his
rivals. Music! How could we pay for music, when we could
not pay our debts? The crescendo and diminuendo were
other than of sound our people had to learn. He grew
sicker at heart, his hopes had all fled, and his spiritual visions
seemed to grow dimmer and dimmer. He sat by the narrow
window of the small unlighted room he rented, in the night,
and played on his flute to the darkness, the air, the groups of
idle passers by, to memory and to the remote future whither
his visions were flying, and the fair spirit of his reveries had
betaken herself. Yet he had one and not an unconcerned
listener, and perhaps another. These were Jane Girardeau
and her father. Mr. Girardeau had discovered the sound of
the music proceeding from the hill behind his house, and his
daughter listening to it. He called her in; she would go up
to the chamber window, and repeat her curiosity. He ordered
her to bed; she would creep from her room, and sly into the
street that she might hear it. He detected her, rebuffed her,
and locked her into her room. Can you indulge such
extravagance
?
was the language of Mr. Girardeau to his
daughter. Can you yield to such weakness? Will you
waste your time in this way? Shall I suffer in you a
repetition
of all your mother occasioned me? Will you hazard
your reputation? Why will you so often break my commands,
and thwart my wishes? Shall I be compelled to resort to
harsh measures? Are you growing so perverse that
moderation
is of no avail? I will have none of this. You are
impudent
,
beastly.
His daughter ill brooked all this. To the mind of her
father, she was rash, reckless, turbulent, obstinate, wasteful,
inordinate, selfish, lavish, insensible. She was lavish, but only
of her heart's best affections; she was rash, not in head, so
much as in impulse; she was insensible, but only to the
demands
of lucre; she was troubled, not turbulent; she was
7*
inordinate, for no want of her heart had ever been supplied;
she was selfish in the sense of obeying her nature, while she
disregarded the behests of stupidity and meanness.
Jane had rebelled under the iron jurisdiction of her father.
Like the hidden fires of the earth she broke out wherever she
could find vent. She was held down, not subdued. She was
too elastic to flatten, too spiritual to stagnate. She rebounded
with a wild recoil. Her fits of anger, or sallies of spirit,
whatever they might be called, were frequent and energetic.
As she grew older, she became more sensible of her
degradation
and wrongs, as well as more capable of redressing them.
She was the only child of an ill-assorted marriage. She
became of some service to her father. Her personal beauty
was an attraction to customers, and he valued her aid as
shopgirl
.
She presided over the department of the store devoted
to the sale of fancy goods, which, obtained in various ways,
afforded enormous profits, and became an item of trade,
that, notwithstanding her father's extensive and multifarious
business, he could not well forego. She was also a good
accountant
and book-keeper. Brckmann was straitened for
means. His quarterly rent was due. He would make one
effort more; and that perhaps the most dangerous for a poor
man; he would borrow money. He knew of the broker near
by, he knew his reputation for great wealth. He had no
friend, no backer. He obtained a certificate from the parents
of one of his scholars, to the effect that he was believed to be
an honest man. He presented himself at the store of Mr.
Girardeau. Jane was there; she recognized in him the
flute-player
,
whom she had sometimes seen in the streets, or at his
window. Brckmann was a Saxon throughout; his eyes were
full blue, his complexion was light and fair, his hair was of a
sandy brown, thick and bushy. Dejection and disappointment
were evidently doing their work upon him. His face had
grown thin, his eyes were sunk, and his look was that of a
sick man. He addressed Mr. Girardeau in broken English.
Speak in your own language, said the latter gentleman,
I can understand you. He stated briefly his object. Mr.
Girardeau looked at the note, and replied in German, Hard
times, Sir, hard times; securities scarce, liabilities uncertain,
business dull, great losses abroad, foreigners do not appreciate
our condition. He then proceeded to interrogate Brckmann
on his business, circumstances, prospects. There were two
listeners to the answer, father and daughter, both intent, but
in a different manner. The old gentleman ordered Jane away
while he transacted a little private business. She retreated to
the back part of the store where she persistingly stood; and it
was obvious, although the stranger spoke in his own tongue,
she comprehended what he said. From one thing to another
Brckmann was led to recite his entire history; his birth, his
retreat to Rubillaud, his interest in Margaret, his enlistment,
his service in the war, Margaret's death, his present method
of support. Mr. Girardeau replied, in brief, that it was not
in his power to accommodate him. The agitation of
Brckmann
was evidently intense at this repulse; and there seemed
to be aroused a corresponding sympathy of distress in the
heart of Jane. The story of the stranger interested her, it
took strong possession of her imagination. As he left, her
thoughts followed him with that most agonizing sense of
powerless
compassion. Could she but see him, could she but
speak with him, she would bestow upon him her condolences,
if she could offer him no more substantial aid.
Jane studied day and night how she might encounter the
unhappy stranger, the enchanting musician. To perfect her
for his purposes, her father allowed her to do a little business
in her own name. These earnings, ordinarily devoted to
some species of amusement or literary end, she now as
sedulously
hoarded as increased. She discovered where
Brckmann
had some pupils in a private family. Thither, taking
her private purse, she went; sought her way to his room, and
seated herself among the scholars. She heard the recitation,
and the remarks that accompanied it. She discerned the
originality of Brckmann's mind, as she had formerly been
interested in the character of his sensibilities. He spoke in
a feeble tone, but with a suggestive emphasis. She knew well
the causes of his depression. He sang also to his pupils one
of his native hymns, she admired its beauty and force, and
perhaps more the voice of the singer. She stayed behind
when the scholars left. He spoke to her. She replied, to his
surprise, in his own language, or something akin to it. She
told him who she was, that she had heard his story, that she
compassionated his wants, that her father was abundantly
rich, and that from her own earnings she had saved him some
money. She pressed upon him her purse, which neither
delicacy
demanded, nor would necessity allow that he should
refuse. She told him how much she had been interested in
his history; she desired him to repeat it. Tell me, said
she, more about Margaret Bruneau. He related as much
as the time would permit.
She was reproached, she was maledicted by her father, on
her return, although he knew not where she had been. An
Idea had seized her, and for that she was willing to sacrifice
everything. It had neither shape, nor color, nor definition, nor
end. She thought of it when she went to bed, she dreamed
of it, she awoke with it. She would see the stranger. She
went again to his school-room. She walked with him on the
Parade. Tell me, she would say, more about Margaret.
How old was she? How did she look? How did you love
her? Why did you love her? He would repeat all he had
said before and discover new particulars each time.
Were her parents rich or poor? asked Jane.
Poor, replied Brckmann.
Happy, happy Margaret! O if my father were poor as
the sheerest mendicant I should be happy.
You may be able to do much good with your money,
sometime or another.
I see nothing before me but darkness and gloom, replied
Jane. My father,you know what he is. My dear, dear
mother, too fond of her child, too opposed to her husband, too
indulgent, too kind,she has gone from my love and my
approach forever. I may be in the midst of affluence, I am
cursed, blighted by a destitution such as you know nothing of.
Gold may be my inheritance, my prospects are all
worthless
,
fearful, sombre. You say you will meet Margaret in
heaven!
Speak freely with me, said Brckmann, I love to hear,
if I cannot answer. Margaret and I often talked of what we
could not comprehend. We strove to lift each other up, even
if we made no advance. She had a deep soul, an unbounded
aspiration. We sang of heaven, and then we began to feel it.
We were more Sphinxes than dipuses. Yet she became
Heaven to me, when there was none in the skies. She was a
transparent, articulate revelation of God.
How I should love Margaret! said Jane to him one day.
What was the color of her hair? like yours?
No, replied Brckmann; as I have told you, she was
not of German origin. Her ancestors came from Languedoc
in the Religious Wars. She was more tropical in her features,
and perhaps in her heart, than I. She had black hair and
eyes, she resembled you, Miss Girardeau, I think.
How I wish I could see her! replied Jane. You say
she does come to you sometimes?
Yes, said Brckmann, and since I have known you she
comes more frequently, more clearly. My perishing heart had
scarce power to evoke her. My song became too faint a
medium. You have revived those visions, those refreshing
communions.
Then I am happy, said Jane; I knew not that I had
such a power. You, sir, know not the misery of being able to
make no one happy. I torture my father, I plague Simon. I
am of use to no one. And my poor self answers not for
itself. * * * * *
How could you, Mr. Brckmann
Call me not that, he said, interrupting her, call me
Gottfried, as Margaret always did.
Then you must do the same by me, she replied, you
must call me Jane; though no one does but father and Simon.
But if you will call me so, I shall forget that any one else ever
has. I was going to ask how you came to fight against our
poor country?
I never did, he said, my heart and soul were with the
Americans. I was forced into the work. I was bayoneted to
the lines. My musket shared the indisposition of its owner,
and shot at random. Wounds that had been spared by those
against whom I was arrayed, were anticipated by my own officers.
Often staggering under the effects of a blow received in
Germany
,
when I attempted to escape, have I been drawn out
against those, so called, my enemies; and at this moment am
I sensible of the pain.
Yet you might have been killed in battle, said she,
and I, poor, ridiculous, selfish me! should never have seen
you.
Nor I you, he rejoined; I know not which is the most
indebted.
It cannot be supposed these interviews were had without
greatly provoking the indignation of Mr. Girardeau. He
noticed the frequent, and sometimes protracted absences of his
daughter; he traced them to the indigent German, whose
application for money he denied, to the villanous musician
that had given him so much annoyance. His passion had no
bounds. He ceased to expostulate; he raved, he threatened;
he shut Jane into her chamber, he barred the door, he declared
he would starve her. As Jane had never learned filial
obedience
,
so she had not disciplined herself to ordinary patience.
Even in matters that concerned her interest and happiness
most vitally, she was impetuous, inconsiderate. She could
bear imprisonment, she could bear starvation, she could bear
invective and violence; she could not endure separation from
Brckmann. She had, in respect of him, new and joyous
sensations
,
enchanting her whole existence. She looked on him as
a superior being. She felt that he alone could understand her,
appreciate her, sympathize with her. She felt that of the mass
about her, he only seemed to have a common nature with her.
She thought not of his poverty, or his dejection. She thought
only of his soul into which she could pour her own. She was
eager for him, as a child for its mother's breast. His love for
Margaret Bruneau only heightened his value in her eyes. He
seemed for his devotion to Margaret Bruneau, purer, greater,
diviner. He and Margaret constituted to her mind a
delightful
company. She entered a magic circle when she came into
their communion. She became one of a glorious trio. Then
she saw herself interpreted and resembled in Margaret; and
she acted as a conjuration to bring that delightful vision from
the shades. Brckmann she assisted, encouraged, enlivened;
she rendered him more hopeful, more happy. And she herself
had no life, except as he was able to explain that life. His
soul seemed to respond to hers, and her own grew serener and
stiller as it received that response. He, too, will suffer,
she said to herself, if he sees me not. His own heart will
break again. Margaret will come to him no more; and
every thought of his uneasiness or suspense vibrated, like a
fire, through her.
Mr. Girardeau waited to see some tokens of his daughter's
repentance and amendment, but none appeared. The more
completely to secure his purposes, he instigated a prosecution
against Brckmann, on the score of debt, and he was thrown
into the City Jail. The old gentleman then approached his
daughter, apprized her of what had befallen her friend, and
announced his final decision. He told her if ever she saw
Brckmann again, if ever she communicated with him by word
or letter, he would turn her into the streets, he would close
his doors upon her forever, he would disinherit her, and cast
her off to utter shame, destitution and wretchedness. With
whatever tone or spirit this sentence may have been
distinguished
,
and there could be no mistake as to its general
purport, its effect on Jane was scarcely perceptible. Her die
was cast, her resolution taken. She undid the fastenings of
her room, she escaped into the street. Going to the Jail, she
obtained access to the cell and was locked in with Brckmann.
Through his drooping heart and wasting frame he received
her with a bland, welcome smile. She fell at his feet, and
poured herself out in a torrent of tears, her swollen heart broke
in sighs, sobs and convulsions. His kindness reassured her,
and she told him what had transpired. But, she continued,
Gottfried, I must see you, I must be with you, I cannot live
away from you, I die without you. Existence has not the
faintest charm, not a solitary point of interest, if I am
separated
from you. You have awakened within me every
dormant
and benumbed faculty. You have spread over time the
hues of a higher being. You have given back to my soul the
only answer it ever received; with your eyes I have looked
into myself and discovered some beauty there, where before
was only a deep and frightful chaos. In a world of
shallowness
and stupidity you alone have anticipated, understood,
valued me. I repose on you as on the breast of God. You
have introduced me to an elevated communion; you have
welcomed me to the participation of yourself and Margaret;
you have inspired me with a desire to know more of the laws
of the spirit's life. For all this I have made you no return.
I am little, how little, to you. You owe me nothing, I owe
you everything.
Jane, said he.
Do not interrupt me now, she continued. Let my poor
soul have its say. It may be its last. I have now no home
on earth but you. May I remain with you? May I hear your
voice, look into your eyes, be blessed and illumined by your
spirit?
Is it possible, said Brckmann, that your father will
never relent? He needs you, his own fortune is under
obligations
to you.
You know not my father
, was the decisive reply. He
is fixed, inexorable, as the God he serves. I look to you, or
to vacancy, to nought, to the sepulchral abyss of my own
soul, to the interminable night of my own thoughts. To be
poor is nothing, to be an outcast is nothing; to be away from
you is worse than all calamities condensed in one blow. Do
not be distressed, my good Gottfried. I will not embarrass
you. GottfriedI will marry youI do embarrass you. I
do distress youI will not. No! I go awayI leave you
Farewell, Gottfried!
Stay! replied he, do not go away.
Speak to me, she said. Chide me, spurn me. I can
bear anything. I will not stir, nor wince, nor weep. I can
stiffen myself into insensibility. I will sit here unmoved as a
curb-stone. Speak, Gottfried, speak, if you kill me.
Jane, said he, calmly but kindly, you have nothing
to fear from me, we have nothing to fear from each other.
We know each other too well to be alarmed by surprises, or
perplexed at disclosures. We have no secrets to keep or to
reveal, no hopes to indulge or disappoint. Our natures are
bared to each other; our several destinies too well
understood
;
a word, the faintest expression of a wish is sufficient.
You know Margaret, I need not
No, Mr. Brckmann, you need not
Call me Gottfried. Margaret called me Gottfried. You
must never call me anything else.
Oh, said she, if I could do Margaret's least office for
you, if I could ever remind you of her! And this assimilates
me nearer to her. It gives me a prerogative, which, with all
my rashness, I should hardly otherwise dare to claim. But
you need not speak to me of her. I know all about it, and
you, and her. Yet, not as a beggar, not as a friend, not as
one who has the slightest demand on your notice, yet, I say,
obeying an impulse which I know how neither to control nor
define, but which is deep as the central fires of my being, I
ask for entrance, for a home, in that which you are, for
fellowship
with you and all your life. Tell me more of Margaret;
I will grow up into her image; I will transmute myself to her
nature. You shall have a double Margaret; no, not double,
but one. Nay, if needs be, I will go out of myself; I will be
the servant of you both. Call me your child, your and
Margaret's
child, your spirit-child, and so love me. And when
we get to Heaven, you may do what you will with me. Sure
I am, I shall never get there if you do not take me. I cannot
sing, as you say she could. But my soul sings. If my larynx
be inelastic, I can describe with my sensations as many
octaves
and variations, as you on your flute; and with your nice
ear perhaps you could hear some pleasant strains. Away
from you, I am all discord, a harsh grating of turbulent
passion.
Have you thought, asked Gottfried, how we should be
situated. This prison is my home now, and I have no better
prospect for the future.
I have enough in my purse, said Jane, to release you.
You can teach as you have done. I perhaps could give
instruction
in the more popular branches.
Dear Jane! said he, you are dearer to me than all on
earth beside. But how fade all earth-scenes from my thought!
I feel myself vanishing into the spirit-world. Daily I perceive
the hand of destiny lying more heavily upon me. Hourly
invisible cords are drawing me away. The echoes of my song
sound louder and louder from the shadowy shore.
Ah, dearest Gottfried! said she; if you die, I will die
too. I cannot live without you; I cannot survive you; I
perish
with you. I will be absorbed with you into the Infinite.
All your presentiments I share.
We will be married, said Gottfried. We yield to the
Immortal Love. We rise to the empyrean of pure souls.
With you the past is nearer to me, the present more cheerful,
the future more hopeful. We shall all of us live a trebled
life. I have ever loved you; I will still love you; you deserve
my love. Margaret too will love you; and the Heaven-crowned
shall bestow her blessing on the Earth-worn.
Jane procured his release from prison, by paying debts and
costs of suit. They went to the house of the Rev. Dr.
a very kind and benevolent old clergyman, by whom the
marriage
ceremony was performed, the wife and daughter of the
Rector being present as witnesses. They knelt on a couch
for an altar, her long black hair, gathered loosely about her
temples, and descending down her clear marble neck, her dark
eyes, a crimson flushing her face, contrasted with his light
thick hair, deep blue eyes, and flickering pale face; both
subdued
,
and somewhat saddened; yet the evening light of their
souls, for such it seemed to be, came out at that hour and shed
over them a soft, sweet glow. The old man blessed them,
and they departed.
They sought lodgings in a quarter of the city, at some
distance
from their former abode. Brckmann was enabled to
form a small class in French. If female education, or the
employment
of female instructors, had been as common in those
days as at the present time, Jane might have directed those
powers with which nature had enriched her, to some
advantage
.
She secured, in fact, but a solitary pupil, and that one
more anxious to be taught dancing and dressing, than to
advance
in any solid acquisition. She found a more satisfactory
as well as promising task in perfecting Brckmann in the
English
language. This difficulty once surmounted, she fancied
he would be able to pursue his practice to any desirable extent.
So five or six months passed away.  Whether it was the seeds of
disease constitutionally inherited, the effect of disappointment,
want, heart-ache, he had been called to endure, the internal
progress of his wound, or his own presentiments, acting upon an
imagination sufficiently susceptibleBrckmann fell sick. He
8
lay upon his bed week by week. Jane abandoned everything
to take care of him.
Jane, said he, I must die.
I know it, said she, you told me you should soon die.
I believed it then, I am prepared for it now.
Voices, he added, are calling me away.
I know that too, she replied; I hear them.
An inward force propels my spirit from me.
Yes, said she, I feel it.
She bent over him, not as over a sick and dying man, but a
convalescing angel. He seemed to her not to be wasting to
skin and bones, but to spirit and life. His eye brightened, his
smile was sweeter, as he grew paler and thinner.
I wish you would sing to me, Jane?
I am full of music and song, she said, can you not hear
me? All that you have ever played, or sung, or spoken, leaps,
trills, is joyous, within me. Do you not hear a soft
chanting
?
Yes, he replied; it sounds like the voice of Jesus and
Margaret.
How glad I am our little Margaret is to have her
birth-place
in song! said Jane. She feeds on melodies.Yet if I
should die before her birth, will she die too? Tell me,
Gottfried
.
I think her spirit will go with ours, he replied.
Then we could train and nourish and mould the
undeveloped
,
unformed spirit in Heaven. And our other Margaret will
be there to help us bring up the little Margaret.Will Jesus
bless our child, as you say he blessed the children of olden
time?
Yes, replied Gottfried. He died for all, and lives to give
all life.
I shall not need to make her clothes?
You had better do that, Jane, we may both survive her birth.
In this exigency, their private funds having become well
nigh exhausted, she repaired to her father's house to procure
some articles of her own, out of which to prepare clothing for
the expected child. By a back entrance she ascended to her
old chamber, where, as the event should prove, Mr. Girardeau
detected her, and drove her off. At this moment, as she
retreated
through the store, Nimrod, who in the mean time had
succeeded to the place of the deceased Simon, saw her, as has
been related in the previous chapter. Here also these two
episodical branches of this memoir unite.
When Nimrod learned from Mr. Girardeau who the woman
was, how she stood related to him, and what were her fortune
and condition, we may naturally imagine that his curiosity,
always restive, always errant, would be more than usually
aroused. A new object presented itself; he must pry into it.
Having ascertained the place of Jane and Gottfried's residence,
being out of an errand, he made bold to enter the house, and
knock at their door.
Ax your pardon marm, he said, shuffling into the room, as
Jane opened the door, and the sick man lay on the bed before
him; hope I don't intrude. I sarve at Master Girarders, since
Simon's dead. I am the fellow what see you running out of
the store like a duck arter a tumble-bug. What was you so
skeered for? I wouldn't a hurt you any more than an old
shoe. I guess the old gentleman an't any better than he should
be
Young man! said Jane breaking in upon him, whoever
you are, we have no connection with Mr. Girardeau.
Yesmarm, said Nimrod, who nothing daunted,
approached
the bed. Gottfried rose a little, with his wan
beautiful
face. Jane, paler if possible, and more beautiful, held
her arm under his head, and her dark, loving eyes brimmed with
tears, the nature of which Nimrod could not understand.
I vum, said he, I'm sorry. What is the matter? If the
Widder was here she would cure him in a wink. Won't your
Dad let you go home? Won't he give you a limb to roost on?
I tell you what it is, he's close as a mink in winter; he's hard
as grubbing bushes. I don't guess he's so poor.
Jane, remembering her father's servants in Simon, who was
a perfect creature of his master, if at first she was annoyed
by the familiarity of Nimrod, or was suspicious of his motives,
soon perceived that his manner was undisguised and rusticity
sincere. She was led to question him as to himself, who he
was, &c. He gave her his real name, and that of his parents.
In fact he became quite communicative, and rendered a full
description of his family, their residence and mode of life. He
was pleased with his visit, which he promised to repeat, and
whenever he had a chance, he dropped in to see his new found
friends. As our readers will have anticipated the result of this
story of Gottfried Brckmann and Jane Girardeau, we shall
hasten to its close. When Mr. Girardeau became apprised of
the real situation of his daughter, he manifested deep
disturbance
of spirit. He addressed himself anew to Nimrod. That
girl, said he, is a runaway, a spendthrift, a wanton. She is
about to have a child, the fruit of her reckless, ruinous
misconduct
.
That child may do me an injury, a great injury.
The offspring of that viper may turn upon me with the
malignity
of the mother. That child must be watched. You know,
Mr. Foxly, we are identified in interest. You know if I let
you go, or you me, we both fall. That child must be watched.
Do you understand?
That wa'nt in the bargain when I came to live with ye,
replied Nimrod. I must have a little more, a little of the
ready.
Nothing could be more opportune to Nimrod. He was now
at liberty to prosecute his visits to Jane and Gottfried at his
leisure. Whatever money he obtained from Mr. Girardeau,
eked out by his own scant purse, he applied to their necessities.
He felt himself to be of more consequence than he had ever
been before, and although he exercised his function rather
pragmatically, he made himself greatly useful. Brckmann
grew more feeble; Jane approached the period of her child's
birth.
Nimrod, said she a few days before that event, we are
going to die.
No, no, he rejoined. He'll give up the ghost as sure
as wild geese in cold weather. But you will come out as
bright as a yaller bird in Spring.
We must die  I shall die, she continued, hardly
noticing
what he said, having become quite used to his manner.
We have loved, tenderly loved, if you know what that
means.
Yes  marm, replied Nimrod. If I am a Ponder and
you live in the city, you need'nt think we are as dull as
millers
that fly right into your links, and never know whether they
are singed or not. When I have been by uncle Bill Palmer's,
that lives at the Ledge, as you go up to Dunwich, and seen his
Rhody out there, jolly! she has gone right through me like an
ear-wig; it sticks to me like a bobolink to a saplin in a wind.
I an't afeered of the old Harry himself, but I vum! I never dare
to speak to Rhody. But you great folks here don't care
anything
about us, no more than Matty Gisborne, and Bet Weeks
down among the Settlers.
Yes I do care for you, said Jane; you have been very
kind to us. I know not what we should have done without
you. But we are really going to die. It has been foretold that
we should.
Oh yes, said Nimrod, relapsing into a more thoughtful
mood, I remember. I heard a dog howl in the streets the
other night, and I dreamed of seeing monkeys, and that is
sartin
death.
You must bury us, Nimrod, continued Jane. And you
must promise one thing, to take care of our child. Its name is
Margaret, you must call it by no other. You will contrive
means to take it to your own home, the Pond. You are poor,
you say, that is the greatest of blessings. Your house is apart
from the world. Your little brother Chilion, you say, would
love it as his own sister. Now promise us, Nimrod, that you
will do all we desire.
Nimrod not only promised, but volunteered a declaration
having the full weight of an oath, that her wishes regarding the
child should be studiously fulfilled. At this crisis they were
also visited by a daughter of the clergyman who married them;
she having become informed of their state, sought to minister
to their needs. Brckmann died as he had presaged.
Farewell
,
Jane! he said. Yet not farewell, but, follow me. I
kiss you for the night, and shall see you in the morning. The
sun fades, the stars glow, brighter worlds await us. We go to
those who love us. Nimrod bent reverently over the dead
form, that did perhaps what life itself could never have done,
made of the strong man a child, and tears gushed from his eyes.
Jane knelt calmly, hopefully by his side, kissed his lips, and
smoothed the bright curling locks of his hair. Nimrod,
assisted
by the clergyman before mentioned, and some of
Brckmann's
countrymen that remained in the city as servants,
bakers
,
or scavengers, and could do little more for their old friend
than bear him to his grave, saw him decently buried. The
wife and daughter of the clergyman were with Jane at that
period
which she had anticipated with so much interest. Her
hour came, and as she had predicted, a girl, the little
Margaret
was born. She lingered on a few days, without much
apparent suffering or anxiety, blessed her child, and melted
away at last in the clouds of mortal vision. The child was
taken in charge by those ladies who had kindly assisted at its
birth. Mr. Girardeau, who had exhibited ceaseless anxiety,
as well as glimpses of some unnatural design, during these
events, the progress of which he obliged Nimrod carefully
to report, ordered the child to be brought to his house. His
language was, that it must be put out of the way. It was a
dark night; Mr. Girardeau, availing himself of a weakness of
his servant, plentifully supplied him with liquor. He also
threatened him, in case of disobedience, with a legal
prosecution
8*
on the score of his smuggling connections. Nimrod,
sufficiently
in drink to make a rash promise, started for the child.
But apprehensions of some dark or bloody deed came over him;
the recollection of his solemn vows to the mother of the child
upbraided him; the spectral shadows cast by the street-lamps
startled him. He remembered the smuggling vessel which had
made another trip, and was about to return. The child was
delivered to him, and in place of going back to his master, he
made directly for the sloop, which was even then on the point
of sailing. The captain and crew, however serviceable they
might be to Mr. Girardeau's interest, cherished little respect
for his character, and Nimrod had no difficulty in enlisting
their aid for his purposes. We need not follow him all the
way to the Pond; or recite the methods he adopted to sustain
and nourish the child. On his way up the river he found
plenty of milk in the cabin. Leaving the vessel, he spent one
night in the shanty of an Irishman, whose wife having a
nurseling
at her side, cheerfully relinquished to Margaret one half
of her supply. In one instance he found a sheep which he made
perform the maternal office. One night he slept with his charge
in a barn. On the third evening he reached his home. The
family were all abed; his father and mother, however, were soon
ready to welcome their son. Surprise was of course their first
emotion when they saw what he had with him. He recounted
the history of the child, and his purpose to have it adopted in
the family. The course of his observations on the subject was
such, as to allay whatever repugnance either of his parents may
have felt to the project, and they became as ready to receive
the child as they might have been originally averse.
Call up Hash and Chilion, said Pluck. The child must
be baptized to-night.
Wait till to-morrow, do Dad, said Nimrod. I guess she
needs something to wet her stomach more than her head.
Fix her something woman, can't wait.
His wife prepared a drink for the child, while Nimrod
aroused
his brothers. Chilion, then a boy, seven or eight years
old, held a pine-torch that streamed and smoked through the
room. Mistress Hart supported the child, while Nimrod and
Hash stood sponsors. The old man called her Mary. No,
Dad, interposed Nimrod, it must be Margaret.
No! Mary, replied his father, in honor of my esteemed
wife. Besides, that's a Bible name, and we can't liquor up on
Margaret. Yours is a good name, and you never will see
cause to repent it, and there is Maharshalalhashbaz; that I
chose because it was the longest name in the Bible; I wanted
to show my reverence for the book by taking as much of it as
I could; and Chilion's is a good one too; all Bible names in
this family.
I tell you no, Dad, she
must be called Margaret
, repeated
Nimrod.
Do call her Margaret, said Chilion.
Well, well, replied Pluck, we will put it to vote.  Three
for Margaret,
I
shall call her Mary, and Hash goes for Peggy.
We won't break heads about it, if we do we shan't the bottle.
So here goes for Margaret and Mary.
The family, severally and collectively, laid themselves under
strict injunctions to keep the history of the child a secret, and
to regard it as their own. Mr. Hart and his little son Chilion
were glad enough to receive it on its own account; Mistress
Hart, if for no other reason, in consideration of the money
Nimrod represented he would get from its grandfather, a
reflection
that prevailed with Hash also. The secluded position
of the family rendered it possible indeed for children to be born
and die without exciting observation. Their neighbor, the
Widow Wright, was the only person from whom they had cause
of apprehension. It was presumed, however, to be an easy
matter
to bring her into the arrangement of secrecy, which was
accordingly
done by an oath sealed with a small douceur. In
behalf of the child were enlisted both the Widow's superstition,
and her avarice. What
might
befal her son Obed, then six or
seven years of age, she knew not. So Margaret was only spoken
of as a child of the Pond. When Obed asked his mother
where the little baby came from, she said it dropped from an
acorn-tree.
Such is the origin of Margaret, who a few months later has
been phantasmagorically introduced to our readers.
We might add, in conclusion of this chapter, that Nimrod,
the next year, made a visit to New York, and sought an
interview
with his old Master. The disappointment, chagrin and
displeasure of the latter were evidently great. Their
conference
was long and bitter. In the result, Nimrod declared in a
cant phrase that he would blow on the old gentleman, not
only as a smuggler, but as a murderer, unless he would settle
on the child a small annual sum, to be delivered at sight. To
such a bond Mr. Girardeau was obliged to give his signature.
He asked where the child was, but on this point Nimrod kept
a rigid silence.
CHAPTER XIII.
RETURNS TO MARGARET, WHO ADVANCES IN CHILDHOOD AND
KNOWLEDGE OF THE WORLD.
Military
Trainings we have alluded to as a sort of New
England Holiday. Pluck, taking with him Margaret and Hash,
Chilion and Bull, went down to the village at an early hour.
The Green flowed with people, soldiers, men, women and
children
.
Portions of the horse-sheds were converted into booths
for the sale of liquors, fruits and bread; wheelbarrows and
carts were converted to the same use. An angle of the
Meeting-house
,
Mr. Smith, the Tavern Keeper at No. 4,
appropriated
for his peculiar calling. Pluck engaged himself as
tapster
in one of the horse-sheds. Margaret, having orders not to
go home, till her father returned at night, sat with Bull on the
grass near the Meeting-house by the side of some other boys
and girls, who all moved away when she approached. Tony's
beat of the troop was the signal for the soldiers to assemble.
They were first marched to the south front of the church,
when prayer, as usual, was offered by Parson Welles, standing
on the steps. O Lord God, for thus he prayed, we thank
thee that thou hast raised up a defence to Israel, whereby thou
hast cut off the mighty men of valor, and the leaders and
captains
in the camp of the king of Assyria. We humbly beseech
that thou wouldst send prosperity, that thou wouldst be an
enemy to our enemies, and destroy all them that afflict our
soul. Let the gates be lifted up, and the Lord, the Lord strong
and mighty, the Lord mighty in battle, come in. And now O
God, we fall down upon our knees before thee, for and in
behalf
of thy cause, name, people and interest, that in this day
are so deeply designed against by the serpent and his seed, and
from this black cloud of tumult and confusion among the
nations
,
wilt thou bring forth the accomplishment of those
promises
thy people are so earnestly looking after and waiting for.
The old man was fervid and earnest. His massive white
wig fluttered in the wind, his venerable form was bent over
his ivory-headed cane. Some of the people were moved to
tears.
The soldiers were then drawn into a line for inspection. The
Captain was Jonas Hoag; 1st. Lieutenant, Eliashib Tuck, from
the Mill; Corporal, Joseph Whiston, a Breakneck; Chilion
Hart, fifer; and Tony Washington, drummer. Their
equipments
presented hardly so uniform and symmetrical an aspect as
appears in the militia of our day. There had been, however,
a gradual improvement from the primitive array of Colonial
times; when the troops were made up of pikemen, bowmen,
and musketeers with match-locks. Miles Standish, and his
puritan coadjutors, was dressed in a coat of mail, on his left
arm he bore a target, in his right a rapier or broadsword, iron
gloves shielded his hands, an iron helmet with a visor covered
his head and face, his breast was plated with iron. In this
Livingston Company many wore three-cornered hats,
shad-bellied
coats, shoe and knee buckles. Some retained the
identical
dress of the late war. The children who may read this
memoir, and we hope there are many such, do not fancy that
our Revolution was fought in cocked-hats and small-clothes!
Among the spectators, seated on the grass under the eaves
of the Meeting-house, were several, whose wounds and
infirmities
,
contracted during the war, rendered them muster-free.
There were six or eight of this description; one had lost a
leg, another an arm, one had survived a shot through the groin,
one had pined away on insults, blows, hunger and cold in the
Jersey prison-ships, and bringing home his stark skeleton,
became
a town pauper. Another one, whose name was Alexis
Robinson, having the side of his face shot away, and with one
eye and ear, losing a moiety of his senses, and failing besides
in his earnings, the certificates of which he always carried, by
the depreciation of the currency, was also provided for by the
town. These severally had hobbled out to see the training.
To these must be added certain soldiers of an earlier date.
Prominent among whom, was lame Deacon Ramsdill, leaning
with his left hand on a smooth crooked mountain-laurel cane, and
having his right folded over his narrow wrinkled face,
perpetually
endeavoring to suppress a good-natured but somewhat
undiaconal
smile, a risible labitur et labetur, that spirted out like
water between his fingers, and ran through the channels of his
cheeks, all around his eyes, and even back to his ears. At the
age of sixteen, in 1755, he was engaged in what is known as
the expulsion of the Acadians, or French neutrals, from Nova
Scotia; in 1757 he was at the surrender of Fort William Henry;
and in 1759 was with Gen. Wolfe at the battle on the Plains of
Abraham, where he received a wound in his leg. There was
also his brother Deacon, Hadlock, of a more Pythagorean
temper
,
who was engaged in the Spanish war, and served under
General Wentworth in the atttack on Carthagena, 1740, and
afterwards was in the defeat of General Braddock, 1755.
Nor would one forget to notice the children on this
occasion
whose chief business consisted in buying
gingerbread
,
pitching coppers, watching the exercises and following
the steps of the soldiers; or to be reminded of a difference in
their habits between this and good old Colony times, when
the Legislature conceiving that the training up of youth to
the art and practice of arms will be of great use; do therefore
order that all youths within this jurisdiction, from ten years
old to the age of sixteen years, shall be instructed by some
one of the officers of the band, upon the usual training days,
in the exercise of arms, as small guns, half pikes, bows and
arrows.
Captain Hoag was an accomplished disciplinarian, esteemed
such at least by his contemporaries. His hair was powdered,
his coat faced with blue, on his hat appeared a large white
cockade, his waist was ornamented with a scarlet sash, his
shoulder rounded off with a silver epaulette, and silver lacings
graced his yellow buck-skin breeches. But what more
peculiarly
distinguished him was the badge of the order of the
Cincinnati, a gold medal with the spread eagle, and blue
ribbon hanging from his coat buttons. Attention! At this
word, said he, giving instructions designed for the younger
members of the company, you must be silent, moving neither
hand nor foot. To the Left, Dress! You will turn your
heads briskly to the left, so as to bring your right eye in the
direction of your waistcoat buttons. Handle Cartridge!
Prime!  Shut Pan!  Draw Rammer!  Ram
down Cartridge!  Return Rammer!  Cock
Firelock
!
Take aim!  Fire! At this word, Fire,
continued he, you will pull the trigger briskly, then return
to the priming position, the muzzle of your fire-lock directly
in front, the left hand just forward of the feather-spring, seize
the cock with the thumb and forefinger of the right hand.
After the inspection and manual drill, the soldiers were
marched and countermarched over the Green.
There came also to the training, Master Elliman, who
exempt
by his profession from arms, and had always ranked as a
Tory, nevertheless made it a point to appear at these times, as
it would seem to air his antipathies. If he encountered
Pluck, well; but this morning he saw one whom he more
fancied, Margaret, sitting with her dog.
How do you enjoy it? said he.
Very well, was the reply. I love to see them.
Svit toto Mars impius orbe.
I do not understand that.
I know you do not. You will by and by.
Chilion plays so on his fife, and Tony drums so well,it
is almost as good as dancing; only the girls and women don't
go with them. See how they follow Chilion round just like
the dancers! Why don't they dance? How slow they
step!
It is not Chilion they follow, replied the Master, it is
that little laced android with a long knife in his hand, and a
lackered bunch on his shoulder. But here are Deacons
Ramsdill and Hadlock,
Livingston, and our broad-brimmed nay nay and yea yea
android
,
Anthony Wharfield. Salvete, Deacons; God bless thee,
Friend Anthony. Miss Margaret Hart, Friend Anthony.
How does thee do? sister Margaret; said the latter.
A Pond gal! said Deacon Hadlock.
What on arth are you doing with that little critter? said
Deacon Ramsdill. Larnin the young pup new tricks?
The dog that trots about will find a bone, said Deacon
Hadlock.
Qui vult cdere canem, facile invenit fustem, responded
the Master.
Bull, whether that his name was used too freely, or from an
old habit in the presence of strangers, began to growl.
Lie still, said Margaret.
There, you see the Scripter fulfilled. Soft words turn
away wrath, said Deacon Ramsdill, with his right hand on
his mouth striving in vain to curb his laughter.
So Friend Anthony gets rid of the wars, and trainings,
by his soft answers, I suppose, said the Master.
Not of paying, responded the Quaker. Ruth and I
were stripped of most we had, to support the troops.
See how God has blest you! What an army he is
raising
for our defence, said Deacon Hadlock, pointing to the
soldiers.
What is that little man, with a long knife, doing to the
men? asked Margaret.
He is preparing them for war; he will prove a Joshua to
us, said Deacon Hadlock, not so much, however, in reply to
Margaret, as to illustrate sentiments which he feared did not
sufficiently prevail with his friends.
I rather guess he's larnin them bagonets and hatchets to
make pretty free work with our legs, said Deacon Ramsdill,
pressing down upon his cane.
He is teaching the science of puppetry, said the Master.
He is teaching them to break the commandments of
Christ, said the Quaker.
What is it for? what for! exclaimed Margaret, starting
up with some surprise.
I can tell you all, said Deacon Hadlock. It is under
God, the defence of our lives, liberties and fortunes.
How many of our people were killed in the French war,
and in the last war! said Deacon Ramsdill.
How many of us were shut in the Jail yonder, said the
Master.
How many farms in this town were ruined, said the
Quaker.
What blunders are ye all making! exclaimed Deacon
Hadlock. It is our enemies that we expect to kill.
Who? asked Margaret.
Our enemies, I say.
Who are our enemies?
Those who injure us.
What, kill them? said Margaret. Now I wish Chilion
would bring his violin and make them dance. They wouldn't
kill one another then. Why don't he play Chorus Jig, and
set them to dancing.
Clear nater, said Deacon Ramsdill; I make no doubt
the gal feels just so.
Oh, Brother Ramsdill, exclaimed Deacon Hadlock,
how can you! What are we coming to! I was informed
you countenanced mixed dancing; that you told Bethia
Weeks, a church-member, there was no harm in it if she
didn't carry it too far. Here you are encouraging that sinful
amusement and opposing our military preparations! I do
believe
the Lord has forsaken us indeed.
Behold your defenders, pro aris et focis, exclaimed the
Master, directing attention to the soldiers. A difficulty had
evidently arisen. The Captain was seen running towards the
rear.
It will be remembered that Hash, the brother of Margaret,
had a difference with Zenas Joy, a Breakneck, at the Turkey
Shoot. We would also state that Zenas was engaged to
Delinda Hoag, a daughter of the Captain. On the parade
this morning, Hash's conduct had been very unmannerly
towards
Zenas, so much so as to offend Captain Hoag, both
officially
and personally; and he changed Hash's place,
transferring
him to a platoon under command of Corporal Joseph
Whiston, also a Breakneck. Hash could not brook this, and
carried his resentment so far, as to strike his Corporal on the
march; an offence that Joseph sought to punish by a blow in
return. Obed, also, who was that day doing his first military
duty, became somehow involved in the affray. The music
ceased; order was lost. Several voices called for Deacon
Hadlock to interfere in his capacity as Justice of the Peace.
The soldiers speedily resolved themselves into a civil tribunal,
and Hash and Obed were equitably tried and sentenced, the
former, to twenty-four hours imprisonment in the Jail, and to
pay a fine of twenty shillings; the latter, to receive
twenty-nine
lashes at the whipping-post. The culprits were
immediately
taken to their respective dooms, followed by crowds
of people. Margaret, probably not understanding exactly the
nature of events, went slowly after. She heard the shrieks of
Obed, she forced herself through the large ring that was
formed about him. He was stripped to his skin, the blood
was running in red lines down his back, four or five blows
only had been inflicted; she ran forward and threw herself
about the culprit. The constable tried to wrench her off, she
clung with an almost preternatural grasp. He threatened to
lay the lash upon her. She told him he should not whip
Obed. Judah Weeks, brother of Isabel, set up a cry For
shame! Isabel herself, who was playing near by, began to
utter a loud lament, all the children raised piteous moans, the
older people became confused; in fine Deacon Hadlock
himself
,
hearing Obed's entreaties, consented to remit the balance
of the penalty. Margaret walked through the people, who
drew off on either side as she passed, her face and clothes
dabbled with blood. She went with Isabel to the brook and
washed herself; Isabel going into her house, which was near
by, fetched a towel to wipe her with, and asked her to walk in
and see her mother. Margaret said she must go back to her
brother Hash. The Jail-yard, constructed of high posts, was,
as we have said, on a line with the street, and when Margaret
returned she found boys and girls looking through the
crevices
;
an example that she imitated. Deacon Ramsdill
approaching
,
asked her if she wanted to go in; she replied that
she did. After considerable parleying, the Deacon was able
to obtain of the Jailer, Mr. Shooks, permission for her to
enter, with Bull, whom it was not an easy matter to keep out.
9
She found Hash in a small, dimly lighted cell, rolling and
blubbering on the floor. She aroused him, and he took her
in one arm, and held the head of the dog by the other, and
seemed very much pleased to have them with him. She said
she would stay all night, but he told her that would not be
allowed
.
She saw another man in the cell, who, Hash
whispered
to her, was a murderer. She saw him sitting, muffled
like an owl, in his long, black beard, long tangled hair, dark
begrimed face, and ragged clothes. She went to him, he took
her in his lap, pressed her hard to his breast, and stroked her
hair. She called Bull, and he patted the dog's head. He said
he had a little boy about as old as she was, whom he had not
seen for a long time, and never expected to see again. She
gave him some gingerbread which she had in her pocket, and
he munched it greedily. Hash offered him a quid of tobacco,
whereat he seemed greatly delighted, and tears ran down his
cheeks. Margaret said she would bring some flowers the next
time she came to the village. He thanked her and said he
should be glad to see them, that he had not seen a flower for two
years. The door was opened, the Jailor entered, and Margaret
was ordered to leave. She crossed the Green to the Horse
sheds, where her father was employed selling liquors. He
seated her on a cider barrel, and gave her another piece of
gingerbread and cheese, which she ate with a good appetite,
as she had hardly eaten anything since morning. The day
approached its close, and the soldiers drew up to ballot for
officers, Captain Hoag's term of service having expired. In
the result, Lieutenant Eliashib Tuck was chosen Captain, and
all the subaltern officers advanced their respective grades,
excepting
Corporal Joseph Whiston, whose name, for some
reason
,
disappeared from the canvass. Captain Tuck replied as
follows: Fellow soldiers, I lack words to express my sense
of the honor conferred upon me, as unexpected as it is
undeserved
.
We live in a glorious era, one that eclipses all past time,
and will be a model for future ages. The close of the eighteenth
century is sublime as its meridian was grand. It were an
honor for a man to be born in this period, how much more so
to be honored by it! My brave compatriots! Military life is
the path to distinction, and the means of usefulness. An
immortal crown awaits the head of the hero! The Lion of
Britain we have bound, and the Unicorn of France shall ere
long bite the dust! Livingstonians! my blood is aroused,
my ambition fired to be at the head of such a corps! Your
fame has spread from Bunker Hill to Saratoga, from Genessee
to King's Mountain. I will lead wherever you will follow, I
will dare all dangers with your support.
Agreeably to custom, he then announced a treat. The
company was marched to the Crown and Bowl, and dismissed.
The citizens, old and young, thronged to the scene. Pluck,
leaving Margaret and his tapstership, joined in the general
exhilaration. Pails of toddy were brought from the bar-room.
The men drank freely, gave huzzas, and sang patriotic songs.
Ex-Corporal Whiston, however, and his particular friends,
dignifiedly
indignant, withdrew, and went to the Store for their
entertainment. The old men drank, and the young men; boys
crept under the legs of the soldiers, and lifting the pails,
tugged at the slops; little children on their bellies lapped
the gutters, and sucked the grass, where the liquor fell.
The sun went down, clouds darkened the sky, and in
swollen
masses drifted over the town. Solomon Smith, son of the
Tavern-keeper from No. 4, set a pine-torch in his stand, and
with knap-sack, shoulder-straps, and dangling priming wire
and brush, called around him as many as he could, while his
father went after the little boys whose coppers he exchanged
for rum. Lights broke out from the wheel-barrows and carts,
all over the Green, which rung with shouts and song, and the
tramping of feet. At the Store they drank and sung. But
the excessive use of alcoholic stimulants aggravates the ordinary
symptoms of good cheer, and produces effects which the most
considerate do not always foresee. Intoxication supervenes,
accompanied by a paralysis of the physical, or an inflammation
of the nervous system. Captain Tuck was borne dead-drunk
by his reeling soldiers, and laid on the floor of the bar-room.
Ex-Corporal Whiston with his friends sallied from the Store; a
brawl ensued between the two parties, and Deacon Hadlock,
interposing to quell the fray, was knocked to the ground.
Some were seized with nausea, and repaired for relief to the
Horse-sheds. Margaret was driven from her seat by Delinda
Hoag, who bore thither her espoused Zenas Joy. She went in
pursuit of her father. She stumbled over a little boy that lay
helpless on the grass. This was Aurelius Orff, whom his
sister
Beulah Ann, and Grace Joy, who had been making a visit
to Hester, niece of Deacon Penrose, were looking after;
whereupon Grace called her a hoddy-doddy guzzletail, and
Beulah Ann gave her a smart push, as if to test her condition;
whereby she was brought in involuntary contact with Paulina
Whiston, who having grasped her brother, the ex-Corporal, by
the collar, was punching and twitching him to the shed where
their horse was tied. She had also slung over her shoulders
a pair of saddle-bags, filled with articles for which she had
been bartering at the Store. She helped her brother mount,
but he was too weak to retain his seat, and before she gained
the pillion, he fell to the ground. Margaret seized the horse's
bridle, and curbed the animal, while Paulina recovered her
brother. Lights blinked and glowed from booth to booth.
The black shadows of men showed unearthly, like demons in
a pit. Boys yelled their excitement, Indian-like, across the
Green. Horses breaking loose, plunged madly through the
crowd. Corporal Whiston's horse was frightened and tore
away. It began to rain, the clouds emptied themselves in
torrents
,
as it might seem to animate and refreshen the people,
but really to superadd a burthen on such as already had more
than they could carry, and bury those who were fallen deeper
in the soil. Margaret hurried she knew not where; she
slunk from the rain under a cart, but was thrust away by its
drunken owner and his drunken customers. She ran towards
the Tavern, that was full of men. A thick darkness had come
on, the lights on the Green were extinguished. The faint
glare from the Tavern discovered her standing out in the rain.
Solomon Smith, leaving his own now deserted and useless
stand, coming along, kindly took her with him into the house.
Men in various stages of intoxication, stood, sat, and lay in
the stoop, and in the bar-room. Through these Solomon led
her into the kitchen. Here was a parcel of men and women,
boys and girls, some drying themselves by the fire, some
waiting
for the rain to hold up, some singing, laughing and
drinking
.
Here also was Tony with his fiddle playing to a
company
of dancers; and Pluck, sitting on his hams near the fire,
with his full-orbed cabbage-head, swaying to and fro, beating
time with his arms and legs, and balancing in one hand a mug
of flip. Ha! my little lady! said he, catching Margaret
with a bounce into his lap, and holding her near the fire,
won't you drink a little, now do drink a little. See how it
creams; don't be snuffy, Molly, none of your mulligrubs.
Here's blood now, Obed's blood on your pinafore. A brave
deed that; you must have something to take. It's training
day, and they don't come only four times a year. There's
Beulah Ann, she loves it as well as a calf likes to be licked.
Sweet pinkey-posy, it is as good for your wet clothes, as the
Widder's horse-radish for dropsy, ha! ha! Whereat as he
was pressing the mug to Margaret's lips, Tony, reaching over
with his fiddle-bow, struck it from his hand into the fire. The
blue blaze whirred up the chimney and darted into the room.
There was a cry of fire, and Mr. Stillwater, summoning himself,
lifted Pluck to his feet, and shoved him into the street. The
old toper anticipating some such issue of the day, agreeably
to custom, had taken Margaret with him to the village to be
conducted home by her at night. Margaret leading the way,
they ascended the hill, crossed the Pasture, and entered the
woods. The clouds hung low, and their floating skirts seemed
to be pierced and hetchelled by the trees. The rain had
thinned into a fine close mist. The path, to inexperienced
eyes, would have been absolutely indistinguishable. They had
threaded it before in similar darkness. They came to the
Brook, which, increased by the rain, flowed with a dismal
sound. They entered the ravine, that brought them now on a
level with the Brook, whose hissing waters rolled over their
feet. They attained the summit above, where the Tree-Bridge
lay. Pluck seemed terrified, and hesitated to cross. He sat
down, then extended his length on the grass, and ere long fell
asleep. Margaret would have been unwilling that her father
should go over, and was not sorry to have him stop; though
it was night, and rainy, and they were alone, and still a mile
from home. The rain-drops from the trees showered on her
head and lap, the grass was wet underneath her, and her
clothes were drenched with water. But of this she hardly
thought; what she more feared was the ways of her father in
his drunken sleep, his mysterious sufferings, his frenzied
utterance
,
his spasmodic agitation. This, and for this she feared;
she looked for it, and it came. She tried to quiet him, and
as she rubbed his arm he said she was a dove feeding him with
milk; and then he scratched and tore at his breast, which she
soothed with her hand, hot, rough, and hairy as it was; then
he said he was boiling in the still, and Solomon Smith was
holding the cap on; he shrieked and yelled till his roar
exceeded
that of the Brook. Then he began to laugh wildly.
Old Nick is turning the North Pole. There comes out of
the sea a whale walking on his tail; Parson Welles has got
astride of his gills with a riding stick, ha! ha! There
comes a star rolling on its five points, and next comes old
Suwarrow in his boots. Grind away, old fellow. Round, round
they go over the mountains, splash, splash across rivers. Can't
you hear the pismires laugh? There's St. Paul with a
cat-o'nine-tails
,
and Deacon Hadlock going to take me to the
whipping
post. I'll be poxed, if you do. Hoa, Molly, Molly! help.
He leaped from the ground, Margaret clung to the skirt of his
9*
coat. He broke away. The Bridge! the Bridge! he
exclaimed
.
They can't catch me then!
Father! father! she screamed in uttermost agony,
you'll fall, you'll fall! He slipped from the uncertain tree;
he struck the sides of the chasm, and dashed into the stream.
Aroused by the shock of the fall, and the stimulus of the
water, he called aloud for aid, as he was borne on by the dark,
invisible rush of the stream. Margaret then, for the first
time in her life, felt the shuddering, appalling
sense of danger
.
What could be done? She ran down the ravine, she seized
the struggling arm of her father, and detained him till by his
own efforts he was able to bring himself to his feet. In silence,
and sickness, and weariness, she fagged homewards; in
darkest
dead of night she went to her bed as to her grave.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE SABBATH.MARGARET GOES TO MEETING FOR THE FIRST
TIME.HER DREAM OF JESUS.
It
was a Sabbath morning, a June Sabbath morning, a June
Sabbath morning in New England. The sun rose over a
hushed, calm world, wrapt like a Madonna in prayer. It was
The Day, as the Bible is The Book. It was an intersection of
the natural course of time, a break in the customary order of
events, and lay between, with its walls of Saturday and
Sunday
night on either side, like a chasm, or a dyke, or a mystical
apartment, whatever you would please liken it to. It was such
a Sabbath to the people of Livingston as they used to have
before steam, that arch Antinomian, annihilated time and
space, and railroads bridged over all our vallies. Its light,
its air, its warmth, its sound, its sun, the shimmer of the
dawn on the brass Cock of the steeple, the look of the
Meeting-house
itself, all things were not as on other days. And now
when those old Sabbaths are almost gone, some latent
indefinable
impression of what they were comes over us, and
wrenches us into awe, stillness and regret.
Margaret had never been to Meeting; the family did not
go. If there were no other indisposing causes, Pluck himself
expressly forbade the practice, and trained his children to other
habits. They did not work on the Sabbath, but idled and
drank. Margaret had no quilling, or carding, or going after
rum to do; she was wont to sally into the woods, clamber up
the Head, tend her flowers; or Chilion played and she sang,
he whittled trellises for her vines, mended her cages, sailed
with her on the Pond. She heard the bell ring in the
morning
,
she saw Obed and his mother go by to Meeting, and she
had sometimes wished to go, but her father would never
consent
.
From the private record of Deacon Hadlock we take
the following:
State vs. Didymus Hart.
Stafford, ss. Be it remembered, that on the nineteenth
day of August, one thousand seven hundred and seventy-eight,
Didymus Hart of Livingston, in the County of Stafford,
shoe-maker
and laborer, is brought before me, Nathan Hadlock,
Esq., a Justice of Peace for and within the aforesaid County,
by Hopestill Cutts, Constable of Livingston aforesaid, by
warrant
issued by me, the said Justice on the day aforesaid, against
the said Didymus, for that the said Didymus Hart, at
Livingston
aforesaid, on the twelfth day of May last, being the Lord's
day, did walk, recreate and disport himself on the south side
of the Pond lying in the West District, so called, of Livingston
aforesaid; which is contrary to the law of this State, made
and provided in such cases, and against the peace of this State,
all which is to the evil example of all others in like case
offending
.
Wherefore, witnesses being heard, &c., it doth appear
to me, the said Justice, that the said Didymus Hart sit in the
stocks for two hours.
Pluck was seated in the manner prescribed, very much to
the entertainment of the boys, who spattered him with eggs,
the disturbance and exasperation of his wife who preferred
that all inflictions her husband received should come from
herself, and resented any interference from others, and his
own chagrin and vexation, especially as the informer in the
case was Otis Joy, father of Zenas, a Breakneck, whose
friendship
he did not value, and Cutts, the executive officer, was the
village shoemaker, and no agreeable rival, and the Justice was
Deacon Hadlock. By way of redress, he chose to keep from
Meeting entirely, and suffer none under his control to go. But
Chilion and Nimrod both urged that Margaret might attend
Church at least once in her life, and Pluck consented. This
morning she heard the bell ring; she saw Obed and his mother
riding by; the latter dressed in a small shining black satin
bonnet, and gown of similar material, with a white inside
handkerchief; the former in sky-blue coat and ruffled
sleeves, white neck-stock, white worsted vest, yellow
buck-skin
breeches, white stockings, and silver-plated buckles,
which had all belonged to his father, whose form was both
shorter and thicker than his son's, and whose garments it
certainly
showed great filial reverence in Obed to wear without
essential alteration. Obed had an old look, his face was
furrowed
as well as freckled, and his mother, to remedy this
disproportion
,
and graduate her son to that consideration which
naturally attached to his appearance, had adopted the practice
of powdering his hair, and gathering it in a sack behind; and
for his nearsightedness, she provided him with a pair of broad
horn-bowed bridge spectacles. The whole was surmounted
by a large three-cornered hat. Whatever might have been the
effect of his recent whipping, there was nothing apparent.
His mother, unlike Pluck, would not suffer anything of that
kind to disturb the good understanding she ever wished to
retain with the people of Livingston.
But let us, if you are willing, anticipate these persons a
little
,
and descend to the village. The people are assembling
for Meeting; they come on all the four roads, and by
numerous
foot-paths, across the lots, and through the woods. Many
are on horses, more on foot, and a very few in wagons. The
horses' heads are garnished with branches of spruce and
birch, to keep off the flies; most of the boys and some of the
men are barefoot; divers of the latter are in their shirt-sleeves,
carrying their coats on their arms, and their shirts are also
visible
between their vests and breeches; some of the young
ladies have in their hands sprigs of roses, pinks,
sweet-williams
,
and larkspurs; others both old and young have bunches
of fennel, dill, caraway, peppermint, lad's love; some of the
ladies who ride, leap from their horses with the agility of cats,
others make use of the horse-blocks, four or five of which are
stationed about the Green. You would perhaps particularly
notice old Mr. Ravel and his wife from the North Part of the
town, on horseback, the former straight as an arrow, the latter
a little crooked, and both more than eighty years of age. For
sixty years they have come in that way, a distance of seven
miles; for sixty years, every Sabbath morning, have they
heated their oven, and put in an iron pot of beans, and an
earthen dish of Indian pudding, to bake while they are gone,
and be ready for their dinner when they return. To meet
any exigencies of this sort in the mean time, you will observe
that Mistress Ravel, in common with many other of the women,
carries on her arm a large reddish calico bag filled with
nutcakes
and cheese. You will also see coming down the West
Street Mr. Adolphus Hadlock, nephew of the Deacon's, with
his wife and six children, and Mr. Adolphus will contrive in
some way or other to give you the names of all his children
without your asking, even before he reaches the steps of the
Meeting-house; Triandaphilda Ada, Cecilia Rebecca,
Purintha
Cappadocia, Aristophanes, Ethelbert, and a little boy he
carries in his arms, Socrates; and you will hear the young
men and boys that are lolloping on the steps repeat these names
as the several parties to whom they belong arrive. Philip
Davis the sexton, who has himself been watching the people,
now strikes the second bell, and those who live immediately
on the Green begin to turn out, and when he commences
tolling
,
it is a sign Parson Welles has issued from his house,
which lies about a quarter of a mile from the Meeting-house,
on the South road. There are Mr. Stillwater, the
tavern-keeper
;
Esq. Weeks with twelve of his children, Isabel and
Judah among them; Judge Morgridge, his wife, his daughter
Susan, and her little brother Arthur; Mr. Cutts, the
shoemaker
;
Mr. Gisborne, the joiner; Lawyer Beach, and his
family; Dr. Spoor; Deacon Penrose, the merchant; Deacon
Hadlock and his wife; Deacon Ramsdill with his lame leg
and wife; Tony, the barber, with his powdered hair and
scarlet
coat; Old Dill, a negro servant of Parson Welles, and
formerly a slave; The Widow Luce, a lady who lives near the
Brook, leading her little hunchback son Job; then you see the
Parson and his wife. This venerable couple have nearly
attained
the allotted age of man, and are verging towards that
period which is described as one of labor and sorrow; yet on
the whole they seem to be renewing their youth, their forms are
but slightly bent, and the step of the old minister is firm and
elastic. He is dressed in black, the only suit of the color in
townif we except that of the sexton, which is known to be
an off-cast of the Parson'skerseymere coat, silk breeches and
stockings, on his head is a three-cornered hat, and voluminous
white wig, and under his chin are plain white bands; he wears
black silk gloves, and leans on a tall ivory-headed cane. His
wife's dress is of black satin, like that of the Widow Wright's.
Next comes their maiden daughter, known as Miss Amy, and
in near conjunction, the Master. And as if composing a part
of the ministerial train, riding slowly and solemnly behind,
appears the Widow Wright, who always contrives to arrive at
the Parsonage just as the bell begins to toll. The Parson and
his wife reverently, sedately ascend the steps, the crowd of
men and boys who have been modestly waiting about the
Porch, opens to let them pass, then all fall in behind, and
enter
the Church; the bell ceases tolling, and the Green is still
as the grave. This morning considerable sensation was
created
no
more indeed than usual on such occasionsby
Deacon
Penrose, the clerk of the town, reading the banns of
marriage
between Zenas Joy and Delinda Hoag. Leaving these
people, let us go back to the Pond.
Margaret's mother, who took a secret satisfaction in the
good appearance of her child, combed and dressed her hair
which in its tendency to curl resembled that of Gottfried
Brckmann, while in color it took a shade between that of her
dead and to her unknown parents  put on her white muslin
tunic and pink skirt; she wore also her red beaded
moccasins
,
and green rush hat. She started away with a dreamy
sense of mystery attaching to the Meeting, like a snow-storm by
moon-light, and a lively feeling of childish curiosity. On the
smooth in front of the house, her little white and yellow
chickens
were peeping and dodging under the low mallows with its
bluish rose-colored flowers, the star-tipped hedge-mustard, and
pink-tufted smart-weed, and picking off the blue-and-green flies
that were sunning on the leaves; and they did not seem to
mind her. Hash had taken Bull into the woods, and Chilion
told her she would not need him. Dick her squirrel, and Robin
were disposed to follow, but her mother called them back.
A little yellow-poll, perched in the Butternut, whistled after
her, Whooee whee whee whee whittiteetee  as soon as I
get this green caterpillar, I will go too. A rusty wren
screamed
out to her, Os's's' chipper w' w' w' wow wow wow  O
shame Molly, I am going to rob an oriole's nest, I would'nt go
to Meeting. She entered the Mowing; a bobolink clung
tiltering
to the breezy tip of a white birch, and said, Pee wuh'
wuh' ch' tut tut, tee tee wuh' wuh' wdle wdle pee wee a a
wdle dee dee  now Molly here are red clover, yellow
buttercups
,
white daisies, and strawberries in the grass; ecod! how
the wind blows! what a grand time we shall have, let us stay
here to-day. A grass-finch skippered to the top of a stump,
and thrusting up its bill, cried out, Chee chee chee up chip'
chip' chipperway ouble wee  glad you are going, you'll get
good to-day, don't stop, the bell is tolling. She thought of
the murderer, and she picked the clover, the buttercups and
daisies, heads of timothy and fox-tail grass, and some
strawberries
;
and hurried on; enveloped in the sweet perfume of
the fields. She gathered the large bindweed, that lay on its
back floating over the lot, like pond-lilies, with its red and
white cups turned to the sun and air; and also the beautiful
purple crane's bill, and blue-eyed grass. She came to the
shadows of the woods that skirted the Mowing, where she got
box-berry flowers and fruit, bunch-berry and star-of-Bethlehem
flowers. She entered a cool, grassy, shady close in the forest,
where were beds of purple twin-flower, yellow star-grass, blue
violets, and mosses growing together family-like, under the
stately three-leaved ferns that overhung them like elm-trees,
while above were the birches and walnuts. A black-cap k' d'
chanked, k' d' chanked over her head, and a wood-thrush whoot
whoot whooted, ting a ring tinged in earnest unison. We are
going to have a meeting here to-day, a little titmouse is coming
to be christened, won't you stop? But a wood-pecker rapped
and rattled over among the Chesnuts, and on she went. She
crossed the bridge, she decended the ravine, the brook flowed
on towards the village with a winsome glee, and while she
looked at the flies and spiders dancing on the dark water, she
heard a little yellow-throated fly-catcher, mournfully saying,
Preeo preea preeeeo preeeeaPray, Margaret, you'll lose
your soul if you don't; and she saw a wood-pewee up among
the branches, with her dark head bowed over plaintively
singing
,
P' p' ee ee ou wee, p' p' ee ee ou wee'Jesus be true
to you Margaret, I have lost my love, and my heart is sad, a
blue angel come down from the skies, and fold us both in his
soft feathers. Here she got the white-clustering baneberry,
and the little nodding buff cucumber root. She continued her
way through the woods; she broke off white thorn blossoms
with their red anthers, the beautifully variegated flowers of the
calico bush, large gold-dusted cymes of the pear-leaved
viburnum
,
and sheep's laurel with its rich rose clusters. The
olive-back
fly-catchers answered to one another up among the green
sunny trees. Whee whoo whee, wee woo woo wee, whee
whoo, whoo whoo weeGod bless the little Margaret! How
glad we are she is going to Meeting at last. She shall have
berries, nutcakes and good preaching. The little Isabel and
Job Luce are there. How do you think she will like Miss
Amy? The Via Dolorosa became this day to Margaret, a Via
jucundissima. She came to the Pasture, where she again
stopped
a moment, and added to her stock of flowers red sorrel
blossoms
,
beautiful pink azaleas, and sprigs of pennyroyal. Then
she sorted her collection, tying the different parcels with spears
of grass. The Town was before her silent and motionless,
save the neighing and whinnying of the horses, and squads of
dogs that trolloped to and fro on the Green. The sky was
blue and tender; the clouds in white veils like nuns, worshipped
in the sun-beams; the woods behind murmured their
reverence
;
and the birds sang their psalms. All these sights,
sounds, odors, suggestions, were not, possibly, distinguished
by Margaret, in their sharp individuality, and full volume of
shade, sense and character. She had not learned to criticise,
she only knew how to feel. A new indefinable sensation of
joy and hope was deepened within her, and a single
concentration
of all best influences swelled in her bosom. She took off
her hat and pricked some grass-heads, and blue-bells in the
band, and went on. The intangible presence of God was in
her soul, the inaudible voice of Jesus called her forward.
Besides
she was about to penetrate the profoundly interesting
mystery
of the Meeting, that for which every seventh day she had
heard the bell ring, that to which Obed and his mother went
so studiously dressed, and that concerning which a whole life's
prohibition had been upon her. And, withal, she remembered
the murderer, and directed her first steps to the Jail.
She tried to enter the Jail House, but Mr. Shooks drove her
away. Then she crept along the fence till she came to a small
hole, through which she saw, on the ground-floor of the Jail,
the grim face of the murderer looking from the small dark
gratings of his cell-window.
I have brought you some flowers, said she; but they
won't let me carry them to you.
I know that, the murderer replied.
I will fasten a bunch in this hole, she said, so you can
see them.
I should be glad if I could reach them, he replied,
thrusting
his lean fingers through the bars. I shall be glad to
look at them. I havn't seen the sun, or heard a pleasant voice
these many months. I am so changed, I don't know as I am
a man. I expect to be hung in a few days, and shall love to
see the flowers before I die. I remember I was a man once,
and had a wife, and a childI thank youyou are a good girl
I shall cry again if you stay there any longer.
She heard the sound of other voices, and she could see the
shadows of faces looking from other cells, and hear voices
where she could see no faces, and the Jail seemed to her to be
full of people, and they cried out to her to bring them flowers.
Mr. Shooks also made himself apparent to her. What are
you about here, you little varmint? exclaimed he,
rushiing
from his house. Encouraging rebellion, breaking the
Sabbath, giving flowers to the prisoners! He tore away the
bunch she had inserted in the wall; she retreated into the
street, and graining a point where she could see the upper
cell-windows
,
she displayed her flowers in sight of the prisoners,
holding them up to the extent of her arm, and heard the
prisoners
shout with joy. If words won't do, I'll try what vartue
there is in stones, said Mr. Shooks, who thereupon, suiting
the action to the word, fairly pelted her away. She directed
her steps to the Meeting-house, and entered the square
buttress-like
,
mysterious porch; she stood at the foot of the broad-aisle,
and looked in, she saw the Minister, in his great wig, and
band, and black gloves, perched in what seemed to her a high
box, and above him was the pyramidal sounding-board, and
on a seat beneath she saw three persons, in powdered hair,
whom she recognized as the Deacons Hadlock, Ramsdill and
Penrose. Through the balustrade that surrounded the high
pews, she could see the tops of men's and women's heads, and
little boys and girls clutching the rounds with their hands, and
looking out at her. The Minister had given out a hymn,
and Deacon Hadlock rising, read the first line. Then in the
gallery over head, she heard the toot of the Master, and his voice
leading off, and she walked farther up the aisle to see what was
going on. A little tiny girl called out to her from one of the
pews, and Philip Davis, the sexton, hearing the noise, came
forward
and led her back into the porch. Philip was not by
nature
a stern man, he let the boys play on the steps during the
week, and the young men stand about the doors on the
Sabbath
.
He wore a shredded wig, and black clothes, as we have
said, and was getting old, and had taken care of the
Meeting-house
ever since it was built, and although he was opposed to
all disturbance of the worship, he still spoke kindly to
Margaret
.
What do you want? he said.
I want to go to Meeting, she replied.
Why don't you go?
I don't know how, she answered.
But you musn't bring all your posies here.
May'nt they go to Meeting too?
I see, he added, you are one of the Injins, and they
don't know how to behave Sabber days. But I'm glad you
have come. You don't know what a wicked thing it is to break
the Sabbath.
10
Mr. Shooks said I broke it when I went to give the
murderer
some flowers, and threw stones at me, and you say I break
it now. Can't it be mended again?
You should'nt bring these flowers here.
I saw the Widow and Obed bring some.
Not so many. You've got such a heap on um.
I got a bigger bunch one day.
Yes, yes, but these flowers are a dreadful wicked thing on
the Lord's day.
Then I guess I will go home. It an't wicked there.
Wal, wal. You be a good gal, keep still, and you may
sit in that first pew along with me.
I don't want to be shut up there.
Then you may go softly up the stairs, and sit with the
gals.
She ascended the stairs, which were within the body of the
house, and in a pew at the head, she saw Beulah Ann Orff,
Grace Joy, Paulina Whiston, and others that she had seen
before
;
they laughed and snubbed their handkerchiefs to their
noses, and she turned away, and went round the other side,
where the men sat. The boys began to look at her and
laugh, and Zenas Joy, one of the tithing men, came forward,
and seizing her by the arm, led her back to the girl's side, and
told her to go to her seat. She looked for the Master, but he
was hemmed in by several men, and while she was hesitating
what to do, Old Dill, who was sitting in one corner, with Tony
Washington and Csar Morgridge, opened her pew door, and
asked her in. So she went and sat down with the negroes.
Parson Welles had commenced his sermon. She could not
understand what he said, and told Old Dill she wanted to go,
and without further ceremony opened the door and slipped
out. She descended the stairs, moving softly in her moccasins,
and turning up the side-aisle, proceeded along under the high
pews till she came to the corner where she could see the
minister
.
Here she stood gazing steadfastly at him. Deacon
Hadlock, observing her position, motioned her away. Deacon
Ramsdill came directly forward, took her by the arm, opened
the door of the pew where his wife was, and shut her in.
Mistress
Ramsdill gave her some caraway and dill, and received in
return some of Margaret's pennyroyal and lamb-kill, and other
flowers. The old lady used her best endeavors to keep
Margaret
quiet, and she remained earnestly watching the Preacher
till the end of the service. The congregation being dismissed,
those who lived in the neighborhood went home; of the rest,
some went to the stoop of the Crown and Bowl, some sat on
the Meeting-house steps, some strolled into the woods in the
rear; several elderly men and women went to what was called
a Noon House, a small building near the Schoolhouse,
where they ate their dinner and had a prayer; quite a number
went to Deacon Penrose's. Of the latter, was the Widow
Wright. Mistress Ramsdill, who lived about a half mile
from the Green, offered to take Margaret to her house, but
the Widow interfered, saying it was too long a walk, and all
that, and prevailed with Margaret to go with her. This going
to Deacon Penrose's consisted in having a seat in his kitchen
Sunday noons, and drinking of his nice cool water. Seats
were brought into the room, the floor was duly sanded, the
pewter in the dresser was bright and glistening. His own
family and their particular relations occupied the parlor. To
this place came Mistress Whiston, and Old Mistress Whiston,
Mistresses Joy and Orff, Breaknecks; Mistresses Hoag and
Ravel, from the North Part of the town; Widows Brent and
Tuck, from the Mill; also Grace Joy, Beulah Ann Orff,
Paulina
and Mercy Whiston, and others. They ate nutcakes and
cheese, snuffed snuff, talked of the weather, births, deaths,
health, sickness, engagements, marriages, of friends at the Ohio,
of Zenas and Delinda's publishment, and would have talked
about Margaret, save that the Widow protected the child,
assured
them of her ignorance, and hoped she would learn
better
by and by. Mistress Whiston asked Margaret how she
liked the Meeting. She replied that she liked to hear them
sing. Sing! rejoined Paulina Whiston. I wish we could
have some decent singing. I was up to Brandon last Sunday,
and their music is enough sight better than ours; they have
introduced the new way almost every where but here. We
must drag on forty years behind the whole world.
For my part, said Mistress Orff, I don't want any
change, our fathers got along in the good old way, and went
to Heaven. The Quakers use notes and the Papists have their
la sol mee's, and Deacon Hadlock says it's a contrivance to
bring all those pests into the land. Then it make such a
disturbance
in the meetings; at Dunwich two of the best deacons
could'nt stand it, and got up and went out; and Deacon
Hadlock
says he won't stay to hear the heathenish sounds. It's only
your young upstarts, lewd and irregular people, and the like of
that, that wants the new way.
If our hearts was only right, said Mistress Tuck, we
should'nt want any books; and the next thing we shall know,
they will have unconverted people singing.
We have got some better leaders, rejoined Paulina,
than Deacon Hadlock and Master Elliman; their voices are
old and cracked, and they drawl on Sunday after Sunday, the
same old tunes in the same old way.
If we once begin to let in new things, there is no knowing
where they will stop, replied Mistress Orff.
It is just so, said the Widow Tuck. They begun with
wagons and shays, and the horses wan't used to the noise, and
got frightened and run away; and our Eliashib came nigh
spraining his ankle.
I remember, said the elder Mistress Whiston, when old
Parson Bristead down in Raleigh, used to sprinkle thirty
bushels
of sand on his floors every year, and I don't believe Parson
Welles uses five.
Yes, yes, said her daughter-in-law, great changes, and
nobody can tell where it will end.
When I was a gal, continued the senior lady, they
didn't think of washing but once a month
And now washing days come round every Monday,
added
Paulina. If you will let us have some respectable
singing
,
I will agree to go back to the old plan of washing,
Grandma
,
ha ha!
It's holy time, child, said her mother.
I remember, said the Widow Brent, who was a little
deaf, milking a cow a whole winter for a half a yard of
ribbin.
I remember, said Mistress Ravel, the Great Hog up in
Dunwich, that hefted nigh twenty score.
If you would go up to the Pond, to-day, said Margaret,
I guess Chilion would play you a better tune on his fiddle
than they sing at the Meeting.
Tush, Tush! said the Widow Wright.
There, there! You see what we are coming to; said
Mistress Orff. Booly Ann where was the Parson's text this
forenoon?
The Widow Wright assumed the charge of Margaret in the
afternoon. She kept quiet, till the prayer, when the noise of
the hinge-seats, or something else, seemed to disconcert her,
and she told her protectress she wanted to go home. The
Widow replied that there was to be a christening, and prevailed
with her to stop, and lifted her on the seat, where she could
witness the ceremony. The Minister descended from the
pulpit
,
and Mr. Adolphus Hadlock carried forward the babe;
which was enveloped in a long flowing blanket of white tabby
silk, lined with white satin, and embroidered with ribbon of
the same color. The Minister from a shining pewter basin
sprinkled water in the face of the child, saying, Urania
Bathsheba, I baptize thee in the name of the Father, and Son,
and Holy Ghost. Margaret was not alone in the number
of causes that disturbed the serenity of the Meeting that day;
there was an amount of mirth in the minds of the people at
large, respecting Mr. Adolphus Hadlock's children, which as a
matter of course must spend itself on their annual return to the
altar. When the afternoon services were over, Mistress
Ramsdill
insisted on Margaret's remaining to the catechising, an
arrangement to which the Widow Wright, who intended to
take the child home, consented. Margaret herself indeed at
first demurred, but Deacon Ramsdill supported the request of
his wife with one of his customary smiles, remarking that,
Catechising was as good arter the sermon to the children, as
greasing arter shearing, it would keep the ticks off, which he
said, were very apt to fly from the old sheep to the lambs. The
class, comprising most of the youths in town, was arranged in
the broad-aisle, the boys on one side, and the girls on the other,
with the Minister in the pulpit at the head. Mistress
Ramsdill
with Margaret, and several of the elderly people, occupied
the neighboring pews.
What is the chief end of man? was the first question; to
which a little boy promptly and swiftly gave the appropriate
answer.  How many persons are there in the Godhead?
There are four persons persons in the Godhead  replied
a little boy in the same tone of confidence that characterized
his predecessor. But before he could give the entire answer,
there was a cry all about, 'Tan't right, 'tan't right. The
Minister, being a little deaf, did not perceive the error, or at
least did not correct it. Deacon Hadlock at the instance of
Miss Amy intimated to him that there was a mistake. The
boy thus doubly challenged, seemed disposed to make good his
position. 'Tis right, said he in a whisper loud enough to
be heard over the house, at the same time counting on his
fingers, Marm said 'twas just like her and Daddy and me that
made three in one family, and now Grandad has come to live
with us it makes four. The inadvertence being adjusted, the
questioning proceeded. Wherein consists the sinfulness of
that state wherein man fell? The sinfulness of that state
wherein man fell, God having out of his mere good pleasure,
elected some to everlasting life, all mankind by the Fall are
under his wrath and curse, and so made liable to the pains of
10*
Hell forever, was the rapid and disjointed answer. The
question
stumbling from one to another, was at length righted by
Job Luce, the little hunchback. His voice was low and
plaintive
,
soft and clear. Margaret looked over the pew to see him.
There were signs of dissatisfaction on the faces of others, but
his own was unruffled as a pebble in a brook. He was
shockingly deformed, his arms were long as an ape's, and he
seemed almost to rest on his hands, while his shoulders rose
high and steep above his head. That's Job Luce, whispered
Mistress Ramsdill to Margaret; and if there ever was a
Christian, I believe he is one, if he is crooked. Don't you see
how he knows the Catechism; he has got the whole Bible eeny
most by heart, and he is only three year old. Margaret's
eye became riveted on the boy, and the whole Catechism,
Effectual
Calling, Justification, Adoption, and Sanctification, were
disposed of, without further attention on her part. When the
children were dismissed, she broke from her kind friend, the
Deaconess, and took Job by the hand, while little Isabel
Weeks joined him on the other side. She looked into his
face, and he turned up his mild timid eye to her as much as to
say, Who are you that cares for me! In truth, Job was,
we will not say despised, but for the most part neglected. His
mother was a poor widow, whose husband had been a
shoemaker
,
and she supported herself and son binding shoes.
The old people treated her kindly, but rather wondered at her
boy; and what was wonder in the parents degenerated into
slight, jest, and almost scorn, in the children; so that Job
numbered but few friends. Then he got his lessons so well,
that the more indolent and duller boys were tempted to envy
him.
You didn't say the Catechism, said he to Margaret.
No, she replied, I don't know it; and I guess it isn't
so good as my Bird Book and Mother Goose's Songs. Their
conversation was suddenly interrupted by an exclamation and
a sigh proceeding from Miss Amy and the Widow Luce, who
were close behind them.
Oh dear! My poor boy! Woe, woe to a sinful mother!
was the sigh of the latter.
Child, child! exclaimed the former, addressing herself
to Margaret, don't you like the Catechism?
I don't know it, replied Margaret.
She an't bad, if they do call her an Injin, said Isabel.
I want to tell her about Whippoorwill, said Job.
God's hand lies heavily upon us! mournfully ejaculated
the Widow.
Can anything be done in such a sad state of things?
anxiously asked Miss Amy.
The several parties stopped. Miss Amy took Margaret's
hand, Job's was relinquished to that of his mother; and as
Margaret's course properly lay in a different direction, she
turned up the West Street, and Miss Amy walked on with
her.
Did you never read the Primer? asked the latter.
No, Ma'am, was the reply.
Do you know what God is?
The little boy said God was a spreeit.
Have you never learned how many persons there are in
the Godhead?
One of the little boys said there were four, but the others
said there were three.
Three, my child, three.
How do they all get in? I should love to see it.
Oh! Don't talk so, you amaze me. How dare you speak
in that way of the Great Jehovah!
The great what?
The Great God, I mean.
I thought it was a bird.
Alas! Can it be there is such benighted heathenism in
our very midst! said the lady to herself. Her interest in the
state of Margaret was quickened, and she pursued her
enquiries
with a most philanthropic assiduity.
Do you never say your prayers? she asked.
No, Ma'am, replied Margaret. But I can say the
Laplander's
Ode and Mary's Dream.
What do you do when you go to bed?
I go to sleep, Ma'am, and dream.
In what darkness you must be at the Pond!
O no, I see the Sun rise every morning, and the
snowdrops
don't open till it's light.
I mean, my poor child, that I am afraid you are very
wicked there.
I try to be good, and Pa is good when he don't get rum at
Deacon Penrose's, and Chilion is good, he was going to mend
my flower bed to-day, to keep the hogs out.
What, break the Sabbath! Violate God's holy day! Your
father was once punished in the Stocks for breaking the
Sabbath
.
God will punish us all if we do so.
Will it put our feet in the Stocks the same as they did
father?
No, my child. He will punish us in the lake that burneth
with fire and brimstone.
What, the same as Chilion and Obed and I burnt up the
bees?
Alas! alas! ejaculated the lady.
We were so bad, continued Margaret, I thought I
should cry.
Deacon Penrose and the rest of us have often spoken of
you at the Pond; and we have thought sometimes of going
up to see you. In what a dreadful condition your father is!
Yes, Ma'am, sometimes. He rolls his eyes so, and groans,
and shakes, and screams, and nobody can help him. I wish
Deacon Penrose would come and see him, and I think he
would not sell him any more rum.
But, my child, don't you know anything of the Great
God who made you and me?
Did that make me? I am so glad to know. The little
chickens come out of the shells, the beans grow in the pods,
the dandelions spring up in the grass, and Obed said I came
in an acorn, but the pigs and wild turkeys eat up the acorns,
and I can't find one that has a little girl in it like me.
Would you like to come down to Meeting again?
I don't know as I like the Meeting. It don't seem so
good as the Turkey Shoot and Ball. Zenas Joy didn't hurt
my arm there, and Beulah Ann Orff and Grace Joy talked
with me at the Ball. To-day they only made faces at me,
and the man at the door told me to throw away my flowers.
How deceitful is the human heart, and desperately
wicked!
Who is wicked?
We are all wicked.
Are you wicked? then you do not love me, and I don't
want you to go with me any farther.
Ah, my dear child, we go astray speaking lies as soon as
we be born.
I never told a lie.
The Bible says so, child.
Then the Bible is not true.
Do not run away. Let me talk with you a little more.
I don't like wicked people.
Yes, but I want to speak to you about Jesus Christ, do
you know him?
No, Ma'amYes Ma'am, I have heard Hash speak about
it when he drinks rum.
But did you not hear the Minister speak about him in the
pulpit to-day?
Yes, Ma'am,does he drink rum too?
No, no, child, he only drinks brandy and wine.
I have heard Hash speak so when he only drank that.
The Minister is not wicked like Hash,he does not get
drunk.
Hash wouldn't be wicked if he didn't drink. I wish he
could drink and not be wicked too.
O we are all wicked, Hash and the Minister, and you and
I; we are all wicked, and I was going to tell you how Christ
came to save wicked people.
What will he do to Hash?
He will burn him in hell-fire, my child.
Won't he burn the Minister too? I guess I shan't come to
Meeting any more. You and the Minister, and all the people
here are so wicked. Chilion is good, and I will stay at home
with him.
The Minister is a holy man, a good man I mean, he is
converted, he repents of his sins. I mean he is very sorry he
is so wicked.
Don't he keep a being wicked? You said he was
wicked.
Why, yes, he is wicked. We are all totally depraved.
You do not understand. I fear I cannot make you see it as it
is. My dear child, the eyes of the carnal mind are blind, and
they cannot see. I must tell you, though it may make you
feel bad, that young as you are, you are a mournful instance
of the truth of Scripture. But I dare not speak smooth
things to you. If you would read your Bible, and pray to
God, your eyes would be opened so you could see. But I did
want to tell you about Jesus Christ, who was both God and
Man. He came and died for us. He suffered the cruel death
of the cross. The Apostle John says, he came to take away
the sins of the world. If you will believe in Christ he will
save you. The Holy Spirit, that came once in the form of a
dove, will again come, and cleanse your heart. You must
have faith in the blood of Christ. You must take him as
your Atoning Sacrifice. Are you willing to go to Christ, my
child?
Yes, Ma'am, if he won't burn up Hash, and I want to go
and see that little crooked boy too.
It's wicked for children to see one another Sundays.
I did see him at Meeting.
I mean to meet and play and show picture-books, and
that little boy is very apt to play; he catches grasshoppers,
and goes down by the side of the brook, before sundown;
that is very bad.
Are his eyes sore, like Obed's, sometimes, so that the
light hurts him?
It is God's day, and he won't let children play.
He lets the grasshoppers play.
But he will punish children.
Won't he punish the grasshoppers too?
No.
Well, I guess, I an't afraid of God.
Miss Amy whether that she thought she had done all she
could for the child, or that Margaret seemed anxious to break
company with her, or that she had reached a point in the
road where she could conveniently leave her, at this instant
turned off into Grove Street, and Margaret pursued her course
homeward. She arrived at the Pond a little before sunset;
she fed her chickens, her squirrel and robin; her own supper
she made of strawberries and milk in her wooden bowl and
spoon. She answered as she was best able to all the enquiries
and banterings of the family relative to her new day's
adventure
.
She might have been tired, but the evening air and
the voices of the birds were inviting, and her own heart was
full of life; and she took a stroll up the Indian's Head.
Along a tangled path, trod by sheep, more by herself, and
somewhat by visiters to the Pond, she wound her way to the
summit. This, as we have said, was nearly one hundred feet
above the level of the Pond; on the top were the venerable
trunk of the Hemlock before referred to, a small cluster of
firs, a few spears of yellow orchard grass, and brown sorrel,
sparse tufts of hare-bells and buttercups, bunches of
sweet-fern
,
and mosses growing on the rocks. From the south front
projected a smooth shelving rock directly over the water,
forming the brow of the so called Head. This elevation
commanded
points of extensive and varied interest; the Pond
below, its dark waters dotted with green islands, its
forest-skirted
shore, the outlet, the dam, the deep and perpetual
gurgle
of the falling water. Beyond the dam was a broken
congeries
;
the result of wild diluvial force; horrid gulfs, high
rocky pinnacles, trees aslant, green dingles; to the west, the
hills crept along by gentle acclivities, and swelling upwards,
formed, to an untrained eye, the apparent boundaries of this
nether world. On the north was a continuation of the ridge
of mountains of which the Head itself seemed to be the close,
proceeding indefinitely till they met and melted into the sky.
On the north-west, buried like a cloud in the dimmest
distance
,
appeared the round, bald, but soft and azure crown of
Old Umkiddin. Beyond the Pond, on the south, extended a
forest without visible break or limitation. Turning to the
east one beheld the River, its meadows, the mountain beyond,
and below you, were portions of the village; to the south,
through the tops of the woods, some of the houses in No. 4
were seen; and on the south-west lay the hamlet, Breakneck.
In every direction, here and there, on side hills, in glades of
the forest, among orchard-groves, appeared the roofs of houses
and barns, dappling the scene, and reflecting in the middle of
the day, a grey silvery light, like mica in granite. To this
place Margaret ascended; here had she often come before,
and here in her future life she often came. She went up
early in the morning to behold the sun rise from the eastern
mountain, and be washed by the fogs that flowed up from the
River; at noon, to lie on the soft grass, under the firs, and
sleep the midtide sleep of all nature; or ponder with a childish
curiosity on the mystery of the blue sky and the blue hills; or
with a childish dread, on that of the deep dark waters below
her. She came up in the Fall to gather thimble, whortle and
rasp-barries that grew on the sides of the hill, and get the
leaves and crimson spires of the sumach for her mother to
color with. She now came up to see the sun go down; she
sat on the grass, with her hands folding her knees. Directly
on the right of the sun-setting, was an apparent jog or break
in the line of the woods and hills, having on one side
something
like a cliff or sharp promontory, jutting towards the
heavens, and overlooking what seemed like a calm clear sea
beyond; within this depression lay the top of Umkiddin,
before
spoken of; here also, after a storm, appeared the first
clear sky, and here at mid-day the white clouds, in long
ranges of piles, were wont to repose like ships at anchor, and
Margaret loved to look at that point. Nearer at hand, she
could see the roads leading to Dunwich and Brandon,
winding
,
like unrolled ribbons, through the woods. There were
also pastures covered with grey rocks, looking like sheep; the
green woods in some places were intersected by fields of
brown rye, or soft clover. On the whole, it was a verdant
scene,Greenness, like a hollow Ocean, spread itself out
before
her; the hills were green, the depths were green, the
trees, grass and weeds were green; and in the forest, on the
south margin of the Pond, the darkness, as the sun went down,
seemed to form itself into caverns, and grottoes, and strange
fantastic shapes, in the solid Greenness. In some instances
she could see the tips of the trees glancing and frolicking in
the light, while the greedy shadows were crawling up from
their roots, as it were out of the ground to devour them.
Deep in those woods the black-cap and thrush still whooted
and clang unweariedly; she heard also the cawing of crows,
and the scream of the loon; the tinkle of bells, the lowing of
cows, and the bleating of sheep were distinctly audible. Her
own Robin, on the Butternut below, began his long, sweet,
many-toned carol; the tree-toad chimed in with its loud
trilling
chirrup; and frogs, from the Pond and Mill Brook,
crooled, chubbed and croaked. Swallows skimmered over
her, and plunged into the depths below; swarms of flies in
circular
squadrons skirmished in the sunbeams before her eye;
and at her side, in the grass, crickets sung their lullabies to
the departing day; a rich, fresh smell from the water, the
woods, the wild-flowers, the grass-lots, floating up over the
hill, regaled her senses. The surface of the Pond, as the
sun receded, broke into gold-ripples, deepening gradually into
carmine and vermillion; suspended between her eye and the
horizon was a table-like form of illuminated mist, a bridge of
visible sun-beams shored on pointed shining piers reaching to
the ground. Margaret sat, we say, attentive to all this; what
were her feelings we know not now, we may know hereafter;
and clouds that had spent the Sabbath in their own way, came
with her to behold the sun-setting; some in long tapering
bands, some in flocky rosettes, others in broad, many-folded
collops. In that light they showed all colors, rose, pink,
violet and crimson, and the sky in a large circumference
about the sun weltered in ruddiness, while the opposite side
of the heavens threw back a purple glow. There were
clouds, to her eye, like fishes, the horned-pout, with its pearly
iridine breast, and iron-brown back; floating after it was a
shiner with its bright golden armory; she saw the blood-red
fins of the yellow-perch, the long snout of the pickerel with
its glancing black eye, and the gaudy tail of the trout. She
saw the sun sink half below the horizon, then all his round
red face go down; and the light on the Pond withdraw, the
bridge of light disappear, and the hollows grow darker and
darker. A stronger and better defined glow streamed for a
moment from the depths of the sun, into the sky, and flashed
through the atmosphere. The little rose-colored clouds
melted away in their evening joy, and went to rest up in the
dark unfathomable chambers of the heavens. The fishes
swam away with the sun, and plunged down the cataract of
light that falls over the other side of the earth; and the broad
massive clouds grew darker and grimmer, and extended
themselves
,
like huge-breasted lions couchant which the Master
had told her about, to watch all night near the gate of the
sun. She sat there alone, with no eye but God's to look upon
her; he alone saw her face, her expression, in that still, warm,
golden sun-setting; she sat as if for her the sun had gone
down, and the sky unloosed its glory; she sat mute and
undisturbed
,
as if she were the child-queen of this great pageant
of Nature.
While at the Pond, the birds were closing their strains, and
Margaret was taking her parting look of the sky, in the village
at the same moment, broke forth the first song of the day, and
was indulged the first unembarrassed vision. When the last
shimmer of blue light vanished from the top of the mountain
beyond the River, whither tenscore eyes were turned, there
exploded the long twenty-four hours pent up, and swollen
emotion of tenscore hearts and voices. Sun's down!
sun's down! was the first unrestrained voice the children
had uttered since the previous afternoon. This rang out in
every family, was echoed from house to house. The spell
was broken, the tether was cut, doors and gates flew open,
and out the children broke into the streets, to breathe a fresh
feeling, clutch at a tantalizing and fast receding enjoyment,
and give a minute's free play to hands, feet and tongues. An
avalanche of exuberant life seemed to have fallen from the
glacier summits of the Sabbath, and scattered itself over the
Green. The boys leaped and whooped towards the
Meeting-house
,
flung their hats into the air, chased one another in a
sort of stampede, and called for games with all possible
vociferation
.
Little Job Luce alone seems to have no share in the
general revel. He has been sitting by the Brook under a
willow, and as the boys come trooping by, he shrinks into the
house; his mother holds him awhile in her lap at the window,
when he, as the grasshoppers have already done, goes to bed.
The villagers, Abel Wilcox and Martha Madeline Gisborne,
Hancock Welles and Hester Penrose, Deacon Ramsdill and
his wife, Deacon Hadlock, Dr. Spoor and his wife, Esq.
Beach, his wife and children, appear in the streets, they walk
up the different roads, and visit from house to house.
11
The Indian's Head, meanwhiles, sinks into shadows and
silence, and Margaret is hushed as the sky above her; the
cool fresh evening wind blows upon her, trills through her
brown curls and passes on. Her mother appeared on the top
of the hill, and without words or noise sat down beside her.
She folded her arm about Margaret's neck, and with one hand
grasped and fingered that of her child, and with the other
dallied with the locks of her hair;but abstractedly, and with
her eye fixed on the darkening expanse. Her own grizzled
hair was swept by the wind, and her bared swarthy bosom
seemed to drink in life from the twilight world. In calm
sternness, in mute brownness she sat, and apparently
thoughtful
,
and as it were unconsciously she pressed Margaret hard to
her breast. Was it an old memory, some old hope, some
recollection of her own childhood, some revival of her own
mother's imagewas it some feeling of despair, some selfish
calculation, a dim glimpse into eternity, an impulse of
repenting
sin, a visitation of God's spiritwas it a moment of
unavowed
tenderness? Presently Chilion came up with his viol,
and going to the projecting rock, sat with his feet dangling
over the precipice. Margaret leaving her mother went to her
brother, stood leaning on his shoulder, and looked down into
the mysterious depth below. Her brother began to play, and
as if he had imbibed the dizziness, dread and profundity of
that abyss, played accordingly, and she shuddered and started,
and then relieving the impression, he played the soft, starry,
eternal repose of the heavens, and chased away that
abyss-music
from her soul. Then her father came up, his red face
glistening even in the shadows, with a bottle of rum, which he
drank, and laughed, and repeated over to her many passages
of the Bible, and imitated the tones, expressions and manners
of all the religious persons whom Margaret had seen in the
village; and then making a papoose of her, he carried her
down the hill.
That night Margaret dreamed a dream, and in this wise
dreamed she. She was in a forest, and the sun was going
down among the trees. Its round red disk changed to yellow,
as she looked, and then to white; then it seemed to advance
towards her, and the woods became magically luminous. She
beheld her old familiar birds flying among the branches with a
singularly lustrous plumage, the wild-flowers glowed under her
feet, and the shrubbery glittered about her. The ball of light
came forward to a knoll or rise of ground, about a dozen rods
before her, and stopped. A gradual metamorphosis was seen
to go on in it, till at last it came out in the form of a man, like
a marble statue, dressed not as Margaret had been accustomed
to see, but in a simple robe that descended to his feet, and he
leaned upon a milk-white cross. Near this appeared another
form of a man, clothed in a similar manner, but smaller in size,
and perched on his hand was a milk-white dove. Margaret
looked at these men, or forms of men, in silent wonder.
Presently
she saw a suffusion and outflowing of animal life in
them. The face of the first was pale but very fair, and a
hidden under-tinge of color seemed to show through an almost
transparent skin, as she had seen the blush of the white
goose-foot
shining through a dew drop. In the preternatural light
that filled the place, Margaret saw that his eyes were
dark-blue
,
and his hair, parted on the crown, flowed in dark-brown
curls down his neck. The appearance of the other was
similar, only the glow on his cheeks seemed to be more
superficial
,
and his look was more youthful. The cross on which
the elder leaned, Margaret now saw set in the ground, where
it grew like a tree, budded and bore green leaves and white
flowers, and the milk-white dove, becoming also endowed with
life, flew and lit upon the top of it. She then saw the younger
of the two men pick flowers from the blooming cross-tree, and
give them to the other, who seemed pleased with their beauty
and fragrance. She found herself moving towards these two
persons, who had so singularly appeared to her, and when she
saw one of them pick off the flowers, she was secretly impelled
to gather some. She proceeded to collect such as grew near
her, calico bush, Solomon's seal, lambkill and others similar to
those she found in the woods on her way to the Meeting, which
she tied with a grass string. Then she got a large bunch of
checker, partridge and strawberries. She carried her flowers
in one hand and her berries in the other. All at once the
milk-white dove flew from the green cross-tree and alighted
upon her shoulder, thus seeming to establish a communication
between herself and these two persons, and as she moved on,
all the birds in the woods, the same as she had heard in the
morning, sung out right merrily. When she stopped, they
ceased to sing, and when she started, they began again. As
she was going on, suddenly issuing from behind a tree,
appeared
to her in her dream, the same lady who had talked with
her after meeting, Miss Amy.
Where are you going? said the lady.
I am going to see those men, and give that beautiful one
these flowers and berries, replied Margaret.
That is Jesus Christ that I told you about this afternoon,
and the other is the Apostle John, rejoined the lady.
Is it? said Margaret, then I think he won't want my
flowers.
No, added the lady. He is God, the second person in
the Godhead. He does not want flowers.
Is he? asked Margaret. One of those things you told
me about in the Catechism? I am so sorry.
He is the same in substance with the Father, equal in
power and glory. He does not want your flowers, he wants
you to believe in him; you must have faith in that cross.
What shall I do? responded Margaret. I was going
to carry him some flowers, I saw him smell of some. He looks
as if he would love me.
Love you? rejoined the lady. What does the Primer
say, that you deserve everlasting destruction in hell, that you
have not prayed to God, and have broken his Holy Sabbaths.
While they were talking, the birds ceased to sing, and the
dove leaving Margaret's shoulder, flew back to the cross. She
started impulsively and said, I will go. As she proceeded
slowly along, in the variegated phenomena of the dream,
Deacon Hadlock stood before her, and asked her where she
was going, to whom she made the same reply as before.
You cannot go, said he, unless you are effectually
called. You are wholly disabled by reason of sin.
It is only a little ways, replied she, and I went clear
down to the village to-day alone. He looks as if he wanted
me to come.
Yes, rejoined the Deacon, if you were in a right frame
of mind, if you were duly humbled. You are vain, proud,
deceitful, selfish and wholly depraved.
No, I am not, replied she.
Even there you show the blindness of the carnal mind.
He is beckoning to me, said Margaret.
If he should appear to you as he truly is, a just God, who
hates sin, and should gird on his sword, then your rebellious
heart would show itself, then you would hate him.
While Deacon Hadlock detained Margaret, the Widow
Luce went by leading her crooked boy Job, Mistress Adolphus
Hadlock and her son Socrates, Mistress Whiston and her
youngest daughter Joan, Mistress Hatch and her little boy
Isaiah, and Helen Weeks with her brother and sister Judah
and Isabel, and several elderly people, men and women.
He an't a hanging on the cross as he is in the Primer, said
Isaiah Hatch.
Where is the tub, Ma? asked Joan Whiston. I
thought you said we were going to be washed in his blood.
Blessed Saviour! by faith I behold thee! exclaimed
Mistress Palmer, coming through the woods.
I guess he don't want you, said Judah Weeks to Job
Luce.
I shall have as many raisins as I can eat when I get to
heaven, said Socrates Hadlock.
I thought he was coming to judgment, in clouds and flaming
fire, taking vengeance on them that know not God, said the
Camp-Preacher looking from behind a tree.
John the disciple and companion of Jesus was now seen
approaching. Welcome to Jesus! he said, as he came
near to the people. The good shepherd welcomes his flock!
as saith the old Prophet, `He will take the lambs in his bosom
and gently lead those that are with young.' He is the Eternal
Life now manifested unto you; come to him that he may give
you some of his life; he is the truth, he will impart to you that
truth; approach him that his own divine image may be
reflected
in you; love him, and so become possessed of his
spirit. The crowd drew back, or rather within itself, as the
holy Apostle approached speaking. Children snuggled to their
parents, and the elderly people seemed disconcerted. Christ
bids me say, continued the Apostle, Suffer the little
children to come unto me, for of such is the kingdom of
heaven.
I know not how many of us may be included in this
invitation
,
said Deacon Hadlock, as the senior officer of the
church, and more prominent man, speaking on behalf of the
company.
Whosoever thirsts, replied the Apostle, let him come.
Whoever would have the true life, like a well of water
springing
up in his soul, let him come to the living source.
It is to be hoped that some of us have been made worthy
partakers of the efficacy of Christ's death, said Deacon
Penrose.
Whosoever doeth not righteousness, rejoined the Apostle,
is not of God, neither he that loveth not his brother; every
one that loveth is born of God, and knoweth God.
I want he should take me in his arms and bless me, as he
did the little children in the Bible, said Isabel Weeks to her
sister.
He looks so beautiful and good, said Helen. I should
rejoice to go near him. It seems as if my heart had for a
great while longed to meet such gentleness and purity.
11*
Alas! exclaimed Deacon Hadlock, that you should
apply
again that unction to your lips! You think your natural
amiability will commend you to Christ. You believe there is
something good in your nature.When, added he turning to
the Apostle, when will this young gal see herself as she is, feel
her own sinfulness, her utter helplessness by nature, and throw
herself on the mere mercy of God?
Hold! said the Apostle. She is in the way of
salvation
.
Her natural amiability is pleasing to Christ. He was
amiable in his youth before God and man. No human being
is sinful by nature. If she have deep love in her soul, that will
remove all traces of the carnal mind. Her love, I see it now,
flows out to Jesus, and his love ever flows out to her, and all
the children of men, and in this union of feeling and spirit will
she become perfect in holiness.
By this time, little Job Luce, as it seemed in the dream,
forgotten and neglected by the crowd, slipping away
unobserved
,
and creeping through the bushes and trees, had gone round
and come out near the cross, under which he stood, and began
playing with the Dove, that offered itself very familiarly to him.
When Margaret saw this, she said she would go too, and
Helen and Isabel said they would go. He's God! cried
Isaiah Hatch, and run away. He's all bloody! said
Socrates
Hadlock, and started back. Jesus, having taken Job by
the hand, was now seen leading him towards them. The little
crumpled boy appeared to have become cured of his deformity,
he walked erect, the hump had sunk from his back, and his
hands no longer touched the ground.
We read that the crooked shall be made straight, said
Deacon
Ramsdill, with one of his very natural smiles.
I don't care who or what he is, spake out Mistress Palmer,
I do love him, and if Rhody was here, she would love him,
and give right up to him now.
Wal, for my part, responded Mistress Hatch, I'm greatly
disappinted. It an't what I expected. He an't no more God
than anything. I shan't trust my soul to a man. Come Isaiah,
we'll go home.
The Cause of this large company, and these varied
sensations
now appeared distinctly approaching; Jesus himself
drew near. The tree-cross, green and flowering, moved along
with him; the birds in the woods renewed their song, and even
the milk-white dove flew from tree to tree, as it were to give
good cheer to some of the more timid little birds. Some of
the people retreated and stood afar off behind the trees, others
clustered about Deacon Hadlock.
Behold him! outspoke the Apostle John, the fairest
among the sons of men; our elder Brother; he took upon
himself
our nature, and is not ashamed to call us Brethren. He
hath loved us, and given himself for us, as the good Paul said,
an offering and a sacrifice to God for a sweet smelling savor.
The voice of Jesus himself was heard at last sounding
heavenly
sweet and tenderly free among the bewildered people.
Come unto me all ye that labor and are heavy laden, and I
will give you rest. Learn of me, for I am meek and lowly of
heart. The bruised reed he will not break, added John,
nor quench the smoking flax.
I am not come to condemn you, was still the voice of
Jesus, but that by me you may be saved. I give myself for
your life. Through my holiness ye shall sin no more.
Yes, exclaimed Helen Weeks earnestly, we will go to
him! Come Isabel, come Margaret.
These three interlocked, Margaret still retaining her berries
and flowers, the kind Apostle led forward, and Jesus smiled upon
them as they approached, and took each of them by the hand,
and spake some comforting and assuring words to them, and they
looked with a reverential pleasure into his face. Margaret,
who from her own ignorance of the person she addressed
felt less fear of him than the others, was the first who spoke to
him. Do you love flowers? said she, at the same time
extending
the bunch she had in her hand. Christ took them,
and replied, Yes, I do. God bless you, my dear child.
Can he bless and love me? said Helen, addressing herself
directly to Jesus, but adopting the customary third person.
Yes, replied he; I love those that love me, keep your
heart pure, for out of it are the issues of life, and I and the
Father will come and dwell with you.
Can he have mercy on a poor sinner like me? asked
Mistress
Palmer. I forgive you, Daughter, he replied; Go
and sin no more.
Are you God? asked Margaret. No, child, he
answered
,
I am not God. But love me, and you will love God.
Is he not the second Person in the Godhead? enquired
Miss Amy, in a humble voice. No, said Jesus.
It an't God!The Primer is'nt right! was whispered
among the children.
There is some mistake here, said Deacon Hadlock, as if
he was afraid Christ had not fully explained himself.
There is no mistake, replied St. John.
But are we not saved by the Atoning Sacrifice, and can
that be made except by an infinite being, and is not that being
God? added the Deacon.
We are only saved by a Divine Union with God and
Christ. He that dwelleth in Love dwelleth in God and God
in him. This Inter-dwelling is our salvation, and this is the
Atonement.
That's nater, said Deacon Ramsdill, I understand that.
I am afeered some of us are resting upon a sandy foundation.
I was a poor sinner, continued the Apostle, till I came
into this oneness with Christ. I feel safe and happy now, my
soul is elevated and purified. To be with him is like being
with God; to possess his spirit, is to bear the virtues of heaven;
to be formed in his image is the blessed privilege of humanity.
To effect such a change is the object for which he came into
the world, and that which I have seen and heard, and handled
and enjoyed, I declare unto you, that you, beloved friends,
may have fellowship with me; and truly my fellowship is with
the Father, and with his Son Jesus Christ.
We are emptied of all self-righteousness, said Deacon
Hadlock, we are altogether become filthy.
Have you no love, joy, peace, long-suffering, goodness,
faith? asked the Apostle.
Alas, none, replied the Deacon.
Say not so, rejoined the Apostle. A single look of his
will pierce you through and through.
What the gentleman says may be true, interposed
Deacon
Penrose; but I think it highly inexpedient to speak of
these things. We might adjourn, a few of us, to my
counting-room
,
or to the Parson's study, and confer upon the matter;
but to talk in this way before all the people is the worst policy
that could have been adopted. It is an imprudence to which I
shall not commit myself; nor can I sanction it any longer with
my presence. So saying he disappeared.
Look at these children, continued St. John, the very
flowers and berries they bring are the affectionate tribute of
their hearts to the Infinite Goodness and Divine Beauty that
appear in Christ; it is the out-flowing of a pure love; it is
the earnest and fore-shadowing of the salvation that has already
begun in their souls. That young lady's yearning after the
love of Jesus is a sign that the Regeneration has commenced
within her, and by it a communication is opened between her
soul and his, which is the Atonement, and so also she becomes
united to God, who is manifested and resident in Christ.
But what will become of her past sins? asked Miss Amy
anxiously.
I forgive them, said Christ. All power, Daughter, is
given unto me, and that of complete and eternal pardon.
What have we been about all our lives, that we know not
so much of the Gospel as these children! exclaimed Deacon
Hadlock mournfully and yet resistingly. Whereupon it came
to pass that the crowd withdrew or melted away like a mist,
and Margaret with Helen Weeks, her sister Isabel, her
brother Judah, and Job Luce were left alone with Jesus and
John. Helen fell at the feet of Jesus, and overpowered by her
emotions, wept with a calm deep weeping; Margaret looked
into his face, and tears came into her eyes also.
Will you forgive me, Job, said Judah to the little boy,
for all that I have done to you?
Yes; replied Job.
Be good children and love one another, said Jesus to them,
and the two boys disappeared.
Weep not, child of my love, said he to Helen, confide in
me, dwell near my heart, obey the Gospel; I will be the life of
your life, the well-spring of your soul, and in purity shall
Heaven
be revealed in you. The little Isabel, she shall be blest
too, I will carry the lamb in my bosom. When he had said
this, they two vanished from the dream.
You ask me who is God, child, said he turning to
Margaret
,
who now alone remained; God is Love. Be pure in
heart, and you shall see God. Love much, and he shall be
manifest to you. Your flowers are fair, your spirit is fairer;
I am well pleased with their fragrance, the breath of your
love is sweeter to me.Margaret! he continued, to you
it shall be given to know the mysteries of Heaven. But the
end is not yet. Man shall rise against his fellow and many
shall perish. The Church has fallen. The Eve of Religion
has again eaten the forbidden fruit. You shall be a co-worker
with me in its second redemption. I speak to you in parables,
you understand not. You shall understand at another day.
You are young, but you may advance in knowledge and
goodness
.
You must be tempted, blessed if you can endure
temptation
.
Be patient, and earnest, hopeful and loving. I too was
a child like you, and it is that you must be a child like me.
Through the morning shadows of childhood you shall pass to
the perfect day. I unconsciously grew in favor with God and
man, so shall you. This Cross is the burden of life, which
all must bear. Bear it well, and it shall bring forth flowers and
fruit to you. This Dove stands for the innocency and virtue,
strength and support, that flow from God to all. In a dream
have all these things passed before you. Forget not your
dream. There is much evil in the world, sin not. You must
be afflicted, faint not. Let me kiss you, my sweet child.
Thus spake Jesus, and the dream again changed. The two
persons were seen to return to marble-like forms, and these
forms became a round ball of light, which, receding through
the forest, stood on the distant mountains like the setting sun,
and Margaret awoke. The morning light appeared in her
chamber
,
and as she looked from her window, she saw the golden
sun coming up over the green woods, and the birds were
pealing
their songs through the air. Margaret went down with
bright feelings, light-hearted and free; she brought water from
the cistern for her mother to wash, spread the clothes on the
bushes, and guarded some yarn from the birds.
CHAPTER XV.
MARGARET PASSES A NIGHT AT THE STILL, AND SOLOMON SMITH
MAKES HER USEFUL.
It
will be remembered that Hash, the brother of Margaret,
at the Spring training, was punished not only by imprisonment,
but also with an inconsiderable fine, for disorderly behavior on
that occasion. Not being himself possessed of the money, he
had recourse to the Smiths at No. 4, to whom he pledged his
oxen for the sum advanced. To acquit himself in that quarter,
he engaged his services as night-warden at the Still. In
addition
for
this seemed to be a point especially insisted upon
he promised that Margaret should accompany him in that
duty.
The Still, or Distillery, was a smutty, clouted, suspicious
looking building, on the slope of ground between the Tavern
and Mill Brook. It rose a single story on one side and two on
the other, into the former of which the barrels of cider were
rolled, and emptied into the cauldron below. The latter was
the chief scene of operation; here were the furnace; the
boiler with its
cap
for collecting the vapor and conveying it
into the worm-pipe or condenser; the
refrigerator
, an
immense
cask, holding the worm, and constantly supplied with
fresh cool water, brought by a series of large troughs from
the Brook above; and the
receiver
, a barrel, into which the
condensed vapor of the cider, now having assumed the form
called spirits, issuing from the worm, fell drop by drop. This
was a large long room, dark from the absence of windows, and
darker still from the accretions of smoke and dust about the
walls, and filled with a strong alchoholic effluvium. There
were barrels of spirits, and piles of wood lying about, and the
bare earth served for a floor. Into this place at night-fall were
wont to assemble the people of the neighborhood, men and
boys, and sometimes girls. Here came Margaret with Hash
and Bull. A pine torch was blazing on the top of the furnace.
Two boys sat in the light of the fire on the ground playing
mumble-the-peg. Old Isaac Tapley leaned on the furnace
inhaling
the fumes of the boiling cider that puffed from a leak in
the cap; little Isaiah Hatch caught with his fingers the drops
that fell from the worm, and conveyed them to his mouth;
and the men vied with one another who should render
themselves
most acceptable to Solomon, helping him crowd wood
into the fire. Damaris Smith politely offered to instruct
Margaret
in the game of Fox and Geese, which they played sitting
on a bench having the requisite lines branded across it. At
length the nine o'clock bell was heard from the village, a tone
mellowed by the distance and the woods, and which breaking
in upon many a scene of idleness, dissipation, domestic quiet,
or friendly visit, admonished the gay of vanity, the devout of
prayer, and all of bed-time. The people went away, and soon
after Solomon, leaving Margaret and Hash to their night's
work, that of tending the fire. It was not long before Hash,
whom Solomon had been treating with singular generosity,
exhibited signs of intoxication, and in a few minutes was
extended
senseless on the ground. Then was Margaret left
alone, with a dead-drunk brother, a roaring furnace, a hot and
hissing cauldron, barrels of detestable drink, grotesque and
frightful shadows leaping on the beams; while through the
aperture above, the reflected light seemed to grin at her like a
demon of the Still. When the fire burnt low, she replenished
it with dry hemlock wood, which snapped like the report of
subterranean musketry, and the splinters of fire dashed out
spray-like into the room, and fell upon her brother's face,
which she was obliged to shield with boards. The gurgling of
the water, as it flowed in and out from the vat, would have
been music to her ears, if she were free to enjoy it; but it was
her own sweet Pond contributing to the wicked business of
rum-making;and so too was she. Would she finish her
work, and flow away as uncontaminated! Her father had
never troubled her with ghost-stories, and she was not disposed
to conjure up alarms from that source. The night showed
dark and chilly, as she looked from the door. She could see
nothing but darkness, and hear nothing but the Brook as it
rippled through the invisible air; but the pure coolness was
refreshing after her hot and fetid furnace-work. Bull followed
her to the door-sill, and crouching at her side, looked
compassionatingly
into her face. When she saw his gentle
sympathizing
expression, as she had done before, she put her arms
about his neck, and wept. She did not complain, or fear, or
feel any wrong or loss, but she wept irresistibly because her
dog loved her; and then she continued to weep as it were
mechanically because there was nothing to occupy her deep
sensitive faculties, and her tears alone remained to flow out;
and so too she fell to laughing, and laughed almost wildly and
incoherently; then chills crept over her, partly from the
increasing
and overpowering coldness of the air, and partly from
an irrepressible nature which must always feel cold if it be not
deeply and warmly loved.
She again renewed the fire, and sat down on the bench
before
it, and Bull, who followed her steps silently from place to
place, watched near her, and she began to try the movements
of the fox and geese game, then she turned towards the fire,
then she looked into the dog's eyes; and as she looked his
eyes seemed to grow larger and larger, and to run together,
and to cover his face. They had a soft clear aspect like
water. Then it seemed as if what she saw became a great
sheet of water, like her Pond, and golden waves, such as the
sunsetting gives, chased one another over it, and those golden
appearances which the moonlight occasions, she saw deep in
its bosom, like strings, or eels, or fishes, frisking and playing,
elongating and breaking off, dilating and narrowing.
Presently
she found herself sinking in these waters, and down, down,
down she went, till she came to an open, hollow place, into
which the light shone as from a cloud. Here she saw a bright
silver basin, or cauldron set, with a fire burning under it, and
three beautiful girls busy about it. One kept renewing the
fire with rose-bushes, bright frost-reddened autumnal leaves,
aromatic dead ferns, and white cotton grass. One threw into
the pot wild flowers, eye-brights, azaleas, blood-roots,
rhodoras
and others; then she caught in her hands the snake-like
moonbeam appearances, and threw them in; then with a long
rake she gathered a quantity of sunbeams which she put in;
then turning a facet at the end of a silver pipe connecting
with the blue sky, she set that running into the pot; then she
threw in a handful of sweet-scented herbs, lavender,
chamomile
,
balm, marjoram; at last cutting off a slice of the
rainbow
,
she grated that over the whole. The third, with a long
silver rod, stirred the contents of the pot. Then each one
taking a silver ladle began to dip out the liquor and pour it in
one place on the ground. As they poured it out, it became
congealed, and the mass increasing, it assumed a human
form; which was that of a female. As they continued to
pour over it the contents of the pot, feet were formed, and
legs, and breast, and arms, and the shape of a head. One
poured on another ladle full, and beautiful eyes appeared;
another another, and a delicate lovely color came out in the
face; the third added her ladle, which covered the head and
neck with long, dark, curling hair. When the Form was
complete
,
they wove with their fingers out of the light, a sort of
drapery which they threw over it. Then one began to
sing, and another to play on a sort of harp; while the third
led down from the skies the brilliant Planet Venus, by a bridle
of blue taste tied about one of its rays, and as it hung floating
near the ground, she fastened it to a spear of grass to keep it
from going off. While the two first were singing and playing,
the spirit of life came into the Form, it was animated with a
soul, and stood before them a perfect human being. The
three girls seemed greatly delighted with the beautiful lady
they had created, and were even transported to such a degree
as if they would worship her. Margaret, meanwhile, was
unobserved, and without being able to have any connection
with these persons, she quietly saw all that happened. The
Beauty, for such the new-formed woman might worthily be
called, did not, however, long consent to receive the adulation
of the others, but took pains to demonstrate her equality with
them in sundry pleasing ways, and the four disported together
on the green grass; then they all went to bathe in a stream of
clear water that opened near by. After this the Beauty was
seated on the brilliant Planet Venus, which was unhitched,
and holding by the blue taste as a snaffle, she sailed slowly
away into the air, followed, and as it were guarded, by the
others who were borne up by some invisible power in their
own bodies. The growling of Bull startled Margaret, and
she found she had been dreaming, and when she was fairly
12
awake, she discovered Solomon Smith coming stealthily
through the door of the Still. His manner showed great
uneasiness
as if he were on some dubious expedition, he thrust
his head forward, like a turkey, into every part of the
building
,
as if he suspected somebody was hidden there, and
manifested
great joy when he found Hash was so completely
insensible. Bull drew nearer to Margaret, and Margaret
pressed closer to Bull. But Solomon told her not to be afraid,
said he would not hurt her, and seating himself on the end of
the bench, edged himself towards her. What he said to her
was that she had been a good girl in minding the fire so well,
and asked her if she wouldn't have some toddy, which she
refused.
You are a curis creetur, he continued, and an't no
moon-calf nuther. You know at the trainin', guess as how, I
found you out in the rain, and took you into the Tavern, and
you might have staid there all night for all anybody else lookin'
arter you. Now you won't begrutch me a favor will you,
Peggy? Can you tell what makes the likker come out of that
are pipe?
No, I can't, she replied. I wish it didn't.
What makes dogs howl when you die?
I don't know. I think Bull would, if I should die.
Didn't you know you could catch a thief by putting a
rooster under a kittle? It'll crow as soon as the rascal
touches it, guess as how.
I didn't know that.
You found the water up to Mr. Palmer's, didn't you,
Peggy? he enquired in an increasingly low and earnest
manner.
No, replied she. The boys found it.
You carried the stick, and Nimrod said you found it, and
so did Rhody and the Widder.
Did they say so?
Wal, now I want you should tell me if you ever found a
four-leaf clover? Speak low; walls have ears.
Yes, she answered, twenty, in the Mowing.
Did you ever kill a cricket?
No, they sing so pretty, I couldn't kill one.
That's you. I wouldn't kill one. It's dum bad. Do you
put a Bible under your pillow when you go to bed?
What, such as Miss Amy told me about? She says the
Bible makes people all wicked; and Pa's Bible makes us
wicked too. I don't like Bibles.
Little coot! Don't you know the Bible is the best book
in the world. I always sleep with one, guess as how.Let
me see your finger nails. Is there any black spots on them?
When they are dirty, and I dig roots for Obed.
Now keep still, Peggy, I want to tell you something. I
have had a dream.
I wonder if you dream too!
Yes, I have had a dream three nights a runnin'. I can't
tell you about it now. But look here, Peg, Hash owes us for
money, and he'll have to lose his oxen if it an't paid dum
soon. He drinks more than his work comes to, but if you
are willing to do what I want you to, I'll let him off.
What shall I do? said Margaret, with some degree of
uncertainty and distress. Keep still, Bull, there, there,
Bull; they won't hurt me, Bull.
I want you to go up with me to-night to the
Fortune-teller's
,
Joyce Dooly's.
To this proposal, Solomon, after considerable coaxing and
threatening, succeeded in gaining Margaret's consent;
promising
that he would release Hash altogether from his
obligations
,
if she would do as he wished.
Solomon, in a few minutes, brought a horse to the door,
and taking Margaret behind him, with the dog in company,
rode off. They crossed Mill Brook, went up a half mile or so
on the Brandon road, when they dismounted, and took a
narrow path, on foot, into the woods. It was pitch dark, and
Margaret had to hold by the skirt of Solomon's coat, while he
felt his way before. They espied at length a light, and
entered a door. In a small, low, ragged room, in what sort
of a house or place it was impossible for Margaret to
tell, she found an old woman with a dish of coals and
two tallow candles burning before her on a table, both of
which she seemed to be intently watching. She was evidently
prepared for the visit, and showed by her manner that she had
been waiting their arrival. Joyce Dooly the Fortune-teller
was old, her face was pinched and sharpened, her eye
black and piercing; she was somewhat fantastically dressed,
and began using sundry cabalistic and charmed words. Five
cats darted from chairs and the chimney side, when Bull
entered, hissing and spitting, and all raised their backs
together in one corner of the room. This movement seemed
to disturb her for a moment, but observing it more attentively
she at length became quiet, as if all was right. Her
immediate
business was with Margaret, whom, after settling certain
preliminaries with the coals of fire, the candle wicks, the
cats, some cards and astrological tracts that lay on the table,
but which we need not describe, she proceeded to examine.
In what month were you born? asked the
Fortune-teller
.
I don't know, replied Margaret.
What, how! exclaimed the old woman, in a tone of
mingled surprise and rebuke. Why have you brought the
gal here? Nativity is the most important. In what house,
Aquarius, Cancer, or Mercury,we know nothing about it.
Was Jupiter in the ascendant? The Moon in aspect to
what? How can we tell?
I don't care for your riggledorums, retorted Solomon,
with suppressed impatience. Will she answer my purpose?
You have got your money to find out that, and that is all I
want to know.
Hold, Solomon! she said, with an overawing sternness.
The cats are against you. Keep still. Here, child, let me
look at you. Curled hair, so she went on, denoteth heat
and drought; brown, fairness, justice, freedom and liberality.
Your signs are contradictory, child. Venus
must
have been
in square signs when you were born. Do you never have any
trouble?
Sometimes, she replied, when Deacon Penrose and
Mr. Smith sell rum to Pa and Hash.
Take note, Solomon, continued the woman, she refers
her troubles to you. She prognosticates disaster, sorrow and
death. You had better let her alone.
Solomon became inwardly greatly excited, but he strove to
control himself, and whispered something in the ears of the
woman, who pursued her inspection of the child.
Lips, said she, fairly set and well colored, argue
fidelity, and a person given to all virtue; brow high and
smooth, signifieth a sincere friend and liberal benefactress;
small ears, a good understanding; neck comely and smooth,
a good genius; brown eyes, clear and shining, ingenuity,
nobility and probity. Let me see you laugh. Teeth white
and even, argue sweetness and reverence; dimples, persuasion
and command; hand, soft and clear, hath discretion, service,
delight in learning, peace-loving; palm D in mount of the
Moon,ha! ha! do you want to know, child! many and
dutiful and fair children,would you like to have children?
Yes, Ma'am, replied Margaret.
The Fortune-teller seemed to be wandering from her proper
point, and becoming quite absorbed in the characteristics and
tokens of the child gave renewed uneasiness to Solomon, who
expressed his feelings in a loud and somewhat menacing tone.
Rest you, young man! she replied, your fortune is
wrapt in that of the child. The hour cometh. Your
significator
must apply to a sextile of Mercury and Venus. I
see a coffin in the wick of this candle. Scare the cats, let
me see them jump once more. Now is your moment, depart.
Whatever might be the meaning of this visit and this
singular mummery to Margaret, Solomon, it appeared, had
now accomplished his object, and was ready to leave. They
plunged from the light again into the darkness, and retracing
their steps through the woods, returned to the Still. Margaret
would have gone in to her brother, but Solomon declared he
had something more for her to do, and insisted that she should
ride a little farther with him. They went up the road leading
to the Pond, and arriving at a growth of trees known as the
Pines, lying on the west side of the way, Solomon hitched
his horse, and led Margaret once more into the woods.
Reaching a spot which he seemed previously to have in his
mind, he put a hazle-twig into the child's hand, and bade her
go about among the trees in the same manner as she did at
Mr. Palmer's at the Ledge. She was not long in announcing
the movement of the twig, and the young man secured himself
of the place as well as he could in the darkness, by piling a
heap of stones over it. She asked him what it was for, but
he declined telling; and what he would not do, we must,
since, in the sequel, the whole affair came out. This young
Smith had a dream, three nights successively, of gold hid in
the Pines. He could not identify the precise locality, and
sundry private canvassings of the earth with a spade had
hitherto been fruitless. Hence his anxiety to secure the
services
of Margaret, whose success on a former occasion with
the divining rod he had been apprized of; hence also his visit
to Joyce Dooly the Fortune-teller, for the purpose of
fortifying
himself more completely in his undertaking. Once more in
this night of wanderings and mystery was Margaret
conducted
to the Still. Morning had scarcely begun to dawn,
and Solomon had time to dispose of his horse in the stable,
and himself in bed, before the family were up. Margaret
found Hash yet in his sleep, the fire decayed, and the Still
dark, cold and dismal as the morning after a debauch. She
rekindled the fire, sufficiently at least for her own comfort,
and lying down before it, with her head upon the breast of
Bull, fell fast asleep.
12*
CHAPTER XVI.
MARGARET ENQUIRES AFTER THE INFINITE; AND CANNOT MAKE
HER WAY OUT OF THE FINITE.SHE UNWITTINGLY CREATES A
GREAT SENSATION IN THE TOWN OF LIVINGSTON.
What
is God? said Margaret one morning to the
Master, who in his perambulations encountered her just
as she was driving the cow to pasture, and helped her put
up the bars.
God, God replied he, drawing back a little, and
thrusting his golden-headed cane under his arm, and blowing
his nose with his red bandanna handkerchief. You shut
your cow in the pasture to eat grass, don't you, mea
discipula
?
added he after returning his handkerchief to his
pocket, and planting himself once more upon his cane.
Yes, she replied.
What if she should try to get out?
We put pegs in the bars sometimes.
Pegs in the bars! ahem. Suppose she should stop eating,
and leaning her neck across the bars, cry out, `O you,
Mater
hominum bovumque
! who are you? Why do you wear a
pinafore?' In other words, should ask after you, her little
mistress; what would you think of that, hey?
I don't know what I should, replied Margaret, it would
be so odd.
Cows, rejoined the Master, had better eat the grass,
drink the water, lie in the shade, and stand quietly to be
milked, asking no questions.
But do, sir, she continued, tell me what God is.
The Master folded back both his ruffle cuffs, lifted his
golden-headed
cane into the air, and cleared at one bound the
road-side
ditch, whereby his large three-corned hat fell into the
water. Margaret picked it up, and wiping it, handed it to
him, which circumstance seemed to recall him to the thread
of her feelings; and he replied to her by saying,
Felix qui potuit rerum cognoscere causas
. God, child, is
Tetragrammative, a Four-wordity; in the Hebrew
Four Hebrew letters, spelling "Yahweh"
, the
Assyrian Adad, the Egyptian Amon, the Persian Syre, Greek
, Latin Deus, German Gott, French Dieu;
, says Aristole; `God is the Divine Being,' says
Bailey; `
Jupiter Divum Pater
,' says Virgil.
Christ the Beautiful One, I saw in my dream, said if I loved
I should know God, replied Margaret.
Verily, as saith the Holy Apostle, God is Love.
Did Love make me?
Mundum fecit Amor; or as Jamblicus has it, `God
produced
matter by separating materiality from essentiality,' or as
Thomas writes, `Creation is extension produced by the Divine
power.'
Is God Latin?
He is in Latin. Deus is Latin for God.
I don't know anything about it. I had rather go into the
woods, or up to Obed's. His mother wants to see you; she
told me to ask you to call there, the next time you came to the
Pond.
I thought she did not like me.
But she wants to see you very much.
I hope she has no designs upon me?
I don't know.  It is something she wants.
She don't purpose to marry me?
I guess that is it. Hash said Miss Amy was going to
marry you.
What, both? You are a ninny. You never heard of the
Knights of the Forked Order. There is the old song:
`Why my good father, what should you do with a wife?
`Would you be crested? Will you needs thrust your head
`In one of Vulcan's helmets? Will you perforce
`Wear a city cap, and a Court feather?'
Malum est mulier, women are an evil.
Thus talking, they approached the Widow's. To the road
up which they went, the Master gave the name of Via
Salutaris
,
the stile by which they crossed the stump-fence into the
herb-garden or front yard, he called Porta Salutaris, as the
Leech herself he had already honored by the title of Diva
Salus.
The child said you wanted me, outspoke the Master, as
he entered the house, in a tone that savored of irritated
dignity.
Please Ma'am, interposed Margaret, both to explain and
appease, he says he won't marry you.
Mehercule! What are you about, my little Beadswoman?
exclaimed he, endeavoring to impose silence upon the child.
In what way, capacity, office, character, can I do you
service
,
Mistress Wright?
Gummy! retorted the woman. He has been a talkin'
about me, and a runnin' of me down. I wouldn't stoop so
much as teu pick him up. I wouldn't crack my finger jints
for him.
He didn't mean you, replied Margaret. He said women
were an evil.
Not widows, child, added the Master.
Yes, said the woman, we are evil, but not evils, I
trust. No offence, I hope, sir, she added in a softened tone.
None in the world, answered the Master. A widow the
good Fuller enumerates in his Holy State.
Ah yes, they would try teu make us think we are sutthin
when we are nothin, as the Parson says.
She is one, as that old writer observes, whose head hath
been cut off, yet she liveth, and hath the second part of
virginity
!
The Lord be praised, said the woman, with a curtsey,
wiping her mouth with the corner of her apron; I do
survive as good a husband, as ever woman had.
Her grief for her husband, continues the Worthy to
whom I refer, though real, is moderate.
Yes, sir.
She loveth to look on the picture of her husband, in the
children he hath left her, as adds our reverend Author,
subjoined the Master turning his eye towards Obed, who stood
in the door, twitching up his breeches.
The manner of the Master was too pointed not to be felt,
and when he had succeeded in smarting the good Widow's
sensibilities
,
his object was attained. But she, on the other hand,
had the faculty, by a smile that was peculiar to her, of
disguising
her emotions, and always contrived to cover up her
sense of humiliation with the airs of victory. These two
persons, as we have formerly remarked, did not like each other
very well, and in whatever respects they stood mutually
beholden
,
it was the object of each to make it appear that
favors were given without grace, and received without
gratitude
.
We will not follow their diplomatic banterings, but
join them when they have concluded to go peaceably about
their business. The Widow had invented a new medicine
which would cure a great variety of diseases. But she wanted
a scientific name for it, and also the scientific names of its
several specific virtues. Her own vocabulary supplied her
with an abundance of common appellations, but her purposes
aspired to something higher, and the Master's aid was brought
in requisition. The Leech sat by a table, holding a pen, with
a pewter inkstand, and some scraps of dingy paper before her,
and endeavored to avail herself of every suggestion of the
Master's by committing it immediately to writing.
Widder or woman, said she, I knows what I knows,
and I know what is in this ere medicine, how many yarbs, and
how I gathered um, and how I dried um, and how I pounded
um, and how I mixed um, and I kalkelate there is a vartue in
it. It'll dill fevers, dry up sores, stop rumatiz, drive out
rattle-snake's
bite, kill worms  there an't a disorder you can
mention
that won't knock under to't.
Except one.
What is that?
Cacoethes Feminarum.
Up-a-daisy! What a real soundin' one! Bile me up for
soap, if that an't a pealer, exclaimed the delighted woman,
giving a kind of chuckling grin both to the Master and
Margaret
.
Deu tell us what it is? she added. Is it round
hereabouts much? Has any died on't?
I know, said Margaret, it is something about women.
Femina is Latin for woman.
Oh forever! I dussay, rejoined the Widow, it's some
perlite matter, and he would'nt like to speak it out before a
body. How vallible is sientifikals and larnin'! Prehaps he'd
tell what brings it  lor me, what a booby I be teu ask. My
skull for a trencher, if I can't cure it, if it's as bad as the itch
itself.
Humors  said the Master.
Humors! Humors in wimmin  now don't say no more.
I knew 'twas some perlite matter. But I can cure it, or any
thing else; only give us the sientifikals and larnin'. There's
elderblows in my new medicine, and they'll drive out humors
as clean as a whistle. Only if I had the name. A name that
has the sientifikals and larnin' in't. Diseases dont take
now-a-days
without they have the pecoolar; and you can't cure 'em
without the pecoolar. I've studied the matter out and out,
and I knows, what I knows, Widder or no Widder. I an't teu
be befooled by nobody, not I. I don't ask no favors of nobody.
But the Master knows so much, and here's our little Molly,
she's as smart and pecoolar as the best on um. The Master
knows there's a good deal in a name, if he'd only say so. There
was four cases up to Snake Hill, and I got two of um, and
should have got the rest bein Dr. Spoor hadn't a come in,
with his larnin' words, and that took. They'll all go teu the
dogs if they can't have the sientifikals and the larnin'. If he
would only be so kind as to give a poor woman a name for
her medicine  but I won't beg, no I won't.
Nominis stat umbra, said the Master slowly and solemnly,
while with assumed gravity and inward impatience he had
been listening to the balderdash of the woman.
Is that it? asked she hastily.
Verily, he replied, Nominis stat umbra.
Nommernisstortumbug, said the Leech. Why now, I
vum, I could a thought of that myself. Obed here, see how
easy tis, Nommernisstortumbug, remember, Obed, and you'll
be as larnt as Miss Molly. Git Molly some honey, prehaps
the Master would like teu taste on't. We'll go it into um
now. My husband made a great push in the sientifikals, and
his pills did amazin' stout; but he didn't live in my day. I
ought by good rights to make sutthin out of it, for I've took
pains and studied long enough teu git it through. Jest
give us the names, and we'll go right among the upper crust
anywheres, and Dr. Spoor may hang his saddle-bags in his
garret. There's Deacon Penrose's gally pots and spattles, and
Nigger Tony's prinked up Patents, I an't afeered of none of
um, no, nor of old Death himself. He daren't show his white
jaws where the larnin' is. A box of my
Nommernisstortumbug
would give the saucy rascal an ague fit, and he'd be glad
teu put on some skin and flesh, and dress up like a man, and
not be round skeerin' people so with his old bones. There's
Parkins's Pints has been makin' a great pudder over to
England
,
but they an't knee high to a toad to't. The thing of it
is, people has got teu be so pesky proud and perlite, they will
have the very best of names. They'd all die every one on um,
before they'd touch the Widder's stuff, as they call it; but the
Nommernisstortumbug they'll swallow down box and all, and
git well teu, ha, ha! I knows what I knows, I've seen how the
cat has been a jumpin'. The ministers try to save their souls,
and have to preach sich things as 'll take; I mean to save
their bodies, and I must fix it so it 'll take;  I han't a grain
of interest in the matter, not I. As soon as Obed gits a leetle
older, I mean teu send him teu Kidderminster, and Hartford,
and Boston, and all about the country, with my medicines, and
there won't be a spice of disease left. The Pints is a pound
sterling, and I shall put my Nommernisstortumbug right up,
and when you ax a good round price, it 'll sell all the quicker.
The Master, secretly amused at the Widow's
self-complacence
,
was not disposed to give her any interruption, at least
so long as he ate of her clear white honey, which Obed
supplied
in liberal quantities, and of which he was thoroughly
fond. Nay he went farther, and at her request wrote down
for her, in scientific terms, the several and various properties
of her nostrum, which she described to him. The Widow's
bad feelings towards the Master were likewise so overcome by
the thought of her good fortune, as for the moment to throw
her off her guard, and she forgot her usual self-possessed
spitefulness. Their interview was in fair progress towards an
amicable termination, when the Master happened to say he
wanted Margaret to do a service for him that day. But the
Widow in the mean time had been concocting plans in her
own brains which included the aid of the child. Their
difficulties
broke out anew, there were taunts on the one side, and
feminine objurgations on the other. How far the matter may
have been carried we know not, when Margaret took the
decision
into her own hands, by running off. Both started for
her, and came to the stile nearly at the same moment.
Margaret
had already got into the road. The Master, having a
little advantage in point of time, mounted the stile first, but
his course was checked by the skirts of his coat catching in
one of the roots that composed the fence. The lady in excess
of strong feeling pounced upon his ankles, and held him fast,
while Obed hovered near with a look that threatened to
facilitate
his mother's purposes. The Master flourished his long
golden-headed cane in the air, greatly to the consternation of
Obed, and the merriment of the Widow, who dared him to
strike. Margaret hastened forward, intercedingly, and begged
the Master off, under such conditions as the woman chose
to stipulate, to wit, that she should come and help her some
other day.
The Master sometimes employed Margaret to scour the
woods in search of wild flowers, a pursuit for which she was
fitted both by her own lightness of heart and foot, and a
familiar
acquaintance with the region. It was his wish that she
should preserve specimens of almost all kinds she encountered,
in the expectation, partly, of discovering some new variety.
He furnished her with a tin case or box to keep the flowers fresh
and sound. Providing herself with a lunch of bread and
cheese, she took a familiar route through the Mowing into the
rich Birch and Walnut woods lying towards the village. Bull
had gone off with Hash in the morning, and she was obliged
to fail of the usual companion of her rambles. The sun shone
warm and inviting, and the air was soft and exhilarating. The
olive-backs trolled and chanted among the trees, and in the
shadowy green boughs, innumerable and invisible creepers and
warblers sang out a sweet welcome wherever she came along.
She found varieties of fungus, yellow, scarlet, and
blood-colored
,
which she tore from the sides of trees, from stumps, and
rails. She gathered the wild columbine, snakeroot, red
cohosh
,
purple bush-trefoil, flaxbell-flower, the beautiful purple
orchis, and dodder, that gay yellow-liveried parasite; and
other flowers, now so well known and readily distinguished by
every lover of nature, but which, at the period of our Memoir,
had not been fully arranged in the New England Flora. She
turned to the right, or towards South, and came to a spot of
almost solid granite, through the hard chinks and seams of
which great trees had bored their way, and forced themselves
into the light and air. This place was set down in the
vocabulary
of the district as the Maples, or Sugar Camp, from its
growth of sugar maple trees. Over these stones she stepped
as on a pavement, or leaped from one to another as one does
on the foam-crags at Nahant. In these dark crevices she
found the bright green bunches of the devil's ear seed, and
the curious mushroom-like tobacco-pipe; all about her, on the
rocks, the bright green polypods and maiden's hair waved in
silent feathery harmony with the round dots of quavering sun
light, that descended through the trees  little daughters of
the sun dallying with these children of the earth, and, like
spiders, spinning a thin beautiful tissue about them, which was
destroyed every night, and patiently renewed every morning.
Here also she found beds of shining white, and rose-colored
crystal quartz stones, large and small, striped and ruffled
with green moss. On the flat top of a large bowlder that was
thrown up from the mass of rocks, she saw growing a parcel
of small polypods, in a circle, like a crown on a king's head.
Up this she climbed, and sat among the ferns, and sang
snatches from old songs she had learned:
There were three jovial Welchmen
As I have heard them say,
And they would go a-hunting
Upon St. David's Day.
She selected some of the fairest of the fronds, and singing
Robin and Richard were two pretty men,
They laid in bed till the clock struck ten;
Then up starts Robin, and looks at the sky,
O! Brother Richard, the Sun is very high,
leaped down again. A humming-bird that she had seen, or
fancied she saw, early in the morning sucking her scarlet bean
flowers, shot by her. She would follow it. It led her
towards
the road going from the Pond to No. 4. She pursued
it till she came to its nest on the branch of a tree, which she
was able to reach by means of a high rock. She found the
nest constructed of mosses, and lined with mullein down, and
in it were two tiny white eggs, a second hatching for the
season
.
Two birds, the male and female, darted angrily at her,
and ruffled their golden-green and tabby-colored feathers, as
if they would fight her. She spoke to them, and discovered
that they were really the same that had fed on honey from her
hand, and one took quietly to the nest, while the other winged
a swift, playful roundelay above her head. Leaving the birds,
she crossed the road, and entered the Pines, where Solomon
Smith took her a few nights before. Here, under the trees
she found a crowd of persons, men and women, boys and girls,
who seemed bent on some mysterious thing, which they
pursued
with an unwonted stillness. Among them was a man, whom
she knew to be Zenas Joy, pacing to and fro with a drawn sword,
and keeping the people back. Damaris Smith ran to her, and
whispered her not to speak loud, and said they were after the
gold. Let us explain what Margaret herself had not been apprised
of, that young Smith, after discovering the supposed deposit of
the gold, for two or three nights, went and dug alone there.
Baffled in his search, but not in his expectations, he had
recourse
to his neighbors, and so the secret leaked out. There
were five or six men employed in digging, and for more than
a week had they worked there, day and night, without
intermission
,
relieving one another by turns. They had excavated
the ground to the depth of nearly thirty feet, and with a
proportionately
large breadth. A prodigious heap of earth and
stones had been cast up, and great pine-trees had been
under-mined
,
precipitated, cut off, and thrown out. When
Margaret
approached near enough to look in, she saw the men,
noiseless and earnest, at work with might and main; scarcely
did they stop to wipe the sweat that reeked and beaded from
their faces. Among them she saw her brother Hash, and
others, whom she knew to be No. 4's and Breaknecks. It
was a received notion of the times, that if any spoke during
the operation, the charm was destroyed, hence the palpitating
silence Margaret observed, and for this purpose also a sentry
had been appointed to keep order among the people.
Margaret seeing Hash, was inconsiderate enough to speak
13
to him, and ask after Bull. For this Zenas Joy, since words
were out of the question, administered a corporeal admonition
with the flat side of his sword, and Damaris Smith, with the
other girls, seconding his endeavors, fairly drubbed her from
the place. She went off, singing as she went,
Little General Monk
Sat upon a trunk
Eating a crust of bread;
There fell a hot coal
And burnt in his clothes a hole,
Now little General Monk is dead;
Keep always from the fire,
Keep always from the fire.
She had not gone far when Bull, who had been asleep in
the shade of a rock, awakened by the sound of her voice, came
leaping out to her, and continued in her company. In the
Pines she gathered such flowers as, for the most part, are
proper to that description of soil;the sleepy catchfly that is
wide awake nights, pennyroyal with its purple whorls, yellow
bent spikes of the gromwell, the sweet-scented pettymorrel,
the painted cup with its scarlet-tipped bractes, yellow-horned
horse balm, peach-perfumed waxen ladies tresses, nodding
purple gay feather; she climbed after the hairy honey-suckle,
and the pretty purple ground-nut, which, despising its name,
overmounts the tallest shrubs. She encountered in her way a
clearing, now grown up to elecampane, mullein, fire-weed,
wild-lettuce. She forced herself through a thicket of brakes,
blackberries and thistles, and clambered upon a fence, where
she sat to look at the tall lettuces that shot up like trees above
the other weeds. The seeds disengaging themselves from the
capsule at the top, and spreading out their innumerable long
white filaments, but still hovering about the parent stalk, gave
the plant an appearance as if it had instantaneously put forth
in huge gossamer inflorescence. Then a slight agitation of
wind would disperse these flowers or egrets and send them
flying through the air, like globes of silver light, or little burred
fairies, some of them vanishing in the white atmosphere, others
brought into stronger relief as they floated towards the green
woods beyond. Descending towards the Brook, she gathered
the beautiful yellow droops of the barberry-bush, white
wall-cress
,
yellow none-such, flowers of the sweet-briar. She came
to the stream, Mill Brook, that flowed out from her Pond;
near it grew the virgin's bower or traveller's joy, bedstraw, the
nightshades, yellow spearwort, button-bush, purple
thoroughwort
,
the beautiful cardinal flower or eye-bright just budding,
and the side-saddle flower. On its grassy margin she took her
seat under the shade of a large white birch. She ate her
bread and cheese, sharing her morsel with the dog. She
kneeled and drank from the swift sparkling waters, where they
ran between two stones. It was now past noon; her box was
full, and quite heavy enough for one so young to carry, and
she might have returned home. The woods beyond, or to the
west of the Brook, were close and dark, hardly did the sun
strike through them, but the birds were noisy there, and she
must perforce enter them, as a cavern, and walk on the smooth
leaf-strewed floor. The ground ascended, then rounded over
into a broad interval below, down into which she went. Here
a giant forest extended itself interminably, and she seemed to
have come into a new world of nature. Huge old trees, some
white pines and white oaks, looked as if they grew up to the
skies. Birds that she had never seen before, or heard so near
at hand, hooted and screamed among the branches. A dark
falcon pierced the air like an arrow, in pursuit of a partridge,
just before her eyes. An eagle stood out against the sky on
the blasted peak of a great tree; a hen-harrier bore in his
talons a chicken to his young; large owls in hooded velvety
sweep flew by her; squirrels chattered and scolded one
another; large snake-headed wild-turkeys strutted and gobbled
in the underbrush; a wild-cat sprang across her path and she
clung closer to her dog. Resting herself at the foot of a large
pine-tree, she picked and ate the little red checker-berries
that grew in profusion on the spot. The birds fluttered,
rioted and shrieked, in strange confusion, among the trees, and
she entertained herself watching their motion and noise. The
low and softened notes of distant thunder she heard, and felt
no alarm; or she may have taken it for the drum-like sound of
partridges that so nearly resembles thunder, and which she had
often heard, and thought no more of the matter. Had she
been on the tops of the trees, where the birds were, she would
have seen a storm gathering, cloud engendering cloud, peaks
swelling into mountains, the entire mass sagging with
darkness
,
and dilating in horror. The air seemed to hold in its
breath, and in the hushed silence she sat, looking at the rabbits
and woodchucks that scampered across the dry leaves, and
dived into their burrows. She broke into a loud laugh, when
she saw a small brown-snouted martin in smart chase after the
bolt-upright, bushy, black-tipped tail of a red fox, up a tree,
and spat her hands, and stamped her feet, to cheer the little
creature on. She sung out, in gayest participation of the
scene, a Mother Goose Melody, in a Latin version the Master
had given her;
Hei didulum! atque iterum didulum! felisque fidesque,
Vacca super lun cornua prosiluit:
Nescio qua catulus risit dulcedine ludi;
Abstulit et turpi cochleare fuga.
While she was singing, hail-stones bounded at her feet, and
the wind shook the tops of the trees. Suddenly it grew dark,
then, in the twinkling of an eye, the storm broke over her,
howling, crashing, dizzying it came. The whole forest seemed
to have given wayto have been felled by the stroke of some
Demiurgic Fury, or to have prostrated itself as the Almighty
himself passed by. The great pine, at the root of which she
was sitting, was broken off just above her head, and blown to
the ground; and by its fall, enclosing her in an impenetrable
sconce, under which alone, in the general wreck, could her
life have been preserved. A whirlwind, or tornado, such as
sometimes visits New England, had befallen the region. It
leaped like a maniac from the skies, and, with a breadth of
some twenty rods, and an extent of four or five miles, swept
everything in its course; the forest was mown down before it,
orchard-trees were torn up by the roots, large rocks unearthed,
chimneys dashed to the ground, roofs of houses whirled into
the air, fences scattered, cows lifted from their feet, sheep
killed, the strongest fabrics of man and nature driven about
like stubble. In bush and settlement, upland and interval,
was its havoc alike fearful. When Margaret recovered from
the alarm and bewilderment of the moment, her first impulse
was to call for the dog;but he, at the instant having been
caught off by the apparition of the wild-cat, was overtaken by
the storm, and borne down by the falling trees, losing all sense
of duty, wounded and frightened, he fled away. She herself
was covered with leaves, fragments of bark, hail-stones and
sand; blood flowed from her arm, and one of her legs was
bruised. The end of a bough had penetrated her box of flowers
and pinned it to the earth. The sun came out as the storm
went by; but above her the trees with their branches piled one
upon another on the great pine that had been her salvation,
formed an almost impervious thatch that enveloped her in
darkness. Making essays at self-deliverance, she found her
path in every direction closed, or at least distorted. The
fallen trees, mingled and matted with the shrubbery, obscured
and opposed her way, while the chasms made by the upturned
roots rendered progress devious and dangerous; and when at
last she reached the edge of the ruins, and stood in the open
woods, she knew not where she was, or in what direction lay
her home. There were no cart-tracks, or cow-paths, no spots
or blazes on the trees, that she could discover. The sun was
setting, but its light was hidden by the denseness of the forest.
As she advanced, hoping for the best, every step led her deeper
in the wood and farther from the Pond. She mounted knolls
and rocks, but could discern nothing; she crossed brooks,
explored ravines, but to no purpose. At last despairing,
exhausted
,
her sores actively painful, she sunk down under the
projecting edge of a large rock. She had not been sitting long
when she beheld, approaching the same place, a large, shaggy,
black bear, with three cubs. The beast came close to her,
smelt about her; she looked into its eyes, scratched its
forehead
,
as if it had been her own Bull. Possibly satisfied with
what it had eaten during the day, the bear was not disposed to
make a meal of the child. The mother-bear stretched herself
on the ground, partly crowding Margaret from her seat, and
the three cubs applying themselves to their supper with all
infantile zest, set an example that proved contagious, and our
other cub, with curiously wrought head, took possession of an
unoccupied dug, and was refreshed and soothed thereby. The
mother-bear and her young, cuddling themselves together,
went to sleep; Margaret pillowing herself in the midst of them,
went also to sleep.
Meanwhile the noise of the storm reached the Pond, where
its effects came not, and distressed the family with agonizing
apprehensions. Hash had not returned; after finishing his
bout in the Pines, he went with his comrades to see the results
of the wind at No. 4, and have a drunken carouse. The
Widow and her son came down both to seek news of the
storm, and inflame the impression of its terror. The ruddy
and wanton face of Pluck became pale and thoughtful. The
dry and dark features of his wife were even lighted up with
alarm. Chilion coming in from the Pond where he had been
fishing, when he learned the absence of his sister, seemed
smitten by some violent internal blow. He paced to and fro
in front of the house, listening to every sound, and starting at
every glancing leaf. The ordinary intercourse of the family,
if it were not positively rude and rough, was more frequently
of a light and trivial character, and, unaccustomed to the
expression
13*
of deeper sentiments, now in the moment of their
calamity, they said but little. Yet they watched one another's
looks and slightest words with an attention and reverence,
which showed how strongly interested they were in one
another's feelings, as well as in the common object of their
thoughts. They watched and waited, and waited and watched,
uncertain what course the child had taken, not knowing
where to go for her, and hoping each successive instant she
might appear from some quarter of the woods. The sun was
going down. Obed was despatched in the direction of the
dam, or north end of the Pond; Pluck went over into the
Maples; Chilion seizing the tin dinner-horn, ran to the top of
Indian's Head, and blew a loud blast. No response came
from the far glimmering sound but its own empty echo.
Descending
he beheld Bull returning alone, lame and bloody.
The dog was at once questioned, and as if convicted of
weakness
and infidelity to his mistress, or with that native instinct
which is proper to the animal, he pulled at Chilion's trousers
and made as if he would have him follow him in search of the
child. Chilion took the lead of the dog, who despite his
wounds pursued his way strenuously. They came to the place
of the gold-digging in the Pines. The sentry and the people
were gone; two men, the relay for the night, alone remained.
Suspended on the trees, and fastened in stone sockets below,
blazed pitch-knot torches. Deep in the hole toiled the two
men, in sturdy silence, and with most religious steadfastness.
Intercommunication was impossible; Chilion spoke to them,
but they answered not. Bull urged him onwards, he had
found the track of the child, and would abide no delay. They
took the same course Margaret had gone in the morning.
They crossed the Brook, they entered the thick woods. It
was now night and dark, but Chilion was familiar with each
vein, recess and loop-hole of the forest, and had often traversed
it in the night. They followed the footsteps of the child till
they came to the line of the storm. Here the prostrate trees,
upturned roots, vines and brush, knitted and riven together,
interrupted the track. A barrier was presented which baffled
the sagacity of the dog. He ran alongside the ruins, up and
down, tried every avenue, wound himself in among the
compressed
and perplexed fissures of the mass, but, failing to
recover the scent, he returned to his master, and set up a loud
howl. What could Chilion do? He called his sister's name
at the top of his voice, he rung out the farthest-reaching
alarm-cry
.
He then repeated the attempt of his dog to gain an
entrance
into the gnarled forest-wreck. He crept under trunks
of trees, he tore a passage through vines and brambles, he
climbed to the end of a tree and lowered himself down into
the centre of the mass; he groped his way in utter darkness
wherever he could move his hand. When he found a space
large enough to kneel or stand erect in, he again called aloud;
but no answer came. She's dead, she's dead, she's crushed
under a treesuch was the dreadful reflection that began to
ebb in upon his heart, and form itself in distincter imagery to
his thoughts. Armed with fresh energy he renewed his efforts.
He explored with his hand every vacant spot, trembling on the
one hand lest he should lay it upon her dead and mangled
body, hoping on the other that the vital spark would not be
entirely extinct; wishing at least to find her before the animal
warmth had wholly subsided in one for whom he evinced so
strong an attachment. A large limb, broken off in the storm,
which he was endeavoring to remove, fell upon his foot,
bruising
the flesh, and nearly severing the cords; but of this he
took no notice. In uttermost despair, he exclaimed, she
is
dead, she
is
dead. He, the moody and the silent, gave
utterance
to the wildest language of distress. That deaf and
dismal
darkness was pierced with an unwonted cry. O my
sister! my dear, dear sister, sweet Margery, dead, dead!
He fell with his face to the earth, his spirit writhed as with a
most exquisite sense of torture; from his stimulated frame
dropped hot sweat. O Jesus, her Beautiful One, how couldst
thou let the good Margery die so? My music shall die, my
hopes shall die, all things die; sweet sister Margery, your
poor brother Chilion will die too. His frenzy seemed to
assume the majesty of inspiration, as in all simplicity of
earnest
love he gave vent to his emotions. Pain and weariness
combined with hopelessness of success to divest him of the
idea of finding her that night. He extricated himself from the
fallen wood, and not without extreme difficulty and much
suffering
,
both bodily and mental, accompanied by the dog, he
returned to his home. His father and mother were still up,
restless and anxious. His foot was immediately dressed and
bandaged, and he was obliged to be laid in his parents' bed.
Obed was also there, strongly moved by an unaffected
solicitude
.
As soon as it was light, he was sent to the village to
have the bell rung and the town alarmed; Pluck himself
immediately
went down to No. 4. In the course of two or three
hours the entire population of Livingston received the exciting
and piteous intelligence of `A child lost in the woods, and
supposed
to have perished in the storm!' At No. 4 Hash was
aroused from his boosy stupor to something like fraternal
activity, and the four families composing the hamlet, the
Smiths, Hatches, Gubtails and Tapleys, more or less of them,
started off for the scene of the disaster, under the direction of
Pluck, whom Chilion had advised as to the course probably
taken by the child. The village was deeply and extensively
moved. Philip Davis, the sexton, ran to the Meeting-house
and pulled swiftly and energetically a loud and long fire-alarm,
on the bell. The people flocked about Obed to learn the news,
and hurried away to render succor.
The Master, who was on his way to the barber's, hearing of
the sad probability respecting his little pupil, was like a man
beside himself; perfectly bemazed, he made three complete
circles in the road, drew out his red bandanna handkerchief,
and returned it
without
blowing his nose, poised his
golden-headed
cane in the air, then leaped forward, like a hound upon
its prey, ran down the South Street, and disappeared, at full
speed, up the Brandon road. Judge Morgridge and his black
man Csar, rode off in a swift gallop, on two horses. They
overtook the Master, who had fainted and fallen, and lay
beating
his breasts and abstractedly moaning. Csar and the
Judge helped lift him to the saddle of one of the horses, and
the Negro mounting behind and holding him on, they galloped
forward. Men with ox-carts, crossing the Green for their
work in the Meadows, stopped, threw out their ploughs,
scythes, rakes, pitchforks, or whatever they had, into the
street, turned their carts about, took in a load of old men
women and children, and drove for No. 4. Deacon Penrose
shut up his store, Tony his shop; Mr. Gisborne the joiner,
and Mr. Cutts the shoemaker, left their benches respectively.
Lawyer Beach, Esq. Weeks and Dr. Spoor started off with
axes and bill-hooks in their hands. Boys seized tin
dinner-horns
and ran. A multitude of people, old and young, men
and women, hastened down the South street. At the corner
or forks of the road they were joined by others, who came
from the Mill. They shoaled up the Brandon road, like a
great wave of the sea, rapidly, urgently, solemnly. The Pottles
and Dunlaps, from Snake Hill and Five-mile-lot, came down
to the Pond, on foaming horses, and receiving their directions
from Chilion, hastened into the woods. A messenger had
been posted to Breakneck, and those families, the Joys,
Whistons and Orffs, turned out. Of all those engaged in the
hunt, were absent the two most interested in it, to wit, Chilion
and Bull, whose wounded and stiffened limbs rendered it
impossible
for them to go out. Dr. Spoor rode up to see Chilion,
and little Isabel Weeks, her sister Helen and brother Judah
also came, and brought him cordials and salves. It was
his irrepressible conviction that Margaret was dead, and he
was slow to be comforted. Successively, as the several
parties
arrived at that spot in the woods where Chilion had gone
the night before, they set themselves at work clearing away
the trees. It seemed to be the universal impression that the
child lay buried somewhere under the wind-fall. Capt.
Eliashib
Tuck, and Anthony Wharfield, the Quaker, took the
general
superintendence of the operations. The melancholy
silence of the workmen singularly contrasted with the
vehemence
of their action. The forest resounded with the blows
of axes, and the crashing of limbs. Broad openings were
made in the compact mass. Little boys crept under the
close-welded
vines prying about in anticipation of the men.
Beulah
Ann Orff and Grace Joy helped one another bear away
the heavy branches. Abel Wilcox and Martha Madeline
Gisborne
lifted large billets of wood. Deacon Penrose executed
lustily with a bill-hook. Pluck, Shooks, the Jailor, Lawyer
Beach, Sibyl Radney, Mr. Cutts, Solomon Smith and Hash,
rolled over a great tree, roots and all, while Judge Morgridge
and Isaac Tapley stood with shovels, ready to dig into the
mound of earth and stones which the roots had formed in their
sudden uprise. Zenas Joy and Seth Penrose rode off to get
refreshments. The Master alternatively worked with the
others, and sat on a stump, covering his eyes with his hands,
foreboding each moment some dreadful sight. In the midst of
all, kneeling on the damp leaves in the open wood, might be
heard the voice of the Camp-preacher, in loud and
importunate
prayer, beseeching the Most High to spare, if possible, the
life of the child, and restore her to her afflicted friends and
family.
To return to Margaret. The night had passed, she had
slept and waked, and taken her breakfast with the cubs. She
felt her strength revive, and her hopes rise. She offered her
bruised and bloody arm to the bear, who licked the blood,
and soothed and fomented the wound with her tongue. She
attempted to walk, but her benumbed limbs refused their
office, and she sat down again. She dug out with her
fingers
the roots of the polypods which she ate with good relish.
Then with her voice she raised the signal of distress, and
tried to make her situation known; but she had wandered far
from any neighborhood, and out of the ordinary haunts of
men. Dreary feelings and oppressive thoughts came over her,
and tears flowed freely, which the kind motherly bear wiped
away with her tongue. Then the three little bears began to
play with their dam, one climbed up her back, another hugged
her fore leg, and the third made as if it would tweak her nose,
and the one upon her back began to bandy paws with the one
that was hugging the leg, like kittens; and Margaret was
forced to be amused despite herself. Then she fell to singing,
and as she sang, the animals seemed to be moved thereby, and
the old bear and the three little bears seated themselves on
their haunches all in a row before her, to hear her; and they
appeared to her so much pleased with her performance, that
neither of them spoke a word during all the time she was
singing.
Where the people were at work, they made satisfactory
examination
of a pretty large space of ground. One of the
boys, Isaiah Hatch, who was burrowing mole-like under the
ruins, raised an exclamation that brought several to the spot.
He had discovered the flower-box, which was soon recognised
as having been carried by the child. The limb that held it
was cut away, and battened and perforated it was borne to the
Master, who, clutching it in his hands, uttered a mixed sound
of pleasure, apprehension and regret. It was concluded that
she might have escaped from the storm, and while a few
remained
and continued the search, they agreed that the main
body should distribute themselves in squads, and range the
forest. They took the horns wherewith to betoken success,
if success should attend them.
Margaret, who, as the hours wore away, could no more than
resign herself to passing events, was startled from her reveries
by the rustling of footsteps, and the sound of a human voice.
At the same instant she saw the Master running
precipitously
across the woods, and crying out, Bear, Bear! Ursa
major, Urs minoreshis arms extended, his cane dropped,
his hat and wig fallen off, his big coat tearing itself to tatters
in the brush, himself stumbling over roots and bestriding
daddocks in extremest consternation. Close at his heels was
the bear with her young, running with similar velocity, but
more afraid of
her
pursuers than the Master was of her, and
whose track she pursued only for the instant that it happened
to identify itself with the direct course to her lair, whither the
animal betook herself, while the Master, thinking he had
dodged her fury, disappeared among the distant trees; and all
this before Margaret, who called to him, could make herself
heard. But in the same moment men and boys appeared
storming and rattling through the brush, with uplifted axes,
clubs and stones, in wild hue and cry after the bear, whom
happening to alight upon, they had given chase to, and drove
to her retreat. Their shouts after the bear were changed into
exclamations of a very different character when they beheld the
child. They sprang forward to Margaret, caught her in their
arms, and asked her a thousand questions. Speedily the horns
were blown, and presently there came up from hill and
hommoc
,
wood and bosket, rock and dingle, all around an
answering
volley. A loud trine reciprocating blast conveyed the
glad intelligence wherever there were those interested to hear
it. The Master at length ventured forward. What were his
emotions or his manners at finding the lost one alive, we will
not detail. To show feeling before folks mortified him greatly;
the received mode of expression he did not follow; nor were
his contradictions performed by any rule that would enable us
to describe them. We have found the child, let us now kill
the bear, became the cry;  the animal in the mean time
having slunk, trembling to the death, under the low dark
eaves of her den.
No, no! was the urgent response of Margaret, and she
recounted again the passages between herself and the animal.
Wal, said the boys, if she has been so good to the gal,
we won't touch her.
It was a question how the child should be got home. For
her to walk was impossible. Some proposed carrying her in
their arms, but the general voice was for a litter, which, of
poles and green boughs, was quickly made, and borne by four
men. The hat and wig of the Master were replaced, and his
tattered garments mended by some of the women, who, leaving
their homes in haste, carried away scissors, wax, thread and
needle, in their pockets. Their best course to the Pond was
through Breakneck, and so down the Brandon road by No. 4.
A fearful gorge, terminating, however, in a rich bottom, gave
the name Breakneck to what was in reality a pleasant
neighborhood
,
consisting of the three families before mentioned,
the Orffs, Joys and Whistons, who were all substantial
farmers
.
Joseph Whiston conducted the people and bearers of
the child directly to his father's. Margaret was carried into
the house, laid on a bed, where Mistress Whiston and the
other ladies examined and dressed her wounds, and had some
toast made for her, and a cup of tea, adding also quince
preserves
.
Refreshments were also sent out to the people, who
in addition received liberal supplies from the other houses.
While Margaret was resting, the young men busied themselves
in putting together a more convenient carriage than the litter,
and Paulina Whiston brought thick comfortables to cover it
with, and pillows and bolsters to put under the child's head.
On this Margaret was placed, reclining, and borne off, as before,
on the shoulders of four young men. For the Master, we would
remark, a horse was kindly provided. They entered the
high-way
,
and went down the hill through the woods; the boys
and younger portion of the company whooping, capering,
and sounding their horns. Passing the side-path that led to
Joyce Dooly the Fortune-teller's, there, at the entrance of the
woods, on a high rock, stood the mysterious woman herself,
holding by strings her five cats. At sight of her the people
were silent. She enacted sundry grimaces, uttered mumming
sentences, declared she foresaw the day previous the loss and
recovery of the child, pronounced over her some mystic
congratulations
,
waved her hand and departed, and the people
renewed
their shouts. Over fences, through the woods, up from
ravines, came others who had been hunting in different
directions
,
and when the party reached No. 4, its numbers were
swelled to more than a hundred. Here they found another
large collection of people, some of whom came up at a later
hour from the village, and others were just returned from the
search. Here also were desolating marks of the storm, in roofs,
chimneys, windows, trees, fences, fields. Deacon Ramsdill,
lame as he was, with his wife, had walked from their home
beyond the Green. Parson Welles and the Preacher were
engaged in familiar conversation, the first time they had ever
spoken together. The Lord be praised! ejaculated the
Preacher. We see the Scripture fulfilled, said the
Parson
.
There is more joy over one that is brought back, than
over the ninety and nine that went not astray. Amen,
responded the Preacher.
You come pretty near having considerable of a tough
time, didn't you, dear? said deacon Ramsdill, advancing and
shaking Margaret's hand; but like to never killed but one
man, and he died a laughin. It'll do you good, it is the best
thing in the world for calves to lie out of nights when the dew
is on.
Our best hog was killed in the pen, said Mistress
Gubtail
;
but here's some salve, if it'll be of any service to the
child.
Salve! retorted the Widow Wright, indignantly, and
elbowing her way through the crowd.
Here's
the
Nommernisstortumbug
,
none of your twaddle, the gennewine tippee,
caustic
and expectorant, good for bruises and ails in the vitals.
I've got some plums that Siah picked under the tree that
blowd down in the storm, said Mistress Hatch; I guess the
gal would like them, and if any body else would eat, they are
welcome.
Bring um along, Dorothy, said Mistress Tapley to her
little daughter. A platter of nutcakes. The chimney
tumbled
in while I was frying um, and they is a little sutty, but if
the gal is hungry, they'll eat well.
Provisions of a different description were furnished from
the Tavern, of which the multitude partook freely. People
from the village also sent up quantities of fruit, cakes, &c.
But they could not tarry, they must hasten to the child's
home. They went up the hill, Margaret erected on the
shoulders
of the young men, escorted as it would seem by half the
town, all wild with joy. Pluck was in transports; Obed
laughed and cried together all the way up the hill; Hash was
so much delighted, that he drank himself nearly drunk at the
Tavern. When they came in sight of the house, a new
flourish of the horns was made, three cheers given, hats and
green twigs swung. Chilion, whom the good news had
already
reached, was seated in a chair outside the door; Bull,
unable to move, lay on the grass, wagging his joy with his tail;
Brown Moll took to spinning flax as hard as she could spin, to
keep her sensations within due bounds; the little Isabel leaped
up and down spatting her hands. Margaret was conveyed to
her mother's bed. Dr. Spoor examined her wounds, and
pronounced
them not serious, and all the women came in and
examined
them and gave the same decision. Parson Welles
suggested to the Preacher the opportuneness of a prayer of
thanksgiving, which the latter offered in a becoming manner.
A general collation was had in which the family who had
tasted of nothing since the noon before, were made glad
participants
.
Chilion, to express his own transport, or to embody
and respond to the delight of the people, called for his violin.
Playing, he wrought that effect in which he took evident
pleasure
,
moving the parties in a kind of subservient unison, and
gliding into a familiar reel, he soon had them all dancing.
On the grass before the house, old and young, grave and gay,
they danced exuberantly. Parson Welles, the Preacher and
Deacon Hadlock looked on smilingly. Deacon Ramsdill's
14
wife declared Margaret
must
see what was going on, had her
taken from the bed, and held her in her lap on the door-sill.
There had been clouds over the sun all day, and mists in the
atmosphere, nor did the sun yet appear, only below it, while it
was now about an hour high, along the horizon, cleared away
a long narrow strip of sky flushing with golden light. Above
the people's heads still hung grey clouds, about them were
green woods, underneath them the green grass, and within
them were bright joyous sensations, and through all things
streamed this soft colored light, and in all shone a pavonine
irradiancy, and their faces glowed more lustrously, and their
hearts beat more rapturously. Deacon Hadlock, stirred
irresistibly
,
gave out, as for years he had been accustomed to do in
Church, the lines of the Doxology
To God the Father, Son,
And Spirit, glory be,
As 't was, and is, and shall be so,
To all eternity.
which Chilion pitching on his violin and leading off, they sung
with great emphasis. When they were about breaking up,
Deacon Ramsdill said, Shan't we have a collection? We
have had pretty nice times, but strippins arter all is the best
milk, and I guess they'll like it as well as any thing now.
We shall have to feather this creeter's nest, or the bird will
be off agin. Here's my hat if some of these lads will pass it
round.
A contribution was made, and thus the night of the
morning
became a morning at night to the Pond and the people of
Livingston.
CHAPTER XVII.
WINTER,
An
event common in New-England, is at its height. It is
snowing, and has been for a whole day and night, with a
strong north-east wind. Let us take a moment when the
storm intermits, and look in at Margaret's and see how
they do. But we cannot approach the place by any of the
ordinary methods of travel; the roads, lanes and by-paths are
blocked up: no horse or ox could make his way through
those deep drifts, immense mounds and broad plateaus of
snow. If we are disposed to adopt the means of conveyance
formerly so much in vogue, whether snow-shoes or magic, we
may possibly get there. The house or hut is half sunk in a
snow bank; the waters of the Pond are covered with a solid
enamel as of ivory; the oxen and the cow in the barn-yard,
look like great horned sheep, in their fleeces of snow. All is
silence, and lifelessness, and if you please to say, desolation.
Hens there are none, nor turkeys, nor ducks, nor birds, nor
Bull, nor Margaret. If you see any signs of a human being,
it is the dark form of Hash, mounted on snow-shoes, going
from the house to the barn. Yet there are the green hemlocks
and pines, and firs, green as in summer, some growing along
the flank of the hill that runs north from the Indian's Head,
looking like the real snow-balls, blossoming in mid-winter, and
nodding with large white flowers. But there is one token of
life, the smoke coming from the low grey chimney, which, if
you regard it as one, resembles a large, elongated, transparent
baloon; or if you look at it by piece-meal, it is a beautiful
current of bluish-white vapor, flowing upward unendingly;
and prettily is it striped and particolored, as it passes successively
the green trees, the bare rocks, and white crown of the hill
behind
;
nor does its interest cease, even when it disappears
among the clouds. Some would dwell a good while on that
smoke, and see in it manifold out-shows and denotements of
spiritualities; others would say, the house is buried so deep, it
must come up from the hot mischief-hatching heart of the
earth; others still would fancy the whole Pond laid in its
winding-sheet
,
and that if they looked in, they would behold the dead
faces of their friends. Our own sentiment is, that that smoke
comes from a great fire in the great fire-place, and that if we
should go into the house, we should find the family as usual
there; a fact which, as the storm begins to renew itself, we
shall do well to take the opportunity to verify.
Flourishing in the centre of these high-rising and
broad-spreading
snows, unmoved amid the fiercest onsets of the storm,
comfortable in the extremity of winter, the family are all
gathered
in the kitchen, and occupied as may be. In the
cavernous
fire-place burns a great fire, composed of a huge green
back-log, a large green forestick, and a high cob-work of
crooked and knotty refuse-wood, ivy, hornbeam and beech.
Through this the yellow flame leaps and forks, and the
bluish-grey
smoke flows up the ample sluice-way of the chimney.
From the ends of the wood the sap fries and drips on the sizzling
coals below, and flies off in angry steam. Under the forestick
great red coals roll out, sparkle a semibrief, lose their grosser
substance, indicate a more ethereal essence in prototypal
forms of white, down-like cinders, and then fall away into brown
ashes. To a stranger the room has a sombre aspect rather
heightened than relieved by the light of the fire burning so
brightly at mid-day. The only connection with the external
air is by the south window-shutter being left entirely open,
forming an aperture through the logs of about two feet square;
yet when the outer light is so obscured by a storm, the bright
fire within must anywhere be pleasant. In one corner of the
room sits Pluck, in a red flannel shirt and leather apron, at
work on his kit mending a shoe; with long and patient
vibration
and equipoise he draws the threads, and interludes the
strokes with snatches of songs, banter and laughter. The
apartment seems converted into a workshop, for next the
shoe-maker
stands the shingle-maker, Hash, who with froe in one
hand and mallet in the other, by dint of smart percussion, is
endeavoring
to rive a three-cornered billet of hemlock, on a block.
In the centre of the room sits Brown Moll, with still bristling
and grizzly hair, pipe in her mouth, in a yellow woollen
long-short
and black petticoat, winding a ball of yarn from a windle.
Nearer the fire, are Chilion and Margaret, the latter also
dressed in woollen, with the Orbis Pictus, or World displayed,
a book of Latin and English, adorned with cuts, which the
Master lent her; the former with his violin, endeavoring to
describe the notes in Dr. Byles's Collection of Sacred Music,
also a loan of the Master's, and at intervals trailing on the lead
of his father in some popular air. We shall also see that one
of Chilion's feet is raised on a stool, bandaged, and apparently
disabled. Bull, the dog, lies rounded on the hearth, his nose
between his paws, fast asleep. Dick, the grey squirel, sits
swinging listlessly in his wire wheel, like a duck on a wave.
Robin, the bird, in its cage, perched on its roost, shrugs and
folds itself into its feathers, as if it were night. Over the
fire-place
,
on the rough stones that compose the chimney, which
day and night through all the long winter are ever warm,
where Chilion has fixed some shelves, are Margaret's flowers;
a blood-root in the marble pot Rufus Palmer gave her, and in
wooden moss-covered boxes, pinks, violets and buttercups,
green and flowering. Here also, as a sort of manteltree
ornament
,
sits the marble kitten which Rufus made, under a cedar
twig. At one end of the crane in the vacant side of the
fire-place
hang rings of pumpkin rinds drying for beer. On the
walls are suspended strings of dried apples, bunches of yarn,
and the customary fixtures of coats, hats, knapsacks, &c. On
the sleepers above is a chain-work of cobwebs, loaded and
knapped with dust, quivering and gleaming in the wind that
courses with little or no obstruction through all parts of the
house. Near Hash stands the draw-horse, on which he smooths
and squares his shingles; underneath it and about lies a pile of
fresh, sweet-scented, white shavings and splinters. Through
the yawns of the back door, and sundry rents in the logs of
the house, filter in, unweariedly, fine particles of snow,
and thus along the sides of the room rise little cone-shaped,
marble-like pilasters. Between Hash and his father, elevated
on blocks, is the cider barrel. These are some of the
appendages
,
inmates and circumstances of the room. Within doors
is a mixed noise of lapstone, mallet, swifts, fiddle, fire; without
is the rushing of the storm. Pluck snipsnaps with his wife,
cracks on Hash, shows his white teeth to Margaret; Chilion
asks his sister to sing after his playing; Hash orders her to
bring a coal to light his pipe; her mother gets her to pick a
snarl out of the yarn she is winding. She climbs upon a stool
and looks out of the window. The scene is obscured by the
storm; the thick driving flakes throw a brownish mizzly shade
over all things, air, trees, hills and every avenue the eye has
been wont to traverse. The light tufts of snow hiss like arrows
as they shoot by. The leafless Butternut, whereon the
whippoorwill
used to sing, and the yellow warbler make its nest,
sprawls its naked arms, and moans pitifully in the blast; the
snow that for a moment is amassed upon it, falls to the ground
like a harvest of alabaster fruit. The Peach-tree, that bears
Margaret's own name, and is of her own age, seems to be
drowning in the snow. Water drops from the eaves
occasioned
by the snow melting about the hot chimney.
Something of a storm, an't it, Molly? said Pluck, looking
up, at the same time strapping his knife on the edge of the kit.
As much as you are a cobbler, rejoined Brown Moll,
keep us wet the whole time;can't step out but our shoes
let in all the snow that falls and all the water that makes.
Glad to hear you speak of water, said her husband. It
reminds me that I am getting very dry.  Who did the Master
tell you was the God of Shoemakers? he asked, addressing
himself to Margaret.
St. Crispin, replied the child.
14*
Guess I'll pay him a little attention, said the man, leaving
his bench and going to the rum bottle that stood by the
chimney
.
I feel some interest in these things, and I think I have
some reason to indulge a hope that I am among the elect.
He wouldn't own you, said his wife tartly.
Why so? inquired Pluck.
Because you are not a man; you are not the thrum or rag
of a man. Scrape you all up, and we shouldn't get lint
enough to put on Chilion's foot.
Look at that, said her husband, exposing his bare arm,
flabby and swollen; what do you think of that?
Garbage! replied the woman. Grand grease, try you
up, run you into cakes, make a present of you to your divinity
to rub into his boots. The fire is getting down, Meg, can't
you bring in some wood?
You are a
woman
really! retorted Pluck, to send the
child out in such a storm, when it would take three men to
hold one's head on.
Ha, ha! laughed out Brown Moll, withdrawing her pipe
to spit. You must have stitched your own on; I don't wonder
you are afraid.That is the way you lost your ear, trying to
hold on your head in a snow-storm, ha ha!
Well, rejoined Pluck, you think your are equal to three
men in wit, learning, providing, don't you?
Mayhaps so.
And weaving, spinning, coloring, reeling, twisting,
cooking
,
clinching, hen-pecking?Well I guess you are. Can you
tell, dearest Maria, what is Latin for the Widow's Obed's red
hair?
No. But I can for the maggot that makes powder-post of
our whole family, Didymus Hart.
Well done! said Pluck with a laugh, and staggered
towards
his bench.
I knew we should have a storm, said his wife, after
such a cold spell; I saw a Bull's Eye towards night; my corns
have been pricking more than usual; a flight of snow-birds
went by day before yesterday. And it won't hold up till after
the full, and that's to-night.
And I thought as much too, answered Pluck. Bottle
has emptied fast, glums been growing darker in the face,
windle
spun faster, cold potatoes for dinner, hot tongue for
supper
.
You
shall
fetch some wood, Meg, or I'll warm your back
with a shingle, said her mother, flinging out a threat which
she had no intention of executing. Hash is good for
something
,
that he is.
Yes, Maharshalalhashbaz, my second born, interjected
Pluck, sell your shingles to the women; they'll give you
more than Deacon Penrose; it is such a nice thing for heating
a family with.We shan't need any more roofs to our houses
always excepting of course, your dear and much honored
mother, who is a warming-pan in herself, good as a Bath
Stove.
Hash, spurred on by this double shot, plied his mallet the
harder, and declared with an oath that
he
would not get the
wood, that they might freeze first; adding that he hauled and
cut it, and that was his part.
Chilion whispered his sister, and she went out for the
purpose
in question. It was not excessively cold, since the weather
moderated as the storm increased, and she might have taken
some interest in that tempestuous outer world. Her hens,
turkeys and ducks, who were all packed together, the former
on their roost under the shed, the latter in one corner, also
required
feeding; and she went in and got boiled potatoes, which
they seemed glad to make a meal of. The wind blazed and
racketed through the narrow space between the house and the
hill. Above, the flakes shaded and mottled the sky, and fell
twirling, pitching, skimble-scamble, and anon, slowly and more
regularly, as in a minuet; and as they came nearer the ground,
they were caught up by the current, and borne in a horizontal
line, like long, quick spun, silver threads, afar over the white
fields. There was but little snow in the shed, although entirely
open on the south side; the storm seeming to devote itself to
building up a drift in front. This drift had now reached a
height of seven or eight feet. It sloped up like the roof of a
pyramid, and on the top was an appendage like a horn, or a
plume, or a marble jet d'eau, or a frozen flame of fire; and
the elements in all their violence, the eddies that veered about
the corner of the house, the occasional side-blasts, still dallied,
and stopped to mould it, and finish it; and it became thinner,
and more tapering, and spiral; each singular flake adjusting
itself to the very tip, with instinctive nicety; till at last it broke
off by its own weightthen a new one went on to be formed.
Under this drift lay the wood Margaret was after, and she
hesitated
to demolish the pretty structure. The cistern was
over-run
with ice; the water fell from the spout in an ice tube, the
half barrel was rimmed about with a broad round moulding of
ice, and where the water flowed off, it had formed a wavy
cascade
of ice, and under the cold snows the clear cold water
could be heard babbling and singing as if it no whit cared for
winter. Her great summer gobbling turkey attempted to
mount the edge of the cistern to drink, but the wind blew, his
feet slipped, and back he fell. She took a dish and watered
her poultry. From the corner of the house the snow fretted
and spirted, in a continuous stream of spray. While she
looked
at this, she saw a flock of snow-birds borne on by the winds,
endeavoring to tack their course, and run in under the shelter
of the house, but the remorseless elements drifted them on,
and they were apparently dashed against the woods beyond.
One of the birds was seen to drop, and Margaret darted out,
waded through the snow, caught the luckless or lucky
wanderer
,
and amid the butting winds, sharp snow-rack, and
smothering sheets of spray, carried it into the house. In her
Book of Birds, she found it was a snow-bunting, that it was
hatched in a nest of rein deer's hair near the North Pole,
that it had sported among eternal solitudes of rocks and ice,
and come thousands of miles. It was purely white, while
others of the species receive some darker shades. She put it
in the cage with Robin, who welcomed the travelled stranger
with due respect.
That day and all that night the snow continued to fall, and
the wind raged. When Margaret went to her loft, she
found her bed covered with a pile of snow that had trickled
through the roof. She shook the coverlid, undressed,
laid herself on her thistle-down pallet  such a one had
she been able to collect and make  to her sleep. The
wind surged, swelled, puffed, hissed, whistled, shrieked,
thundered
,
sighed, howled, by turns. The house jarred and
creaked; her bed rocked under her; loose boards on the roof
clappered and rattled; the snow pelted her window-shutter.
In such a din and tustle of the elements lay the child. She
had no sister to nestle with her, and snug her up; no gentle
mother to fold the sheets about her neck, and tuck in the
bed; no watchful father to come with a light, and see that she
slept safe. Alone and in darkness she climbed into her
chamber, alone and in darkness she wrapt herself in the bed.
In the fearfulness of that night she sung or said to herself
some words of the Master's, which he, however, must have
given her for a different purposefor of needs must a stark
child's nature in such a crisis appeal to something above and
superior to itself, and she had taken a floating impression that
the Higher Agencies, whatever they might be, existed in
Latin:
O sanctissima, O purissima,
Dulcis Virgo Maria,
Mater amata, intemerata!
Ora, ora pro nobis!
As she slept amid the passion of the storm, softly did the snow
from the roof distil upon her feet, and sweetly did dreams
from heaven descend into her soul. In her dream she was
walking in a large, high, self-illuminated, marble Hall, having
flowers, statues and columns on either side. The top or roof
of the Hall was neither covered nor open, but seemed ceiled in
a sort of opaline-colored invisibility. The statues, of clear
white marble, large as life, and the flowers in marble vases,
alternated with each other between the columns, whose
ornamented
capitals merged in the shadows above. There was no
distinct articulate voice, but a kind of low murmuring of the
air, a sort of musical pulsation, in the place, which she heard.
The statues seemed to be for the most part marble
embodiments
of pictures she had seen in the Master's books. There
were the Venus de Medicis; the Apollo Belvidere; Diana,
with her golden bow; Ceres, with poppies and ears of corn;
Humanity, with sweet and lovely countenance; Fortitude,
with her hand on a pillar; Temperance, pouring water from
a pitcher; Diligence, with a sickle and sheaf; Peace, and
her crown of olives; Truth, with her looks serene, pleasant,
courteous, cheerful and yet modest. The flowers were such
as she had sometimes seen about the houses in the village,
but of great size and rare beauty;cactuses, purple dahlias,
moss-roses, carnations, high nodding geraniums, large pink
hydrangeas, white japonicas, calla lilies and others. Their
shadows waved on the white walls, and it seemed to her
as if the music she heard issued from their cups. She
went on till she came to a marble arch, or door-way,
handsomely sculptured, and supported on caryatides. This
opened to a large rotunda, where she saw nine beautiful
female figures swimming in a circle in the air. These
strewed on her as she passed, leaves and flowers, of
amaranth
,
angelica, myrtle, rose, thyme, white jasmin, white
poppy, bluebell, bittersweet nightshade, acacia and
eglantine
;
and spun round and round in silken silence. By a
similar arch, she went into another rotunda, in the centre of
which was a marble monument or sarcophagus, arising from
which were two marble youths with wings, and also above
them she saw two butterflies with iris-colored wings, flying
away. Through another door-way she entered a larger space,
opening to the heavens. In this she saw a woman, the same
woman she had before seen in her dreams, with long black
hair, and a pale beautiful face, who stood silently pointing to
a figure far off on the rose-colored clouds. It was Christ,
whom she recognized. A little distance from him, on the
round top of a purple cloud, having the blue distant sky for a
back-ground, was the milk-white Cross, twined with
ever-greens
;
about it, folding one another's hands, she saw moving
as in a dance, four beautiful female figures, clothed in white
robes. These she remembered as the ones she saw in her
dream at the Still, and she now knew them to be Faith, Hope,
Love, and their sister, who was yet of their own creation,
Beauty. She tried to speak, but could not. Then she
returned
through the Rotundas and Hall, and at the door she
found a large green bull-frog, with great goggle eyes, having
a pond-lily saddled to his back. She seated herself in the
cup, held by the gold threads as a pomel, and the frog leaped
with her clear into the next morning, in her own little dark
chamber. When she awoke the wind and noise without had
ceased. A perfect cone of pure white snow lay piled up over
her feet, and she attributed her dream partly to that. She
opened the window-shutter; it was even then snowing in
large, quiet, moist flakes, which showed that the storm was
nearly at an end; and in the east, near the sun-rising, she saw
the clouds bundling up, ready to go away. She went below;
Pluck and his wife were just out of bed; a dim, dreary light
came in from the window; Chilion, who unable to go up the
ladder to his chamber had a bunk spread for him of the pelts
of wild beasts, near the fire, still lay there. Under a bank of
ashes and cinders, smoked and sweltered the remains of the
great back-log. Bull rose and stretched at her feet; Dick
pawed round his tread-mill in fresh morning glee; Robin
chirruped faintly and winterishly. Little heaps of snow
that had blown in during the night, and other rubbish about
the room, her mother set her to sweeping out with the green
spruce-twig broom. Pluck with the slice raked open the
ashes, drew forward the charred log, which cracked and
crumbled
in large deep crimson, fine-grained, glowing coals,
throwing
a ruddy glare over the room. He dug away the ashes, as
if he were laying a cellar-wall, and with the aid of his wife
and Margaret and divers pryings and pushings, he rolled in a
fresh green log, at least four feet long, and nearly two thick.
Hash came lumbering down the ladder, thrusting out one
arm then the other hustling on his coat, and calling the
name of God over Margaret, for hitting his saw with the
froea kind of family prayer she was quite accustomed to
and then putting on his snow-shoes he went to the barn.
Mistress
Hart went about getting breakfast, not putting on the
tea-kettle
,
for she had none, and only at rare intervals did they
drink tea or coffeebut a pot of potatoes, which served alike
for family, hens and the pig. After breakfast Margaret
opened the front door to look out. Here was raised a straight
and sheer breast-work of snow five feet or more in height,
nicely scarfing the door and lintels. Pluck could just see
over it, but for this purpose Margaret was obliged to use a
chair. The old gentleman, in a fit of we shall not say
uncommon
good feeling, declared he would dig through it. He
went round by the back-door, waded through the snow
breast-deep
to a spot in front of the house, where the whiffling
winds had left the earth nearly bare, and commenced with a
shovel his subnivean work. Margaret saw him disappear
under the snow, which he threw behind him like a rabbit.
She waited in greatest frolicksomeness imaginable his coming
in sight at the door, hallooed to him, and threatened to set
the dog on him as a thief. Pluck made some gruff unusual
sound, beat the earth with his shovel; the dog growled, and
thrust violently at the snow; Margaret laughed. Soon this
mole of a man poked his shovel through, and straightway
followed
with himself, all in a sweat, and the snow melting like
rain from his hot red face. Thus was opened a snow-tunnel,
as good to Margaret as the Thames, two or three rods long,
and three or four feet high. Through this she went to the
hollow beyond. The storm had died away; the sun was
struggling through the clouds as if itself in search of heat
from what showed us the white, radiant, warm face of the
earth; there were blue breaks in the sky over head; and far
off, above the snow-strown western hills, lay violet-fringed
cloud-drifts. A bank of snow, reaching in some places quite
to the eaves, covered the front of the house, and buried
many feet deep the grass, mallows, dandelions, rosebushes,
flowerbeds, hencoops.
The Chesnuts shone in the sun with their polished,
shivering
,
cragged limbs, a spectacle both to pity and admire. The
evergreens and other trees drooped under their burdens like
full-blown sunflowers. The top of Indian's Head was nearly
bare; its bleak and wild summit being scathed and polled by
the storm, and the peeled and naked old hemlock or Feather
stood up a sullen and derisive monument of the desolation of
the race to which it was fancifully supposed to appertain.
The dark, leafless boughs and twigs of the taller trees around
looked like bold delicate netting or linear embroidery on the
blue sky, or as if the trees, interrupted in their usual method
of growth, were taking root in mid-winter up among the
warm transparent heavens. Pluck came out and began
playing
with Margaret, throwing great armsful of snow that burst
and scattered over her like rocks of down, then suffering
himself to be fired at in turn. He set her astride the dog who
romped and flounced, and pitched her into a drift whence her
father drew her by her ankles. As he was going in, stooping
under the tunnel, a pile of snow that had formed itself on the
house and jutted over, fell, and breaking in the roof of the
frail passage-way, completely buried the old man in the ruins.
He gasped, floundered and thrust up his arms through the
superincumbent mass, like a drowning man. Margaret leaped
with laughter, and Brown Moll herself coming to the door
was so moved by the drollery of the scene as to be obliged to
withdraw her pipe to laugh also. Bull was ordered to the
rescue, who, doing the best he could under the circumstances,
wallowing belly-deep in the snow, seized with his teeth the
woollen shirt-sleeve of his master, and tugged away, till he
raised the old man's head above the drift. Pluck, unchilled
in his humor by the coolness of the drench, stood, sunk to his
chin in the snow, and laughed as heartily as any of them, his
shining bald pate and whelky red face streaming with
moisture
and shaking with merriment. At length both father and
child got into the house and dried themselves by the fire.
Margaret took her book to study, but her mother called her
away, and set her to picking over butternut, peach and
sumach leaves, and other coloring stuff. Chilion likewise
demanded attention; his foot pained him; it grew swollen
and inflamed. Margaret bathed it in rum; a poultice was
applied, and she held it in her lap, and soothed it with her
hand. A preparation of the Widow's was suggested. Hash
would not go for it, Pluck and his wife could not, and
Margaret
must go. Bull could not go with her, and she must go
alone. She was wrapped in a hood, mittens, and
martin-skin
tippet; her snow-shoes, a pair that she had often gone on
the snows with, were fastened to her feet. She mounted the
high, white, fuffy plain; a dead and unbounded waste lay all
about her. She went on with a soft, yielding, yet light step,
almost noiseless as if she were walking the clouds. There
was no road or path, no guide but the trees; ruts, gullies,
holes, ditches by the way-side, knolls, stones, were all one
uniform level. She saw here and there a slightly raised
mound, indicating some large rock she clambered over in
summer. The beautiful bordering of wild flowers on either
side of the road was invisible; and the ever smelling and
universally
diffused aroma of the sweet fern was smothered and
blighted. Here and there appeared above the snows the black
dead spikes and seed-heads of the golden-rod, mullein, tall
aster and wild sunflower. The shrubs, ivies, alders, sumachs,
the grape-vines running over thorn-bushes and witch-hazles,
seem to have been contending with the storm, and both to
have yielded at the same moment, the snow hanging upon
them in broken bunches and tatters, and their branches
bending
down stiffened, motionless. About the trunk of some of
the large trees was a hollow pit reaching quite to the ground,
as if the snow had waltzed round and round the tree and laid
itself back to rest; or as if the flakes had been caught in a
maelstrom and been devoured as they fell. Wherever there
was a fence, pile of brush or heap of stones, thither had the
storm betaken itself with full flooding force, and around,
above and alongside, were erected mountain-like
embankments
,
impenetrable dikes, and inaccessible bluffs. As she
entered the thicker woods that lay between her house and the
Widow's, Margaret saw the deep, unalloyed beauty of the
storm; the large moist flakes that fell in the morning, had
dressed, furred, mossed over every limb and twig, each minute
process and filament, each aglet and thread, as if the white
spirits of the air had undertaken to frost the trees for the
marriage festival of their Prince; or as if an ocean of pure
foam had suddenly subsided in the region. The slender
white-birches with silver bark and ebon boughs that grew
along the path, were bent over; their arms met
intertwiningly
;
and thus was formed a perfect arch, snow-wreathed,
voluptuous
,
dream-like, glittering, under which she went. There
was the clear bright shining of the sun, its light both softened
and heightened, spread and reflected through all the wood.
All was silent as the Moon; there was no sound of birds, or
cows, sheep, dinner-horns, axes, or wind. There was no life,
but only this white, shining, still-life wrought in snow-marble.
No life? From the dusky woods darted out those birds that
15
bide a New England winter; dove-colored nuthatches, she
suddenly heard, quank quanking among the hemlocks; a whole
troop of titmice and woodpeckers came bustling and whirring
across the way, shaking a shower of fine tiny raylets of
snow on her head; she saw the graceful snow-birds, our
common
bird, with ivory bill, slate-colored back and white breast,
flying about and perching themselves on the dead tops of the
mulleins and other flowers, and pecking out the seeds. Above
all, far above the forest and the snow-capped hills, caw cawed
the great black crow. All at once too, as she was going
along, directly in front of her, by the side of the road, came
up through the snow a little red squirrel, who sat bolt-upright
on his hind legs, gravely folded his paws, surveyed her for a
moment, as much as to say, How do you do? and in a
trice with a squeak shot back into his hole.
She found the brook, Cedron, like everything else buried
in snow, bridge and water alike indistinguishable, only she
could hear the gurgling of the latter as in an abyss below.
Approaching the Widow's, she crossed the Porta Salutaris and
all the scrawls of the stump fence, without touching them,
on a mound of snow that extended across the garden, half
covering the side of the house, wholly hiding beds of sage,
saffron, hyssop, and what not, and nearly enveloping the
bee-hive
,
where, on the paradoxical idea that snow keeps out cold,
the bees must have been very cozy and warm. Reaching the
door, she stooped down to find the handle, but Obed, who
espied her coming, was already on the spot, opened to her,
and handed her down from the snow as he would from the
back of a horse. The Goddess of the Temple very cordially
received her in her adytum, that is to say, the kitchen. She
was divested of snow-shoes, hood, &c., and sat down to take
breath and warmth, by the fire. The Widow was all
attention
,
and her son all humility. What with the deep
snow-banks
without, the great fire within, and the deft and accurate
habits of the lady of the house, they were neat, snug and
comfortable
as heart could wish. A kettle over the fire simmered
like the live-long singing of crickets in a bed of brakes in
August, and there was a pleasant garden perfume from
numerous herbs dispersed through the room. On the walls
and ceiling hung various kinds of medicinal plants; and on
boards and the hearth were spread out roots, stalks, leaves,
berries and flowers, drying. In a corner of the room, tier
upon tier, were piled small wooden boxes. On the table were
an iron pestle and mortar, graters and a pair of scales.
The Widow asked her son to read sundry scraps of writing
she had, for Margaret's particular edification. You see,
she said, he's as smart and perlite as any on um. His
nat'ral parts is equal to the Master's, and he only needs a
little eddecation teu be a great man. There's a good deal in the
way of bringing children up, Peggy, you'll know when you
have been a mother as long as I have. He won't play the
back-game teu nobody, the Lord knows he won't; they don't
put their hooks into his gills, not by a great sight. There has
been a pooty consid'rable mullin goin on 'mong the doctors
ever sen the Nommernisstortumbug come out; Dr. Spoor
looked dismal as snakes the first time he seed me. I am goin
teu put up the price teu and penny happence a box. It's
worth it. It's none of your slush, it's gennewine sientifikals,
it cures people. They'll pay for't teu, and they ort teu. The
more you ax the sooner it'll cure. And it's a downright
gospel marcy teu hitch on a good price. How many have I
sold, think, sen the Master was here? Nigh forty boxes.
After having sufficiently enlightened Margaret in these
matters, she promised her some salve of which she was in
quest, provided she would help Obed awhile in pasting labels
on the boxes. These she had sent to Kidderminster to be
printed, black type on a red ground.
When Margaret left for home, the sun had gone down, and
the moon rose full, to run its high circuit in these winter
heavens. The snow that had melted on the trees during the
day, as the cool air of evening came on, descended in long
wavy icicles from the branches, and the woods in their entire
perspective were tricked with these pendants. It was magic
land to the child, almost as beautiful as her dream, and she
looked for welcome faces up among the glittering trees, and
far off in the white clouds. It was still as her dream too, and
her own voice as she went singing along, echoing in the dark
forest, was all she could hear. The moon tinged the icicles
with a bright silver lustre, and the same pure radiancy, more
faint, shone from the snow. Anon she fell into the shade of
the Moon on her left; while at her right, through the dark
boughs of the evergreens, she saw the Planet Venus, large and
brilliant, set on the verge of the horizon in the impearled
pathway of the Sun. She thought of her other dream at the
Still, of Beauty, fair sister of three fair sisters, and she might
have gone off in waking-dreams among the fantasies of real
existence, when she was drawn back by the recollection of her
brother, to whose assistance she hastened. It was very cold,
her breath showed like smoke in the clear atmosphere,
and the dew from her mouth froze on her tippet; but the
snow settling, and her path becoming more compact and hard,
she trod on with an easier step. All at once there was a glare
of red light about her, the silver icicles were transformed to
rubies, and the snow-fields seemed to bloom with glowing
sorrel
flowers. It was the Northern Lights that shot up their
shafts, snapped their sheets, unfurled their flaming penons,
and poured their rich crimson dies upon the white lustrous
earth. She thought the Winter and the World were beautiful,
her way became more bright, and she hurried on to Chilion
for whom day by day, hour by hour, she labored and watched,
assiduously, tenderly; till his foot amended apace, though it
never got entirely well.
One morning Obed called for Margaret to go with him to
the village. There had been a rain the day before, followed
by a cold night, and the snow was glazed over with a smooth
hard incrustation. They both took sleds, Margaret her
blue-painted
Humming Bird, which she received as a Thanksgiving
present awhile before. Obed wore a reddish butternut-colored
coat with very long and broad skirts, buck-skin breeches, grey
yarn stockings; and a bright red knit woollen cap, that came
down over his ears, and fitted close to his head, having a high
pointed top surmounted with a tassel. Under his shoes was
fastened a pair of dogs or creepers, a strap of iron armed with
points to prevent slipping. Margaret was guarded against the
ice by moccasins drawn over her shoes, and against the cold
by her hood, tippet and mittins; and wore her ordinary
winter
dress, a yellow flannel short-gown, and skirt of the same
material. It was a clear bright morning, and the sun and the
earth seemed to be striving together which should shine with
the greatest strength; and they appeared to serve as mirrors
respectively in which to reflect one another's rays. As
Margaret
and Obed went on, the light seemed to blow and glow
through the forest like a blacksmith's forge, and one almost
expected to be enveloped in hot flames as he advanced. Now
sliding down pitches, now dragging their sleds up acclivities,
they emerged so far from the woods as to overlook the village
and open country beyond. A steam-like vapor arose from the
frozen River, diffused itself through the atmosphere, and hung
like a blue thin veil over the snowy summit of the Mountain.
A long band of white mackerel-back clouds garnished the sky.
They came at length to Dea. Hadlock's Pasture. Here the
scattered trees were all foaming with ice, and the rain having
candied them over, trunk, branch and twig, they shone like so
many great candelabras; and the surface of the lot in all its
extent, burnt and glared in the singing sunbeams. Here also
they encountered a troop of boys and girls coasting. Some
were coming up the hill, goreing and scranching the crust with
their iron corks, others wheeling about and skimmering away
through the bright air, the ups and downs forming a perfect
line of revolution. Margaret and Obed, joining the current,
mounted their sleds, and scudded away down the smooth glassy
slope, with a rapidity that would almost take one's breath away.
At the foot of the hill and lower end of the Pasture, which
bordered on Grove Street, surmounting the fence, was a high
drift, or broad bank of snow; over which some of the sleds
passed into the road beyond, some came to the top and halted,
some with a graceful recurve turned off aslant, while others with
less momentum going up half way ran backwards, and striking
some obstruction, reared, and threw their riders heels over
head; and up they jumped for a fresh fling. Margaret,
elevated
in feeling as she entered this scene flowing alike with joy
and light, made a bow on the drift, and mingled with the
moiling merry-hearted ups. There were trees scattered through
the lot, and small rocks just rounded off with snow, and larger
ones with a pitch in front, and diversities of soil that gave a
wavy hucklebacked character to the entire field. The boys
wore steeple-crowned caps like Obed's, some knit, some made
of strips of black and yellow cloth; the girls were dressed
both in short and long gowns. Their sleds had various names,
Washington, Napoleon, Spitfire, Racer, Swallow. The downs
whooped by, some dodging among the trees, some shot through
and dispersed the line of the ups, some sprang many feet off
the rocks. Some were astride their sleds, some lay on their
breasts with legs projecting behind guiding their course with
their toes, some knelt on one haunch, making a rudder of the
other foot. It was a youthful, exhilarating, cock-brained,
winter, New England dytharimb.
This is music, says one boy.
Something of the broomstick order  a fellow gets
thwacked most to death, says a second.
There goes Judah Weeks, his trotters are getting up in
the world, says a third.
Old Had. is rather hard upon him, rejoined the second
boy.
He always is upon the boys, but dum him, we'll get some
fun out of him at any rate, added the first.
15*
Spitfire is as skittish as the Deacon's sorrel colt; Jude
might have known he would have got cast, interposed the
third.
I declare, how they ache, said Judah, blowing his red
snow-dripping fingers, as he joined the ups.
Clear the coop! cried all hands, here comes a
straddlebug
.
But the rider, it happened to he Obed, losing his
balance, his sled bolted directly in front of them, raking and
hackling the crust, and scattering the bright particles on every
side, and he rolled over at their feet.
Hurt, Obed? said Margaret.
No, replied he, picking up himself and his sled, and
joining the upward track; but I shall take it knee-bump,
next time.
No, I wouldn't, said one of the boys.
Try bellygut, you'll like that better, said another.
Does your Marm know you are out? asked one of the
large boys.
Yes, she said I might come!
Do you know what will cure cold fingers? said Judah.
Take garlic and saffron blows, and bile um an hour and
drink it just as you are gittin' into bed, and it'll cure any cold
that ever was, Marm says, replied Obed.
There go Washington and Napoleon! cried several
voices, Old Bony 'll beat as true as guns; she's all-fired
swift.
Peggy's Hummin' Bird 'll beat anything, said Obed.
She 'll go like nutcakes, an allusion, we should remark, he
was in the habit of making founded on a favorite dish his
mother cooked for him every Saturday night.
Guess Racer 'll give her a try, or anything there is on the
ground, answered one of the larger boys, Seth Penrose, son
of the Deacon's. Pox me! if these Injins put their tricks
on me as they do on daddy,
Sh'! sh'! Seth, rejoined Judah, you didn't talk so
when you was digging her out of the woods. We don't have
such a time as this every day. Let us all make the best of it.
Ho ho, hoop ho! exclaimed all voices, as they reached
the top of the hill. They are coming! Below were seen
two large sleds, each drawn by five or six boys, coming up
the lot. Now for a race. Hoora for the Old
Confederation
!
shouted one party of the observers. Hoora for the
Federal Constitution! shouted the other, as the objects of
their attention drew near. These were sledges or pungs,
coarsely framed of split saplings, and surmounted with a
large crockery crate. The boys, in whom the strong
political
feeling of the time could not well fail to develop itself, had
planned an adventure, and were about to test and signalize
their respective merits and capabilities, by a race with sleds,
named agreeably to the existing party distinctions. These
ark-like vehicles were turned round and loaded, the crates
filled with boys, and several seated in front to steer,
while others did the like office behind. They started off at
the same moment, those in the crates standing up, swinging
their caps, and echoing the cheers of the spectators. They
skewed, brustled and bumped along, the crates wabbled and
warped from side to side, the riders screamed, cross-bit,
frumped and hooted at each other; they lost control of their
course, their bows struck, they parted with a violent rebound;
one went giddying round and round, fraying and sputtering the
snow, and dashed against a tree; the other whirled into the
same line, plunged with its load headlong into the first. It
was a regular mish-mash; some of the boys were doused into
each other, some were jolled against the tree, some sent
grabbling
on their faces down the hill, some plumped smack on
the ice, some whisked round and round, and left standing.
There was a shout from the top of the hill, and a smothered
response from below, then a clearer shout, and at last a
fulltoned
hoora. None were seriously hurt; who was ever hurt
sliding down hill? Yet what with their lumbering gear staved
to atoms, splinters, nails, and the violence of the concussion,
it was a wonder some were not killed. The cry was now for
a single race, to which all parties agreed. The sleds were
drawn up in a line evenly as the nature of the ground would
permit, twenty or thirty of them, Margaret and Obed, and all
who cared to enter the lists. The fence at the foot of the
Pasture was the ordinary terminus of their slides; but they
sometimes went farther than this. Crossing Grove Street, and
the fence on the other side, passing through an orchard, and
emerging between the Court House and the Jail, they came
out on the Green; to gain, by methods unimpeachable, the
farthest point on which was the stake, and comprised a
distance
of nearly half a mile. The girls sat with their skirts
trussed about their ankles, and the boys took postures as they
liked best. The signal was made, and they flushed away.
Soon separating, some went crankling, sheering, sidewise of
the hill; some were tossed in somersets from the rocks; some
ran into each other, and turning backwards channeled and
ripped their way through the hard crust; on, on they went,
skittering, bowling, sluice-like, wave-like; Margaret curvetted
about the mounds, she leaped the hollows, going on with a
ricochet motion, pulsating from swell to swell, humming,
whizzing
,
the fine grail glancing before her and fuzzing her face
and neck; her hood fell back over her shoulders, her hair
streamed bandrols in the wind; she reined her sled-rope as if
it had been the snaffle of a high-spirited horse;  she passed
the first fence, and the second  others were near her  some
lodged on the fences, some dropped in the street. Three or
four sleds were in full chase through the orchard, they gained
the Green, near the centre of which their speed exhausted
itself. Margaret was evidently foremost and farthest.
You hitched, said Seth Penrose, somewhat angrily.
No I didn't, said Margaret, somewhat excited.
She didn't hitch, said little Job Luce, who had been
hovering
about the hill all the morning watching the sport, and
at the race, crept to the Green to see them come in.
I thought Spitfire was up to anything, said Judah Weeks,
jumping from his snow-bespattered sled; but she is beat
now.
Margaret had indeed won the race, and that without a
miracle. Chilion, her mechanical genie, had constructed her
sled in the best manner of the best materials, and shod it with
steel. In her earliest years, he inured her to the weather,
hauled her on the snows before she could walk, made her
coast as soon as she could sit a sled, graduated her starting
points up Indian's Head, so that she became equal to any
roughness or steepness, and could accomplish all possible
distances.
Who beat? Who beat? asked a score of breathless voices
rushing to the spot.
Little Molly Hart, roundly answered Judah.
No, the wicked Injin didn't beat nuther, rejoined Seth.
Yes, she did beat teu, interposed Obed, coming forward
among the late rear; I know she did.
How do you know she did, Granny? said Seth.
Cause Hummin' Bird can beat anything, and I know she
did, replied Obed.
You are done for, said one or another to Seth.
No I an't done for  she hitched, answered the sturdy
rival.
I guess she didn't hitch, said little Isabel Weeks, who
was of the number, cause Ma says good children don't cheat;
and she is good, cause Ma says good children helps their ma's,
and she helps her ma.
I
know
she didn't, repeated Job, cause I was here and
saw it.
Bawh! Ramshorn! said the indignant Seth, thrashing
about and by a side-trick knocking Job on the hard crust.
Come, pick him up, said Isabel; Jude, take hold of his
feet.
I'll help you, said Margaret.
Don't touch him! exclaimed Obed, addressing Margaret.
He'she'she'll kill you, he'll pizen you, he'll give you the
itch. He's a ghost.
No he won't hurt you, replied Isabel, its only little Job
Luce with a crook in his back, Ma says; and it's handy to
lift by. Up with him.
They placed him on Margaret's sled, who with Isabel drew
him towards his home, leaving the rest of the company to
their own affairs. They went on the crust, with the road two or
three feet below them, straight and narrow, fluted through the
solid plane of the snow. Two or three sleighs or cutters
passed
them, large and heavy, with high square backs like a settle,
and low square foot-boards; without buffalo, bear skin or
blanket, and painted red and green. They took Job to his
mother, who received her son with thankfulness toward the
girls, but without surprise as regarded the boy. Mistress
Luce, a wan, care-worn, ailing looking woman, yet having a
gentle and placid tone of voice, was binding shoes. The bright
sun-light streamed into the room, quite paling and quenching
flames and coals in the fire-place. A picture hung on the
walls, an embroidery, floss on white satin, representing a
woman
leaning mourningly on an urn, and a willow drooping
over her. On a small round table, together with the shoes she
was at work upon, lay open-spread a bible. Job was seated
in a low armed rocking-chair on the hearth. He had always
been an object of sport to the boys, and not unfrequently
sufered
from their wontonness.
Poor boy! ejaculated his mother with a sigh. He
grows worse and worse  we did all we could for him.
Won't he grow straight and stout? asked Margaret.
No, answered the woman. A whippoorwill sung on
the willow over the brook four nights before he was born;
we had him drawn through a split tree, but he never got
better.
Whippoorwills sing every night most at the Pond in the
summer, said Margaret.
I have heard them a great many times, added Isabel.
Ma says they won't hurt people if they are only good.
I know, I know, responded the woman, with a quick
shuddering start.
Ma says they only hurt wicked people, continued Isabel.
Ah, yes, said the woman with a melancholy respiration,
I always knew it was a judgment on account of my sins.
What have you done? asked Margaret anxiously.
Oh, I don't know, answered the Widow, only I am a
great sinner; if you could hear the Parson preach you would
think so too. I just read in my Bible what God says, `
Because
you have sinned against the Lord, this is come upon
you.'
I saw Job at the Meeting one day, said Margaret, he
recited the catechism so well. Do you know what it meant?
she continued, turning to the boy.
No, I don't, replied Job, but Mammy doesbut I know
the whippoorwill's song.
Do you? asked Margaret; can you say it?
No, only I hear it every night.
What, in the winter?
Yes, after I go to bed.
Do you have dreams?
I don't know what it is, replied the boy, only I hear
whippoorwill. It sings in the willow over the urn, and sings
in here, he said, pointing to his breast. I shall die of
whippoorwill
.
Oh dear, yes, O Father in Heaven! sighed out his
mother strugglingly, yet with an air of resignation, it is
just.
It sings, added the boy, in the moonshine, I hear it
in the brook in the summer, and among the flowers, and the
grasshoppers sing it to me when the sun goes down, and it
sings in the Bible. I shall die of whippoorwill.
How he talks! said Isabel. I guess Ma wouldn't like
to have me stay, only Job
is
a good boy, he says his prayers
every night, and don't kill the little birds, like the other boys,
and Ma says he will go to Heaven when he dies. I wish they
wouldn't teaze him so. A horn was heard, and Isabel said it
was her dinner time, and Margaret must go with her.
Good bye, Job, said Margaret, in the summer I will
come and see you again, and you must come up to the Pond,
I will show you my Bird-book, and you shall sail on the
water.
Esq. Weeks, who lived nearly opposite the Widow Luce's,
was an extensive farmer. Mistress Weeks was the mother of
fourteen children, all born within twenty-three years, all still
living, and cherished under the same roof.
A new one to dinner, hey, Miss Belle? said her mother.
So, so, just as your Pa always said, one more wouldn't make
any difference. Take your placesI don't know how to cut
the pudding downwise, crosswiseone, two, three, four, five,
six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven. Eleven, where are they
all? Don't I count straight?
John, Nahum and the men have gone into the woods, Ma,
said Bethia.
I am sure I had fifteen plates put on, said the mother.
Washington hurt his hand, and Dolly you said wasn't old
enough to come yet, said Bethia.
Yes, yes, answered the mother, I forgot. I don't
remember
anything since we had so many children. Lay to
Mabel hasn't anything, said Helen.
What, can't I get it right? said the mother. Girls
I tell you all, study arithmetic. If I had known what a
family I was going to bring up, I should have learnt mine
better. Arithmetic is the best thing in a family, next to the
Bible.
And a good husband, interposed Esq. Weeks.
That's fair, replied his wife. But gals take to your
arithmetic, numeration, addition, subtraction, division and all
the compounds, practice, tare and trett, loss and gain. And
you've come all the way from the Pond, Miss Margery. How
is your Ma'am? I really forgot to ask. It's pretty cold
weather
,
good deal of snow, comes all in a bunch, just like children.
And you like to have been killed in the tornado? If it had
been our little Belle how we should have felt'
And me too? asked the littler Mabel.
Yes, you too, can't spare any of you. Only be good
children, be good children, eat all you want. Zebulun is
crying, I forgot to nurse him
After dinner Margaret said she would go and see the Master,
and Isabel went with her. At the Widow Small's, the Master's
boarding house, they were told he was over the way, at the
Parson's; whither they directed their steps. The house of
Parson Welles stood on the corner, as you turned from South
Street up the Brandon, or No 4 road. Isabel leading the way,
they entered without knocking, and made directly for the
Parson's study. The Parson and the Master were sitting near
the fire, with their backs towards the door, smoking long
pipes, and engaged in earnest conversation, so much so that
the Master only nodded to the girls, and the Parson, who was
a little deaf, did not notice them at all. Isabel held her breath,
and made a low curtesy to the Parson's back, while Margaret
stood motionless, looking about the room, and at the persons
in it. The Parson, whose hair was shaved close to his head,
wore a red velvet cap, and had on in place of his public suit
of black, a long, bluish-brown linen dressing-gown, which his
wife had probably wove for him at some by-gone period. The
room had small windows, was wainscotted and painted a dark
green, and rendered still darker by tobacco smoke. There
were book-shelves about the apartment; on the walls hung
pictures in dark frames similar to those Margaret saw at the
Master's; the sand on the floor was streaked in whimsical
figures, and on a black stout-legged table lay paper, ink and
some manuscript sermons of the dimensions of four by six
inches.
Touching objections, Master Elliman, continued the
Parson, laying his pipe on his hand, fourteenthly, it is
calumniously asserted by the opposers of divine truth that on
this hypothesis, God made men to damn them; but we say
God decreed to make man, and made man neither to damn
him nor to save him, but for his own glory, which end is
answered
in them some way or another.
Whether they are damned or not? said the Master.
Yes, said the Parson, inasmuch as that is not the thing
considered, but the rather the executing of his own decrees,
and the expression of his proper sovereignty, who will be
glorified in all things. The real question is, whether man was
considered in the mind of God, as fallen or unfallen, as to be
created or creatable, or as created but not fallen. But the
idea of things in the Divine mind is not as in ours. God
understands
all things
per genesis
, we understand them
per
analysin
. Hence going back into the Divine mind, aborigine,
we first seek the status quo of the idea. In that idea came up
a vast number of individuals of the human specie as creatible,
some as fallen, others as unfallen. He did not create them to
cause them to fall
But he made them fall that they might be created
Now this idea considered as an active volition is God's
decree, and this decree going into effect creates man on the
earth; some predestined to everlasting life, some to everlasting
death. And here the Universalists do greatly err, not
perceiving
that God is equally glorified in the damnation as the
salvation
of his creatures: so St. Paul to the Romans, ix. 17, 18, 19.
My pipe is out, and we must apply to King Solomon to help us
in this matter.
Yea, verily, responded the Master.
This King Solomon, we should explain, was a large silver
snuff-box, with a mother-of-pearl lid, on which was carved the
interview of the Queen of Sheba and the afore-mentioned king,
which Parson Welles carried in his deep waistcoat pocket,
and of the contents of which he and the Master partook freely
in the intervals of smoking.
Why should man reply against God? continued the
Parson.
That would in truth be very unreasonable, interposed the
Master.
The riches of God's mercy do alone save us from the
infernal
designs of reprobate men. Those who oppose the
divine decrees would soon have Satan in our midst.
The Master sensible that some attention was due his little
pupil, here broke from the Parson, called Margaret, and
introduced
her.
Margaret Hart, yes, replied the Parson. Of the Hart
family in Litchfield, I knew her grandfather well. He was an
able defender of the truth.
She is from the Pond, sir, added the Master. Didymus
Hart, alias Pluck's daughter.
Yes, yes, of the Ishmaelitish race, responded the Parson,
laughing. If she could be baptized and jine the catechizing
class; appinted means whereby the Atonement is made
efficacious
.
Isabel, he continued, addressing the companion of
Margaret, you are sprung of a godly ancestry, and the blood
of many holy persons runs in your veins. See that ye despise
not the Divine goodness.
The Master took Margaret about the room, and showed her
some of the books and pictures. Of the former were the
writings of the most distinguished Divines on both Continents;
there were Prey taken from the Strong, or an Account of a
Recovery from the Dangerous Errors of Quakerism;
Thatcher's
Sermons on The Eternal Punishment of the Finally
Impenitent; An Arrow against Profane and Promiscuous
Dancing, drawn out of the Quiver of the Scriptures; Owen
on Sin; Randolph's Revision of Socinian Arguments;
&c. &c. The latter were chiefly faces of the old clergy;
some in large wigs, some in long flowing curls, some in
skull-caps
,
16
some with moustaches and imperials, all in bands and
robes.
Parson Welles was the contemporary of Bellamy, Chauncey,
Langdon, Cooper, Byles, Eliot, Forbes, Franklin, Goodrich,
Hopkins, West, Styles and others; with some of whom he was
on terms of familiar acquaintance. He was a pupil of
Edwards
,
and afterwards the friend and correspondent of that
Divine. Whitfield and his labors, the latter especially, he never
brooked, and would not suffer him to preach in Livingston.
The Master presently returned with Margaret to his room,
where she accomplished her errand, that of getting his advice
respecting something she was studying; when she parted with
her little friend, went back to the Green, found Obed, and they
proceeded on together to their homes. And there for the
present
we leave her.
PART II.
YOUTH.
16*
CHAPTER I.
SPRING.ROSE.MARGARET KEEPS SCHOOL.SUNDRY MATTERS.MR.
ANONYMOUS.
This
Part commences with an omission of five or six years,
the particulars of which, one familiar with life at the Pond will
not find it difficult to supply. Margaret has pursued the tenor
of her way, even or uneven, as the case may be; assisting her
mother, entertaining her father, the companion of Chilion, and
the pupil of the Master. If variety in unity be the right
condition
of things, then her life has been truthful and sound.
She has made considerable progress in her studies, pursued for
the most part in a line suggested by the peculiarities of her
instructor. It is Spring; Hash is about beginning his annual
labor of making maple sugar, and burning coal; Margaret has
promised him her aid, after which it is understood she is to
enjoy her own leisure. She carries to the Maples the
alderspouts
,
which Chilion makes, rights the troughs that have been
lying overturned under the trees, and in due time kindles a fire
beneath the large iron kettle that hangs from a pole supported
between two rocks. Wreathing the trailing arbutus in her
hair, and making a baldric of the ground-laurel, with a wooden
yoke stretched across her shoulders, she carries two pails full
of sap from the trees to the boiler. With a stick having a bit
of pork on the end, she graduates the walloping syrup when
it is likely to overflow, while her brother brings more sap from
the remote and less accessible part of the Camp. The
neighbors
,
boys and girls, come in at the sugaring off; the wax
is freely distributed to be cooled on lumps of snow, or the
axe-head
;
some string it about in long, flexile, fantastic lines,
some get their mouths burnt, all are merry. Her mother
stirs it off, and a due quantity of the quick and alive
crystal sweet is the result, a moiety of which is destined to
Smiths at No. 4, in consideration for the use of the lot, and
another portion to Deacon Penrose's for other well-known
objects.
The Coal-pit, lying farther up the road, on the Via Salutaris,
next demanded attention. She helped clear off the rubbish,
and remove the sod to make a foundation for the kiln, and
prevent the spread of the fire. She lent a hand also in
stacking
the wood, covering the pile with turf, and constructing a
lodge of green boughs, where her brother would stay during
the night; one whole night she herself watched with him.
Then she raked up the chips about the house, and with a twig
broom swept the dirt from the new-springing grass; she hoed
out the gutter where the water ran from the cistern, and
washed and aired her own little chamber. The cackling of
the hens drew her in search of their eggs in the manger and
over the hay-mow in the barn; she fed the brooders and
watched the chickens when they broke from their shells. So
four or five weeks pass away, and her own play-spell comes, if,
indeed, her whole life were not a play-spell. She would
replenish
her flower-bed, and goes into the woods to gather rare
wild plants. She has books of natural history with which the
Master kept her supplied. The forests in their first leafing and
infloresence, present an incipient autumnal appearance, in
the variety of colors and marked divisions of the trees, but the
whole effect is thinned, diluted and softened. The distant
hills have a yellowish grey merging into a dim silver look,
and might be taken for high fields of grass in a bright dewy
morning. The atmosphere she finds deliciously balmy and
exhilaratingly pure. Innumerable birds have also come out to
enjoy the hour; they sing in the woods, roundelay among trees
and shrubbery about the house; their notes echo across the
Pond, and salute the skies from the top of Indian's Head.
She turned over logs and stones, and let loose to the light and
air tribes of caterpillars, ear-wigs, sow-bugs, beetles and
lizzards
,
that had harbored there all winter. The ants open
their own habitations by demolishing the roof, which they
convert into a redoubt; and she watched them coming up from
their dark troglodital abodes bringing the fine grit in their teeth,
and stepped with a kind caution among these groups of dumb,
moneyless, industrious Associationists. Toads, piebald,
chunk-shaped
,
shrugged and wallowed up from their torpid beds, and
winked their big eyes at her. The birds are going on with
their grand opera, and she and the sun, who is just raising his
eye-glass above the trees, are the sole unoccupied spectators.
Hash is busy scolding and goading his oxen; her mother
hastens
to bring in yarn she has had out over night, and storms
at the birds, who are to her no more than pilferers. Her father
perhaps has some interest in the scene; he sits in the front
door with a pipe in his mouth, the smoke rolls over his ruddy
pate and muffles his blear eyes, but he contrives to laugh
lustily
,
and his flabby proportions shake like a bowl of jelly. She
caught at the moment, a harry-long-legs, which she holds by
one of its shanks, while she very soberly inspects the book
before her, to find out more about it than it is disposed to tell
of itself. Her other brother, Chilion, used to love to go into
the woods with her, and while he was hunting, he pointed out
the different birds, gathered rare flowers, and discovered green
knolls and charming frescoes where she could sit. But he is
lame now, and cannot walk far, having never recovered from
the injury he received some years before, searching for her in
the wind-fall. Besides he never said much, and what value he
put upon things that interested her, she could never precisely
understand. He is engaged withal thwacking his axe-head on a
long white ash stick, the successive layers of which being
loosened, he tears off to make baskets with, which has become
almost his sole employment. So she enjoys the world quite alone,
and not the less for that, since she has always done so. The
place flows with birds, and they flow with song; robins, wrens,
yellow-polls, chirping and song-sparrows, bobolinks, thrushes,
cat-birds, cow-buntings, orioles, goldfinches, grassfinches,
indigo
birds, purple linnets, swallows, martins, humming-birds;
loons and bitterns on the water; and deep in the forest
olive-backs
,
veeries, oven-birds, and many kinds of warblers and
creepers; to say nothing of a huge turkey gobbling in the
road, a rooster crowing on the fence, and ducks quacking in
the ditches. A varied note breaks upon her, which if she is
able to distinguish, she can do better perhaps than some of
our readers, who will hardly thank us for giving names to what
after all is very perceptible to the practised ear; twittering,
chirping, warbling, squeaking, screaming, shrieking, cawing,
cackling, humming, cooing, chattering, piping, whistling,
mewing, hissing, trilling, yelping. Chilion is passionately
attatched
to music in his own way, is master even of some of its
technicalities, and Margaret in this matter is his pupil; and it
requires no great effort for her to discern a general hallelujah
in this bird-concert; affetuoso and mstuoso, con dolce and
con furia are agreeably intermingled; nor are there wanting
those besides herself to encore the strain. She is no Priapus
to drive the birds away, but as if she were a bramble-net,
their notes are caught in her ears; even if their feet are not
seized by her fingers as they winnow the air, wheel, dive and
dally about her. They frisk in the trees, pursue one another
across the lots, start fugues in a double sense, compete with
their rivals, clamor for their mates, sing amatory and convivial
ditties, and describe more ridottos than the Italians. Could
we suppose sounds to be represented by ribbons of different
colors, and the fair spirit of music to sit in the air some
hundred
feet from the ground, having in her hand a knot of
lutestrings of a hundred hues, blue, pink, white, gold, silver,
and every intermediate and combined shade and lustre, and let
them play out in the sun and wind, their twisting, streaming,
snapping, giddying, glancing, forking, would be a fair symbol
of the voices of the birds in the ear of Margaret, on this warm
sunny Spring morning. Howbeit, the profusion of Nature
offers other things to her attention besides the birds; or
rather we should say the good mother of all gives these
beautiful
voices wherewith to purify the sensibilities of her
children
,
and animate them in their several pursuits. Thus
enlivened
and impelled, Margaret entered other departments of
observation. Shod with stout shoes, armed with a constitution
inured to all forces and mixtures of the elements, supported by
a resolution that neither snakes, bears, or a man could easily
abash, she penetrated a wet sedgy spot near the margin of the
Pond, where she found clusters of tall osmunds, straight as an
arrow, with white downy stems, and black seed-leaves, curling
gracefully at the top in the form of a Corinthian capital, and
shining pearl-like in the sun with their dew-spangled chaffy
crowns; the little polypods with green, feathery, carrot-shaped
fronds, penetrating the solid dry heaps of their decayed
ancestry
;
horse-tails with storied ruffs of supple spines; farther
down the road were the fleecy buds of the mouse-ear, bringing
beautiful cloud-life from the dank leaden earth; the young
mulleins, velvety, white, tender, fit to ornament the gardens of
Queen Mab; buttercup-sprouts with dense green leaves,
waxen
and glistening; in the edge of the woods she gathered the
straw-colored, pendulous flowers of the chaste bell-wort; the
liver-leaves, with cups full of snow-capped threads; mosses,
with slender scarlet-tipped stems, some with brown cups like
acorns, others with crimson flowers; there were also
innumerable
germs of golden rod, blue vervain, and other flowers,
which at a later season shall fill the hedges and enliven the
roads. In the woods a solitary white birch, bedizened with
long, yellow, black-spotted flowers, pulsating in the wind, and
having a scarlet tanager sitting in its thin sunny boughs,
attracted
her eye by its own gentle beauty; in the shaded grass
were hundreds of snow-drops, like a bevy of girls in white
bonnets trooping through a meadow; quantities of the slender,
pink flowering-wintergreen grew among the white dog-weed;
and the twin-flower interlaced the partridge berry. Within
the forest was a broad opening, where she loved to walk, and
which at this time disclosed in high perfection the beautiful
verdure of Spring. Here were white oaks with minute white
flowers, red oaks with bright red flowers, red maples with still
redder flowers, rock maples with salmon-colored leaves, as
it were birds fluttering on one foot, or little pirouetting
sylphs; a growth of white birches spread itself before a
sombre
grove of pines, like a pea-green veil. The path was strown
with old claret boxberries, grey mosses, brown leaves,
freaked with fresh green shoots; and what with the flowers of
the trees illumined by the sun on either side, one could
imagine
her walking an antique hall with tesselated floor and
particolored gay hangings. This opening descended to the
shore of the Pond, where, under another clump of white
birches, she sat down. The shadows of the trees refreshingly
invested her, the waves struck musically upon the rocks, and
in the clear air, her own thoughts sped like a breath away; the
vivacity of the birds was qualified by the advance of the day,
and while she had been delighted at first with what she saw,
all things now subsided into harmony with what she felt.
She hummed herself in low song, which as it had not rhyme,
and perhaps not reason, we will not transcribe. Some new
tide of sensation bore her off, and she went up the Via
Salutaris
to the brook Kedron. This she threaded as far as the
Tree-bridge; golden blossoms of the adder and willow
over-hung
the dark stream; she passed thickets of wild cherries
in full snowy bloom; yellow adder's tongue diversified green
cowslips, pink columbines festooned the grey rocks, red
newts were sunning themselves on the pebbles of the brook;
she saw a veery building its nest in a branch so low its young
could be cradled in the music of the stream; green, lank frogs
sprang from her feet into the swift eddies, and thrust up their
heads on the other side, like their cousins the toads, to look
at her; clear water oozed from the slushy bog of the banks.
Crossing from the Via Dolorosa, through the grove of walnuts
and birches, and the Maples, she came to rocks that abutted
the south-east boundary line of the elevated plain on which
lay the basin of the Pond; a point overlooking the bed of
Mill Brook, the Brandon road, ranges of hills beyond, and the
Village at the left. Descending this, on the slope below, were
pines, spruces and cedars; hereabouts also she discovered the
dog-wood, high cranberry and tulip-tree, in showy bloom;
and the prettily flowering mitrewort, saxifrage, and Solomon's
seal.
But there appeared what for the moment quite diverted her
from these things She heard a sound issuing from the
shady side of a young pine, like that of a woman, singing
or murmuring to itself. Stealing her way to the tree, through
the boughs, she beheld a young lady of nearly her own age,
reclined on the dry pine leaves, whiling herself in rending to
shreds the bright crimson flowers of the red-bud or Judas
tree, and uttering plaintive broken sounds. She was delicately
fair, the outline of her face was finely shaped, long locks of
golden hair trailed upon her neck; her hand was snowy white,
and fingers transparently thin. She wore a white red-sprigged
poplin, a small blue bonnet lay at her side, and a brocaded
camlet-hair shawl falling from her shoulders discovered a bust
of exquisite proportions. Her complexion was white, almost
too white for nature or health, and her whole aspect betokened
the subsidence and withdrawal of proper youthful vigorous
expressiveness. Margaret was spell-bound, and looked in
astonished
silence. The young lady laughed as she scattered
the flowers, and there was a marvellous beauty in her smile,
melancholy though it seemed to be, and even to Margaret's
eye, who was not an adept in such matters, it rayed out like
the shimmer of a cardinal bird in a dark forest. Margaret
thought of the Pale Lady of her dreams, and that she had
suddenly dropped from the skies at her feet. She saw the
young lady press her thin fingers to her eyes as if she wept,
then she smiled again, and that smile penetrated Margaret's
heart, and she advanced from her ambuscade, but spider-like,
as if she were about to catch some fragile vision of her fancy.
The young lady sprang up at the noise, seized her bonnet, and
ran. Margaret pursued, and what with her ready familiarity
with the woods and fleetness of foot, gained upon the other,
who turned abruptly, and said, Why do you chase me?
Why do you run? responded Margaret. I would not
hurt you; let me hear your voicelet me take your hand,
she continued. Her tone was kind, her manner innocent,
and the young lady seemed won by it, and disposed to parley.
She rejoined, I sought this spot to be away from the faces
of all.
How strange! ejaculated Margaret. Where is your
home? Are you from the village? she asked.
I have no home, replied the young lady, but you are
Molly Hart, whom they have told me about.
Yes, answered Margaret, I am Molly Hart; but say
who are you, and what is your name?
Those are questions I cannot answer, replied the other.
You look very unhappy, said Margaret.
Were you ever unhappy? asked the stranger.
No, said Margaret, not much so; I have always been
happy, I think.
You seem to be fond of flowers, said the young lady.
Are not you? asked Margaret.
I used to be, she replied. I was going to say, she
added, I will help carry your basket for you, and look for
flowers with you; only you must not ask me any questions.
Then I shall want to, said Margaret.
But you must not, said the young lady.
Very well, said Margaret, you will be another flower
and bird to me, and equally unknown with all the rest; nor
will you give me less pleasure for that you are unknown, since
everything else is.
Then I shall like you very much, said the young lady,
if you can consent to my being unknown; and perhaps in
that way we can contrive to amuse one another.
They ascended the bluff, and returned through the woods
together.
Have you found the snap-dragon, that recoils when it is
touched? asked the young lady.
That does not come out in the Spring, said Margaret.
But here are some berries of the witch-hazle that blossomed
last Fall.
And under our feet are withered dead leaves, rejoined
the young lady.
But they shone in vigorous starry brilliancy, after the
frosts pinched them, said Margaret.
Here is the morning glory, said the young lady as they
entered the Mowing, that lasts but an hour.
The young lady, as we have said, evinced great waste of
strength, her voice was reduced in a corresponding degree,
though it was sweet and clear as her face was beautiful; and
there was something in her tone and manner of allusion that
signified a secret unexpressed state of being which Margaret
could not fail to remark, however far she might be removed
from its proper comprehension; and her replies took the turn
of one in whose breast, intuitively, will float veiled images,
and be reflected therefrom indistinct recognizances of latent
deep realities in the breast of another.
Look at this blue-flag, she said; our neighbor, a wise
simpler, declares it will cure a host of diseases.
The star-grass there, replied the young lady, hides
itself in the rank verdure, and only asks to be.
The strawberry is very modest, too, rejoined Margaret,
but its delicious fruit is for you and me, and everybody.
Shall I never see you again? enquired Margaret
emphatically
.
Will you go away as suddenly as you came? Will
you not
speak
to me? Have the naturalists given no
description
of such a one as you? You say you have no homedo
you live under the trees? Where did you get that shawl and
bonnet? No name! No genus, no species? Come into the
house and let Chilion play to you.
You have seen the pond-lily, replied the young lady,
that closes its cup at night, and sinks into the water.
But it springs up the next morning blooming as ever, said
Margaret. Besides, if only one had appeared in my
life-time
,
I should be tempted to plunge in after it, come what
might. You are very `anagogical,' as my Master says, strange
and mysterious I mean, like a good many other things. You
remind me of a pale beautiful lady I have seen in my dreams,
only her hair is black
The blood-root, replied the imperturbable young lady,
when it is broken loses its red juice.
In truth! exclaimed Margaret. Yet it is a very pretty
flower. I have a whole one just flowering in my bed near
the house. Do go with me and see it. You love flowers,
and I do too, and perhaps they will talk you more to me.
No, replied the young lady, I cannot go now. I am at
the Widow Wright's; but do not follow me. You are very
happy, you say, and you have no need of me; you are quite
busy too, and I would not call you away.
Do give me a name, urged Margaret, some point that
I can seize hold upon you by, be it ever so small. I am sure
I shall dream about you.
Since you like flowers, answered the young lady, you
may call me Rose, but one without color, a white one.
17
So they separated, and Margaret went to her house. From
her collection she transferred to her flower-beds a
spring-beauty
,
a rhodora, a winter-green, to grow by the side of
sweet briar, cardinal flowers, blood-roots, columbines, and
others. Chilion brought out a neatly made box in which he
wished her to set a venus shoe or ladies slipper.
It was not singular that Margaret should desire again to see
the strange young lady, who was called Rose, nor was she at
loss for opportunities to do so. She pursued her sedulously,
and even prevailed with her to come to her father's. The
spirit of Pluck seemed to rally Rose, and Chilion's music
penetrated
and charmed her soul, albeit it failed to reveal the
secret of her thoughts. It was of different kind from any she
had heard before; it operated as a simple melodious
incantation
,
and did not, as music sometimes does, arouse feelings
only to tantalize and distress them. Chilion played in a wild
untutored way, catching his ideas from his own simple thoughts,
and from what of nature was comprised above and below the
horizon of the Pond, and this pleased her. Margaret
sensitively
alive to whatever pertained to the due understanding of
Rose, sometimes gave her brother a hint at which he played;
but there was developed so plain an uneasiness within the
concealed being of the young lady, that both were fain to
forbear
.
Rose came frequently to Pluck's; she loved to be with
Margaret and Chilion; even the sullen disposition of Hash she
evinced a facility for softening by her playful repartees and
beautiful smiles. She gained the favor of Brown Moll by
assisting
Margaret, who rising in domestic as well as natural
science, had become equal to carding and spinning. Bull too
was not insensible to her attractions, but with an enlargement
of heart, not always found in the superior races, while he fell
off no whit in his original attachments, he recognized her as
a new Lady-love, obeyed her voice, followed her steps, wagged
his tail at her smiles, and leaped forwards to meet her as
readily
as he did Margaret, and that too in his old age. Nothing
could have been more diverting to the whole party, and to
Pluck especially, though in himself the line of the ridiculous
was complete, than to see Brown Moll weaving, Margaret
spinning, Rose carding, and Pluck, reduced to Margaret's
childhood estate, occupying her little stool, quilling; which
was often done. But Rose's strength was not adequate to such
tasks long continued, and perhaps from the entertainment it
afforded was her chief power derived. She and Margaret
walked in the woods, sailed on the Pond, and sometimes read
and studied together. Now also the peculiarities of Rose
appeared
.
She would absent herself from Pluck's and Margaret
whole days; she would stay at the Widow's, between whom
and herself some relationship was claimed, and work silently
with Obed in his herb-beds, despite the most urgent
solicitations
of Margaret; she resorted alone to the thickest parts of
the forest; and sometimes she would break away from
Margaret
when they were on the Pond together, take the canoe and
wander alone over the deep dark waters, or spend hours by
herself on a solitary island. No questionings, no attentions,
no generosity could succeed in discovering the secret that
seemed evidently to labor in her breast, or a part of which
she may have been. The Widow, and Obed, who took his
cue from his mother, would answer nothing for her; save that
the latter called her his cousin. At times she was cheerful,
talkative, vivacious, even to exuberance; in the same moment
she would relapse into a thoughtful and preoccupied state;
not unfrequently she wept even, but would not tell Margaret
why. Margaret soon learned to acquiesce in these diversities
of the stranger, at whatever expense of baffled solicitude on
her own part. She was delighted with the gushes of Rose's
sprightliness, she was overawed by her hidden pain, as by some
great mystery of nature, which, nevertheless, she sometimes
essayed critically to explore, sometimes humanely to compose;
but the subject only reminded her of her ignorance, though,
meanwhile, it haunted her with new and indefinable
sensations
of tenderness and reflective philanthropy.
In the latter part of May, the Master came to the Pond, his
thin grey face agreeably illumined by the pleasing intelligence
he bore, this, to wit, that he had negotiated the Village School
for Margaret,it having recently, that is for three or four years
past, been in charge of a female during the Summer. However
Margaret might have regarded this proposal, there was one
consideration that prevailed with her to accept it. This arose
from the pecuniary embarrassments of the family. Pluck's
whole estate was under mortgage to Mr. Smith of No. 4, the
original proprietor, and retained indeed from year to year with
a diminishing prospect of redemption. That gentleman in fact
threatened an ejectment, and if relief were not soon afforded,
dismemberment and homelessness might at any moment
become
their lot. Pursuant to orders, the next day, Margaret
paid a visit to Master Elliman's to take such instructions as
he felt bound to communicate relative to her new duties. He
gave her to understand that there existed an opposition in the
minds of some of the people to her having the School, but that
he had secured the appointment through Parson Welles, whom
he persuaded to his views. He next advised her as to the
books used in the School. He said the children would read
daily in the Psalter, recite every Saturday morning from the
Primer, and for the matter of the Spelling-book, the only
remaining
channel of elementary instruction, he intimated there
was a question. He made known that he learnt from Fenning's
Universal, which was afterwards supplanted by the New
England
;
that many of the people were clamorous for a change,
which had been effected in most of the towns; that one
wanted
Perry's Only Sure Guide, another Dilworth, a third
Webster's
First Part; and that he and Deacon Hadlock, who
agreed in little else, had hitherto been united in resisting
scholastic
innovations; but the time was come when he supposed
a concession must be made to the wishes of the public.
Compare, said he, the First Part, and the deific
Universal
.
Look at the pictures even. Young Noah, who
propounds
to us his visage in the frontispiece of his book, has
doffed, you see, the wig, and is frizzed, much to the alarm of
your good friend Tony, who declares the introduction of said
book will ruin him. Those super-auricular capillary
appendages
,
hardened with pomatum, to what shall we liken them, or
with what similitude shall we set them forth? They are like
the caves of a Chinese temple; or in the vernacular of your
brother Nimrod, they are like a sheep's tail; yea, verily.  But
by a paradox, id est, by digressing and returning, we will keep
in the straight track. The Deacon, the Parson and the
Master
,
a megalosplanchnotical triad, have recommended Hale's
Spelling Book. Enoch was a pupil of mine, and though grown
sanctiloquent of late, he always knew how to say the right
thing, as his book abundantly declares. Webster, moreover,
advertises us that & is no letter  the goal of every breathless,
whip-fearing, abcdarian's valorous strife, the high-sounding
Amperzand, no letter! Mehercule! You apocopate that from
the alphabet, and Deacon Haddock will apocopate you from
the School; yea, verily. It really signifies and per se, that for
your private edification, Mistress Margaret. Moreover Perry
makes twenty-six vowel sounds, Hale only sixteen; Webster
enumerates nine vowels, Hale five; Hale preponderates in
merit by reduction in number. Too many words, Margaret,
too many words among men. The fewer vocals the better,
as you will certainly know, when you have the children to
instruct
.
In spelling, let the consonant be suffixed to the last
vowel thus, g-i v-e-n, not, g-i-v e-n, given, as they do
now-a-days
.
It is revolutionary and monstrous. Hand me my pipe,
I shall get angry.  And, memor sis, mea discipula, vox populi,
vox dei. You have asked me who God is; you will probably
arrive at that understanding as soon as you desire. Here,
he continued, presenting a heavy ebony ruler, is what serves
to keep up the flammula vitalis in the simulacra hominum.
You will find it a good Anamnetic in the School, and useful
in cases of the Iliac Passion, that the young androids are
subject
to. Let not the words of Martial be fulfilled in you,
`Ferule tristis, sceptra pdagogorum cessant!'
The best Master I wot of is the Swabian who gave his scholars
911,000 canings, with standing on peas, and wearing the fool's
cap in proportion. With my most pious endeavors, I could
never exceed more than ten castigations per diem, one at each
turn of the glass; and that in thirty years that I have borne the
Solomonic function, amounts only to about sixty thousand;
Jove forgive me! Here also is a clepsydra, yclept an
hour-glass
,
for you; and this is the Fool's Cap, which it is hardly
needful to put on in a world like this, but the Committee
will be pleased to see it worn. Lupus pilum mutat, non
mentem
.
Your friend Fenning, interrupted Margaret, I see, writes
thus in his preface. `I must take the freedom to say, that I
am sensible a Rod, a Cane, or Ferula, are of little
signification
;
for I have experienced in regard to Learning itself,
Infants
may be cheated into it, and the more grown-up youth
won by good nature.'
I don't wonder, replied the Master, that Deacon
Hadlock
is confounded at the times, when the scholar presumes to
arraign his tutor! My friend Fenning, peace to his shades, had
a weak side, nor could all the Divine Widow's embrocations
cure him; I mean he was tainted with heresy; he denied the
plenary inspiration of the Bible; not your father's, for of that
there can be no doubt; but that wherein King Solomon
appears
and
this reminds you of the Parson's snuff, which is
truly after a godly sort, kept in godly pockets, and is efficacious
in the illuminating of the understanding of the saintsbut of
these things I do not discourse. It is somewhere said, `Spare
the rod and spoil the child;' this truth carefully concealed in
the holy mysteries, my Friend Fenning most unbecomingly
dared to question.But you are not through with your anagogics
yet. You never saw a Mumming, or Punch and Judy? No
well
17*
While they were speaking, Deacon Ramsdill halted into the
room, with one of those smiles, which, if it ever preceded him
as a shadow, still was the promise of something kind and
good-natured
thereafter. I heer'd what the gal was about, said
he, and I thought I would try, and give her a lift. I am
abroad a good deal, and my woman is getting old and rather
lonesome-like; and we made up our minds if Miss Margery
would come and stay with us, she should have her board and
welcome. Hester Penrose that kept the School last summer, got
her lodgings free, at the Deacon's, and we thought we could
do as much for you. Don't know how you will like us, but
we have found that swine that run at large in the woods make
the sweetest pork, and we are willing to give you a try.
What on arth are you going to do with that piece of board?
If I understand the Master, replied Margaret, he
intends
for me to fence in the scholars with it.
There now, responded the Deacon. I tell you children
have nater, and you can't help it, no more than you can being
a cripple when your hamstrings are cut. When they first
come to school they are just like sheep, you put them into a
new pasture, and they run all over it up and down, shy
round the fence, try to break out, and they won't touch a sprig
of grass, though they are hungry as bears. You send the
youngsters of an arrant, and they climb all the rocks, throw
stones at the horse-sheds, chase the geese, and stop and talk
with all the boys and gals in the way, and more than as likely
as not forget what they have gone upon. We old folk must
keep patience, and remember we did just so once. It's sheer
nater and there's no stoppin on't, no more than a rooster's
crowing
a Sabber-day.Blotches are apt to come out in hot weather,
and you may find the scholars a little
tar
bulent, particularly
about dog-days; but nater must have its course. Don't keep
them too tight. When the tea-kettle biles too hard, my woman
has to take off the cover. 'Twon't do to press it down, it's
agin nater, you see.But, Molly, or Mistress Margaret, as we
shall have to call you, for want of a nail the shoe is lost, as
Poor Richard says; you must mind little things, and see that
matters don't come to loose ends before you know it. Pull up
the weeds, and then throw down some brush for the cucumbers
to fasten to; it's nateral, and they don't get snarled among
themselves. But you understand how to work a garden; well,
it's all nater alike. Ha, ha!
This language, the Master, who perhaps on the principle
that extremes meet, or, what is more likely, that the simple,
hearty pleasantry of the Deacon was always boon company to
his own laughing humor, ever maintained friendly relations
with the latter gentlemanthis language, we say, the Master
suffered to pass without animadversion or rejoinder.
Margaret, thus turned adrift to her own reflections by the
pointed opposition of her friends, thanked them both for their
magnanimous interest in her behalf, took the books and other
pdagogical ensigns, and returned to the Pond. Early the
succeeding Monday, she reported herself at the School-house,
took her seat behind the big desk, and opened with her scholars,
who filed in after her, each one making his bow or her curtesy
as they entered the door; and all with clean bright faces and
barefeet. The boys took their places one side of the room,
and the girls the other. They reckoned about twenty, and
were all under twelve years of age, comprising the buds of the
village population. Among them was little Job Luce, who
recompensed for deformity of body in vivacity of mind, and
combining withal certain singularities of sentiment, could not
fail to recommend himself to the favorable attention of his
Mistress
,
however he stood reputed with the world at large. She
classed her scholars, heard their a's, ab's, acorns, and
abandonments
,
gave them their outs, rapped with the ferule on the
window
to call them inthe only application she made of the
instrument
in questionturned her glass every half hour, enjoyed
the intermission at noon, and at night, if like most teachers,
was as glad as her scholars, to be dismissed. Her dinner this
first day, which she brought from home, she ate at the
School-house
;
a practice which she not unfrequently adopted, since
Deacon Ramsdill's where she had her quarters was some
distance
from the Green,and in this she was joined by many of
her scholars; and she spent the hour cultivating their
acquaintance
,
remarking their manifold novel and diverse evolutions,
moral and physical, and contributing to their pastimeshe
never commanded the intimacy of children before. The
Deacon's
became in fact no more than her nominal abode, since
there were others in the village who regarded her with
kindness
.
Isabel Weeks, whom she had occasionally encountered,
and who even visited her at the Pond, was her staunch friend.
Of Isabel we might say many things, and on Margaret's account,
some amplification perhaps were demanded; but agreeably to
the well used maxim, that times of peace furnish few topics for
the historian, we follow all precedents, and forbear. Isabel
was emphatically a time of peace, she had no contentions,
intrigues
,
or revolutions. She was so quiet and unobtrusive, she
would be set down for an ordinary character. She was just as
common-place and unnoticed as the sun is. She had no veiled
secret like Rose, to tantalize expectation, and stimulate
curiosity
;
she was transparent as the air, and like that element,
was full of refreshment and health, sweet odors and pleasant
sounds. She had always been indulgent of Margaret, and of
the people at the Pond, from her childhood; and perhaps, if
we ascribe to her a portion of that self-love of which so few
are deprived, she found she lost nothing in continuing this
friendship, which indeed had cost her something with her
neighbors. In addition her sister Helen, older by one year,
was one not altogether unlike herself, and Mistress Weeks felt no
other concern about Margaret's coming to her house than that
it forced her to a fresh task of arithmetical action, so that she
frequently passed the night there. The Widow Luce,
grateful
for her attention to the unfortunate Job, was also disposed
to receive Margaret cordially. She sometimes staid at the
Widow Small's, where the Master kept her late in the
evening
employed in a manner that gave him the greatest
possible
gratification, playing back gammon. One day in this first
week, at the close of the School, following her scholars from
the house, who broke forth in noise, freedom and joy, the boys
betaking themselves to their several diversions,
snapping-the-whip
,
skinning-the-cat, racing round the Meeting-house, or
what not, she found herself engaged with a group of girls,
saying,
Intery, mintery, cutery-corn,
Apple seed, and apple thorn;
Wine, brier, limber-lock,
Five geese in a flock,
Sit and sing by a spring,
OUT and in again.
It's the Ma'am's, it's the Ma'am's! shouted the girls, she
must stand; and stand she did, blinded her eyes, counted
a hundred, went in search of the hiders, anticipated their
return
,
and, in fine, went through a regular game of Touch
Goal, with the ardor and precision of her pupils.
Saturday forenoon, she omitted the customary lesson in the
Primer, and on her return home, deliberately reported her
conduct to the Master, and let fall some intimations about not
understanding the Book. Understand the Primer! retorted
he with considerable vehemence. What most people dread,
I am fain to confess I love, lunacy, to be out of one's head.
Didn't you know that you must be out of your head when you
undertook the School. Are not all teachers, preachers,
speakers
,
out of their head? What do they know or pretend to
know of what they froth and jabber about! Ugh! Eidepol! Is
it not all a puppet-show, are we not all wheel-grinders? Are
not Patriots cap wearers and Priests mummers? Wag your
mouth and blink your eyes like most genuine pasteboard when
you come out into the world among folk.Not teach the Primer,
hey? That is the finest part of the whole. You would banish
Harlequin from the play, like some other good moral people!
Go to, go to, you little prude! Lie out in the Moon this and
to-morrow night, and you will be ready to begin your work
again Monday, like any good saint.
With these condolences and ministrations, she continued
her way to the Pond, where she proposed to spend the Sabbath.
Rose came to see her, to whom she recounted the passages of
the week, new and reflective, painful and pleasing. Pluck
nearly split with laughter at what she related of the Master and
the Primer, whereby also Rose was similarly affected, yet not
so naturally as the old man, but like one startled from a dream,
or in whom an imprisoned phantasmal voice breaks out wild
and derisory.
The bell tolls; who is dead? asked Brown Moll, as they
were sitting in the door-way about sunset Sabbath evening,
and the measured melancholy note fell upon their ears, the old
and familiar signal to the town that some spirit had just left
the body. Hold your yop, Gaffer, while I count. So by
keeping pace with the number of strokes she learned the age
of the deceased. Forty one, who is it?
It must be Mrs. Morgridge, said Margaret. I heard
that she was sick, but did not think she was going to die.
Poor little Arthur!
This exclamation over one who was a pupil of hers, was
supported
by no contributions of her friends, and the subject, like
those to whom it owed its rise, died away. The family never
said much about death, whether they feared it and did not wish
their peace disturbed, or were indifferent to it and felt moved
to no words, or were prepared for it and needed no admonitions,
nothing in their manner would leave us the means of
determining
.
Monday she resumed her duties; Tuesday afternoon, she
was advised by the Master that it was expected the school
would be suspended on account of the funeral. She went to
the Judge's, who lived on the North Street, a short distance
from the Green, with her friend Isabel. There was a large
collection of people, many from the remote skirts of the town.
After prayer by Parson Welles, the coffin was taken into the
front yard, and laid on the bier, under the trees. Sunlight and
shadows, fit emblems of the hour, flickered over the scene, not
more breathless, hushed and solemn, than were the voice, step
and heart of the multitude there assembled. The voluminous
velvet pall thrown back, exposed a mahogany coffin, thickly
studded with silver buttons, ornamented with some gilt armorial
tracery, and having the name and age of the deceased on a
silver tablet. The citizens approached one by one to take a
last look of the remains, then sunk away into the silently
revolving
crowd. The mourners presently appeared, and the
people parted in a ring on either side. These also indulged a
tearful, momentary, final vision; the lid was closed, and the
pall folded to its place. On the coffin were then laid six pairs
of white kid gloves, one for each of the pall bearers, and a
black silk scarf, designed for the Clergyman. The bier,
carried
on the shoulders of four young men, was followed by the
relatives, when came the citizens at large, two and two abreast,
forming a long train. The bell began its slow, far-echoing, heavy
toll, and continued to sound till the procession reached the
grave-yard. This spot, chosen and consecrated by the original
colonists, and used for its present purpose more than a
century
,
lay on the South Street, or rather at the junction of the
road to the Mill and that leading to No. 4, and constituted the
crown of the ridge that divided Mill Brook and Kedron. It
was in fact conspicuous both for its elevation and its sterility.
A sandy soil nourished the yellow orchard grass that waved
ghostlike from the mounds, and filled all the intervals and the
paths. No verdure, neither flower, shrub, or tree, contributed
to the agreeableness of the grounds, nor was the bleak
desolation
disturbed by many marks of art. There were two marble
shafts, a table of red sand-stone, several very old headstones of
similar material, and others of a later date made of slate. But
here lay the fathers of the people, and here too they soon must
lie, and it was a place of earnest solemnity to all. Coming to
the grave, the men took off their hats; the four bier men
lowered
the coffin by leathern straps, then each in turn threw
in a shovelful of earth; next Philip Davis the Sexton, taking
the shovel into his own hands, standing at the foot of the grave,
said in form as follows, I will see the rest done in decency
and order. Parson Welles, as the last obsequial act, in the
name of the beneaved family, thanked the people for their
kindness and attention to the dead and the living, and the
procession returned to the house of the Judge. Some lingered
behind to revisit the graves of their friends; Margaret and
Isabel also stayed. It was, as we have intimated, a spot
without
beauty or bloom; like many others in New England; but
in New England affections are green remembrances and
enduring
monuments; tears that mausoleums cannot always
command
,
were freely shed on this dry orchard-grass, and the
purest purposes of life were kindled over these unadorned
graves. The drunken Tapleys from No. 4, moved in a body
to a corner of the lot where four years before was laid their
youngest child, a little daughter, marked by a simple swell of
dry sod scarce a span long, and there at least they were sober.
Margaret alone had no friends there. Isabel took her to the
grave of one of her early companions, Jesselyne Ramsdill,
only child of the Deacon's, an amiable and beautiful girl who
was cut off by that scourge of our climate, consumption, in
her fifteenth year, wasting away, like a calm river, serene
and clear to the last. As objects of curiosity, were the old
monuments, made as we have said of red sand stone, now
grey with moss, bearing death's heads and cherub cheeks
rudely carved, and quaint epitaphs, and the whole both
sinking
into the earth and fading under the effects of time. Alas,
who shall preserve the relics of
these
Old Covenanters!
Again in the same week was she summoned to the
suspension
of her School, to which, from day to day, were her
attachments
increasing. The occasion was this; being one evening
with the Master, he showed her a piece of brown parchment
inscribed with the following words, which he desired her to
translate;
Universis Quorum interest.
Attestamur Bartholomew Elliman in Actis Societatis dict
Masoni ex ordine fuisse inscriptum, &c., the substance of
which being, that he was a worthy member of the Masonic
Lodge of the Rising States. He condescended also to explain
the seal of his watch, a huge cornelian cased in gold,
dangling
from a long gold chain, which had attracted the attention
of her earliest years. He said it was Azure on a chevron
between two castles argent, a pair of compasses somewhat
extended of the first, &c.; and in fine he told her, that as the
Masonic Fraternity were about to perform the ceremony of
consecrating a Hall to their purposes in the village, it would
be quite impossible for the School to keep, and perhaps
altogether
pleasant for her to witness the scene. On the
appointed
day, in company with Isabel, she repaired to the
Green. The procession, numbering nearly two hundred of
the order, out of the whole county, formed from the Crown
and Bowl. It exhibited what has been called a splendid
parade in the gorgeous attire of the men with their
freshly powdered hair, white gloves, aprons and stockings; the
six standards of crimson and gold, blue and silver, flaunting
in the sunbeams; the pictured gradations of office, and the
showy paraphernalia of the mystic institution. She saw
Captain Eliashib Tuck, Grand Tyler, with a drawn sword,
leading the march; then came her friend the Master among
the Worshipful Deacons, with staves; in place were the
Secretaries, Dr. Spoor being of the number; a band of Music
playing Hail Columbia; a corps of Singers; Brothers bearing
a gold pitcher of corn, and silver pitchers containing wine
and oil; four Tylers supporting the Lodge which was
garnished
with white satin, and, so the Master gave her to
understand
,
was the identical Ark of the Covenant, constructed by
Bezaleel, and presented to Moses; the Right Worshipful
Grand Master, Esq. Weeks, who bore the Bible, Square and
Compasses on a crimson velvet cushion; the Chaplain, the
Rev. Mr. Lovers, of Brandon, in his robes. The
uninitiated
were invited to fall into the rear, among whom were
Margaret and Isabel. The Hall, which was the object of this
convocation, covered the second floor of a building recently
put up for town occasions on the east side of the Green.
The door was decorated with emblematical figures, the floor
had a mosaic coloring, heavy curtains of crimson and gold
shaded the windows, on the walls were blazoned sundry
hieroglyphics, the Sun and Moon, a Cock, Coffin, Eye and
Star; in their places were to be seen the implements of the
Order, the plummet, mallet, trowel and an armillary sphere,
and in the centre stood two marble pillars, understood to be
Jachin and Boaz. The procession entered and marched
three times round the room; at the first turn, the Grand
Master, facing the East, said; In the name of Jehovah I
dedicate this Hall to Free Masonry; then he pronounced it
sacred to Virtue, and lastly to Universal Benevolence. A
prayer and anthem succeeded, when an Oration was
pronounced
by the Chaplain. Free Masonry, said the
Reverend
gentleman, is the most perfect and sublime institution
ever devised for conferring happiness on the individual, and
augmenting the general welfare of society. Its fundamental
principles, he continued, are Universal Philanthropy and
Brotherly Love; its pillars are Faith, Hope and Charity; its
embellishments Order and Beauty; its instruments Truth and
Rectitude; its end Virtue and Happiness; Religion is its
Sister, its Creator is God. Its constitution is coeval with
that of the world, from the Divine Architecture of the
Universe
are derived its Symbols, and He who said, Let there be
Light, proclaimed the solemn Dedication of our Order. Free
Masonry, said he, confounds distinctions, and is insensible
to rank; owning a common affiliation of the race, it
distributes
its beneficence to all, and honors the meanest with its
fellowship. It treats none with contempt, and pardons the
imperfections of the weak. The distant Chinese, the rude
Arab, and the accomplished European will embrace an
American, and all sit together at the same table of fraternal
confidence and affection. Unconstrained by local prejudice,
unswerved by the rivalries of party, spurning alike the claims
of sect and the limitations of country, we know no preference
but virtue, no sanctity but truth, in whatever clime, or amid
whatever fluctuations of outward life they may appear. Our
Association relieves misery and shuns revenge. The tears
of Widowhood it wipes away, the pangs of Orphanage it
soothes, and by its hands are the stores of Destitution
replenished
.
It curbs the fury of War, and multiplies the blessings
of Peace. The sign of a brother even in an enemy's camp,
subdues our animosities and sheathes the sword. Nay, it
appeals to the most barbarous heart, and the rude Corsair of
Algiers receives to his bosom the hopeless victim of slavery,
and shelters a Brother Craftsman from the vindictive
cruelties
of his tribe. The Arts behold in our Order a munificent
Patron, and knowledge receives from us a constant support;
in Good Manners we would be patterns, and Piety shall own
us its handworkers.We have been accused, such were
the closing words of his discourse, of conspiring against the
liberties of mankind, it is slanderously reported that we are
leagued with the foes of law and order to demolish the entire
fabric of society. Were Napoleon a Mason, as he is a
Warrior, where he has drenched the earth in blood he would
have strewed it with flowers, for wasted cities would have
arisen Temples to Virtue, for Ministers of Wrath driving
before
them the horror-stricken nations, we should behold Angels
of Mercy keeping watch over their happy homes, our Melodies
would drown the notes of the Clarion, and the race instead of
closing with the ferocity of ensanguined battle, would this day
meet in the embrace of Universal Brotherhood!
18
The speaker took his seat amid great applause; when an
Anthem was sung as follows:
Hail Masonry! thou Craft Divine!
Glory of Earth, from Heaven revealed!
Which dost with jewels precious shine,
From all but Masons' eyes concealed!
A collation was now enjoyed, consisting of fruits, cakes,
and since, on a previous day, at a funeral, spirituous liquors
were freely dispensed, we are only just to the times and to
this festal company, in adding, that wine and brandy formed a
conspicuous part of their entertainment. Three additional
grand marches around the Hall finished the scene; strangers
retired, and the Brotherhood were left to their private affairs.
Shortly after, with Deacon Ramsdill and his wife, and a
large number of villagers, Margaret was invited to an evening
party at Esq. Beach's. This gentleman lived on Grove Street,
in a house of the new style, very large and high, having a
curb roof with dormar windows, eleven windows on either
end, and the lower tier surmounted with carved work. The
parlor was, for the times, elegantly furnished, in a mahogany
side-board garishly bedecked with decanters of brandy and
wine, silver cups and tankard, a knife-case, and having
underneath
a case-of-bottles brass-trimmed; a bright Kidderminster
carpet; light Windsor chairs; a Pembroke table, now
degenerated
into a common dining-table; and, what caught the eye
of our novitiate, more than all, superb hangings. These
represented
the South Sea Islands as conceived by the original
discoverers. The sides of the room opened away in charming
tropical scenery, landscapes and figures; the people, their
costume, habits, sports, houses were brought into panoramic
view, as were also apparent their innocence and simplicity, their
native and rural enjoyments and peace, now, alas, to be seen
no more by those who shall again visit them! These
occupied
Margaret so long that she well nigh trespassed upon the
courtesies of the hour, and Deacon Ramsdill was obliged to
recall her to her fellow-guests. There were dancing,
card-playing
,
much spirit-drinking, and more warm political
talking
,
very warm indeed, so fervid and life-imbued, in fact, as to
engross all things within itself; and Margaret became a
devout listener to what for the instant appeared topics the
most lofty and interests the most momentous; nor could she
be diverted until the Master had thrice trod upon her toes,
and engaged her in a game of backgammon.
The School, in her own estimation, was going on
prosperously
and satisfactorily. Her scholars were ductile and
inquisitive
,
many-phased and many-minded, and their
proficiency
in the Spelling Book was only equalled by their
attachment
to herself. A single instance of discipline sprang from
a rude attack made by one of the larger boys, Consider
Gisborne, on one whose helplessness appealed strongly to the
teacher's sensibilities, Job Luce. She called Consider from
his own bench, and ordered him to sit an hour with the girls
on the opposite side of the house. In enjoyment and fidelity
three weeks were nearly spent.
Yet the original coolness with which the people at large
received her as teacher was fast ripening into positive dissent.
Some boldly proclaimed her unfitness for the station, others
clamored for the restitution of the old teacher, Hester
Penrose
.
Deacon Ramsdill was the first to break to her the no
less surprising than depressing intelligence, and Master
Elliman
confirmed the suspicion that she would be obliged to quit
the School. Parson Welles was considerate enough to suggest
the propriety of an investigation in form prior to any action,
which, however, she would have done well to avoid by a
voluntary
relinquishment of her post; but she was
over-persuaded
by her friend Isabel, one of those who always hope for
the best, and consented to abide an issue. The study of the
Parson was the appointed scene of trial, and that room which
in her girlhood she had surveyed with strong delighted
curiosity
,
was now shaded to her mind beyond the stains of
tabacco-smoke and time on the walls. The great mysterious
books were there which she had importuned the Master to
give her access to, but he put her off on one pretence or
another, and now they seemed about to be forever hidden
from her view. Above all was the reverend presence itself,
the grave person of the Minister, a conflicting union to her
eye, of extremest sacredness and extremest profanity, a sort
of corporeal embodiment of all unreality with which the
lessons of Master Elliman were calculated to fill her mind;
and when she saw him soberly lay aside his pipe and as soberly
put on his glassesthat single act affected her with a twinge
of fright, which was not lessened at all by contact with
Isabel, who sat next her, shaking with awe and alarm. In
addition, rumor of what was afloat having drawn a number of
people to the place, their faces, some frowning, some
sneering
,
some laughing, increased the complexity of her
sensations
.
The nominal charges were reduced to two heads;
first, omitting to use the Primer; and second, harsh and
unreasonable treatment of Consider Gisborne. To this was
appended a supplement that had its full weight, this to wit,
that she did not attend Meeting on the Sabbath, and that she
played with her scholars; and the whole was ridden by the
insinuation that she had shown partiality to the crumple-back,
Job. On these several and various matters she could make
no defence, and she attempted no reply. Her friends, who
would under other circumstances have gladly appeared in her
behalf, felt constrained to abandon the case, and could do no
more than secretly condole with her disappointment.
Touching the unfortunate youth, said the Parson, he
suffereth from that sin which we do all inherit from the Fall.
The compassion which you have exhibited toward him would
be counted a token of gracious affections in the regenerate
mind. But continuing unregenerate, the danger is great that
you will reckon it meritorious, and thus by adding to your
good works, increase the probabilities of your condemnation,
for truly the Bible saith, The sacrifice of the wicked is an
abomination to the Lord. But, he continued, addressing her
with a direct interrogation, will the Mistress wholly deny to
impart the godly instruction contained in the Primer?
I cannot use it, replied Margaret, with a tolerably firm
accent, yet faltering in every muscle.
Therein are to be found, resumed the Parson, the
great truths of evangelical faith and practice.
I know nothing what it means, she added, and I could
never consent to teach it.
Truly, exclaimed he, their eyes are blinded that they
cannot see. What says Master Elliman on the matter?
Yea, verily, replied the Master, as the Lord hardened
the spirit of Sihon, King of Heshbon, and made his heart
obstinate, that he might deliver him into the hand of Israel,
so is it exemplified in what we now behold.
She's a dropt stitch, said one woman, who had been busy
during the proceedings footing a stocking. She has cast her
band if she is a spinner's daughter, was the simultaneous
comment
of another woman. She ought to have put in a
straining
brace before she run her roof so high, observed Mr.
Gisborne the Joiner. She had better learn of her Daddy
how to mend her own ways against she comes down to patch
up our 'n next time, said Mr. Cutts, the Shoemaker. How
hardly have we escaped from the hands of the Philistines!
ejaculated Deacon Hadlock. We have a small account
against you at the Store, some pins and ferret I believe, said
Deacon Penrose, hope you will call and settle before you
leave.
You have lost your title, and we must call you Molly
again, said Deacon Ramsdill, as they left the house; but
you stuck to your pint, and mabby it's as well. I see 'twas
nater, and you couldn't give it up. The Lord knows what'll
come of it, but if you follow nater, he'll take care of you.
There is more in things than we old folk have thought of, and
if you young heads can find it out, for one I shall be glad.
You have eat your crib and broke your halter, but there is a
good deal of feed out of the stable. Fences last the longest
when the logs are peeled; you are pretty well stripped, but I
guess you won't give out any quicker. The children have
nater, and you and they would get along smart enough
together
;
the old people are chock full of their notions and
politicals, and I don't know as you could do better than to let
them alone. I was afraid, at the start, how the matter would
turn. About Consider, he is not a nateral bad boy, only it
went agin the grain to be put among the gals; and he took
on dreadfully, and his people thought he had been most
killed. But it was because
you
did it, Molly, yes because
you
did it; if anybody else had done so, he would not have said a
word; but he liked the new Ma'am, I've heard him say so,
and when you punished him, it broke him right down; that's
nater agin, clear nater. Hester might have thrashed the skin
off his body, and he wouldn't have cried boo. Then you
know, some people's geese are always swans, so we thought
when our little Jessie was alive; yes, yes. God knows how
hard it is to help setting a good deal by one's children.  But,
Molly, you mustn't judge the people too harsh; they are just
like gooseberries, with a tough skin, and sharp pricks, and yet
there is something sweet inside. Remember too, he who can
wait hath what he desires.
Tony, the negro barber and fiddler, who had been hovering
about the Parsonage during the trial with considerable
apparent
concern, and still hung on the steps of the party as they
walked up the street, at length made bold to speak, and asked
Margaret if she would not go to his shop and have her hair
dressed; a request which she answered in the negative.
Your brother Chilion has done great favors to this
gentleman
in the musical profession, continued the negro, and if
the Mistress would let him try the tongs to her head, it would
make great commendations. It an't Tory now, and there isn't
nobody else in the world that I would see suffer if I could
18*
help it, and the Mistress was a most handsomest dancer, and
Chilion tuned my fiddle. Still Margaret declined.
You had better go, said Deacon Ramsdill, it does a
man as much good to do a favor as to get one. Tony has a
feeling heart, and he mabby would serve you when nobody
else would, and will take it hard if you deny him. Isabel will
go with you, and he would like to show you his shop.
The Barber, whose function was no unimportant one to the
villagers, had set off his apartments in a manner for which
such quarters have been famed from time immemorial. The
window shutters that concealed his treasures during the night,
published them in the day, serving for advertising boards,
standing along the front of his shop, whereon appeared a list of
articles he sold, and of services he performed. Within doors
on shelves were displayed sundry of the exquisites of the day.
King Henry's Water, Pink and Rose Hair Powder,
Face Powder instead of Paint, Hemmett's Essence of Pearl
for the Teeth, Paris made Pomatum, Infallible Antidote
for Consumption, Elixir Magnum Vit, etc. etc. On the
walls were large bills, pertaining to the aforesaid articles,
flaming
in color and rhetoric, and closing with a peculiar
observation
,
which, since it is somewhat old, and serves to
distinguish
the times, and some virtuoso might like to have access
to it, we have taken the pains to copy, this to wit;
Beware
of Counterfeits.
Margaret was seated in the tonsorial chair, and throwing off
her bonnet, delivered herself into the hands of the professor.
What a head! exclaimed the negro, what a figure, Miss
Belle, she would make in the great world if she was only well
powdered! I have had Madam Hadlock four hours together
under my hands, when she was fixing for a ball, where I also
had the pleasure to attend her four hours more. After she
joined the Church, I lost that honor. The Sacrament, Miss
Belle, makes bad work with gentlemen of my profession. I
am as the Master says A. B. Android Barberosus, S. T. D.
Societatis Tonsorum Dux, a great man you see, and Parsons,
Judges and Masters, as Master Elliman says, bow down to
me
You hurt me, said Margaret.
Yes, indeed, replied the negro, 'tis a most
fashionable
pain, Runy Shooks will sit it out by the hour.You won't
need a cushion, but a little powder, patent lily, violet, gives
such an etiquette
No, none, said Margaret.
I can't use the tongs, you are all in curls now. What shall
we do, Miss Belle? A roller, toupee  that's all Paris.
What! said Isabel, I thought you didn't belong to the
French party, Tony.
Oh no, I'm all Jacobin, all Federal, all Lumination, only
I an't no dum Tory. The Lady's father was a Tory, wasn't
he? Well, they won't hurt me now. They were good heads,
all of them; I use to get five pounds a year out of Col. Welch's.
Let me comb it up over the top, and bring these back locks in
front? No, no, said Margaret. You shall be welcome
to one of my silver spangled ribbons to tie it with. Let it
be as it is. Ha! ha! who ever heard of a lady's hair being
as it is? That isn't the fashion at all. A lady wouldn't live
out half her days. We use to set it up a foot high; but that
was before the War. The War was very ruinatious to our
profession, and I have heard the York gentlemen say taste had
very much descended since.I an't no Tory, I'm Federal,
Jacobin, Lumination, only if they won't put down the Barbers
so that they can't keep the fashion perfect. I have heard ladies
say they couldn't go to meetin' on the Lord's day or improve
a bit on the sermon because they were not in fashion. We
are a means of grace, as Master Elliman says. So I must
bring this curl here, and this one here, and let them be as
they was. Well, this gentleman declares upon his honor,
Mistress looks as beauteous as the great Queen Ann on the
wall. She will not disprove a little Hungary Water? No.
Thank the Lady Margaret, thank her. No pins, no spangles,
no tye-top, no beads,  Miss Belle so too  well upon my
soul!
Simplicity becomes us best, you know, Tony, said Isabel.
Ma always said those were most adorned who were adorned
the least. So you will not feel bad, I know you won't.
This gentleman D. D. Devil of a Doctor,  for you must
know we use to perform surgery, phlebotomy, and
blood-letting
,
till the other professors came in, and they have well nigh
propelled us,this gentleman, A. B., S. T. D., D. D. see the
toilette every day going down, and expect the great Napoleon
will eat the Barbers all up; but he declares Mistress the most
grandiloquent head in all the country  hope no offence, Miss
Belle.
None at all, replied Isabel; you know we always said
Margery was beautiful, and she is good too, and good folks
will bear to have anything said to them, and not take it as
flattery
,
but only truth, Ma says.
The Barber held a looking-glass to Margaret, and she saw
her hair not essentially affected by the professional endeavor,
still as before parted on the top, and hanging in thick frizettes,
which the operator had done his best to smooth, gloss and
arrange. Tell Master Chilion, said he, as the young ladies
were going, one of my fiddle-strings is broke, and the board
out of order, and he is the only gentleman this side of the Bay
can fix it, as it ought to be done.Do the Mistress take a box
of the Patent Tooth Wash.
Margaret finished out the week with Isabel, and
Saturday
afternoon, left for Mr. Wharfield's, where she was invited
to make a visit, and two of whose children had been under
her tuition. The Quaker lived on the Brandon road half-way
between the Village and No. 4. Turning from the South Street
between Parson Welles and the Burying Ground, she crossed
Mill Brook, and rapidly commenced the ascent into a more
elevated region. On the right, below her, hidden among trees
and shrubbery, flowed the Brook; farther to the north-west
rose the beautiful green-wooded summit of the Pond, with her
favorite Indian's Head towering above all; on her left, by
alternate gentle acclivities and precipitous bluffs, sloped the
long hills away to the skies. A high flat brought her to the
house of her friends who were farmers, and as we say well off
in the world. Where she intended to stop a single night, her
abode was protracted nearly a week. The habits of the family
were simple, their manners quiet, and tastes peculiar. Their
enjoyment seemed to consist in listening to her, they strove to
make her happy by receiving what she had to say, they
watched
her with the interest approaching to awe of those who
beheld in one, what they described as the inner workings of
the spirit, and from whom they looked for some surprising
evolutions. Thus by appliances the most delicate they
contrived
to detain her. Their children were thrown continually
in her way that they might catch the inspiration with which
she seemed to be endowed. She pursued her studies of nature
in the woods, she climbed the loftiest eminences behind the
house,books, if any were to be had, she for the moment
lost all relish for.In these strolls the children were often her
companions, and they told their mother she dug up roots,
examined
flowers, and lay on the grass and looked into the clouds;
that she sometimes explained to them the simple operations of
nature. Troubled at last as her friends imagined with a
desire to go home, they would no longer detain her, and
gratefully dismissed her on her way. If she were depressed
at all by the events of the School, the treatment of the Quakers
was certainly fitted to reassure her; and with whatever
melancholy
she may have first thought of returning home as it were
disgraced from the Village, this was qualified or displaced by
the second thought that it
was
her home, that there were her
best friends and purest pleasuresand she trod on with a firm
step and considerable buoyancy of feeling.
She traversed No. 4, known in her vocabulary as Avernus,
and not inappropriately named. In addition to every aspect of
blight and waste that could conveniently be combined in a
human dwelling place, the geese, those very agreeable articles
in their proper use, but the greatest enemies of road-side
beauty, like the locusts of Egypt, had discriminated and
polled the green grasses, and more delicate flowers, and left
only may-weed, smart-grass and indian-tobacco, shooting up
like living monuments of desolation; an offence for which
they had long since been banished the Pond. Hogs lay
under the cherry-trees by the stone-wall fences, crabbedly
grunting like bull-frogs, muddling the earth and wallowing in
the mire. Leaning well-sweeps creaked in the scant gardens.
She encountered a file of children, with hair thoroughly
whitened and face as thoroughly blackened by the sun,
kicking
before them the dry dust of the road, in clouds. Sheep
with fettered legs wandered from side to side of the way
restless
and forlorn. An overturned wood-sled, lying outside of
a barn-yard fence, and protecting within its bars a collection
of white-flowering catnip, was a solitary point of beauty. A flock
of yellow butterflies, flying before her and lighting on the road,
then flying and lighting again as she advanced, at last whisking
off and forming themselves into a saucy waltz over a black pool
of water, where they were finally dispersed by the incursion of
a pair of blue-spotted dragon-flies, afforded her some diversion.
A pink in a pewter mug standing on the window-sill of one of
the low ragged houses, Mr. Tapley's, she would fain turn aside
to see; a little girl, Dorothy Tapley by name, appeared
awkwardly
enough with her fingers in her mouth, and said it was
hers. Margaret laying hands upon it, asked if she would let
her have it. The girl immediately removed her fingers from
her mouth to her eyes and began to cry. Margaret enquired
what was the matter. Dorothy gave her to understand that
when her little sister Malvina was sick, and Miss Amy with
the Parson came to see her, she wanted a pink which Miss
Amy had pinned on her breast, and that having got possession
of it she would not part with it, but kept it by her, and when
she died held the wilted fragments close in her hand;
whereupon
she, Dorothy, went to the Parsonage and begged of Miss
Amy a root of the same pink which was now growing in the
pewter mug; that she had taken much care of it, and would
on no account let it go. This conversation through the
window
,
Margaret standing without and the girl within, reached
the ears of Mistress Tapley, who was at work in the back
shed cutting up cheese-curd; and brought her into the room.
She, a very greasy looking woman, with chopping knife in
one hand, and a pinch of snuff in the other, confirmed all the
child had said. Margaret told them she was glad they valued
the flower so, and said she would not think of taking it, and
asked for a draught of water. This produced a fresh
demonstration
on the part of these people, the mother averring with
undisguised emotion that they had used their last drinking
utensil for the pink, and that they drank all their rum now
from the bottle; that the gourd was broke, but she should
be welcome to drink as the rest did from the bucket. You
help her, Dorothy; she won't git away your posy; she han't
forgot how much we done for her when she was lost in the
woods. They went through the house into the back shed.
That back shed! cheese-room, dye-room, sink-room, airy,
piazza, hen-roost, cupboard, wardrobe, scullery, with its
soap-barrel
,
pot of soap-grease, a range of shelves filled with rusty
nails, bits of iron hoops, broken trays, hammer, wedges,
chizel; tar-pot, swill-pail, bench, churn, basket of apples,
kittens, chickens, pup, row of earthern milk-pans drying
about ittake it for all in all, we shall never look upon its
like again! At one end was the well, its long sweep piercing
the skies, its bucket swinging to and fro in the wind.
Dorothy
ran and caught the bucket, brought it to Margaret, who
grasping the pole was about to draw it down hand over hand.
She paused to look at what was below her. The mouth of
the well was shaded and narrowed by green mosses and slender
ferns; which also covered the stones quite to the bottom, and
bore on every leaf and point a drop of water from the waste
of the bucket. Below the calm surface of the water appeared
a reversed shaft having its sides begemmed with the
moss-borne
drops, which with a singular effect of darkened brilliancy
shone like diamonds in a cave. Through a small green
subterranean
orifice she could look into nethermost, luminous,
boundless
space; a mysterious ethereal abyss, an unknown realm of
purity and peace
below
the earth, the faintly-revealed inferior
heavens; and too she beheld her own fair but shadowy face,
in the midst of all, looking up to her. Anon a falling drop of
water would ruffle the scene, and then it eddied away into
clearness and repose. Such was the rare vision that detained
her, and made her pause with her hands still grasping the pole.
What are you doing? said Dorothy. I am thinking of
your pink, replied Margaret. I thought I could see Malvina
in the well sometimes, added the girl, but there is nothing
there only some fishes Biah put in last summer. At any
rate there is good water there, and we will see if we can get
some, said Margaret. The bucket was drawn up, and
inclined
dripping on the curb, where Dorothy steadied it, while
Margaret drank. Margaret sat on the long bench to rest
herself
,
and told Dorothy Chilion would make a box for her pink.
Dorothy gave her the better half of a rotten geniton apple,
the best she had, and Mistress Tapley with unwashen hands
hurried into the garden, that is to say a small unenclosed spot
where they raised a few vines, and got a watermelon, and with
the same versatile and economical member, broke it in pieces,
which she divided between Margaret and her daughter. Going
on her way, she passed pastures, and extensive forest-skirted
uplands crimsoned over with the flowering sorrel; and large
fields, planted as it would seem to mulleins like nursery trees
with silvery leaves, rising into tall gold-tipped pinnacles.
She saw bull-thistles, like a phalanx of old Roman soldiers of
whom she had read, suddenly fallen into disorderly mutual
combat
,
piercing one another with sharp malignant spines. The air
of the place tainted as it might appear from the vapors of the
Still, whose fires waited not for mid-summer heats, was yet
sensibly relieved by the sweet-scented vernal grass mingling
with the odors of the new-mown hay, from the meadows or
lots on the margin of the Brook; she saw also women with
blue and brown skirts, naked arms, and straw hats, raking and
turning hay among alders and willows, that yet flourished in
their best mow-lands; ox-carts with rickety racks loaded with
hay, surmounted by stout men and driven by profane boys,
reeled and tilted over rocks and stones which no enterprise of
the people had sufficed to remove. From loads of brakes, a
lazy substitute for grass, that went by, regaling her with a rich
spicy fragrance, she was saluted by the slang and ugly mirth
of the owners. Men and boys were seen going to the Tavern
for their eleven o'clock, and in the sun before the house lay
Mr. Tapley, boosily sleeping, with his bare head pillowed on
a scythe-snath.
She was not sorry to turn into the Delectable Way, a name
by which she had enlivened the road from Avernus to the
Pond; and perhaps on the whole it never seemed to her more
pleasant. She had often traversed it with the rum-bottle, with
baskets of chesnuts, bags of yarn, she had been carried over
it by her brothers, once she was borne up it in the proud arms
of an exulting populace. It was steep, narrow, rough,
winding
.
It had contributed to the elasticity of her muscles and
vigor of her heart. Now it glowed with wild-flowers, which
the lavish fertility of nature pours into every open space. It
was a warm day, and the sunbeams were strongly reflected
from the grey pebbles and glassy grit of the road, but a breeze
from the valley and another in her soul, gave her endurance
and self-possession. She was going home, and this, however
such a home might seem to many of her readers, was, we have
reason to believe, to her a solid consideration; she had been
disappointed in the School, sadly, grievously; her heart was
wrung in a manner that only a School-mistress can know; it
cannot be told. She nevertheless consoled herself with calling to
mind how much her scholars loved her, how kind some of the
villagers had been to her, and she might have decided the
matter
at once by reflecting how utterly impossible it was, all
things taken together, to have stood well with the people at
large; she was encompassed by those subtle and exquisite
ministries of nature that can be enjoyed at every period of life,
and are capable of making themselves felt even by the most
desponding, and which go to mitigate the sense of calamity,
and give transport to our most temperate enjoyments. There
was besides an unnamed, undeveloped feeling in her own
breast, welling and provoking, partly inquisitiveness, partly
wonder, partly logic, partly thoughtfulness, partly she knew
not what, that heightened the interest of all things. This
feeling, we have cause to believe, was allied in character to
what it approximated in moral place, that, to wit, which was
sported between her and the Master as Anagogicalness,
whereby seems to have been intended any or all kinds of
profundity
of uncertainty; seems, we say, for the compiler of this
Memoir professes to know no more of the matter than any of
its readers. On a side of the road was the cow-path winding
among sweet-fern and whortle-berry bushes, where she a little
girl used to walk, and even hide under their shade. The
great red daddocks lay in the green pastures where they had
lain year after year, crumbling away, and sending forth
innumerable
forms of vegetable life. On a large rock grew a
thistle
,
the flower of which a yellow-breeched bee and a
tortoise-shelled
butterfly were quietly together feeding upon. Farther
off, in the edge of a dark green forest twinkled the small
sunflower
,
like a star. She walked on with a bank of beautiful
flowers on either side, golden-rods, blue-vervain, mulleins,
flea-bane, thoroughwort, high-mallows and others, which she
saw come up in the Spring, watched from month to month,
and would yet behold giving food to the little birds on the top
of the snow in mid-winter, and which had become a part of
her yearly life. A thin stream of water emerging from a long
line of fox-colored cotton thistle, sweet-flag, bullrushes and
high blackberries, ran across the road at her feet. The sky
was blue above her, relieved and variegated by mares-tail
clouds, from which some would augur a rain, and over her
left shoulder paled the mid-day moon. Her path in some
places was carpeted with the tassels of the late flowering
chesnut
.
A pig in a yoke started out from the bushes, scampered
before her as for dear life, its ears shaking like poplar leaves,
and dashed out of sight into the bushes again. The birds had
finished their spring melodies, and gave themselves up to the
quiet enjoyment of the season they so delightfully introduced,
and were no otherwise observable than in an occasional rustle
among the trees. She made a nose-gay for Chilion of yellow
loose-strife, purple spearmint, pale blue monkey flower, small
white buds of cow-wheat; and a smaller one for Rose, a stem
of mountain laurel leaves, red cedar with blueberries, and a
bunch of the white hard-hack, a cream-like flower, innerly
blushing. While thus employed, there appeared before her
a gentleman descending the hill, who seemed to have just
issued from the trees, and whom she fancied she had seen
retreating
within doors at the Tavern, as she came by, and who,
if it were so, must have hastened across through the woods
while she loitered in the road. The face of this gentleman
was strikingly marked by a suit of enormous black whiskers
that flowed together and united under his chin. His age
might have been four-and-twenty; his eye was black and
piercing, but softened by an affectionate expression; his look
was animated, and a courteous smile played upon his lip. His
dress was more elegant than that of the young men of
Livingston
,
a scarlet coat delicately embroidered with buff facings,
a richly tambored waistcoat, lace ruffles, white silk breeches
and stockings, and a round brimmed hat. He addressed her
with deference and urbanity, and asked if he might have the
pleasure of accompanying her up the hill. I am rambling
about the country, said he, and pursue whatever is novel
19
and interesting, and hope my presence, Madam, will not
disoblige
you? This is an exceedingly bleak place, and I should
think you would sometimes lack for variety. It is a very
beautiful spot to me, she replied, and Ah yes, indeed,
said he, I did not mean that it was not beautiful, only there
are so few people here,yet perhaps you are one who has the
singular felicity of being contented almost anywhere.A
boquet
!
There is a rare profusion of flowers here. The
atmosphere
is so fresh and vivifying. Most charming day this.
So they talked of the weather, the season, the place, till they
reached the summit of the road. Before they came in sight
of the house, the gentleman suddenly stopping, said, Might
I venture to hope, Madam, if in my rural strolls I should
chance again to encounter you, it would not be disagreeable?
What is your name, sir? said she. I amAnonymous,
Mr. Anonymous;does not that savor more of the romantic,
of which I see you are passionately fond? All wind-fall
comers here seem to be without names, said she; but there
is really so little in a name, that I do not care much about it.
Are there other strangers besides myself here? he asked.
Yes, she replied, we have one who would be anonymous
at first, but she allows herself to be called Rose now, though
she is so frail she can hardly support any name. Rose,
Rose, rejoined he with a repetition, that is a very pretty
name indeed. Politely bidding her good morning, he went
down the hill.
Margaret hastened home to recount her misfortunes,
intelligence
of which must have preceded her, and enjoy the
commiseration
of her friends. Bull with Dick on his back, whom
Chilion
,
seeing her come, had seated there, ran out to meet her,
the only member of the family who did not know what had
befallen
her, and whose expression of unmingled delight gave her
a momentary deep pain in the way of contrast, and yet in the
end tended to reassure her and bring her back to her former
state. After dinner she went to the Widow Wright's to see
Rose, whom, unfortunately, she found plunged in the deepest
melancholy, and the more distressing for that it could render
no reason for itself. Margaret strove by every effort that
instinct
or ingenuity could suggest to compose her friend, but in
vain. She remained awhile, but found her own tenderness
fully reciprocated, that Rose was pained because she was
pained, that she increased what she endeavored to dispel, and
thus without the possibility of gaining intelligence or affording
relief, she could do more than embrace her friend and go
home. For a solitary moment she might have seen a look of
returning equanimity in the face of Rose; this was when she
spoke of her own defeatures and repulsions respecting the
School, but it soon vanished.
Shortly afterwards, as she was occupied one morning with a
book in the shade of the woods near the Delectable Way, she
was aroused by the arrival of Mr. Anonymous. Have you
read Cynthia? said he, after concluding the compliments of
the hour. I saw it at the village, the other day, she replied.
It is a charming novel, said he. I do not know as I am
capable of understanding it, she rejoined. I mean it is a
delightful thing to toss off a dull hour with. Are you never
afflicted with any such? Not often. Are no dangers
to be apprehended in a place like this? I never have any
fears. I see you know how to diversify your time. As you
would walk, Madam, let me assist you. Allow me to remove
that bit of brush from your path. I thank you, Sir, I never
mind the trees. I am tempted to help you over that rock.
These rocks are no more formidable than our kitchen
door-sill
.
How rich these woods are in flowers! Indeed
they are. The most beautiful are not the most esteemed.
I fear they are not. With great justice the Poet writes,
`Full many a flower is born to blush unseen!'
That is well said. I find new ones every Spring, and
there are many yet hidden in the dark store-house of the earth.
So talked they awhile, when he again took an abrupt but civil
departure, acting it would appear on the principle that short
visits make long friends.
Margaret was obedient to her parents and faithful to the
house, so that she was allowed many indulgences, the chief of
which consisted in leisure for her own pursuits. She rose
early, did her work with spirit, and her enjoyments were
marred by few complaints of her mother, and little domineering
of Hash. A peculiarity of fog-scenery as observed from the
Head, a phenomenon in its perfect characteristics occurring
only two or three times a year, took her to that point. The
fogs arising from the River lay wholly below her; like a
flocculent ocean they filled the interval between the Pond and
the Mountain beyond. Above was a clear atmosphere and a
bright sun. As if an entire firmament of purest white clouds
had fallen into the valley, they were piled one upon another.
Like sea-waves they were moved by the winds, dilating
and quivering they flowed the high grounds of the Pond,
swept around the base of the Head, and penetrated the region
beyond. They were an organic lustre, sublimated wool,
spiritualized alabaster; they glowed like snow-flames. It was
in fact to summer what snow is to winter, a robe of whiteness
thrown over the face of the earth. It was not often she could
look down
upon the fogs with the pure dry air about her. She
had been
in
them, sailing on the Pond, or traversing the woods,
when they seemed to fall from the sky, and drizzled rain-like
over the earth; now she was over them, and could command
all their beautiful varieties and forms. Higher and higher
they rose till only the top of the Butternut, and the peak of the
tall forest was visible above them. She fancied that the visions
of her dreams were composed of fogs, and she thought she saw
fair shapes of Ideal Beauty as it were
precipitated
in them,
chemically, and becoming animated, like the Beautiful Lady.
A new Venus, of whom she had read, was indeed sprung from
this foam; and she looked when she should swim for the
Butternut, as for a green island, and she would run down and
embrace her; at the same moment, a great black crow flew up
from the depths of the white waves, a true make-shift for
Vulcan. But a more substantial apparition opposed itself to
her view. At the west edge of the platform, or level on which
she stood, arose an enormous pair of black whiskers, speedily
followed by the well dressed young gentleman to whom they
belonged, Mr. Anonymous, who, for some reason
unexplained
,
perhaps because it savored more of the romantic of which
he was an admirer, had chosen a very unusual and almost
inaccessible
route to the summit of the Head, immediately
apologized for his intrusion, and hoped he had not disturbed
the tenor of the young lady's reveries. I cannot be disturbed
by one who enjoys the scene, replied Margaret. The fog is
really uncivil, added Mr. Anonymous, it has quite drenched
me. If it would clear away I think there would be afforded a
very charming prospect. I wonder I had not sought it out
before. Yet the view which the place itself affords, Madam,
is unimpaired, and would richly repay clambering up a much
rougher way. I fear you must have fatigued yourself,
said she, you missed the path which is on the other side.
It matters little how I came, since I am well here, and in
the presence of so fair an object. You will join with me
in the contemplation of what is about us. Perhaps, Sir, you
can aid me in resolving the exceeding mystery of all these
things. I should be most felicitated to join you in
anything
.
That beauty and our beauty, how are they related?
I see your beauty, and I scarcely think of that. But
there is a connexion, I feel it. The beauty that is in me either
gives, or is given. Or there is some cause that creates both,
and unites them like musical chords. Your beauty, most
enchanting lady, since you lead me to speak of it, consists in
symmetry and color, those eyebrows, your forehead, your lips,
that dark curling hair; it brings me near to you. Nay, pardon
my presumption. Do look at that pile swimming through
the mass, like a great white hog! Nay, Loveliest! I can
look only at you. Then I will go away; there is enough
besides to look at. Beauteous being! do not leave me.
Do not shun the person of one who adores you. Adores
me! I hardly know what to make of that. I kneel at your
feet, sweet Madam, allow me to take your hand. My hand!
more mystery still. What is there in my hand? May I
be so presumptuous as to believe that with your hand you
would also bestow your heart? I have no heart. Have
I vainly cherished the hope that my person had made some
impression upon you? What, your fine clothes? Oh,
you will not trifle with me. Your manner has been such as
to inspire the hope that my feelings toward you were
reciprocated
.
I would not trifle with you. I thought you better
dressed than the young men hereabouts. But do see how the
Mountain shines in its coat of fog! Be not so severe; do
not retreat from me; render some condescension to my poor
plaints. I know not what you desire. Yourself, Madam,
is the supremest object of my wishes. Allow me to press your
fingers to my lips. I cannot stay here, Sir, I shall leap off
into the Pond. O, fairest of creatures, be not so cruel.
Blame me not if I reveal I love you, never before unfortunate
if you prove pitiless, never before happy if you prove kind.
See, the mists are fast rising, we shall be thoroughly wet, if
we stay much longer. Dissipate, Madam, the distressing
apprehensions your words create. My purposes are legitimate,
I offer you marriage, I offer you a fortune. Our banns shall
be published in the neighboring Church the next Sabbath.
I must own, Sir, you do sadly disturb me now. Your
presence
is becoming an intrusion. You will slip from the
rock, you will fall into those hideous waters. Beautiful
waters, and I could almost wish to drop through the
snow-drifting
mist into them. I will not approach you nearer; I
will abide at a distance, till you say the dear, dear word that
shall make me happy. Do not be afraid of me. I would
make the birds and toads happy, and everything about me.
19*
I protest my designs are honorable as my sentiments are
invincible. Consider what I shall bestow upon you. At this
crisis, our old friend Obed appeared, brustling his stalwart
knobby frame through the bushes, and being somewhat short
of sight, a defect that was aggravated by the dense fog-flood
that now surged over the place, he wholly mistook the nature
of the scene; saw Margaret, as he thought, driven to the verge
of the precipice by the violence of the man, whose fervid
exclamations
he had confounded with demonstrations of a more
fatal character, rushed upon him from behind, and perfectly
trussed him in his long arms. In the struggle that ensued,
both fell and rolled down the hill, performing a kind of
horizontal
waltz, through briars, over rocks, quite to the bottom.
Margaret screamed to Obed to quit his hold, ran after them,
but in vain; they finished the descent before she could overtake
them. The face of Mr. Anonymous was not a little bruised
and his dress soiled; Obed defended by so good a buckler
escaped nearly unhurt. Pluck and his wife ran out at the
alarm, Margaret proffered the unfortunate gentleman every
assistance in her power; but as if disposed to withdraw from
observation, he made a very rapid retreat, forgetting even his
customary civilities in the hurry of departure, and was seen no
more at the Pond.
CHAPTER II.
MARGARET.MR. EVELYN.CHRIST.
We
would come nearer to Margaret; we have kept too far
from her. What she denied to Mr. Anonymous, she will grant
to her readers, who, as a parent, have watched about her from
her babyhood,a more intimate approximation. And if what
Isabel said be true, that she could bear the truth, she can
certainly
bear to be looked at, a distinction not mortifying to most
young ladies. She denied that she had a heart; has she any?
If she has none, unlike most young ladies, in another respect
also she differs from many of her sex and age, she can make
good butter, which she did this very morning, churning it in
the cool dawn, working it out, salting it, and depositing it in a
cellar which, if it possessed no other merit, boasted this at
least, that it was cold and free of flies. It has been intimated,
and may come up again for affirmation, that Margaret was
brought up on bread and cider and bean-porridge. This,
however
,
must not be taken too literally. The facts in the case
are these, sometimes the family kept a cow, and sometimes
they did not. But, to our purpose. This morning, after
churning and breakfast, she went out to a favorite spot, a little
below the house, on the Delectable Way, lying in the shade of
the eastern forest. If Bull followed, it was rather from habit
than necessity, since she was wont to go where she listed,
unattended
,
relying chiefly upon a pair of pretty strong arms, and
whatever defence against danger is to be found in not fearing
it. It is here, precisely in this morning retreat that weby
we is meant her readerspropose to look at her. The place
she has chosen, characterized chiefly by forest association and
aspect, opens to the south, where are visible the Avernian hills,
and to the zenith, where is the everlasting sky. What of
sound she perceives, comes from the solitary crowing of a cock
in some distant hidden farm-yard, and the barking of a fox in
the deep lonely woods. She has also near her what might pass
for a music-box, in a bed of yellow brakes, inhabited by
innumerable
crickets and grasshoppers, that keep up a perpetual
tuneful murmur, alternating like waves of the sea, or the wind
in a pine-tree. She holds in her hand a book, or rather her
arm lying on the ground the book lies there too, closed on her
fore-finger. The book, we shall see, is an old one, so very old
that its leathern back has changed into a polished mahogany
hue; it is in Latin, and the title anglicised reads, The
Marrow
of Theology, by William Ames, a Dutchman. Not far
off down the hill, in a pasture of large white rocks and tall
star-flowering elecampane, are very contentedly feeding two
red cows. Whether she
saw
these or not, she looked at them,
and now her eye is directed upwards. What we see in the
sky is a group of clouds, massive and dense, with white tops,
dark cavernous sides, and broad bases deepening into a blueish
leaden color, and having their summits disposed as it were
about a common centre, thus forming a circular opening,
through which appear the boundless aerial fields of fairest
ultramarine. These peaks are like chalk-cliffs girding the
ocean, on which one would stand to look off into the sky-sea.
If we examine her eyes, those organs by which she
communicates
with the exterior world, and through which whatever
belongs to the inner sanctuary of her mind more readily
manifests
itself, we shall discover that they have changed since her
Childhood.
Then
, those eyes perceived with briskness and
disposed of their objects with ease. The external world made
a rapid transition through them, enlivened and graced her
spirit, and then returned; and since material substances are
by this process transmuted into moral emotions, and the nerves
of the face are sympathetic throughout, a beautiful flower for
example, borne in on the optic nerve, would come out an
irradiation of joy generously spread over the whole
countenance
.
Now
, a world has been created
in
her eyes; outward
objects no longer pass immediately through, but are caught
and detained, as it would seem, for inquisition. Some are
seen to sink with a sullen plunge into the dark waters of her
soul; some she seizes upon and throws out among the waste
things of the earth; others again get in by stealth, creep round
upon her nerves, come out and sit under the edge of her face,
and play their old pranks of beauty and joy; anon some fair
large object, that she suffers to pass, floods her spirit and
drowns out everything else; a full proportion of these objects,
it would appear, are assigned to the region of the Anagogical.
We cannot say that she is sicklied o'er with the pale cast of
thought, yet her expression is subdued if it be not positively
sober, there is a mixed look of fervid aspiration and annoying
uncertainty about her. The clouds have shifted their places
and forms, the cows are quietly feeding, and she betakes
herself
to her reading. She is interrupted by the echoing click
of iron horse-steps on the stones of the Delectable Way; the
cows look up, and so does she. Strangers in Livingston
frequently
visited the Pond to survey the scene from Indian's
Head; they went up and down taking little notice of the
inhabitants
,
and with extreme consideration avoided laying upon
them the slightest burden of civility or attention; and
Margaret
,
accustomed to these transient manners, would have
suffered the present to pass as an ordinary instance, save that,
with a stranger man on horseback, she saw little Job Luce
little he was though older than when she first knew himon
the pommel of the saddle in the arms of the rider; and when
they were over against her in the road, Job caused the man to
stop. That's it, said Job, that's the Pond. I don't
see any water, replied the man, nothing but a rock and a
woman. That's Margery, reiterated the boy, and that
is where she sits, and I find her there 'most always. Is she
the Pond? asked his respondent. She had always rather
be in the woods than in the house, continued Job, she pricks
flowers into her bonnet instead of ribbons, and likes to hear
the birds sing Sundays better than Zenas Joy, the new
chorister.
Meanwhile, Job lowered from the horse stood holding by
the snaffle, and insisting that the gentleman should dismount
likewise. His manifest anxiety brought Margaret also to the
spot. That is Margery, do stop and see herhere, Margery,
is a billet from Isabel.
I overtook this little fellow on the way, said the young
man, for such it proved to be, and as he seemed but a sorry
traveller, I thought my horse could better do that office for
him.
Do stop and see Margaret, and I guess she will go with
you up the Head, you have been so good to me, said Job,
with renewed earnestness.
Won't you stop, Sir? said Margaret. The young man
thus importuned left his horse among the trees, and walked
with Job and Margaret to the spot occupied by the latter.
Since you have been so fairly introduced, said he,
addressing
Margaret, I ought to make myself known, Charles
EvelynJudge Morgridge is my uncleperhaps you are
acquainted
with his daughter Susan?
I am not, replied Margaret, but I have heard my friend
Isabel Weeks speak of her. This is Job Luce, Mr. Evelyn,
one among the very few friends of whom I can boast in the
village.
He seems very much attached to you, rejoined Mr.
Evelyn, to walk so far, with his feebleness, to see you. He
said there was some one at the Pond who knew almost every
thing and loved him very much.
I do love Job, poor boy, he has but few to love him, and
his love for me produces a cyanosis, as Mr. Elliman, my old
Master, says, whereby we do not see things clearly, and so he
thinks very highly of me, as I know I do of him.
She knows Whippoorwill, said Job, and that is more
than the Parson does, if she don't go to Meeting.
I know nothing, replied Margaret.
Have you no home, no father or mother? asked Mr.
Evelyn. Do you live in these woods?
There is our house behind the trees yonder, said
Margaret
;
there are my father and mother; there is my brother
Chilion; I have books, a squirrel, a dog, flowers, a boat; the
trees, the water, the birds all are mine, only I do not
understand
all.
The Master, interposed Job, said she understood Latin
as well as Hancock Welles who has gone to College.
Yes indeed, rejoined Margaret, smiling, I can say as
he did once, when pursuing me in the woods he was
over-taken
by a bear, `Veni, vidi, victa sum.' I am lost in my
gains; every acquisition I make conquers me.
The vici, replied Mr. Evelyn, is a rare attainment. It
is easier to know than to be masters of our knowledge;I
see from your book you are exploring an abstruse subject
through what some would regard an abstruse medium.
Theology
is not always rendered plainer for being put in plain
English. Do you find it cleared up in Latin?
My Teacher, answered Margaret, says Latin is the
tongue of the learned; and so, most curiously, to convict me
for a fool as it would seem, he commends me to my studies
in it. I asked him some questions, and he gave me this book,
but not so much in the way of a reply, I ween, as a repulse.
I can construe the sentences, distinguish the supine in u;
but, the ideasgramercy! I had as lief encounter a troop of
bull-beggars, or undertake to explain the secrets of the
nostrummonger
that lives above us. I am caught by my own
fish, as brother Nimrod says, and dragged into an element
where I pant and flounder as any strange creature would in
ours.
Mammy says, exclaimed Job, it is because Margery is
proud, has a natural heart, and won't bend her will down, and
so she lost the School. But she isn't proud to me; she used to
lead me home all the way from school. Hester Penrose, the
other Ma'am, never would touch me or speak to me out of
school; and when we were there, she only spoke hard to me,
and whipped me, because I caught the grasshoppers that flew
in, and stopped to hear whippoorwillI could hear it in the
windows. She wouldn't give me a ticket either, for all I got
my lessons wellArthur Morgridge said I got them better
than he, and he had a ticket.
Your mother, Job, said Margaret, and Deacon
Ramsdill
don't agree; he applauds me for having a nateral heart, as
he calls it, and says he hopes my will never'll be broke; he
says a man with a broken will is no better than a slunk calf.
But, of what we were speaking, Mr. Evelyn, are you familiar
with these ideas, these things, these what-nots? Or are you,
like all the rest, only a dainty, white handkerchief sort of a
traveller among the hills?
I have dabbled a little in a good many matters, replied
the young gentleman, and if there be any points that trouble
you, more than as likely as not it will be found our troubles
are not dissimilar, only it sometimes results that difficulties of
this sort once fairly stated are dispelled; the attempt to give
them form annihilates themthey pass away in the breath that
pronounces them.
A fine prospect, indeed! responded Margaret. I shall
be able to discharge the Universe at a whiff! But soberly,
here is the source of all my perplexity, a quid and a quis.
The book, as you see, discusses without satisfying the case.
It is `Quid sit Deus,' or `Quis sit Deus,' what is God, or,
who is God. He, that is the Master, says I did not put the
question right, at first, and, nulla vestigia retrorsum, I have
been going wrong ever since. We have quis'd and quid'd
it together, till my brain whirls and my mind aches. Who is
God? I will ask. `Do you intend,' he replies, `entity or
form? If the former, then you should say, What is God; if
the latter, then your language is correct. Language has its
rules as well as that whereto it applies. Informal language
on formal subjects is altogether contrary to Logic.' Good
Heavens! say I, I don't know which I mean. `Then do not
talk until you know what you are talking about; let us finish
this game of backgammon.' To complete my distress he has
given me this book! There is one pretty thing in it, the
little boy with a girlish face in the frontispiece. He is
holding
up a big book
before
the door of some temple. Would
the
book
would remove, then we could enter the mysterious
place. Alack-a-day! `Where there's a secret there must be
something wrong,' good Deacon Ramsdill says, and I believe
it.
Look here, said Mr. Evelyn, Father Ames touches
fairly on these topics. `
Quid
sit Deus, nemo potest perfecte
definire,'
what
God is we cannot perfectly define; but `
Quis
sit explicant,' who he is his attributes sufficiently make
known.
Read another page, said Margaret, `I Tim. vi. 16,
Lucem habitans inaccessam, &c.' What is referred to there
seems very mystified indeed. The only Tim that I am
acquainted
with is our neighbor's horse.
Don't speak soyou astonish me. That, said Mr.
Evelyn, is language addressed by the Apostle Paul to a
young man whose name was Timothy. `God dwelleth in the
light which no man can approach unto.'
I did not intend any harm, replied Margaret. I had
no idea there was any feeling in the matter. The Master and
the Parson are always bringing in some name, Aristotle,
Moses, Scotus, Paul or somebody, whom they make responsible
for what they say, and commit themselves to nothing,
laughing
and smoking in the mean time. They are both as `
amfractuous'
as he says I am, and as `anagogical' as our little
friend Job.
I don't know what that means, said the boy, but I do
know Whippoorwill, and that I shall die of it. But Margery
don't believe the Parson, and she won't read the Bible.
My troth! exclaimed the young man. There are
more things in heaven and earth than are dreamed of in my
philosophy, and more in Livingston than I had imagined.
Did you never read the Bible?
No, replied Margaret. The Master has endeavored
that I should never see one, and the first book he put into my
hand when I asked him about God was Tooke's Pantheon.
There was a great book marked Holy Bible on the outside at
Deacon Ramsdill's; there were some singular pictures in it,
and some singular reading, but not of a nature to tempt me
to look far into it. Only I remember laughing outright when
I came to something just like what Pa calls his Bible, and the
good Deacon took the book away. Pa's Bible is some leaves
of a book hanging by a string on the chimney, and consists of
names beginning with Adam and ending with Duke Magdiel,
and he always uses it he says when he christens his children.
It is suspended, also, you must know, directly over his
rumbottle
,
and he says he reads his Bible when he drinks his rum.
That is our Bible.
Mammy gave you a Testament once, said Job.
The Master took it away, replied Margaret. He said
I was not old enough to understand it, or something of that
sort.
She doesn't go to Meeting either, added Job.
Do you not indeed? asked the young man.
It is not quite true that I never go, said Margaret.
I have been to a Camp Meeting and Parson Welles's
Meeting.
Only once, said Job.
I could hardly wish to go a second time. Everything was
turned topsy-turvy; flowers became an abomination; for
walking
the streets one was liable to be knocked down; people had
on gay dresses and sepulchral faces; no one smiled; the very
air of the Green grew thick and suffocating; sin lurked in
every spot, and I couldn't do anything but it was a sin; the
most beautiful and pleasant parts of my life became a sudden
wickedness; the day was cursed, and I was cursed, and all
things were cursed. I was glad to get out of it, and escape
to the Pond once more, and breathe in brightness and love
from our own skies. No, we never go here; Pa was put in
the stocks for hunting his cow one Sabbath, and he swears we
shall not go. I frighten you, Sir, and you will have me put in
Jail right off?
If I am frightened, said the young man, I can hear all
you have to say, and would much prefer you should not
interrupt
yourself.
I was young then, and these are old impressions which
have grown perhaps somewhat sour by keeping, and I might
not feel just so now. At the Camp Meetinghave you ever
been to one? Well, I need not recount that. The Preacher
I never could forgive, only he was so kind to me when I was
lost in the woods. That was the pink of what the Master
calls Puppetry, a hornet's nest of Harlequins, Saints
bacchantizing
.
When I told the Master of some of my accidents on
these holy occasions, for in one instance I liked to have been
sent to Jail, and in another, to have been crushed to death,
`Ne sutor ultra crepidam,' said he, `you are a shoemaker's
daughter; mind your own business, and stay at home next
time;' so I did. Nimrod once took me to an Ordination at
Dunwich, where the Leech, who contrives to be everywhere,
accompanied us. It was more like training-day than anything
else. The town was full of people and soaking in rum. At
the Church I was wedged in an impassible drift, but managed
somehow to crawl out like a stream of water through their
legs and feet. The Widow found means to introduce herself
and me with her to the dining-hall. Such things were enacted
there as would not disgrace the bar-room at No. 4. Pa when
he is drunk has far better manners than those sanctiloquent
Wigs exhibited. It was altogether the richest specimen of
`deific temulency,' you ever beheld. The side-boards were
emptied half a dozen times, tobacco-smoke choked the air,
and to finish the play one grey old Punch with inimitable
gravity said grace at the close. The exercises of the day
were rounded off by a Ball in the evening, and that was the
best of the whole, save that the ministers were not there to
give the occasion the zest of their jokes and laughterI
supposed
at the time they were in a state of aquaclestification,
and could not dance. But Oh! Oh! Oh! Job, dear Job, I
20
love you, Job! Why do I, a poorer wretch, speak of these
poor things!
This exclamation was followed by tears that fell
drenchingly
and hot on the face of the boy whom she clasped in her
arms. Job turned up his mild blue eye to her and said,
Margaret, Whippoorwill sings, and Job don't cry; I swing
over the brook when the boys teaze me, and the bubbles take
away the pain; I hear a pewee in the woods, Margaret, that
sings when the whippoorwill is gone. I love you too,
Margaret
,
and Job's love is good, the little Mabel says. If there
were no innocent hearts, there would be no white roses, Isabel
says.
There were two birds sat upon a stone
Fa, la, la, la, lal, de,
Margaret began, saying, come Job, sing too, and they
both sung,
One flew away, and then there was one,
Fa, la, la, la, lal, de;
The other flew after, then there was none,
Fa, la, la, la, lal, de;
And so the poor stone was left all alone,
Fa, la, la, la, lal, de.
Now, Job, she said, we will go and get comfrey root
for Chilion's drink, and burdock leaves for drafts to draw
out all pains. We shall detain the gentleman.
The detention is rather on my part, said Mr. Evelyn.
Yet I am truly unwilling to have you go.
I shall only offend you if I stay, said she.
I have learned, he replied, never to be offended with
any human being.
Then you are the strangest of all human beings, though
I agree with you, and find myself small place for offence
Androides furentes create a sensation of the ridiculous more
than anything else.
You seem, continued he, to be sincere, however
mistaken
;
and I am not a little interested in what you say.
Are
you
sincere? she asked. Are you not
simulacrizing
?
Yet, I wrong you, Sir, I wrong myself. It confesses
itself within me, that you are in earnest.
That is Whippoorwill, said Job.
It is the voice of nature, said the young man.
I am not, added Margaret, so brook-like as I used to
be, when neither rock nor night, inundation or ultimate
disemboguement
disturbed my little joyous babble. The
beauties
and sweetnesses, the freedom and health that surround me
do not so perfectly satisfy me. I have not much of the `
acquiescentia
cordis' of which Father Ames speaks. My
squirrel, Dick, has been rolling about his cage these many
years, and is contented with it as ever. I, forsooth, must
explore the cupboard whence my food comes, dig into the
well-head whence my water flows, anatomatize the hand that
caresses me. There seems to be something
above
the people
in the village, something over their heads, what they talk to,
and seem to be visited by occasionally, particularly Sundays,
making them solemn and stiff like a cold wind. Is it God?
What is God? Who is God? Heigh ho hum  let me not ask
that question. Is it Jupiter or Ammon? Is it a star? Or is
it something in the state of the weather? Going to Meeting
Sundays, the Master calls a septenary ague universal in these
countries. Yet the matter is deep and penetrating as it is
anagogical.
Why do you not speak with the people, said Mr. Evelyn,
and discover the nature of their emotions and thoughts?
My sooth! I had rather lie here on the grass and read the
Medulla, dig roots, card and spin, clean dye-tubs, pick geese,
draw chickens, or even go for rumanything, anything. Vox
populi vox Dei, he says, but it must have a very strange voice.
The hygeian gibberish of the Leech is not half so bad; nor
that stupendous word, honorificability, he used to make me
spell, half so unintelligible. It all runs of sins and sinners,
the fall and recovery, justification and election, trinity and
depravity, hell and damnationthey have an idiosyncrasy of
phrases, just as the Free-Masons have, and Tony the Barber
and Joyce Dooly the Fortune-teller have; then there are
experiences
and exercises, ah's and oh's, sighs and laments, as
if we were about to be burned upand indeed they say we
are, at least our family; and Pa laughs so about it all, and the
Master while he seems to join in with it, only turns it to
ridicule. Isabel says she is growing tired of it, though she is
not apt to complain of anything, and has already been
admonished
against keeping company with the wicked Indian, as
they call me. She says that those they call sinners are some
of the best people in the world, that theological distinctions
do not conform to anything that exists in nature. The Master
says that piety is the art of concealing one's original
character
,
and that church-members are those who have attained
the greatest proficiency in that art. But let me hear what
you would say. I have `polylogized' quite long enough. Are
you a student for the `sacred ministry,' a class of young
men in whose behalf the Dutchman says he has prepared his
Marrow?
No, I am not. But the subjects to which you refer
possess a value that engages all professions and all minds. I
have a Bible in my pocket, or a part of one.
What! Are you bibbleous too?
Bibliopalous, you mean.
No, bibbleous. When one comes to our house with a
flask of Old Holland, or a bottle of rum, we say he is
bibbleous
,
and has a bible in his pocket. Pardon me. I am
unbridled
as the winds. You seem to be drawing upon me, and
I give way here within, till every, the most transient, feeling
escapes.
I know what it is to become the sport of impulses, and
will not condemn you for that.
Speak, Sir, and I will listen quietly. I can trim myself to
patience when it is necessary.
You have heard of the Saviour of the world, Jesus
Christ?
Yes, till I am sick of the name. It sounds mawkish in
my ears.
You do shock me now, said Mr. Evelyn with some
feeling
.
You cause me grief and astonishment.
I pray you have mercy upon me, Sir! What have I
done? Your look frightens
me
.
That you should speak so of him who to my soul is most
precious.
I am sorry to have distressed you.
You have distressed one who is dearer to me than my own
life.
Speak that name again.
Jesus Christ.
What, my own Beautiful One? Christyesthat is his
name. I had almost forgotten it. I have thought only of
him
. The name is associated with whatever is distasteful in
the world. It is Christ, Jesus Christ. Is he not beautiful?
He is described as fairer than the sons of men.
And you, Sir, know him and love him, and your
innermost
sense is alive to him? You are the first one who ever
showed a deep natural sensibility to that One. I have
distressed
you and him through you, and myself in him!
There-in
lies my closest garnered being. Saying this Margaret
turned her face away.
It is Whippoorwill, said Job to Mr. Evelyn. Don't
speak now.
That gentleman waiting awhile in silence, was obliged, by
direct enforcement, to renew the conversation.
Tell me, said he, what is the meaning of this? Here
is a greater mystery to
me
than all this strange world can
offer to you. By what secret affinities are you bound to him
who is my Life? How have you come to know him in this
heart-felt manner? Like Nathaniel has he seen you under
the fig-trees?
No, said Margaret, turning herself, and speaking with
composure, it was under those trees yonder in what we call
Diana's Walk.
What, that you literally saw him?
No, it was a dream. He, the Beautiful One, called
Christ, filled one of the dreams of my childhood. He spoke
to me, he took my hand, he kissed me, he blest me.
Tell me about it.
It was some years ago. Its remembrance fades, then
brightens again. Sometimes it bubbles up within me like a
spring, sometimes it spreads away into a deep calm surface
like the Pond. It haunts me like a cloud white and soft. In
my sensibilities it lies and stirs me up to weeping. Forgive
me a thousand times that I should have been so wanton!
When you spoke of him in such a way, I was suddenly
flooded with emotion such as I cannot describe. Isabel and
Job know of it, but they do not precisely answer to my
feelings
.
Indeed at the moment you came up I was endeavoring
to form out of the clouds some likeness to what I had seen,
the One himself, the Cross, the Dove; I gazed into the
heights of the blue sky for some Apparition. I beguile the
uncertainties of my thought by the creations of my fancy.
But That comes not, and the clouds veil over those infinite
distances. He said if I loved, I should know. I do love,
how little I know.
But do, if it pleases you, give me the particulars of your
dream.
She repeated what is already in the possession of the
reader, and recounted some things of her several dreams.
But, said she, as the conversation went on, I thought this
was for myself alone. It has been kept in my own life. Is
he, Christ, great, is he general? You, Sir, seem to know and
20*
to feel him, though you say you have had no dreams about
him. He has been a strange beautiful flower in my garden,
and so he exists in yours. What do these things mean?
Your question raises, said he, a long train of
reflection
.
Let us be seated, and we will go over the matter with
that care which it deserves.
No, indeed, replied Margaret, I would not trouble you
to that extent now. Job promised for me to go upon the Head
with you, and it is time to startI must be at home and help
about the dinner.
Where is the cake for Egeria? said Job.
I guess she will have to be content with the
grasshopper-music
,
or she may lie down in the shade as the cows do,
answered
Margaret. I did not tell you, Sir, she added, that
this spot is consecrated to the Nymph whom the old Roman
was wont to visit, and when we go away we sometimes leave a
cake or piece of bread both as an oblation and for her dinner,
and, will you believe it, Sir, when I return,
it is all gone
.
They proceeded towards the eminence called the Head.
Seeing Chilion moving leisurely in the direction of the water,
Job importuned to go and sail with him, and Margaret with
Mr. Evelyn went up the hill.
How very beautiful this is! said the young gentleman,
here, there, and everywhere.
Look down
into
this water, said Margaret, standing on the
rock that overhung the Pond, if your brain is steady enough.
This the Master calls Exclamation Point.I have wished
to drop into that splendid cloud-flowing abyss, and perhaps I
shall be missing one of these days, and you will know where
to find me. You are soberwell, look off into the mountains
yonder. That is Umkiddin. You will not blame a passion I
cherish for climbing that sunny height, and laying hand and
heart in the downy Blue.
No I could not.But see that point of rock around which
the water bends, with a great tree overshadowing the distance.
So I admire a river, not so much in its expanse and full-tide,
as in the turns and angles, where it loses itself within green
shores and sinks away under the shade of cliff and forest.
`Loses itself'! replied Margaret, repeating the word with
some emphasis. There you have it again. Lost, gone,
vanishing
,
unreachable, inappropriable, anagogical!I used to sit
here in my merry childhood and think all was mine, the earth
and the sky. I ate my bread and cider and fed the ants and
flies. Through me innumerable things went forth; the loons
whooped me in the water, in my breath the midges sported,
the Sun went down at my bidding, and my jocund heart kindled
the twilight. It now flies away like a bird, and I cannot get
near enough to put any salt on its tail. Then I owned so much
my losses were of no account, and though I could not reach
the bottom of the Pond, I saw the heavens in it, and myself
sailing above them. In the darkest night, with our red
tartarean
links, Chilion and I have rowed across the Pond, and
sniggled
for eels, and so we conquered the secrets of those depths.
I have cried too in my day, I have an unkind brother and a
profligate father, and what with the wretchedness of those I
love and their wickedness, my own heart has been duly
tortured
and these swollen veins have been bled with weeping; but
I seem also to have lost the power of tears. Those, like the
days of good Queen Bess, are gone, and how shall they be
recovered
!
Have you no faith? asked Mr. Evelyn.
`Faith'! That sanctiloquent word! That is what the
Widow Luce dins me with.
Faith; trust, confidence, repose, seeing the invisible,
relying
upon the spiritual, having an inner impersonal
inhabitancy
.
In that alone I am happy and sustained. Would you
were thus happy.
I wish I wereBut faint heart never won fair lady. I do
not quite give overI am happy, none more. In the same
moment
that I am worried I am at rest. How is this? What
many-colored streams flow through us, blood-red, and
woolly-white
!
Are we divided off like sheep, has each feeling its
fold? Through our skies sail two sets of clouds, one to the
North, one to the South? Even now while I speak all I feel, there
is more in me than I can ever speak of. What Harmony
circumscribes
the whole? In what are Pain and Pleasure One?
I will not ask you, I am happy. Greater simpleton than I am
if I were not. Much I have lost, much remains, more comes.
My dreams have a place within me; and all the books I have
read. My home is every year more beautiful, the trees more
suggestive, the birds more musical, the bees more knowing.
Roots grow in new ways every Summer, and snow falls in new
forms every Winter. There is more in churning than most
people think of. Time is regenerative, and new births occur
every hour. The gritty Earth, alumen and silex spring up in
dream-like beauty. I have also many and improving
visitations
,
and much select company. I told you of Egeria; then
there is Diana's Walk in the woods, and close upon the edge of
the water you see some graceful white birches, those are the
Nine Muses. Brother Chilion is our Apollo. In the house we
have St. Crispin for the shoemaker, and St. Catharine for the
spinner; Bull is our Cerberus. Brother Hash the Master calls
Priapus; the Leech we call Dea Salus, and the road to her
house has received from the Master the name of Via Salutaris.
The cross-path to the Village he calls Via Dolorosa, on account
of a dangerous pass in the brook; and that, (the brook) from the
same cause he says, because he got into trouble going over it,
he calls Kedron, though I do not understand anything about that
name. Religion he says is an anagogical parenthesis, because
it must be spoken in a lower tone of voice. No. 4
I
called
Avernus, and the road to it Descensus Averni, but, coming up,
he would have it that it was The Delectable Way. The Head
is called Mons Bacchi, but our cistern I call Temperance. The
Hours dance round me in snow flakes, Naiads and Dryads
inhabit our woods and water; in one of my haunts I can
show you the Three Graces. That Island with a large elm in
the centre is Feronia's, where I often go. Narcissus grows in
my garden, Daphnis in the woods. The Head I told you the
Master called Bacchus' Hill, and sometimes our whole region
goes by that name, and the Pond he says he has no doubt is
the reappearance of the river Helicon into which some fabled
Orpheus was changed, and whose waters were a long time
hidden under ground; so we sometimes call our place the Lake
of Orpheus. To which Divinity we are on the whole
consecrated
,
I hardly know; but for my part, I prefer the musical,
to the tippling God. Then the fair Lady of my dreams
sometimes
still comes to me with her pale beautiful face. I have
also one at the Widow's, but whether she be a phantom or a
reality I know not, a girl like myself, also pale, sad and
beautiful
,
whose smile is an enchantment, even if I know not her
hidden
self.Am I not happy?
It may be so, answered he, but in a manner different
from the world.
Another word that I do not understand! What mean you
by the world?
People about you, men and women in general.
If you mean the villagers, the No. 4's, Breaknecks and
Snakehills, I know I differ some from them. They drink rum,
which I do not; they are unkind one with another, which for
the life of me I never could be. Their Anagogics indeed I
wholly fail to comprehend, their Sabbaths, Meetings,
Catechizing
,
Freemasonry, Trainings, Politics, Courts, Jails and all
that.
Your Religion is so different from theirs.
Bless me, I have no religion; and Bull defend me from
theirs! Albeit, as Deacon Ramsdill says, we must eat a peck
of dirt before we die, and perhaps I must make mine out
in some of their religion!I
have
offended you; it is just as I
told you I should do, if you talked with me.
I repeat, that you cannot offend me, only you must allow
what you say to make me somewhat thoughtful. You said you
wanted to clamber up the blue mountain yonder, and are ready
even to leave your pretty Pantheon for that acquisition. That
is Religion even if you had not thought it.
No, never would I leave my `pretty Pantheon,' as you call
it. But I should like to thrust my fingers between those two
blues, that of the hill and of the sky. There Christ has come
to me; in celestial skyey softness has
that vision
appeared.
No one like the Beautiful One has ever visited my dreams, my
thoughts, my aspirations; and I have nothing about me I dare
call Christ. There is sometimes a cloud that stretches from
Umkiddin to the Moon when it rises, like a turkey's
tail-feather
whence
comes it? to what serene eternal bird does it
belong? is it part of the wing of Christ under whose shadow I
may lie? is it the trail of the beautiful Goddess, Venus?I
know not.No, I cannot leave my Pantheon, and I long for
what I have not; and that is religion, you say. Your definition
differs somewhat from my Tutor's, and by it, I am quite
religious
!
ha, ha. Prithee, tell me Sir, who are you? Are not
you `the world'?
A sorry part of it, I fear; yet removed enough from it
neither to drink rum nor disturb the peace of others. I do keep
the Sabbath, and go to Church; I do not say the Catechism,
or belong to any train-band. Most people, I confess, are
degraded
by their piety; I do believe there is a worship that
purifies
and ennobles.
You confound and delight me both. I know not what to
say. The horn is blowing for dinner, and I am glad
something
befalls to put an end to the perplexity.Won't you stay
and have your dinner with us? I will introduce you to my
home, family, dog, squirrel and spinning-wheel.
I am engaged at the VillageMay I have the pleasure of
seeing you again, Miss Hart?
Miss Hart!
That is your name, I believe.
Yesonly I was never called it before, it sounds strange.
If I do not give you more pain than pleasure, you are welcome
to see me, when I am to be seen. I have a good deal to do.
Can you break flax?
I fear I should bungle at it.
Then I fear Ma would not like you. If you could help me
get cotton grass or thistle down, I should be glad to see you.
I would not pain a toad, I hope I shall not you.Where is the
Bible you spoke of, if it does not make me laugh to ask you.
You shall have it if you will promise me not to laugh
when you read it.
I never made a promise in my life; only I will try.
It is not the whole Bible, it is the New Testament, so
called. I hope it will please you.
I don't know. `A clouted shoe hath oft-times craft in it,'
Deacon Ramsdill says, and there may be some good in the
Bible.
We have had fine luck, said Job, coming from the boat
as they descended the hill. Six white perch, four eel-pouts,
six shiners and a pickerel.
You shall carry some to your mother, replied Margaret,
and mind you give Whippoorwill a taste.There is my Apollo,
not so fair perchance as his namesake, but he is as good. He
is lame you see withal, and in that resembles his great
prototype
;
and this stone of my heart becomes melodious when he
plays.Mr. Evelyn, Chilion.
How do you do, Sir.
Quite well, at your service, Sir, replied Chilion.
What springal is that, has kept you from helping me?
said Brown Moll, coming to the window with a tray full of hot
potatoes, which she was pealing, as Mr. Evelyn and Job turned
down the road.
A fox after the goslin, hey? said Hash, who with his
father arrived at the same moment. I saw you on the
Head.
I guess he has lain out over night, said Pluck. He
looks soft and glossy as your Mammy's flax of a frosty
morning
.Now
don't take pet, Molly dear.
She swells like a soaked pea, added the old woman.
What's the matter, husy? I should think he had been
rubbing
your face with elm leaves.
Never mind, Molly, interposed her father. Better to
play at small game than stand out. You are the spider of the
woods. Spin a strong web; you are sure to catch
something
.
She looks as if she had been spun, colored and hung out
to dry, said her mother.
Gall darn it! exclaimed Hash. I smell potatoes. Give
us some dinner.
Speaking of spinning, said Pluck, when the others were
gone in, you know how to use the wheel-pinkeep the thread
taught and easy in your fingers, mind the spindle, then buzz
away like Duke Jehu;only if he is a dum spot of a Lawyer
or a Priest, weave him into a breeches-piece, and I'll wear
him, I be blown if I don't; and when he is past mending, I'll
hang him up for a scare-crow, blast him!
After dinner, Margaret took her boat and went to the Island
called Feronia's, remarkable for its great elm. She threw
herself
on a bed of mosses under the shade of the tree. Patience,
Silence, Feronia, Venus, O Mother God! help thy child!
she said, or ejaculated with herself. I, Icarus, with waxen
wings, am melted by the light into which I fly! I, Eurydice,
am in Hell; my Orpheus bore me out a little ways, left me,
and I am caught back again! How cold I grow! Let me lie
in the sun. Dear clouds, sweet clouds! let me shine and be
dissolved with you! Oh ChristRelent thou iron soul of the
skies, and speak to me!My little boat, where is the glad,
bird-child you used to carry? Still the same, the oar, the
seat; the water the same, rocks, woods; waves sing their
eternal
lullaby, box-berries keep their unchanging red, shadows
embrace me as if my heart were free.How I twattled,
skurried
!
`Miss Hart'! Miss Pan, Miss Bacchus, rather. Now
I grow hot again. Who, what am I? Quis, Quid! God and
I alike anagogical. Who or what is he? Let me get it right
this time. Who is Mr. Evelyn? His What is what? What
is his Who? The What! Lucem inaccessam, light
inapproachable
.
Rose too the same.How kind his words, how
gentle his voice, how mild his looks, how benign and forbearing
in all things! And yet sanctiloquent, and yet so different
from others! What is `the World'? Is he it? Is he like
me? Why am I not it? I will see how this matter looks in
the water, let me quench my hot limbs. Drifting along in
her boat, she bent over the water, Molly dear, said she, is
that you? Your face is red and feverish. Go to the Widow's
and get some balm tea.Can't you keep cool down there?
The sun shines there as well as here! Your hair wants
combing
,
your dress is disordered, Neptune's sea-dogs would be
ashamed of you. She left her boat and clothes on the shore,
and immersed herself in the grateful water. She returned
to the island; she said, I will lie down under the tree;
sleep is better than knowledge, a bed kinder than God, the
shadows more beautiful than Truth! or, Mr. Evelyn, is rest
given us wherein we find ourselves and all things? Pardon
me, Sir. She slept a long time, and awoke, refreshed and
regulated, resolute but subdued; with an even hand and
quiet temperature she rowed homewards, and went about such
duties as domestic necessity or customary requisition imposed.
In the evening she went to see Rose, and while she had
made no mention of Mr. Anonymous, she found she had much
to say of Mr. Evelyn. Rose embraced her with a silent
summer-like
tranquillity, and kissed her lips fervently, which was
nearly all the response she made. She shone out if at all like
the Moon through dark clouds, that are only the darker for
the brightness behind them. Death, said, she, diverging
into a train of thought seemingly suggested by what Margaret
related, Death will soon end all. In the grave we shall lie
and the beauty and strength of existence shall perish with us.
I only ask, Margaret, that I may be buried side by side with
you. The worm shall devour the fairest visions and the most
dismal forebodings, alike; decay shall feed sweetly upon your
ruddiness and vigor, your nobleness and benignity. A
princely
offering are we to Annihilation. I murmur not, I dread not,
with the serenity of angelic love I submit to the
all-o'ersweeping
Fate. In your arms to lie, with you to die, I smile as I
sink into the eternal rest. Yet, live on Margaret, while you
may, fill your golden cup, it will never be too late to drink it,
even if death seizes you in the act.
CHAPTER III.
CHRISTIANITY.
Another
day Mr. Evelyn came to the Pond. Margaret
watched his approach with composure, and returned his
greeting
without confusion. You have been on the Head, said
she, and I must take you to other places to-day. First the
Maples.
This is a fine mineralogical region, said he as they
entered
the spot. I wish I had a hammer.
I will go for one, said she.
O no, Miss Hart, I will get it if you will tell me where it is.
You are not in health you told me, and you do not look
very strong. I must go by all means. I will be back in a
trice. You will have quite as much walking as you can master
before the day is through.
You may go, but I fear I shall be more tired wondering
than in going.
See this, said he, exposing a hollow stone filled with
superb crystals, which he found and broke during her absence,
I thank you, I thank you, she replied. The Master has
given me an inkling of geology, but I never imagined such
beauty was hidden here.
With definite forms and brilliant texture these gems are
created in the centre of this rough rusty stone.
Incomparable mystery! New Anagogics! I begin to be in
love with what I understand not.
Humanity is like that.
What is Humanity?
It is only another name for the World that you asked me
about.
I am perplexed by the duplicity of words. He is humane
who helps the needy.
That is one form of Humanity. I use the term as
expressing
all men collectively viewed in their better light. Much
depends upon this light, phase, or aspect, what subjectively to
us is by the Germans called stand-point. The Indian's Head,
in one position resembles a human face, in another quite as
much a fish's tail. Man, like this stone, is geodic  such
stones you know are called geodes
Have you the skill to discover them?
It is more difficult to break than find them. Yet if I
could crack any man as I do this stone, I should lay open
beautiful crystals.
Any
man?
Yes, all men.
O passing wonderful! I would run a thousand miles for
the hammer! I have been straining after the stars, how much
there is in the stones! Most Divine Earth, henceforth I will
worship thee!Geodic Androids! What will the Master say?
I see traces of other beautiful minerals in these large
rocks. Let me rap here, and lo! I show you a beryl, there
is agate, yonder is a growth of garnets.
Let me cease to be astonished and only learn to love.
An important lesson, and one not too well learned.
21
Under this tree I will erect a Temple to the God of
Rocks.Was there any such? Certes, I remember none.
The God of Rocks is God.
You sport enigmas again. Let us to Diana's Walk.
They perambulated the forest touching upon various spots
of interest to Margaret. She had given name and population
to many a solitary place, and for many years, it appeared, had
been deepening her worship and extending her supremacy, such
as it was, over the region. Tired at last, they sat down under
the trees.
You will not relish such a walk and so many Gods, I
fear, said she.
I could pursue the woods forever, was his reply. The
trees give me more than my acquaintances.
They are my home. I was born in them, have been
sheltered under them, and educated by them, and do
sometimes
believe myself of them. The Master rightly says I have
a fibrous disposition. I used to think I came of an acorn,
and many a one have I opened to find a baby brother or sister.
Am I not an automative vegetable, a witch-hazle in
moccasins
?
The Master says I am of the order Bipeds, and
species
Simulacrens; distinguished by thirty-two teeth, and
having the superior extremities terminated by a hand which is
susceptible of a greater variety of motions than that of any
other animal, and is remarkably prehensile; that it inhabits
all parts of the earth; is omnivorous; and disputes for
territory
,
uniting together for the express purpose of destroying its
own kind; that I am of the variety Caucasiana, differing
from the Americana in this, that my feet are a little broader
just above the toes, and from the Simia in the configuration of
the thumb. For my own part, I incline to the Sylvian
analogy
,
only my clothes are not half so durable as this bark, nor
my hair so becoming as the leaves, and I must undress myself
at night and take to my bed, while the trees sleep standing
and unhooded. Then what a pother we make about eating,
while the tree lives on its own breathing, and, with more ease
than a duck, muddles for nourishment with its roots.
You will not overlook the mind, the spirit; the inner
voluntary
life, the diversifier of action, the possibility of
achievement
,
the subordinator of matter, the master of Time, the
annotator of the Universe, the thinking, willing, loving, the
joy and sorrow, the aspiration and submission, the
retrospection
and prospection, the smiling, the weeping, the speech,
the silence, sight, smell and taste, the right and wrong, art,
poetry, music, the self-consciousness of infinite affinities,
heroism, and self-renunciationall, all demonstrate the
separateness
and superiority of man.
I
know
what you say is true, and when I hear it said, I
shall
feel
it to be true. Speak on
The tree has no sense of happiness, like you and me, nor
possesses it any capability of wretchedness. It exists for our
pleasure. He, the soul of all, the supreme Intelligence, the
Uncreated Creator, the invisible Seer, has caused it to grow
for our use. Even now I feel Him, called in our tongue God,
in the Greek Theos, in the Hebrew Jehovah, in the Indian
Manitou, by some distinguished in some way, by others in
another. His life inflames my life, his spirit inspires my spirit.
All that is now about us is his, and he in it; the beauty of the
forest is the tincture of his beneficence, the breeze is the
respiration
of his mercy, the box-berries and mosses are his, the
rocks and roots, the dancing shadows, the green breaks into
the blue sky are his creation, the fair whole of color, perfume
and form, the indescribable sweet sensation that wells in our
breasts, are his gift and his presence in the gift, they are the
figures woven into the tapestry that girths the Universe, the
fragrance that fills the vinaigrette of Creation. Through all
and in all pierces his spirit, that blows through us like the
wind.
But what becomes of my pretty Pantheon, Apollo and
Bacchus, Diana and Egeria, before this all-deluging One?
That belongs to what is termed Mythology, a mixture of
imagination, religion and philosophy. Apollo, for instance,
as Tooke will tell you, denotes the sun; and of the arts
ascribed
to him, prophesying, healing, shooting, music, we
discover
a lively prototype in that luminary. It dispels darkness,
brings secret things to light, shoots its rays, imparts health
and preservation to all things; and being placed in the middle
of the planets makes with them a kind of harmony or music.
In Hindoo Mythology is Brahma, an uncouth image, coarsely
done in stone, which Christians affect to despise, having the
form of an infant with its toe in its mouth, floating on a flower
over a watery abyss. It represents this, that in some of the
renovations which the world is supposed to have undergone,
the wisdom and designs of God will appear as in their infant
state; Brahma, that is God the Creator, floating on a leaf,
shows the instability of things at that period; the toe sucked
in the mouth implies that Infinite wisdom subsists of itself;
and the position of the body, drawn into the form of a ring by
this union of the extremities, is an emblem of the endless
circle of eternity. It is a mere hint at the highest ideas, and
by its very rudeness effectually anticipates the error of
diverting
attention from the substance to the shadow, and if
worship
be performed before it, it is none otherwise than worship
done in our Churches, which are styled, pre-eminently, houses
of God, sanctuaries or sacred places. The Northern nations,
inheriting the germs of spirituality from the East, superadded
Beauty, and elaborated the Symbol in the fairest forms of
Art. Their Statues also were an embodied Allegory, they
were an Encyclopedia of truth. Now-a-days, we have lost
the ancient idea, and so split up our systems of knowledge,
that a statue is no more than a handsomely wrought stone;
and sometimes we vituperate the attention paid to it, as
Idolatry
.
It furnished to the eye what a written treatise does to
the understanding; or in brief the chisel did the work of the
pen. To the Greeks, a statue was at once a Church and a
Book, it was Beauty and Inspiration, Truth and Illustration,
Philosophy and Religion. The human form is more
expressive
than any other, and genius seized upon that as the most
fitting instrument for conveying ideality, and ennobled man
while it symbolized his frame.
So Apollo is a creation of God?
The original on which that is founded is a creation of
God; or I should say, Apollo, representing certain facts in
the creation of God, or certain attributes of God, his culture
was observed by different nations under different names, till at
last some artist, fusing as it were the popular idea in his own,
wrought the whole in marble, and so gave us the Belvidere.
What are we? What am I?
In the words of the biblical Job, whom I fear you know
less about than you do about the Widow Luce's Job, `There
is a spirit in man, and the inspiration of the Almighty hath
given them understanding.' God himself breathes into us
the breath of spiritual life. This divine afflatus animates the
embryon existence. The spirit assumes a material frame-work
which it must quit at last. Our souls coming from God return
to him. We are ever-living as the Divinity himself. The
bosom of the Infinite while it nourishes us here is our ultimate
home. God creates us in his own image, and we like him
go on to create. He weaves, and we are his warp and filling.
Who winds the spools?
You are more at home in the detail, Miss Hart, than I
am, and I leave you to answer that question yourself.But,
we, the woof, are also weavers. God weaves and we weave;
`He dwells in us and we in him,' St. John says. `He clothes
the grass of the field,' Christ says. `He works in us,' St.
Paul says.
Did God work in the artist that made the Apollo?
Yes; all beautiful works of man are an inspiration of
the Almighty. We read in the Old Testament that `God put
wisdom and understanding into men's hearts to know how to
work all manner of work,' for a fabric the Jews were
building
.
It is the energy of that action wherewith he endows
man.
Then I may keep my Apollo, and all my Divinities.
I would not deprive you of anything that shall make you
beautiful and strong, happy and chaste, devout and simple,
that shall give companionship to your solitude, ministry to
your susceptibilities, exercise to your imagination.
You are taking the pegs out of the bars, but I will not
run wild  I am impatient to know about Christ; what will
you say of him? I have read some in the New Testament
you gave me. It is the strangest book I ever saw. It
transported
me with an unspeakable delight; and then I was
over-whelmed
by a painful complexity of sensations. I came to
where he died, and I laid down the book and wept with a
suffocating anguish. Then there were those sanctiloquent
words!
That which I gave you is a version made two hundred
years since, when our language was imperfect, scholarship
deficient
,
biblical knowledge limited, and the popular belief
replete with errors; and moreover done by men of a
particular
sect under the dictation of a King. Of course the
translation
suffers somewhat; but the general truth of the Gospels
can no more be hindered by this circumstance, than the effect
of day by an accumulation of clouds. But of the subject
itself, Christ, what can I say? It is almost too great for our
comprehension, as it certainly rises above all petty disputes.
How can I describe what I know not? How can I embrace a
nature that so exceeds my own? How can I tell of a love I
never felt, or recount attainments I never reached? Can I give
out what I have not, and I sometimes fear I am not completely
possessed of Christ. Can I, the Imperfect, appreciate the
Perfect
one; can I, the sinful, reveal the sinless soul? I have not
Christ's spirit, his truth, his joy, so integrally and plenarily,
that I can set him forth in due proportion and entireness. His
experience and character, his spiritual strength and moral
21*
greatness are so transcendent, I truly hesitate at the task you
impose upon me. That we may portray the Poet or the Artist,
or any high excellence, we must square with it; who, alas! is
equal to Christ!
Yet, said Margaret, all that is lies secretly coiled
within
our own breasts! All Beauty, I am persuaded, is within
us; whatever comes to me I feel to have had a pre-existence.
I sometimes indeed doubt whether I give or receive. A flower
takes color from the sun and gives off color. Air makes the
fire burn, and the fire makes the air blow; and the colder the
weather the brisker the fire. A watermelon seed can say,
`In me are ten watermelons, rind, pulp and seeds, so many
yards of vine, so many pounds of leaves.' In myself seems
sometimes to reside an infant Universe. My soul is certainly
pistillate, and the pollen of all things is borne to me. The
spider builds his house from his own bowels. I have
sometimes
seen a wood-spider let off a thread which the winds drew
out for him and raised above the trees, and when it was
sufficiently
high and strong, he would climb up it, and sail off in
the clear atmosphere. I think if you only begin, it will all
come to you. As you drain off it will flow in. The sinful
may give out the sinless. I long to hear what you have to
say.
What you observe is too true, and I thank you for making
me recollect myself. Even the Almighty creates us, and then
suffers himself to be revealed in us. We, motes, carry an
immensity
of susceptible, responsive existence. But for this we
should never love or know Christ. In his boyhood, we are
told, Christ waxed strong in spirit, was filled with wisdom,
and the grace of God was upon him. His earliest
developments
must have been of a peculiarly beautiful and striking
kind. When he was twelve years old, being in company of
some learned people, his questions and replies were of such a
nature as to excite astonishment in all present, at the extent of
his understanding. We have no authentic account of him from
this until his thirtieth year; excepting that he resided with his
father and pursued the family avocation, that of a carpenter.
What, do you know nothing about him when he was as
old as I am, or as you are, when he was fifteen, or twenty, or
twenty-five? In the dream I remember he said I must be like
him, I must grow up with him. Had he no youth? Had he
no inward sorrowful feelings as I have had?
There is one of the books of the New Testament of a
peculiar character, and it contains some intimations respecting
Christ, not found in the others. I will read a passage. `In
the days of his flesh he offered up or poured forth prayers and
supplications, with strong crying and tears, to him that was
able to save him from death, and was heard in that he feared,'
or as it stands in the original for his piety. This, as I
believe
,
points to a period of his life not recorded in the other
histories, and should be assigned to that which you have
mentioned
,
his youth.
I have no doubt of it, said Margaret. It describes
exactly what I have been through. Did he suffer all we do?
Yes, his life and sufferings were archetypal of those of all
his followers. `He suffered for us,' says St. Peter, `leaving us
an example that we should follow in his steps.' `Rejoice,' he
says, `inasmuch as ye are partakers of Christ's sufferings.'
How near this brings Christ to me! It seems as if I had
him now in my heart. He too suffered! How much there
is in that word! and in this earnest, soul-deep way! I
understand
his sad tender look. Apollo killed Hyacinth by accident,
and was very sorry. But there was no deep capable soul in
Apollo, was there? I shall not think so much of him,I
interrupt
you, Sir, go on.
He suffered all that any being can suffer; he was alone,
unbefriended, unsympathized with, unaided; books gave him
no satisfaction, teachers afforded him no light. The current,
swift and broad, of popular error and prejudice, he had to
stem and turn, single-handed. He grew in knowledge, we
read; the problems of Man, God and the Universe were given
him to resolve. But he was heard for his piety, for his
goodness
.
He became perfect through suffering. Supernatural,
divine assistance was afforded him, and he conquered at last.
At the age of thirty, when he entered what is called his public
ministry, which is the chief subject of history, he encountered
a severe temptation, such as all are liable to, and was enabled
to vanquish it; he was tempted as we are. He was ever
without sin, neither was guile found in his mouth, he was holy,
harmless, undefiled. At times he was made indignant at the
conduct of men, he was grieved at the hardness of their
hearts, he groaned in sympathy with human distress, he wept
over the follies of the race; he was persecuted by the great,
and despised by his own kindred; his nearest friends deserted
him, and one of his chosen disciples betrayed him; the greato
ness of his views met only with bigotry, and the generosity of
his heart was repelled by meanness; he carried the heavy wood
on which he was crucified, and when brought as a malefactor
to the place of execution, he was scourged and spit upon;
once prostrated by the weight of his anguish, and from very
heat of internal agony, he entreated that the bitter cup might
be removed; and to add to all, in the extreme stage of
dissolving
life, for a moment his spiritual vision seemed to be dimmed,
and he cried out, `O my God! why hast thou forsaken me?'
Such is a brief notice of his sufferings. Let me turn to other
points
Oh, Mr. Evelyn! exclaimed Margaret, how can you
go on so! How cold you are! I cannot hear any more;
and from the posture she had maintained with her eyes fixed
on the ground, she fell with her face into her hands, and
followed
the act with an audible profusion of tears.
Do forgive me, Miss Hart, said Mr. Evelyn. I have
been so long familiar with this most affecting history, that I
know it does not move me as it should.
I only know, said Margaret, looking up with a forgiving
smile gleaming through her tears, that I feel it all through
me, my heart swells like a gourd, and I ache in a strange
way. My memory and my sensations seem to be alike
agitated
.
That must be sympathy! replied Mr. Evelyn.
What is that sympathy? asked Margaret. I never
heard, methinks, the word before.
It is of Greek origin, and means feeling or suffering with
another. It denotes mutual sensation, fellow-feeling; it
implies
also compassion, commiseration. It is defined a
conformity
in feeling, suffering or passion with another; also a
participation
in the condition or state of another; and also, if you
are not tired of superenumeration, the quality or susceptibility
of being affected by the affection of another, with feelings
correspondent
in kind.
Sympathy, sympathy! said Margaret. That is it.
You understand me now!
Yes, you sympathize with Christ. I can but deplore my
own insensibility.
I will remember that word; I like to get a good word; it
is like a tin cover put over a dish of potatoes, it keeps them so
nice and warm. While you were speaking, I felt myself drawn
out by some strange affinities to what you said, and when you
came to the extreme sufferings of Christ, my sensations were
something such as I had when you spoke about him the other
day, and when I read that part of the Book, only so many
things being brought together, I felt more. All the sadness I
ever felt was revived, and burst within me anew.
I was going to tell you, continued Mr. Evelyn, that in
addition to, and despite all, Christ was very happy, and that
in manner and matter beyond what most men can conceive of,
which is another secret in his character. On the last day of
his life, with the horrors of crucifixion impending, he said to
his sorrowing friends, `Peace I leave with you, my peace I
give unto you.' He desired, he says, that `his joy might
remain
with them;' he prays that `his joy may be fulfilled in
themselves!' This I think will please you.
I believe I understand something of that too, said
Margaret
.
There are still other points, pursued Mr. Evelyn. I
must speak of the object of Christ's coming into the world, or
what is known as the plan of Redemption by him. Man had
fallen, if you know what that means.
I remember something the Primer says, and what Pa says
when he is so intoxicated he can't stand. `In Adam's fall,
we sinned all.'
I do not refer to that. Eve, of whom you will read in the
Old Testament, ate an apple from an interdicted tree, which is
commonly known as the Fall of Man. There is no authority
for such a belief. Men fall, each man for himself, when they
sin, that is, do wrong. At the time Christ appeared, St. Paul
tells us, unrighteousness, wickedness, covetousness,
maliciousness
,
lasciviousness, envyings, backbitings, murders, wrath,
strife, seditions prevailed; men were inventors of evil things,
disobedient to parents, without natural affection, without
understanding
,
unholy, and so forth
I shall laugh now, said Margaret, to hear all that
sanctiloquence
.
I must have hit upon some of those words which
nearly disgusted me with the book. I have heard Deacon
Hadlock called a very holy man, and Pa laughed, and the
Master
blew his nose.
Those are words, replied Mr. Evelyn, in common and
proper use when the translation was made to which I referred.
Having disappeared from the popular tongue, and being
retained
only in ecclesiastical terminology, it is not surprising
they sound strange to you. Rendered in modern English,
holiness and righteousness, mean goodness, virtue, rectitude,
or any high moral and religious excellence. As respects the
other vices mentioned, we have now-a-days, as you well know,
war, intemperance, slavery, unkindness; and then what go by
the name of bigotry, intolerance, irreligion, pious frauds,
persecution
,
simony, villany, burglary, violence, peculation,
treason
,
perjury, kidnapping, piracy, scandal, ingratitude, intrigue,
bribery, meanness, social inequality, governmental misrule,
spirit of caste, oppression of labor, superciliousness, are
abundant
.
These and similar things are what the Gospel
denominates
the works of the flesh, and renders unto tribulation and
anguish, as evil doing. These are that whereby men break
the Divine Law, and separate themselves from God. But the
primary idea in this matter, the fundamental law of sin, the
very essence of the Fall, consists in this, that men ceased to
love. Love is the fulfilling of the law, it is the first and great
command; it unites man with God and with himself. In the
subsidency and departure of love, the moral system is
revolutionized
and completely disordered. The instinct of
self-preservation
is tortured into selfishness, the desire of
excellence
is inflamed into ambition, the sense of right becomes
the author of innumerable wrong. The whole head is sick,
the whole heart faint. Nature commences a burdensome
contention
with abuse, misdirection, absurdity, folly. It is ever
Nature
versus
the Unnatural. The institutions and
organizations
of men, founded upon the new basis, partake of the general
corruption, and only foster evils it is their design to prevent.
Love casts out fear; in the absence of love, fear supercedes;
hence aggression and violence, superstition and the doctrine
of devils.
I never feared, said Margaret; was that because I
loved?
Fortitude, replied Mr. Evelyn, springs as much from
superiority to our enmities, as from superiority to our enemies.
And this reminds me, that the first voluntary wrong act any
man ever did was done through the absence of love. But here
arises a new element. We were never created to do or to
suffer
voluntary wrong, and there is generated in consequence of
such acts, the sense of injury. Hence come all retaliations.
A most mournful fact in this matter is that dissonance and
dis-disorder
are themselves sympathetic and reciprocal.
Aversion
reproduces aversion, and selfishness is answered by
selfishness
.
I have felt that towards Solomon Smith sometimes, said
Margaret. I know he dislikes me, and I have been moved
to dislike him, and I suppose I should if I did not feel what a
ridiculous piece of business it is for one most anagogical
puppet
to be mad with another. And since you would also
convince
me he is geodic, what can I do, but abide, like the ants,
whose hills through trodden upon are patiently renewed every
morning.
When man ceases to love, he is not only estranged from
God, but the image of God within him is lost, the heavenly
purity of his character is sullied, and the divine harmonies of
his nature are discomposed.But what is worst of all, we are
educated to regard every man with suspicion and enmity. We
are taught in our earliest years that men are by nature totally
depraved, and since total depravity covers every form of sin and
vice, we are in effect instructed to believe every man a villain,
a thief, a murderer, at heart; as mean, selfish, and malicious,
in his secret conscious purpose. This is the cardinal doctrine
of what passes under the name of Christianity. It is annually
enforced by hundreds of thousands of discourses from Bishops
and Clergy in every part of Christendom. This consummates
the Fall! Every youth under the operation of that
sympathetic
and reciprocal law, to which I adverted, enters life in
the spirit of hostility. To receive injury he expects, to do
an injury on the injurious, he thinks no harm. The evil which
he is made to believe all others saturated with is reflected in
his own bosom, and so, in spite of himself, he becomes
depraved
.
There is something denominated love in the religious
circles; I should call it Ecclesiastical love, because it is a
figment
of the Church, to distinguish it from Christian love, which
has its origin in Christ, or Evangelical love founded on the
Gospels. After making you believe all men totally depraved,
our teachers endeavor to create in the breasts of the elect so
termed, a pity for this depravity, and to inspire them with a
desire to remove it, and this they call love, which is no love at
all, since an important element in love is that it thinketh no
evil, judges not. In what I have now said, you see not only
the Fall of man generally, but also that second greater
catastrophe
,
the Fall of the Church.
Here I must beg of you some more explanations; what do
you mean by the Church?
I mean that great body of men, in all countries, of all
denominations
and sects, who profess Christianity, in their
associate
capacity, with their clergy, or leaders, and creeds, or
articles
of establishment.
Have the Church-members in the Village and those who
groaned so at the Camp Meeting fallen?
Yes, all. The effect of a corrupt Christianity, or as I
should say of a fallen religion, is to perpetuate and augment
itself
;
and now, with very few exceptions, all share in the
common
calamity. In the progress of decline, it became a matter
of course, that the Church should change its standards of faith,
or as we say in politics, adopt a new constitution. The
Gospels or Evangelicons, by which are intended the personal
biographies of Jesus, a book of Acts, and certain documents
known as Epistles, are indeed accredited by all. But there
arose certain things which have practically superseded the
Gospels. These are known as Articles of the Council of Trent,
of the Church of England, of the Episcopal Church, of the
Methodist Church; or as Creeds in our various Churches.
And now a man may believe the Gospels, and aim to conform
to Christ, but he is not reckoned a Christian by the Catholics
unless he assent to their Articles, or by the Protestants unless
he subscribe their several Creeds. And they have carried this
matter so far, as to condemn a man to everlasting perdition if
he depart from these Gospel-substitutes. You may examine
them and canvass their qualities, you will find no more
Christianity
in any one of them, than apple-juice in that stone.But
we must bear in mind that the world had fallen, before the
Church fell; and it was to repair the effects of this first Fall,
that Christ appeared on the Earth; let us return to him. He
came to renew love, and reinstate men in a pure and happy
condition.
But how could men love if they were as you describe
them?
Man never wholly loses his capacity for loving. The
natural susceptibility to goodness and truth can never be
extinguished
.
Our powers are perverted, not destroyed. In
fact, there have been holy, loving people in the world, true
Christians, in all times, all countries, all Churches, among all
religions, and all nations. Such have sometimes been kings,
and occupied thrones, they have been outcasts from society,
and buried in dungeons. Among princes and peasants, the
affluent and the poor, the learned and the ignorant, aristocrats
and plebeians, have appeared from time to time sincere and
earnest
lovers of God and man. Some sympathy with Christ exists
in all minds, either latent or active.
Christ came on his high embassage with credentials of an
authoritative and remarkable character. He was the brightness
of the glory of God, and the express image of his person.
Indeed
,
He and the Father were one. He received, he tells us,
all power from God. He was baptized of the Holy Spirit.
He was proclaimed the beloved and well-pleasing Son of God.
He had gone through the experience of life, he had studied the
human mind in its every phase, he understood the condition of
men, and was prepared for the exigences of his lot. The
thirty years of his life had not been spent in idleness. The
effect of his address was electrical. Cities poured forth their
population to him, and the country was deserted of its
inhabitants
gone in pursuit of him. The multitudes that thronged
him were so great no house could contain them, and he was
obliged to resort to the open air and spoke sometimes from a
hill-side, sometimes from a boat moored by the shore. But,
as I have intimated, his course was not without trial and
obstacle
.
His success it was in part that contributed to his
unhappiness
,
and precipitated his death. The common people
heard him gladly; and this aroused the jealousies of the higher
orders, who became his unrelenting antagonists. With covert
insinuation and open assault they pursued him, and by their
intrigues at last brought him to the cross.
Let me speak of what he did, of the spirit of his action and
the secret of his effect. Fresh and glowing he came from the
bosom of Heaven. His heart yearned for man as for a brother.
His sympathies were ardent, profuse and forth-putting. His
hopes were high and bright. He spared himself neither
privations
,
self-denials, inconveniences, disrepute or toil. He gave
himself for our ransom, his whole self, body and mind, his
thought, his sagacity, his activity, his health, his time, his
knowledge, his popularity, his example, in fact all he had or
was, even to life itself; he consented that by his stripes we
should be healed, by his death we should live, and shed his
blood to wash away our sins. He was gentle and tender, the
bruised reed he would not break, or the smoking flax quench.
Wherever arose one feeblest aspiration to God he was prepared
to foment and cherish it. He made an open door of his
compassionate
feelings, and invited to himself all who labored and
were heavy laden with sin and evil. He did not join in the
common execrations of men, or approve their punitive
severities
;
he saw something excellent in the vilest, he would
win by love the most ruffianish, and the profligate he bade `Go,
and sin no more.' When he was reviled he reviled not again,
and when he suffered, he threatened not. If he received an
injury he did not retaliate, but committed himself, Peter says,
`to him that judgeth righteously,' that is, to God.
And here we see the high moral perfection of Christ; he
had so disciplined his spirit, he was so preoccupied with love,
he was so magnanimously considerate, that enmity and
aversion
,
which in most breasts give rise to corresponding qualities,
in his excited only kindness and favor. Here also discovers
itself his sublime Heroism, that he stood unshaken before all
22
moral assaults, and faced undaunted every moral danger. Yet
he was one of the strongest sensibilities; he wept like a child
in pure sympathy with the distresses of his friends. He `took
upon himself our infirmities,' and if sensitiveness be an
infirmity
,
he possessed it equally with the rest of us. The insane,
those who were chained, imprisoned and under keepers, and
who in their paroxysms were ungovernable and dangerous, he
approached freely, became very familiar with in love, and
expelled the delusion that possessed them. The miraculous
power with which he was endowed he employed in ways most
instructive and beneficial. He gave sight to the blind, hearing
to the deaf, strength to the weak, and health to the sick. He
did not consult what was expedient, but pursued what was
right, and broke the popular Sabbath, an exceedingly bold act,
and one that nearly cost him his life. Yet he was not harsh
and sweeping in his movement; he was sparing of those
feelings
which are deep because they belong to our childhood, of
convictions that are honest because they are all we possess,
and of forms of public life to which a long antiquity imparts
an air of reverence; and he would not see the Temple of the
Jews mercenarily profaned. The spirit of the Goth and
Vandal
was most remote from Jesus. God he called his Heavenly
Father, and sought to create a near and filial relation with the
Divinity. Man he called his brother, and in all he would
find fathers, mothers, brothers, sisters. Little children, what
is unparalleled in all religions, he took in his arms and
blessed
.
National, local, and geographical antipathies he sought
to correct, and strove to unite all men on a common footing of
brotherhood; and the Samaritans, who were regarded by his
own people the Jews as the offscouring of all things, he
demonstrated
both by precept and example to be deserving a common
friendship and love.
That is what Mr. Lovers said about the Freemasons,
interposed Margaret, and Isabel and I were so smitten we
determined to join them right off, and went to the Master, but
he said they did not admit women.
Freemasonry, replied Mr. Evelyn, is a partial good. It
recognizes every man as a brother who is a Mason, but Christ
recognized every one as a brother who was a man. Woman
shared equally in his sympathies, and was embraced by his love.
The motto of Masonry, Faith, Hope and Charity, is a fragment
borrowed from the Gospels. Freemasonry in some of our States
excludes the black; Jew and Gentile, Barbarian and Scythian,
male and female, bond and free, are one in Christ.He was
invidiously styled the Friend of Sinners, because he
maintained
a kindly intercourse with those whom the world despised;
he dined with Pharisees, the chief men of the nation, that
he might understand their position, and be better able to meet
their wants. Certain leaders of the people were the only
ones whom he seems ever to have addressed with severity, and
that not from any hostility, but because they appeared to him
wholly dissolute and abandoned; yet his language, in the
original, savors more of a lament than a proscription. I cannot
tell you all he did. In the expressive words of one of his
disciples
`he went about doing good.'
I thank you for what you have told me, said Margaret.
Christ certainly seems to me the most wonderful being of
whom I have ever heard. I have read about Plato,
Anaxagoras
,
Socrates, Epaminondas, Diogenes, Seneca, Cicero, Cato,
Numa, Confucius, Budha, Manco Capac, and others, who
interested
me a great deal, but nothing seemed like this.
I have not told you half, replied Mr. Evelyn. I have
only spoken of what he
did
. How can I describe the greatest,
most excelling part of him, what he
was!
It is a small thing
to say that he was affable, generous, honorable, brave,
warm-hearted
,
truthful, discreet, wise, talented, disinterested,
self-denying
,
patient, exemplary, temperate, consistent, charitable,
industrious, frugal, hospitable, compassionate, and such like.
He was meek and lowly in heart, and that with more
incentives
to arrogance and pride than ever fell to the lot of one
individual
;
he was forbearing when a precept of his religion
demanded an eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth; his affection
was universal, while the sentiment and practice of his people
condemned intercourse with other nations; he was self-relying
in a community ruled by tradition and resting on prescription;
he was pacific where war was sanctioned and encouraged; he
was free in a world of bondage, he was spiritual in a world of
forms, he was great in a world of littleness, he was a God in a
world of men. His intrinsic nobility rose above meanness and
subterfuge, and if he ever withheld all he thought, it was
because
he would not cast his pearls before swine. He was
frank without bluntness, courteous without guile, familiar
without
vulgarity, liberal without licentiousness. He combined
tenderness of feeling with rigor of principle, harmlessness with
wisdom, simplicity with greatness, faith with works. He
fellowshipped
man without countenancing sin, he mingled in all
classes of society without losing his singleness of character.
In him were harmonized the opposite extremes of trust and
independence
,
forethought and impulse, plain common sense
and the highest spirituality, theory and practice, intuition and
reflection, cheerfulness and piety, toil and refinement, candor
and enthusiasm; he was lord of lords and king of kings, and
the companion of peasants and confidant of the obscure. He
was eloquent and persuasive, yet his voice was not heard in the
streets, he had no boisterous tones, no demagogical manner;
he discoursed of the highest truths, yet his language was so
simple, the people were astonished at the gracious words that
proceeded out of his mouth; God-possessed as he was,
all-engrossing
as was the object he had in view, and preoccupied as
we must suppose his attention to have been, he was ever alive
and fresh to the beauty and suggestiveness of nature, and the
falling rain, a flying sparrow, the bursting wheat, the luxuriant
mustard, the blooming vine, the evening twilight, the clouds of
heaven, wells of water in the deserts of the East, oxen and
sheep, a hen brooding over her chickens, all things about him
left their impression in his heart, and became the illustrators
of his doctrine. Considering the fervid Oriental
imagination
,
the perspicuous chasteness and emphatic directness of his
style, adapted to all climates and people, is not a little
remarkable
.
Made in all things like his brethren, he was still one
whom the offer of empire did not flatter, or a houseless night
dishearten. His miraculous power he used unostentatiously
and sparingly; and with no other intent than the good of man
and the glory of God. You have asked if he was not
Beautiful
;
he was superlatively so. In the translation it reads the
Good Shepherd; but here and elsewhere in the original
Gospels
a term is employed by which the Greeks denoted the
highest description of Beauty, and if the public mind were
not debased, we should understand what is meant when it is
said, he is the Beautiful Shepherd. Yet it is not mere beauty
of color or features, but something from within that expresses
itself in the face.
I remember, said Margaret, that look; his eyes were
fair, his hair and countenance; but there was something
behind
,
deeper, like music in the night, like the shining of a fish in
the water, like a nasturtion flowering under its green leaves.
Something like that; it glowed in his look and illuminated
his manner. The hidden source of his Beauty was Love;
and once, as his Love increased, as he became more and more
perfect through his sufferings, when his spirit had completely
passed through the veil of his flesh, this inward Beauty shone
out in a most wonderful way; and in connection with the
splendor of God which answered to it at the moment,
constitutes
a striking scene known as the Transfiguration, which
you will read. That same look melted one wicked man to
tears, and felled to the ground some brutal soldiers.
Do explain to me one thing; in one of my dreams were
three girls, whom I knew to be Faith, Hope and Charity,
because
I had seen pictures of them. They created a fourth
whom I called Beauty, because it could be nothing else but
that. Yet you say Beauty comes from Love.
That Charity, replied Mr. Evelyn, is none other than
Love. It is an evangelical term, and there again our
translators
committed a blunder when they rendered it Charity, who
is none other than an alms-giver. But Love, as Christ would
have it, is something entirely different, greater than Faith or
Hope, the greatest of all things, and from it comes true
Beauty. As David desired to behold the Beauty of the Lord,
so that of Christ was not without its effect in the rapid spread
of his doctrine; he was altogether lovely. The grace of your
Venus, the symmetry of your Apollo, the colors of flowers,
the brilliancy of gems, pass with me as nothing compared
with the Moral Beauty of Christ. Apollo is a perfect material
form; Christ a perfect moral soul. What Apollo is in the
galleries of Art, Christ is in the galleries of Spirit. The
Apollo comprises all the bodily excellences of men, Christ all
their moral excellences. There is some worth, some virtue
in every human being; in Christ these all united and made a
harmonious whole. The Apollo, as I told you, represented
the higher operations of Nature; Christ represented the
higher operations of God; or as I might say, the Apollo
represented
the natural attributes of God, Christ his moral
attributes
.
By as much as the statue of Apollo differs from the
image of Brahma, by so much does Christ differ from Plato.
I have thought sometimes, said Margaret, of Regulus
going back to the Carthaginians,wasn't that an unexampled
act? of Codrus and Eubule sacrificing themselves for their
country
,
of Epaminondas's magnanimity, Arrius's integrity,
Evephenus's
truthfulness; and Oh! how I have wished to get away
from Christians, sit down on a stump in the groves of the
Academy
and hear Plato preach, or squat with Diogenes in his tub and
listen to his railings. When the Master laughs about people,
and I ask him who is good, he says, `The Seven Wise Men
of Greece.' I am sure there was some virtue in those days
yetI know not what to say.
If you intend a comparison, replied Mr. Evelyn, it
22*
were easy to prove, if you put me upon that, that Christ differs
from those to whom you have referred, toto clo, by the greatest
possible distance. True, they possessed many virtues, but
what you would glean from a whole antiquity seems to me
aggregated
in Christ. There may be some analogy between
Christ and them, but no similitude. How this matter stands
you will see when I have said all I shall say about him.
Besides
,
regarding Regulus for instance, there seems to be no
basis of comparison, they do not stand upon any common
footing
.
Among fallen men there exist certain notions of
rectitude
,
which go by the name of honor. It is a familiar saying,
there is honor among thieves. The Romans and
Carthaginians
were fallen men, they made war upon each other, they
were mutual pillagers, incendiaries, liars, assassins. Yet they
retained this sentiment of honor. Regulus indeed, true to
his word, went back, even when he knew it would cost him his
life, a noble act; yet he was put to death by those whom he
had just before been trying to kill, and possibly by the friends
of those whom his own sword had pierced. Then, in
retaliation
,
the Carthaginians in Rome were by the public authority
barbarously tortured.
I see, I see, rejoined Margaret. I did not think of
comparison
.
Only those noble deeds detached from everything
else, have lain in my mind, as things very beautiful. And
while you were speaking they rose up vividly.
Christ's was no dependent, distorted, or relative
excellence
,
continued Mr. Evelyn; he was not conspicuous
because
he stood a head taller than his countrymen. He was
excellent from the sole of his foot upwards. He was
absolutely
and rudimentally great, and would have appeared so
equally alone, or with a million. He was un-fallen; he did
not stand upon a platform of depravity, and exhibit how much
excellence was compatible therewith. He stood upon a
platform
of pure goodness, and shows how beautiful it is.
Regulus
aided in carrying on the wicked purposes of the world,
Christ contemplated regenerating the whole world.
Epaminondas
was made great by the vices of his countrymen, Christ
from his own inherent Life. Plato maintained that fire is a
pyramid tied to the earth by numbers; Christ is guilty of no
philosophical absurdity, and what is not a little noticeable is
this, that while he pursued the track of high, transcendent
truth, he does not exhibit the slightest tinge of those
metaphysical
speculations that prevailed in his time. Plato travelled
into Egypt in pursuit of knowledge, Christ into the region of
himself. Plato borrows from the Brahmins. What absence
of that anagogical, all-prevalent, all-winsome Brahminism in
Christ! Socrates, the wise, beneficent and pious, lifted a
bloody arm against his fellow men. Thales thanked God he
was born a man, not a woman; a Greek, not a Barbarian.
Solon ordered robbery to be punished with death.
Anaxagoras
,
when he was old and poor, wrapped himself in his cloak,
and resolved to die of hunger. These were all stars in the
night time, worthy of admiration, and pleasant to go to sleep
under. Christ seems to me a Morning Sun.
Keep to Christ, I can afford to forget all others, a while
at least.
It is after all by approximations we know Christ, not by
any comprehension. We must rest content to paddle about
in the inlets of this great ocean. Consider his intellectual
character`he knew what was in man,' his biographer
declares
.
He had not books or teachers; he worked at his
father's bench; he had never, as I believe, travelled farther
than from Nazareth to Jerusalem, and his doctrine savors as
little of Jewish hagiography as it does of the lore of the
Rabbins
;
and well was it asked, `How knoweth this man letters,
having never learned?' He studied his own mysterious
nature
,
his own manifold necessities, his own disposition; and
by thus first knowing himself, he knew all men. Through
himself he read the race. That love, which is the secret sap
of the soul, by which our being enlarges itself, the faculties
grow apace like the arms of an oak, the knots of thought are
loosened, and a clear shining intellectual vision is attained, he
possessed in unbounded measure. He did God's will, and
therefore knew of the doctrine. He grew in wisdom, and
love added to his insight and fortified his reason. He was
pure in heart, and thus saw God. Christ is perfectly adapted
to man, as a well-adjusted piece of carpentry, as light to the
eye, as air to the lungs, as musical notes to a musical ear. He,
the prototypal Diapason of the race, studying himself, and
man in himself, so strikes a chord that vibrates to every heart.
Christ was a genius, one without compeer or parallel, a
spiritual
genius; not of the Homeric, Phydian, or Praxitelean
order, but of his own most singular, most exalted kind. A
sculptor, from the several beauties found in a collection of
human bodies, gives you a beautiful material statue; Christ
gives you a beautiful spirit. A sculptor from his own Ideal
produces a beautiful Form; Christ from his Ideal produces
beautiful Men. A sculptor sometimes succeeds in throwing
passion, action, a soul into marble; Christ threw a soul into
man. Art explains nature to man; Christ explained God to
man. His power was strictly creative, as it was rare and
benign
.
A spiritual landscape painted he, that no Claude could
equal. Indeed such an impression had his disciples of his
productive energy, that by him they say `the worlds were
made.' A new Heaven and a new Earth created he. Christ
was, if we are willing to apply to him modern terms, both Art
and an Artist. He was in himself the fairest, self-wrought,
divine creation. Then patiently, studiously, lovingly, he went
on to form new creations. In Love lies all Artistic energy;
from the highest love proceeds the highest work. Praxiteles,
in the composition of his Venus, is said to have been inspired
by the presence of a beautiful female. Christ needed no
other inspiration than what his own beautiful heart could
furnish
.
But I must delay on this till I have said some other things.
Having all too meagrely spoken of him in himself, I will
speak of him in his relation to God. The Soul of the
Universe
entered into his soul, and was cherished there. The
Spirit of God, as a dove, descended and rested upon him. In
him dwelt the fulness of the Godhead bodily. He is called
the only begotten Son of God. With a nature harmonious in
all things with God, God himself sympathised, and he dwelt
in God, and God in him. The Word became flesh. He
was the Bread of God, he was a Vine of the Father's
planting
;
he was Emmanuel, God with us. But of what chiefly
interests us, his relation to man, I will tell you. In this
respect we learn much of Christ from his immediate
successors
,
called Apostles, in whom is seen the Ideal of Christ as it
were projected, and who manifest in effect what he held in
purpose. `As he was, so are we in this world,' they declare.
This expresses the gist of the matter. Whatever he himself
was he designed man to become. God sent him into the world,
through him to restore his own fallen image. He was made
perfect, that through his perfection we might become perfect.
He would restore us by the infusion of himself, by re-uniting
man with his spirit, his holiness, his love. His wish and
prayer were that we together with him might become one with
God. He announced
himself
the Way, the Truth, the Life.
He did not
teach
, he
was
the Resurrection and the Life, and
those who were dead in trespasses and sins heard his voice,
came forth from their graves and lived. `Take up your Cross
and follow me,' were his words; `eat me,' `live on me.' As
he laid down his life for us, so are we directed to lay down
our lives for the brethren. `I travail,' says one, `till Christ
be formed in you.' `Christ in us' is the Mystery of
Revelation
.
`We die daily;' `we live, yet not we, but Christ lives
in us.' As he forgave, so are we to forgive. The same mind
that was in him is to be in us. As he suffered without the
gate, so are we to go forth, bearing his reproach. We are
crucified together with him. As he died to sin, so do we.
As he was a sacrifice, so are we to offer our bodies living
sacrifices
.
He suffered, leaving us an example. If we imitate
his Passion, we shall reign with him. The Glory which God
gave him, he says, he gives his disciples. Greater works than
he did he declares they shall do. So perfect was this
contemplated
identity that he says, He who receives you receives
me; and it was even declared, that he who sinned against a
brother, sinned against Christ. This inner, received Christ,
Paul declared, worked in him mightily. Through him, thus
received, we escape the pollutions of the world. His blood,
his doctrine, his spirit, his death, his whole self, washes away
our sins. As he is holy, so we become holy. We are
partakers
of the divine nature. He is to us a Moral Revelation of
God; as there is a Natural Revelation in the material creation.
He embodies, and sets forth the Moral attributes of God. So
he came into the world, as it were, suffused with the
effulgence
of God, raying out with love, benignity, paternal
affection
.
He addressed himself to human sympathies, I mean to
that power of which we were speaking, of reciprocating the
feelings and passions of another; to that susceptibility of truth
and goodness which exists in all minds. This was the medium
whereby he would communicate himself to man. He relied
upon the spirit of God to second and bless his labors. He
would uncurb the well-spring of love that is found in every
soul, and let its waters flow out over the earth. He begins
with saying, `Repent,' or in the original, Change your minds,
Reflect upon yourselves. In the only discourse of any length
which remains to us, he pronounces the Beatitudes, which I
hope you will soon read. His object is the salvation of man;
he is called the Saviour, because he shall save his people from
their sins. In the revival, development, and extension of love,
he would bring men to holiness; in becoming holy, sin is
expelled
and forgiven; in the expulsion of sin, Hell both as an
experience and a destiny ceases, and Heaven is secured. On
the deep, eternal foundations of Nature he would erect the
superstructure of Grace. He came mature in preparation,
flushing with hope, dexterous for attempt. He looked with
loving eyes to behold loving eyes in return, he spake in
kindness
to be greeted with kindness, his warm heart would be
met by warm hearts, his lofty purposes would kindle lofty
purposes
,
his holy life shall stimulate a holy life, his gentle rebuke
shall react in penitence, his pity shall arouse from despair. As
by a conjuror's touch he shall awaken the dead soul of the world.
His Divine Spirit propagating itself, the image of God shall
reappear
in the face of man. He, the Heavenly Sculptor, works
on rocky souls, and with his chisel fashions a form of immortal
beauty. Thousands upon thousands heard his voice and lived.
The stately Pharisee, the unknown rustic, and the despised
foreigner
became his converts. To his resurrection from sin and
sense, fashion and fortune, multitudes strove to attain; many
vied in his crucifixion; by the new and living way through the
veil, that is, the flesh, the carnal and self-indulgent denied
themselves to enter. A living, sympathetic response to Christ
arose in John and Peter, Martha and Mary, and hosts. A
splendid Ideal had he, which he called the Kingdom of
Heaven
;
the reproduction of himself among men he spoke of as
his coming again; the reappearance of Virtue and Peace,
Truth and Righteousness, he described as the clouds of
Heaven
and Angels of God. Such was his Ideal of Truth, that
while he says he himself judged no one, he expected
that
would judge the world, condemn sin, and extirpate it forever;
and those who possessed this truth he speaks of as standing
upon thrones. The ordinary magistracy of man would be
supplanted, and all iniquity flee away before the brightness of
his Advent. Such is the scheme of Redemption, so called;
a scheme or plan, originating with God, executed by Christ,
fostered by the Holy Spirit, energetic through human
sympathies
and affections; a method, as we are graphically told, `of
redeeming unto Christ a peculiar people, zealous of good
works,' of instituting a `Church without spot or blemish.'
Let me now explain some of your troublesome `anagogics.'
The Atonement is the union of man with God through Christ
by the reproduction of Christ in us; the Trinity is this
tri-fold
union, God, Christ and Man; Faith, a Saving or
Evangelical
Faith, or Believing in Christ, is taking Christ to
yourself
in this living and warm way, receiving his spirit into your
spirit, his feelings into your feelings, his character into your
character, whereby his whole self becomes grafted upon, and
fused into yourself. Sanctification or Holiness is the
subsidence
and departure of sin in proportion as you thus receive
Christ. Justification is God's approval of you; Adoption is
becoming a member of the great Divine family.
This is
Christianity!
The regeneration of the world went on well
for a while; the spirit and power of Christ reached many
nations
;
Christism survived a few years after his death, when,
alas! the dog returned to his vomit, and the sow that was
washed to her wallowing in the mire. The Church began its
Fall in the second century; Christians became degraded into
the ways of the world, the forms of Judaism were revived, a
false philosophy was introduced, and sacerdotal and imperial
ambition finished the work. With Constantine in the fourth
century, the union of the Cross and the Sword was complete,
and in the name of Christ, Christian nations have gullied the
earth with the blood they have spilt, and rent the skies with
the yells of mutual massacre.
I must ask you one question, said Margaret. How
came the first man to fall?
That question belongs to a subject of the most subtle
nature
,
the prime origin of Evil, which I must take some other
time to discuss.
I know you are tired, but let me ask you how these wicked
things could be done in the name of Christ?
That name has been perpetuated, although so great was
its abuse that in the seventh century a new sect arose who are
now called Mohammedans. The solitary divine virtue
immanent
in Christ has ever found a response in the heart of
humanity
;
and such was the original majestic effect of his name,
that it has served as a convenient basis for delusion, error and
sin, craft, avarice and pride, to raise their fabrics upon.
Besides
,
the Gospels, handed down from age to age, have been
held in nominal reverence.
You mentioned the name of Mary?
Yes, there were two Marys, one of whom was so affected
by Christ, that she washed his feet with her tears, and wiped
them with the hairs of her head.
You have said the last word; I have no more questions.
Sweet sister Mary! my name too is Mary. Oh Tony, Tony!
Your profession is done in a way you little wotted of. Toupee,
tyetop, pomatum, powdermy hair goes for a towel to wipe
Christ's feet with. My handkerchief cannot hold my tears,
they go to do Mary's service too! I have not understood, Sir,
all you have said, but it is enough, enough; I am filled to
distention
,
I can bear no more. Apollo, Diana, Orpheus, are
you scared? Have you hid under the bushes? Dear little
Gods and Goddesses all, don't be frightened,Christ won't
hurt us. They have been beautiful and true to me, he will
love them for that, won't he, Mr. Evelyn? Christ shall
preside
over us, I will worship him. It is late, I thank you, I
bless you, Mr. Evelyn, I must go, I would be alone. But the
names must be changed. Bacchus Hill shall be Christ's Hill,
Orpheus' Pond, his Pond. He shall be supreme; Head, Pond
and all, shall henceforth be called
Mons Christi
.
CHAPTER IV.
SUNDRY MATTERS.
Another
day found Mr. Evelyn at the Pond, and with
Margaret, on the Head, now called Mons Christi.
The name which this eminence has commonly borne,
said Mr. Evelyn, together with the broad forest about, bring
strongly, I may say, mournfully to recollection, the original
population, the Indians, I mean.
What do you know about them? asked Margaret.
If we may rely on accounts written when they and the
whites first met as friends, before a mutual hostility
exasperated
the judgment of the historian, and disordered the
conduct
of the natives, we shall form a pleasing picture of their
character and condition. `These people,' the New England
Indians, say the first discoverers, `are exceeding courteous,
gentle of disposition, and well-conditioned; for shape of body
and lovely favor they excel all the people of America; of
stature much higher than we. They are quick-eyed and
steadfast in their looks, fearless of others' harms, as intending
none themselves; some of the meaner sort given to filching.
Their women are fat and well-favored, and the men are very
dutiful towards them. The wholesomeness and temperature
of the climate doth argue them to be of a perfect constitution
of body, active, strong, healthful and very witty, as sundry
toys of theirs, very cunningly wrought, may easily witness.'
A friendly intercourse was had with them in those days,
`and,' say the whites, `in great love we parted.' They are
universally represented as kind-hearted, hospitable, grateful,
truthful, simple, chaste. Property was never more secure
than with them, bolts and bars they had none on their doors,
and one vice that gangrenes Christian nations, was unknown
amongst them, they never offered indignity to woman; they
were also, in respect of drinks, a very temperate people.
They possessed more virtues and fewer vices than Christians.
But when in the process of time their young men were
pirated into slavery, their population was thinned by the
introduction
of new immedicable diseases, intemperance shed its
baneful influence, inflaming their passions and corrupting their
morals, the mercenariness of border intercourse alternately
cajoled and defrauded them, their several sovereignties were
drawn into destructive collision, and their entire strength
became the game of a foreign and unknown intrigue; when
the disposition of the settlers was more clearly ascertained,
the pressure of civilized policy began to tighten about them,
and they grew sensible of the value of what they had in their
simplicity surrendered; and when in the contest that ensued
between the two powers, they were driven to every resort, for
the defence of their rights, the recovery of their empire and
the preservation of existence itself, they assume a new
attitude
,
as all men do in similar circumstances. They exhibit a
melancholy instance of the reflex, reciprocal action of evil,
agreeably to a law that we before talked about. And yet, if
we would give to their revenge the name of reprisals, call
their subtlety and cunning military manouvres, their hatred
patriotic pride, if we would render their ferocity gallant
behavior
,
record their cruelties as vigorous measures for
disarming
an enemy, and if instead of distinguishing them as
savages, we should write them simply Americans, they would
not appear very unlike other people of the globe.
It is not so bad a thing for me to be called an Indian after
all, said Margaret. Yesterday I felt that I was a
Christian
,
I don't know but I had better remain an Indian.
I told you there was a difference between Ecclesiastical
Christians and Evangelical Christians.
I would call myself a Christoid, a Christman, or anything.
I wanted to tell you how glad I was I persuaded Nimrod, my
brother, not to enlist, when they were about, awhile since,
after soldiers to go against the Indians on the Ohio.
Poor Indians! We have driven them from their reserves
in the West, and they may at last be compelled to take refuge
in the forests of the Mississippi, or even to cross its waters for
defence!
23
I know one Indian, said Margaret, an old man, who
comes here every year, and has come almost since I can
remember. He lives in the blue yonder, on the sides of
Umkiddin. He looks very old, as if he had seen a hundred
years. Yet he is tall and straight, has fine muscular
proportions
,
and passes the house with a taught, Junonian step. He
comes and sits up here. He makes his annual return in dry,
yellow Autumn, when the frosts have fallen and the leaves
change and drop. He is silent almost as Jupiter himself, and
I cannot get much out of him. His expression is majestically
sad. He sometimes brings a little girl with him, whom I have
more than once induced to play with me. She says he is her
grandfather. Here he sits in a sort of brown study, and
muses over the water and wood. His hair is tied in a knot
behind, and surmounted with a coronet of white heron's
feathers; he wears a robe of tambored deer-skin. I have seen
him stop and listen to Chilion's music, and once the girl gave
me a pair of beaded moccasins, in return, I suppose, for some
of my bread and cider.
He is probably a relic of the departed race, and comes to
look upon the home of his ancestors. He may have lived
hereabouts. A distinguished tribe of Indians formerly
occupied
the borders of the River. They always selected the
most fertile and picturesque spots for their residences. And
truly this was a goodly heritage of theirs. The Connecticut,
the Merrimack, the Kennebec, the Penobscot were their noble
rivers. The early voyagers whom I have quoted to you seem
to have found the lost Eden. `This main,' say they, `is the
goodliest continent that we ever saw. The land is replenished
with fair fields, and in them fragrant flowers, also meadows,
and hedged in with stately groves, being furnished with
brooks of sweet water, and large rivers.' Their woods
abounded in beasts of the chase, their rivers in valuable fish.
They raised corn in their meadows, beans, peas, pumpkins and
melons in their gardens. They had plums, cherries and
grapes. The Indian children gathered strawberries in the
Spring, and whortleberries in the Fall. Their maidens found
violets, lilies-of-the-valley, and numerous flowers in the fields
and forests. God they called by various names, Squanto,
Kishton, Manitou, Areouski.
What a pity they should not be here still; and II would
willingly be not.
They were not always at peace among themselves. The
Maquas, an imperious race, did much harm to the others, and
threatened universal supremacy. But they are gone. For
reasons which we cannot well understand the red gives place
to the white man. With their wigwams and canoes, their
Gods and their pawwas, their government and titles, their
language and manners, they have vanished forever. No trace
of them remains, except in the names of a few localities.
The way is cleared for a new population, a new religion, new
society, new life. We wait to see what will be done. New
England is swept and garnished. It is an unencumbered
region.
Do I live in New England?
Yes, you are a New Englander.
Mehercule! I thought I lived anywhere between the sky
and this most anagogical rotundity, and have been
entertaining
my later years with soap-bubbling a few DivinitiesI
will
be serious, Mr. Evelyn, I do know the realities of things.
But how the Gods chase one another over the world, Manitou,
Jupiter, Jehovah! Are not New Englanders like Old
Englanders
,
and Old Englanders like the Hindoos?
Men are all formed of one blood; yet there are specific
differences. But God is one, and if New Englanders were
pure in heart, as Christ says, they would see him, and that
more truly perhaps than any other people. Yet many of them
ascribe acts to their God which would disgrace a heathen
deity. This results from the debased state of the public
mind; or rather I should say from the debased doctrines of a
fallen church which have been transmitted to us. Still in
many respects we have an advantage over all other nations,
which it is worth your while to think of.
I am glad to hear anything you say.
A good part of the Old World on its passage to the New
was lost overboard. Our ancestors were very considerably
cleansed by the dashing waters of the Atlantic. We have no
monarchical supremacy, no hereditary prerogatives, no patent
nobility, no Kings, and but few Bishops, by especial Divine
interposition. The gift of God is with the virtuous and
truthful
.
`All men are equal,' is our favorite motto; and it is one
of far-piercing, greatly humanizing, radically reforming force,
though now but little understood. Many things that affect
character and condition in the Old World, adulterate truth,
perpetuate error, degrade society and life, sully the soul, and
retard improvement, we have not. I intend to take a trip
thither soon, and shall see what they are of and for.
Are you going away?
My health and taste both require a sea-voyage, which I
shall make as soon as Bonaparte and Mr. Pitt settle their
differences a little.There are no fairies in our meadows, and
no elves to spirit away our children. Our wells are drugged
by no saint, and of St. Winifred we have never heard. Our
rivers harbor no nereids, they run on the Sabbath, and are all
sacred alike, Mill Brook as the Ganges; and there is no
reason why the Pond of Mons Christi should not become as
celebrated
as the Lake of Zurich. In the clefts of our rocks abide
the souls of no heroes, no spirits of the departed inhabit our
hills, nor are our mountains the seats of any Gods; Olympus,
Sinai, Othus, Pico-Adam, Umkiddin, Washington,
Monadnock
,
Holyoke, Ktaadin, it is all one. The Valley of the
Housatonic is beautiful as the Vale of Tempe, or of Cashmere,
and as oracular. We have no resorts for pilgrims, no shrines
for the devout, no summits looking into Paradise. We have no
traditions, legends, fables, and scarcely a history. Our
galleries
are no cenotaphic burial grounds of ages past; we have no
Haddon Hall, or Raby Castle Kitchen; no chapels or abbeys,
no broken arches, no castled crags. You find these woods as
inspiring as those of Etruria or Mamre. Robin-Good-Fellow
is unknown, and the Devil haunts our theology not our
houses, and I see in the last edition of the Primer his tail is
entirely abridged. No hideous Ghosts appear at
cock-crowing
.
Witches have quite vanished, and omens from sneezing
and itching must soon follow. At least in all these things
there is a sensible change in the public mind. If the girls put
wedding-cake under their pillows to dream upon, it is rather
sport than magic. Astrology, Alchemy, Physiognomy and
Necromancy are fast dying out, and Animal Magnetism has
not ventured to cross the sea. January and May are not, as
in the Old World, unlucky months, and Friday is rapidly
losing its evil eye. At marriages the bride is not obliged to
throw her shoe at the company; at births, we have no Ragged
Shirt or Groaning Cheese; if a child die unbaptized, it is not
thought to wander in woods and solitudes; at deaths our
common
people do not cover up the looking-glasses.
Ecclesiastical
Holidays have a precarious hold on New Englanders;
curses are not denounced upon sinners, Ash Wednesday; we
have no Whitsuntide given to bearbaiting, drunkenness and
profligacy; Trinity Sunday our bachelors do not kiss our
maidens three times in honor of that mystery; bread baked
on Christmas eve turns mouldy as soon as any other; we are
not obliged to use tansy to purge our stomachs of fish eaten
in Lent. In our church-yards bodies are buried on the North
as well as the South side. There is no virtue in the points of
compass that our clergy repeat the Creed looking towards the
East, and none in wood that we bow to the Altar. All these
things our Fathers left behind in England, or they were
brushed away by contact with the thick, spiny forests of
America. Our atmosphere is transparent, unoccupied, empty
from the bottom of our wells to the zenith, and throughout
the entire horizontal plane. It has no superstitious
inhabitancy
,
no darkening prevalence, no vague magistracy, no
Manichean bisection. As you say, Manitou is gone, and with
due courtesy to your Pantheon, the One God supervenes;
there is no Intermediation but Christ, and for man, the bars
are let down. Our globe stands on no elephant, but swings
clear in open boundless space; it is trammeled by no Northern
Snake, and circumvented by no Oriental Sea of Milk. We
have no Hindoo Caste, and Negro Slavery is virtually extinct
in New England. Education is universally encouraged, and
Freedom of Opinion tolerated.
So you think New Englanders are the best people on the
Earth?
I think they might become such; or rather I think they
might lead the August Procession of the race to Human
Perfectibility
;
that here might be revealed the Coming of the
Day of the Lord, wherein the old Heavens of sin and error
should be dissolved, and a New Heavens and New Earth be
established, wherein dwelleth righteousness. I see nothing to
prevent them reassuming the old Hyperionic type, rising head
and shoulders to the clouds, crowding out Jupiter and Mars,
Diana and Venus, being filled, as the Apostle says, with all
the fulness of God, reaching the stature of perfect men in
Christ Jesus, and reimpressing upon the world the lost image
of its Maker. New England! my birth-place, my chosen
pilgrimage, I love it. I love its earth and its sky, and the
souls of its people. They, the Unconquerable, could alone
subdue its ruggedness, and they are alone worthy to enjoy its
amenities. I love the old folks and the children; I love the
enterprise of its youth and honorable toil of its manhood. I
love its snows and its grass, its hickory fires and its
cornbread
.
The seeds of infinite good, of eternal truth, are
already sown in many minds; these might germinate in
another generation, and in the third bear fruit. High
Calculation
,
which is only the symbol of a higher Moral Sense, is
even now at work; and they are ripping up the earth for a
23*
Canal from Worcester to Providence; and what shall next be
done, who knows. Only, if love lay at the heart of all things,
thought and action, what might not be! But how stint we
ourselves! Politics, society, life, the church, love, aim, what
are they all!
Why don't you lead off yourself in this matter? You
shall be a Hero, the days of Chivalry shall be renewed.
I! I have neither health nor spirit. I only perceive, I
only deplore.
Really, we must go to the Widow's without delay, and
get some of the Nommernisstortumbug, that will cure you.
Speaking of the Widow, I think of Rose, poor Rose. I
asked her to come with me and see you to-day; she hesitated,
and declined. I told her you would speak better to her than
anybody else. She shook her head mournfully, and said,
`Only you, Margaret, only you!' What can we do for her?
I do not know, I am sure, I have turned over the account
you gave me of her. I am persuaded she has some chord
that could be reached, some secret self to be disclosed.
Can you send me for no hammer that will break her to
pieces?
Christ might reach her, if nothing else.
Oh no. She has a perfect horror of that name. She
hates it, worse than I did; I only laughed at it, she seems to
loathe it inwardly. Said I, `Rose, Christ loves you, he
suffered
for you, can't you have faith in him?'`Gracious
Heavens!' she broke out `if you won't kill me, Margaret,
don't speak of that,' and so shut my mouth, and I could say
no more.
I think I see how it is; I believe I understand the
difficulty
,
so far at least as that demonstration is concerned.
I can very well understand how a person might not like
the name of Christ, how it might offend one; but that it
should give a shuddering pain is quite beyond my
comprehension
.
Be good and kind to Rose, and she may yet listen to
you.
I have borne her deep in my heart, I have felt most
strange motions towards her, I am ready to melt and flow into
her, and much sorrowful feeling she gives me, and I am
willing
to have for her.
Persevere, and I am confident she will yield. I might say
many things of what
I think
about her, but perhaps it were of
no use. I am willing to leave her with you, though if it were
in my power I should be glad to see her. When shall I find
you at leisure again?
To-morrow I must spin, next day help Chilion on his
baskets; then is Sunday, we do not work that day, I wish you
would come up then.
I go to Church.
Alackaday! so you do. I quite forgot you belong to the
fallen race!
I told you all had some excellences; and if you would
come and hear Parson Welles you might think so too. He is
serious-minded, his prayers are earnest, his sermons have some
good sense, and the place itself is grateful to one's spiritual
feelings. Perhaps in no one more than in him would you see
the struggle that goes on between Nature and the Unnatural.
Nor is it easy to overcome the effect of our education so but
that old erroneous influences seem to minister to one's
spiritual
peace, and I find many things in going to Meeting very
pleasant.
No, it is not, replied Margaret laughing, and I find
much pleasure in staying at home.
Monday, I may see you?
Yes, after washing. Besides you have left me enough for
a three days' rumination, at least.
CHAPTER V.
MR. EVELYN UNEXPECTEDLY DETAINED.MARGARET GOES AFTER
HIM, IS ABSENT FROM HOME SOME WEEKS.HE RETURNS WITH HER
TO THE POND, IN THE FALL.WHEN ALSO ROSE MAKES HERSELF
COMPANIONABLE.
Monday
came, but not Mr. Evelyn, nor did the whole week
bring him. His absence can be accounted for. He exhibited
symptoms of the Small Pox, a disease the scourge and terror
of the age. He was from a town on the sea-board where the
infection raged. The people of Livingston immediately took
the alarm, town meetings were held, a Pock House was
established
,
Mr. Evelyn conveyed thither, and a general beating
up for patients was had throughout the town. All who had
been exposed were ordered to the Hospital, and candidates for
the disease universally were taken thither. This number was
made up chiefly of youths of both sexes. Margaret and Obed
were both sent for; Rose escaped by secreting herself in the
woods.
The house selected for the terrible ordeal, was that known
as Col. Welch's, the Tory absentee, now used as a Poor House,
a large building, occupying a commanding site on the west
side of the village, north of Deacon Hadlock's Pasture, and
detached from the highway by a deep front yard, which was
once ornamented with gravel walks and flower-beds, but of
late years had been abandoned to the pleasure of swine. In
the rear the grounds extended a long distance, also intersected
by walks, shaded by a grove of forest trees, and rising to an
eminence where were the ruins of a Summer-house. Above
the ridge of the Hospital, on a long pole, waved a blood-red
flag, an admonition to all of the fearful disease that was there
doing its work. Guards were set about the premises to
prevent
all unlicensed ingress or departure.
Margaret, having been brought from home by the authorities
of the town, was shut in a room with several other young
ladies then and there awaiting the process of inoculation by
Dr. Spoor. Among the number she found Isabel Weeks, who,
at the instance of the latter, introduced her to Susan Morgridge.
It being supposed that Margaret and Susan might have
received
the disease in the natural way, they two were for a few
days consigned to a room by themselves. Margaret's first
inquiries related to Mr. Evelyn, who the nurse told her was
very sick in the male apartment, but not in apparent danger;
Susan supplied her with other particulars respecting her cousin,
for whom she expressed the highest esteem, and it might have
been a little flattering to Margaret to know how kindly he had
spoken of her in the Judge's family. Susan, sobered by the
recent death of her mother, serious by nature, and of a retiring
disposition, was yet most excellent company for Margaret.
She possessed amiability and good sense, sweetness and
strength, cultivated manners and great delicacy of sentiment,
and she was not one to condemn all that she could not
approve
.
For the first time in her life, Margaret had a
bed-fellow
,
if we except Bull. No symptoms of the natural disease
appearing, and the virus with which they were charged
begining
to develop itself, the enviable privilege of solitude, which
these two enjoyed, was disturbed, and they were reduced to
the common lot, and became occupants of a chamber where
were four beds, alternatingly from five to eight patients, three
or four nurses, and a stagnant atmosphereventilation being
prohibited for fear of taking cold. It boots not to describe
that Middle Passage of the Pock House, or follow from day to
day the progress of a dreadful disorder;the primary dullness
and lassitude, succeeded by fever and ague, the hot, blinding
eruption, sharp, darting pains, the swollen face, the sore
throat, tiresome sleep, haunted dreams, convulsions, delirium,
blindness; a noisome air, slow haggard midnights, inflamed,
nettlesome noontides; jalap and the lancet; saffron and
mary-gold
infusions, rum and brandy, applied to throw the
eruption
from the heart; the body half roasted with blisters to
keep the disease from striking in. Thanks to Lady Mary
Wortley Montague and the Turks for our lives indeed, and
thanks to Dr. Jenner and the cows for our comfort! The
aspect of the town was suddenly transformed, the streets were
comparatively deserted, the people wore their faces lengthened
and distressful, and stealthlike was all intercourse. Prayers
multiplied for the sick, sermons were preached on the vanity
of life. It is a wonder that so many of the number returned
again to their homes, in fact only two died, one a boy, from
the North Part of the town; the other, a friend of
Margaret's
,
and sister of Isabel's, Helen Weeks. Unshriven,
unblest
,
she died; at midnight, without prayer, or funeral, or
passing bell, was she buried; by the hands of the sexton,
Deacon Ramsdill, and her own father and mother, was she
laid in the grave, which closed over one as pure in heart and
guileless in life as this world often produces.
She, whose especial province was the health of the people,
the Widow Wright, could not fail to bestir herself on an
occasion
like the present. In Rose's sequestration she aided,
Obed's being taken to the Hospital she opposed, and however
hostile to the practice of the Faculty, she still felt it incumbent
upon her to do something. Accordingly, laden with sundry
medicaments, she presented herself one morning at the gate
of the infected grounds. Here presided Captain Eliashib Tuck,
with a staff instead of a firelocka long black pole barbed
with iron, and formerly used by tythingmen for the admonition
of unruly children on the Sabbathwhich he carried with the
precision of a soldier on guard, pacing to and fro, but raised
in a manner somewhat threatening, when he observed the
sedulous lady trying to open the gate.
Marcy on us, Cappen! exclaimed the Widow, ye
wouldn't spile a woman's gear and forsan break her head,
for deuin a dight of good, would ye, bein it was Sabber
day?
There are the General Orders, replied the Captain with
sturdy brevity.
On a post the Leech read as follows:
1. No person is allowed to enter or leave the grounds
without permission. 2. If a person cause the spread of the
disease, he or she shall be fined fifty pounds. 3. If any person
be inoculated in any other place than the Hospital, he shall
pay forty pounds. 4. No Paper Money to be carried into the
building under penalty of ten pounds.
Ha, ha, ha! snickered out the woman. More afeerd
of paper money, than they are of the Doctor's knife. I
kalkilate
,
Cappen, if they'd a kept paper money out of the War,
there wouldn't have been quite so many broke doun.
I was in the War, rejoined the Captain, and I was afraid
neither of paper money nor
British swords
. I consider myself
honored by my losses. I am no grumbler. Where is your
countersign, Ma'am? You can pass with a ticket, not
without
.
Ra'aly, you look as if you Cappen Granded it over all
creation, and the Hospital besides. The Doctor has got um
all penned up here. He daren't let um come out and have
fair play. Won't ye let a woman see her boy?
The countersign, Ma'am.
They'll kill him with jollup and rhubarb. They'll make a
shadder of him, and won't leave enough teu bury him by.
I know, rejoined the Captain, neither men nor women,
mothers nor children, judges nor ministers. Have you never
heard, when I stood sentry before General Washington's tent,
then only a raw recruit, and the Old Hero himself rode up in
his carriage, I challenged him. `Who goes there?' said I
`General Washington,' said he, looking from the window.
`I don't know General Washington,' said I. `What is the
countersign?' and he had to give it before he could pass one
inch.
You had better a stuck teu the Camp, old feller, and gone
out agin the Injins, and not be here a meddlin' with the
sientifikals, and a killin' poor folk's children.
The Captain, who stood too much on his dignity to take an
affront, replied that she might go to Mr. Adolphus Hadlock's,
where perhaps her services would be valued. They are
building a Smoke House there, said he, and perhaps Aunt
Dolphy will let you pass without the word. The whole family
is in panics.
On this cue, the Widow sidled off up the road, and going
partly by cultivated grounds and partly through the forest, a
short distance this side of Mr. Hadlock's house, she met that
gentleman himself, flurrying in the way, with a long pole which
he flourished with a wild menace, evidently prepared to dispute
the passage with her
Do you come from the infected precincts? asked he
with earnest precipitancy, and speaking with what clearness
his nostrils stuffed with sundry herbs would allow.
Aristophanes
,
Ethelbert! Ho, here, Holdup, knave! Urania
Bathsheba
,
my little daughter, run back, run for your life!
I han't been nigh the smittlish consarn, said the Leech.
Cock on a hoop! Don't be so adradd. I wouldn't tech it
sooner a cow'd eat elder blows. I've come up teu help ye.
What have you got in yer nose?
Rue and wormwooddon't come nearour lives depend
on it. Do, Sophronisba, my dear wife, do supply Holdup, his
has fallen to the ground. Never mind if he is our servant,
the safety of the whole of our darling family is at stake.
I've got the stuff in my pocket, said the Leech, the
gennewine sientifikals, what 'll keep off the pest, and cure it
when it comes. I am as sound as a new born baby. Let us
see what you are deuin here.
These are direful days, Mistress Wright, responded Mr.
Hadlock. Our son Socrates, and Purintha Cappadocia our
daughter dear, are already under treatment at the Hospital;
and as the law allows and our duty enjoins, we are aiming to
prevent the spread of the miasm. We have erected a fumitory
for the more complete cleansing of all that pass this way.
Cecilia Rebecca, my dear, do go back and continue your
prayers
I can't find it, Papa.
That on The Visitation of the Sick.
Where, Papa, where is it?
Take the first you come to, one is as good as another in
such a case as this; run child.Don't approach too near the
good lady, Aristophanes, lest your garments should brush.
Keep the rags burning, my dear Ethelbert.
Don't be so despit skeered, Mr. Hadlock, said the Widow.
Bein I was steeped in their pus and pizens, I tell ye, I can
keep ye clear and wholesome, as ye was born.
At the edge of the woods, a rude structure had been hastily
thrown up, of staddles interlaced with boughs, and within were
quantities of water, soap, salt and vinegar. Over a heap of
charcoal
and cobs, the Widow beheld a woman crouched, in a
tattered
and begrimed long-short, with the collar open exposing a
dingy neck and broad shoulders, and blowing lustily at the fire
which she was striving to kindle with her breath.
How d'y'e?Sibyl, for sartain, said the Leech. Wal
if you an't here, pon my soul!
How's the Widder? I am glad you've come, responded
Sibyl Radney, for it was she, intermitting her labors, and
looking up.
Get the pile ignited, exclaimed Mr. Hadlock; we can't
lose any time.
Then you must have some fire, replied Sibyl; I can't
make a puss out of a sow's ear, nor light cobs with my
wind-wipe
,
death or no death.
Where is the tinder-box. I thought you had struck a fire.
Haste, Holdup, knave, get some fresh coals. Havn't you been
for the brimstone yet, Ethelbert, my son?
You told me to keep the rags burning, Papa
Never mind what I told you, run to Deacon Penrose's, but
don't, for dear Heaven's sake, go by the road, speed down
across the woods.
A tough case, I can tell you, Miss Wright, said Sibyl,
rising to her feet. But we mean to stop the plague. We
are going to catch every scrag that comes this way from the
Pest, and soak, smoke, salt and rub them, till there isn't a
hang-nail of the pock left. They won't get off so easy as the
Colonel did. The law gives it and we'll do it. Here comes
Miss Dunlap, and Miss Pottle and Comfort.
We are all in a toss in our neighborhood, said Mistress
Pottle. I got Comfort to come down with me, and see how
things were doing. Sylvina is there, if she an't dead before
this.
We heard there was seventeen dead up to yesterday, said
Mistress Dunlap, and four to be buried to-night; we havn't
had a word from our Myra since they took her down.
It's cruel skeersom about there, I knows, said the Widow.
I jest kum up, and I had a tight rub teu git by. I kalkilate
my son Obed is lying stone dead there now.
Lord have mercy! exclaimed Mistress Pottle. Comfort,
you go to felling trees across the way.
They are killin' um with the lancet, and starvin' um to
death with milk-sops, said the Widow. Here's white
cohush
,
it 'll bring out the whelk in less than no time;
brooklime
will break any fever. There's lavender and horse-mint,
and calamus to burn when you go inteu the room. I've got um
here, but they won't let me go nigh um.
Halloo! shouted Comfort Pottle, who was busy cutting
the trees. There's Soc. coming up the road!
Ah Socrates, my dear son! cried the father, seizing a
pole, and rushing forwards, followed by the others. How,
whywhat has happened?My dear Triandaphelda Ada,
don't be alarmedDon't come near, my dear sonWhat shall
we doAre you well?Holdup, knave, where is your
crow-bar
?Don't
cry, Sophronisba, myHe is upon usmy dear
sonwe shall all be killed!
I wasn't going to stay any longer, replied the boy, who
with no other vestment than his shirt, was now rapidly
approaching
the party. It didn't take. I stole off through the
barn and got into the woods. I havn't had any thing but sour
whey and barley water this week. If I could get the smell of
mother's buttery, the Doctor shouldn't know me for one
month.
Bide back, said Comfort, striking forwards with his axe.
Don't come nigh me, said Holdup, clenching his
crow-bar
.
He 'll get well combed before he gets through this, said
Sibyl Radney, advancing with a long branch of a tree, which
she shook in her brawny arms.
Let us all retreat a little, said Mr. Hadlock, and form
with our several instruments a line both of offence and defence,
along which, Socrates, do you proceed into the Fumitory. It
is a case, my dear son, in which our parental feelings must
yield for a moment to our severer judgment; but the conflict
will soon be over. When you are in take off your shirt, and
lay it in the tub of water; and so dispose yourself over the
burning heap that the smoke will reach your whole body.
The boy obedient to the paternal wishes entered the lodge,
where he was presently followed by his parents and some of the
women. Meanwhile, being missed from the Hospital, two or
three servants were despatched for him. Hastening up the
road, and dispersing whatever force was opposed to them, they
broke in without ceremony upon the process the runaway at
the moment was undergoing. Four women, one at each
extremity
,
held him face downwards over the fumes of coal,
sulphur
,
lavender and calamus, while the Widow was rubbing his
back with vinegar. Mr. Hadlock stood a suitable distance
from the tub stirring the shirt with a long pole. As the
pursuers
entered, this gentleman, uttering a faint scream, bolted
24
through the sides of the hatch. At the cost of a sharp but
short altercation with the women, the boy was delivered up,
and duly appareled, returned to the Hospital;whither, as
some of these good mothers are going, let us also betake
ourselves
.
These ladies from the smoke-house encountered some other
elderly women who, with a slow step and solemn air, came up
the West Street; among whom were Mistresses Whiston, Joy,
Hoag, Ravel and Brent, whose names have already been
mentioned
.
Can't any of us be admitted? enquired Mistress Whiston
of Captain Tuck.
Not if the Great Queen Catherine herself should apply on
her knees before me, replied the trusty warden.
Do you know how our little Joan is doing? said the lady.
None I believe are considered dangerous since the death
of Helen Weeks, rejoined the Captain.
Poor Miss Weeks! ejaculated Mistress Whiston.
Mournful times these! added Mistress Joy.
It is most as bad as the Throat Distemper that was round
when I was a gal, said one of the ladies; there were more
dead than alive.
So it was in the Rising of the Lights, said another.
What is that to the Camp Fever, we had in the War!
echoed the Captain. There were two thousand sick at one
time, and never a quarter recovered; and we had to march,
sick or well, alive or dead.
That tells how our Luke came to his end, said Mistress
Dunlap.
And how glorious it was to die for one's country! said
the Captain.
That was nothing to the Great Earthquake when I was a
gal, and lived to the Bay, said Mistress Joy. The
spindle and vane on Funnel Hall was blown down, chimblys
were cracked, brick and tile choked up the streets. It
sounded
as if God Almighty's chariot was trundling over the
pavements
in Old Marlboro.
That was the same year one of the niggers in
Kidder-minster
cut his master and mistresses' throat, as I have heard
Ma'am tell,' said Sibyl Radney.
No it was four year arter, said an elderly lady, it was
the same year our Prudence was born, and that was just four
year arter the Earthquake.I can remember an old Indian
slave we had at our house, one of the Nipmucks, and what a
time we had of it. Daddy kept him chained nights, but he
broke away, and killed one of the men that was sent arter him;
and he was hung the next week. I remember Dad's saying,
`There goes twenty pounds.' But he wouldn't work, and
wan't worth his hide.
The Indians and Negroes never did us much good, said
Mistress Whiston; and I am glad there are going to be no
more slaves.
I kalkilate as much, said the Widow, if you had seen
the niggers burnt alive down teu York, nigh fifty of um, for
bringing in the Papists. My Granther was on the spot and saw
it all, and said it did his heart good teu see the fat fry out of the
sarcy dogs.
I remember, said the Widow Brent, who was a little deaf,
milking a cow a whole winter for a half a yard of ribbin.
I remember, said Mistress Ravel, the Great Hog, up in
Dunwich, that hefted nigh twenty score.
Morrow to ye, Good Wives. Are you not running some
risk here? said a voice behind them, that of Deacon
Hadlock
,
whose approach the ladies, diverted by memories of other
days, and transported to scenes of legendary horror, had not
perceived.
I don't know but we are a matter exposed, said Mistress
Whiston.
I had as lief go right inteu it arm's length, said the
Leech.
The danger is that you might carry it away in your
clothes, answered the Deacon. I have no business here,
but I saw ye all, and I thought I would just ride up and give
ye a friendly warning.
While these ladies disperse it is safe for the rest of us to
remain; and by methods which the vigilance of Captain Tuck
cannot counteract we will enter the forbidden spot.
Favored by a constitution, which often in life stood her in
hand, Margaret has been able to carry forward her disease
more rapidly than many others, and is so far recovered as to
have passed from the sick chamber through the Cleansing
Apartment, and is now almost sole occupant of the Clean
Room. Glad enough is she to exchange mint-tea and jalap
for water-gruel and milk-porridge. She goes out into the
open air. The aspect of things has changed during her
confinement
.
The verdure of nature shows in gold and crimson
colors. The frosts have fallen, and the flowers are drooping;
Summer is giving place to Autumn. The fresh air of the
heavens and the free tread of the earth were an
exhilaration
.
But when she saw a morning glory with its
black, blistered leaves, heard the feeble notes of the birds
wailing a farewell to our northern latitudes, and the
mournful
underflowing murmurs of the crickets that so betoken
a fading season; and especially when she thought of Helen
Weeks, whose death occurred in the same chamber with
her, but at a time when she could be hardly conscious of what
transpired, she was seized with a deep melancholy, so that,
in her present debilitated state, she well nigh fainted, and
staggering with weakness and a burdensome sense of evil, she
went back to the house.
Sorrow for the death of a friend
she never before experienced, nor was she in a condition the
most apt for meeting it. She sank in a chair by the window,
turned her face from all, and her thoughts wandered
confusedly
,
painfully, darkly, over the trees, the landscape, the sky,
God and the Universe. Susan Morgridge and Isabel Weeks
were yet in the sick-room, the latter at a point of dangerous
reduction, so much so that her convalescence was for some
months delayed. Of Mr. Evelyn she heard he had passed the
hands of the cleansers, but she saw nothing of him. To the
Clean ones, with whom she was now associated, she might
have addressed herself, but they were strangers to her, and the
freedom and spirits which most of them seemed to enjoy,
rendered
the weight in her feelings more intolerable, and she was
constrained to keep by herself, and spent a good part of two
days in solitary reverie by the window. On the third day she
had the good fortune to see Mr. Evelyn walking in the garden,
cloaked and muffled, and tears in fresh large drops rose into
her eyes. Presently he sent by one of the attendants a
summons
to herself, which she could not but obey. Clearing her
eyes, throwing on shawl and bonnet, she went out. Her face,
ordinarily animated with the colors of health and hope, was
stricken and sorrowful, and bore evident traces of sickness
and disappointment; nor was the appearance of Mr. Evelyn,
altogether dissimilar. He took her hand cordially, and spoke
to her soothingly. Helen, said he, has indeed gone from
us, as all must go at last. But in Christ, we never die. By
the Atonement are we immortal. Where he is there shall we
be. Possessed of him, death has no terror for us, or power
over us. The trees fade to renew themselves.
I have felt, said she, that I should never wish to see
another summer, and all beautiful human faces seemed hidden
from me forever. But I hope these feelings will not last
always.
Beauty and Pureness, said he, are everlasting; they
are of God and can never die. They may for a moment be
obscured, but they shall reappear in brighter lustre. Angels
have charge over them that they dash not their foot against a
stone. Let us turn to the pleasant face of God in what is
about us.
I wish we were at the Pond, how beautiful it is there in
the Fall! You see the woods that go up there metamorphosed
into great marygolds filled in here and there with a cardinal
flower.
They remind one of a flame of fire, still burning, but not
consumed, like the Bush of which the Bible speaks. They
bring to my recollection an army of staff-officers with crimson
coats on roan steeds. Would that all blood were as innocent
as that which yonder straggling trooper of a red-maple is dyed
with! They call up the solemn convocations of our old
fashioned Judges in their scarlet robes.
You confound me by such things. I should not like to
look upon trees in that `stand-point;' that savors only of
trainings, rum-drinking and jails. I would rather see in them
the sunsetting, and my dream-clouds.
I love the Beautiful wherever I see it, and perhaps
sometimes
see it where I should not. But we are not in strength
for any disquisitions of this sort. Let us enjoy without
reason
.
How long do they keep you here, Miss Hart?
I am sure I don't know. I wish I could go home to-day,
but the Committee are very exact, and they may keep me a
month.
Dr. Spoor thinks I may be allowed to go day after
to-morrow
,
and I will intercede with him to let you off. I am
anxious to return home, having already been delayed beyond
my time, as I must sail so soon.
I did not know as you had any home. If I had thought
anything about it, I should have imagined you dropped right
out of the sky.
I have a home indeed, with a holy mother.
I will not laugh, because I cannot laugh. You are so
soon away! I am tired, had we not better return to our
rooms?
The extensive grounds of Col. Welch were the allotted
limits of the convalescing patients. The next day Margaret
and Mr. Evelyn went out together; they met others like
themselves
revelling in their tethered liberties, and enjoying the
sumptuousness of the hour and the place. Conventional
distinctions
24*
and proprieties were foregone in this general invalid
exuberance, and no surmises were raised or words uttered
while the feeble Indian strolled arm in arm with the feeble
relative of the Judge. An early frost had smitten the
vegetation
,
but the sun was warm and the air bland. The
grove-thridding
walks they pursued, now looking out upon the
village, the salmon-colored woods on the North of the Green,
and the russet mountains beyond the River, now immersed in
the mellow golden trees. They felt the glow of returning
health and invigorated frames, and were grateful for
deliverances
often delayed and sometimes never afforded. Red
squirrels
chased one another over the yellow leaves that covered
the ground, and along the branches of the trees, yelping and
chattering, like king-fishers. Fox-colored sparrows, titmice,
nuthatches, snow-birds, and the great golden-winged
wood-pecker
vied in their notes, and seemed resolved on merriment
while the season lasted. They reached the knoll on which
the old Summer-house stood; by broken steps they ascended,
and on a broken seat they sat down.
Have you strength enough to sing to me? said Mr.
Evelyn.
I will sing you `To Mary in Heaven,' said Margaret.
The next morning two horses were brought to the gate,
one assigned to Margaret, while Mr. Evelyn mounted the
other.
Are you going up with me? said Margaret.
I brought you down, replied Mr. Evelyn, and it is but
fair I should see you back.
They went through the South Street, entered the Brandon
road, and ascended the long steep hill Margaret had formerly
climbed on her way to Mr. Wharfield's. The Indian Summer
had just begun, a soft haze pervaded the atmosphere, and
settled like a thin grey cloud on the horizon; there was a
delicious, sweet, sleep-like feeling created by all things about,
both inspiring and tranquillizing. Above, and as it were close
to them, the sky rested on red trees and green grass; Mill
Brook dashed and tinkled below as through a bed of roses.
Margaret's horse proved mettlesome, and she reached the
summit-level before Mr. Evelyn.
I should have a magnificent scene, said she, turning her
horse and waiting for him, as he came up, even if I had to
see it all alone. You yourself are a live man and horse in a
field of embroidery such as Mrs. Beach can't equal, and she is
said to be the most skilful needle-worker in town.
Look at your own Mons Christi, said he. All the
looms of the Gobelins could not garnish it so! There is a
solitary maple, like a flamingo on its nest of green cedars and
laurels.
How
hot
those yellow witch-hazles look under the tall
trees, if I were cold I would go in there; and yonder the
dark forest is burning with glowworms and tapers, if I were
gloomy I would go in
there
. I wish, Mr. Evelyn, you
were
going to stay a little longer in Livingston. See that hemlock
so covered with grey moss, and there is a row of red trees
peeping out from green hemlocks behind it. It stands out
alone, you see; its kindred have deserted it, and the mosses
are taking pity on its old age. Will you find anything as
beautiful on the sea-coast, or beyond the sea; the Master
says there is nothing like it in Europe.
I do not go to the Old World for its scenery, I only wish
to see Man there. There is nothing like New England, and
nothing in New England like its interior districts. The
sea-coast
is more level and uniform; here you have the advantage
of mountain, bluff, interval, to set off the view. This
Autumnal
tapestry is hung upon windows and arches, and flung
over battlements. With us it is only spread on the floor.
But why do you notice that old tree? You are too young to
be attracted by age and decay.
I don't knowI seem sometimes to have lived half a
century, and again as if I was just born. How many years I
have lived the last month. When I was very young I used
to think this frost-change was owing to yellow bugs,
humble-bees
and butterflies lighting on the trees; and then it was
orioles and goldfinches; and afterwards it seemed to me
twilight
clouds snowing upon the earthand nownowThere
is a dash for you, Mr. Evelyn, which the Master says implies
a suspension of the sense. There is sister Ruth coming out
to meet us, let us start our fillies.
How is sister Margaret? said Mrs. Wharfield, advancing
into the street.
This is Mr. Charles Evelyn, said Margaret.
Glad to see thee, Friend Charles. Will ye not tarry
awhile? How is the malady?
No, replied Margaret; we must hasten homewards.
They are getting better at the Hospital. Helen Weeks is
dead.
So we learned. She has found the true light now
where-to
the world is dark. Farewell, if you cannot rest. Anthony
would rejoice to see thee. He has been much moved towards
thee, Margaret.
They presently met a drove of cows driven by an old man
and a boy.
That is Kester Shield, Uncle Ket, the cowherd, said
Margaret. She he is afraid of us, he is running into the
woods to escape contagionhis cows also are much moved by
our horses, as the Quaker said.
Phin! Boy, shouted the old man hiding himself among
the brush. Keep clear of the wind of the horsesthere
there, head off the Parson.
Uncle Ket, Uncle Ket, don't be scared, cried Margaret.
We havn't any of the disease. We are all free. We have
been smoked clean.
The old man continued to retreat and to cry to his boy.
Keep out of the wind. We shall lose Miss Lucethe
Parson 'll have them all crazed.
We must stop this movement, said Mr. Evelyn. I will
help the boy, while you ride along by the edge of the woods,
and see if you can compose the old man.
The Parson, said the cow-herd, whom Margaret reached
and quieted, is the worst pair of horns I ever druv, and I
have had the business now rising of sixty year, and take it by
and large, fifty head a season, and she is the beater of
all.
Have you, indeed, said Mr. Evelyn, followed the
business
so long.
I was chose arter Old Increase Tapley died. I was
'prenticed
to Old Increase, but he got to be so old I had it pretty
much all to myself.
How old was he? enquired Mr. Evelyn.
He was going hard on to seventy-five, when he died,
though he didn't do much for a spell before.
How old are you, Sir.
I was seventy-two, eighteenth day, March, last; though I
like to have lost one year by them heathenish Papists. Zuds!
you'll begin to think I am getting old too; I never should
have thought of it. I havn't seen an old man this thirty year,
they used to be thick as blackberries when I was a boy; only
there is Old Miss Radney, Sibyl's mother, she's rising of
ninety. But, as I was saying, I was chose the very next
Town Meeting arter Increase died, I took oath under the
Old King  Phin, boy, the Parson's hunching Miss Luceand
I have been run ever since; fair or foul, wet or dry, bloom or
blow, hot or cold, mud or dust, I stick it through.
The cows must give you some trouble in your advancing
years, said Mr. Evelyn.
O, it an't a circumstance to what it used to be, when the
Injins skulked round and stole my cows, and run off with the
horsesin them days we took all kindsthe troops in the
War pressed some of the best of them, and they tried to make
Uncle Ket make it good; and in Burgwine's time when the
Hissians and Highlanders came through, with their check
backs, long pipes and busky caps, they distarbed them so it
took a whole day to bring them to; and latterly when the
wagons began to come, the whole pack would up and off,
capering and snorting, into the woods. I'm glad you keep to
the saddle, and don't interfere with people's business. They
are fencing in the commons now, and putting their cows to
pastur. I had a calculated to leave a handsome run of
business
to my Grandson, Phin. My wife is dead and children,
and he and the cows is all there is left. The cows you see
are dwindled down to less than a quarter. Great changes
Uncle Ket's trade is most done.You are a young man, and I
could larn you a good many things. Molly I've known ever
since she was dropt; she has brought in the strays, and many
is the poundage she has saved Uncle Ket. She is brisk-eyed,
full-breasted and straight-limbed, as a Devon heifer; she wants
coaxing and patting a littleshe don't run with the old cows
enough to larn their ways,Glad you got through with the
pock so wellit takes a second time, some sayits worse than
horn-ail, hoven or coreThere, Molly, let Bughorn go by, we
will manage them.
You see, said Margaret as they rode on, there are
things besides trees to remind us of age and regrets. But I
had rather talk of the trees. They become individually
developed
by the frosts; you can distinguish them better now
than in the summer.
I have known the beauties of the forest only in the
aggregate
;
said Mr. Evelyn. It is a fair whole of form, color
and effect that interests me. What is that orange-crowned tree
glowing so in the sun, over among those pines?
That is a rock-maple.
These straw-colored trees and that dark purple clump?
These are oaks, and that is a grove of wild cherries. I know
them in the Spring, I seem to half lose them in the Summer;
in the Fall they announce themselves again. The red-maple is
deep crimson, that tawny colored grove is beeches, there is the
purple woodbine trailing over the rocks. What a pretty picture
is that flock of sheep and lambs feeding among the blood-red
blueberries.
Here is a solitary maple, so soft, limpid, silken, as if the
Spirit of Color dwelt in its leaves. These are scenes which
Rosa or Poussin could never have commanded.
There is some advantage in knowing the detail.
Yes, one could not be a Painter or Poet without it.
More than that, ourselves are there in those trees.
Distress
,
like the frosts, brings out all our feelings, light and dark,
cheerful and sombre. The trees have a sympathy with me.
I am but a mottled forest. These last weeks have unfolded
all my colors. You say you sketch sometimes, you cannot
carry me away in your portfolio, I shall only allow you a leaf.
I must grow green again.See those dark trees above, the
yellow hobble-bush and brakes below, and on the ground the
green arbutus, mosses and wintergreen. The lowest down
the greenest. Let me lie low, where no frosts can touch me.
Shall you ever think of these things when you are away, Mr.
Evelyn?
Yes, and I will think of you the Wintergreen, unscathed
by frost, unaffected by changing seasons.
Geodic Christian Androidal Wintergreen Indian Molly
Pluck, mater bovum divumque! what a string of names you
put on me! What shall I call you?
Let us look a little farther on and perhaps we shall find
something.  Here we open into a tropical grove of lemons
and oranges, the golden fruit glows on the trees and crackles
under the hoofs of our horses; beyond I see a warm sunny
vale of tulips and carnations; truly this cannot be surpassed.
What say you to the pool of water under that arbor of
trees? I can count you crimson gooseberry, flaming maples,
claret sumach, yellow birch and what not.
Those are garnets, topazes and sapphires set in a dark
rock of polished steel. Indeed look about you, Miss Hart,
would it not seem as if the trees extracted all the colors of
the earth, cobalt, umber, lapis-lazuli, iodine, litharge, chrome,
copper and gold, and compounding them in the sap, drenched
and dyed every leaf; or as if Great Nature herself, making a
canvass of the forests, had painted them as you say with
rainbows
and twilight.
Do you, Sir, remember what I say?
Most certainly I do.
So does Job, and Isabel, and I shall have one in Europe,
and two in Livingston to remember me. I never before felt
there was a pleasure in being remembered, at least such a
thing never was a thought to me. And all New England, that
you admire so much, you will bear in your heart into Old
England; I wonder what they will think of you!  Here we
come to the Delectable Way.
They rode in silence up the rough ascent. Will you
wear this, Miss Hart? said Mr. Evelyn, at length breaking
the monotony, and offering a ring with a small diamond
stud.
I will, replied Margaret, if my Bona Dea allows it.
Who is your Bona Dea?
I think it must be Christ, it used to be something else.
I will give you some of these leaves you admire so much; and
there are berries in the woods, the scarlet devil's ear, blue
dracira and crimson cranberries.
You must not think of it, you are too weak to leave your
horse. A beautiful wish I shall cherish as much as beautiful
fruit.
Here in my stirrup, said Margaret, I can get you the
leaves, maples, beeches, cherries, hobble-bush and all. These
leaves will keep their color a long time; there you have
pink, beet, carrot and what not. Don't you lose them.
Reaching the house, Bull and Dick came out to meet
Margaret
,
her father handed her from the saddle, Chilion undid
the budget that was strapped to the crupper, and her mother
offered Mr. Evelyn a cup of water. Csar, the negro servant
of the Judge whose were the horses, had come up across to
take the spare beast.
God love you, Margaret, said Mr. Evelyn.
Christ love you, Mr. Evelyn, said Margaret.
Mr. Evelyn, with Csar rode off through the trees.
Dat be one nice gal, said the Negro speaking to relieve
the quiet of the way, ef she no hab brack, but only Ingin
blood. She steel-trap.
What do you mean, Csar?
She catch Massa heart.
What makes you think so? Was your heart ever caught?
Yes, once, Phillis Welch grabbed him in her two hands.
Has she got it now.
She took him off wid de Curnel ober de seas in de War
time.
Don't you love her now?
Csar hab two lubs, Massa Parson say, when him jine
de Church, de wicked nater lub, and de good God lub, and
him kill de wicked nater lub.Csar fraid Massa no tink ob
de Pond wench when him gone.
Don't you ever think of Phillis?
No; him hab no tink ob Phillis now. De wicked lub
tink get in Csar's heart sometimes, and de tears in him eyes.
Massa see Phillis ober de seas, gib Csar's lub to Phillis,
but only for de lub ob God's sake. Tell Phillis, Csar old,
soon sink in de grabe, meet her in de glory; him hab no wife,
no children for Phillis sake.
Can't I think of that young lady, the same as you do of
Phillis?
Fear Massa not convarted, hab wicked tink, den no tink,
lub oder faces.
Margaret, debilitated by her illness, tired by the long ride,
went immediately to her mother's bed. In a short time Rose
appeared, and ministered unto her. The broth of a fresh
chicken was prepared; some peaches Chilion had saved from
her own tree she ate. The next morning she went into the
woods and gathered some of the brilliant leaves,
corresponding
to those she gave Mr. Evelyn, and put them carefully
away. She ascended Mons Christi, she looked in the
direction
she supposed Mr. Evelyn had gone, she pressed the ring
to her lips, and her handkerchief to her eyes.
Why do you weep, Margaret? was an unanticipated
voice.
Rose! are you here?
I followed you up, said Rose. You were abstracted.
Why do I weep, Rose? I know not why.
If you do so, it shall be in my arms. I am stronger
than you to-day, Margaret. Lay your head here and go to
sleep.
Nay, Rose, I am very dry, I want some water, let us go
down to the cistern. I shall feel better if I can drink.
Not all the waters of the Pond can quench your thirst,
Margaret, methinksbut I will go down with you.
Let us go, and then we will have some plums Judge
Morgridge
sent up this morning, nice damsons. We will also go
and make our oblations to Egeria, who has been a long time
deserted,
Did Judge Morgridge, or Mr. Evelyn, send you these
plums? asked Rose when they had gained their retreat.
Csar said it was the Judge, replied Margaret coloring.
I thank you! I thank you! I love you Margaret, said
Rose, and by a very unexpected gesticulation buried her face,
with apparent strong feeling in Margaret's lap.
Well done, Rose, said Margaret, you are lux inaccessa,
unapproachable, inexplicable. What is the meaning of this?
You are crushing my bonnet, you are staining yourself with the
plums.I have exhausted myself in vain upon you, and have
failed to discover you at all, and now you flood me with
yourself!
Margaret! said Rose regaining her position, you are
angry with me! I have offended you! I can expect no more
from you. I will not inflict myself upon you.
Hold, Rose! said Margaret laying her hand upon her
arm. No one knows what I have felt and suffered for you.
I am not angry with you. In my heart I love you, and never
more than now. Why did you thank me?
For that blush when I asked you about the plums, said
Rose.
In good sooth, replied Margaret,
your
face is red as a
beet with the plums, now; and I doubt if you would thank me
for thanking you for it. Here is my handkerchief, wipe it off
and we shall be even.
Don't laugh at me, Margaret, if you do I can never speak
to you again. I have stains in my soul, Margaret, which
cannot
be so easily effaced.
Tell me, Rose, said Margaret, what is this you speak
of?
When I saw the color in your face, replied Rose, it
seemed to me as if you possessed feelings which I never
supposed
you to have, or you appeared in a light different from
ever before.
Surely, said Margaret, you need not have waited for
that, to know I have in my keeping a pretty considerable
variety of emotions, as many as there are speckled hens in our
roost.
I know, rejoined Rose, that you have been most kind
to me, a perfect angel, and the only one I ever expect to see,
but you were always happy you said, and you seemed so healthy
and strong; and a certain description of feeling I concluded
you were never troubled with. And even while Mr. Evelyn
was here you seemed on the whole quiet and undisturbed.
But I did see you weep on the hill, and I did see a tremulous
flush in your face, when I spoke about the plums
And you
do
suppose I have some feelings of human nature
about me?
Yes, of a kind that would fit me; I had despaired to find
any, wholly such, in the world. You must needs have suffered
25
some in your innermost soul, to feel with me, and that I
supposed
you never had.
It is sympathy you want, said Margaret.
Yes, sympathy, replied Rose, that is it.
That word, said Margaret, Mr. Evelyn taught me. But
I hardly need wait for an instructor to tell me its meaning.
I knew you pitied me, said Rose, but I feared you did
not sympathise with me.
Well, now, said Margaret, perhaps after all I do not.
How do I know what to sympathise with?
If you will promise to sympathise, without knowing
precisely
what with, I will tell you. Margaret! continued Rose
solemnly, do not I exhibit symptoms of a decline? Can I
live long? I do not wish to. Let me die. Let me sleep the
eternal sleep. But before I die, you shall know all I have to
tell.
I will see that you do not die, Rose, if you will only tell
what you are.
A broken-hearted girl, Margaret, that is all. Can you
sympathise with that?
I knew, dear Rose, something pierced and wounded you
inwardly, and by intimations of which I can give no account,
I have felt it all. It has been repeated in my own breast,
though I never spoke of it. Come where you need to be, into
my arms, Rose, and speak or be silent, as you best can. That
word broken-hearted is a strange word, I never heard it,
methinks, before. I have heard of puppet-hearts, and wicked
hearts, and hard hearts, but never till now, Rose, of a broken
heart.
A broken heart is all I boast of, and a poor thing it is,
and sad its story to me, perhaps to you foolish.
I have seen nothing foolish in you, Rose, only some things
that I could not understand, and some that made
me
very sad.
Do tell me all.
I am simply one, said Rose, who has pined for human
sympathy, a disease of which I am about to die, coupled with
a few other things. But let me tell you, you once asked my
name. I used to be called Rose Elphiston. I had a father,
a mother and a dear sister. My native town is Windenboro,
about thirty miles hence. My father was a clergyman,
venerable
and esteemed. We were a very happy family, none could
be more so, until I ruined their happiness. Oh, Margaret,
you have no sins to cause you to shed tears, as I havebut
hear. I had companions, pretty and lively young girls, with
whom I ought to have been content, but was not. No voice
spake what my heart felt, no eyes saw what mine did, so I
must needs be silent, and look where others did not, and then
I took to making company of brooks and flowers, and my own
thoughts; and such things. I thought I would give the
universe
if I could find somebody's else heart beating into my
own, or somebody's else eyes looking through mine. I longed
for a twin existence; to divide and find myself in another.
My father and mother loved me, and my sister was always
kind to me, but she had not the same feelings that I had.
One day there was a donation party at our house. The ladies
of the town brought their wheels and spun quantities of flax,
which they gave to my mother; and the young men made an
ox-sled, which, with a yoke of oxen, they presented to Pa. A
merry time it was, and I enjoyed it with the rest. I could
even be very happy with my old mates. Among the young
men was a stranger in town, a gentleman from New York,
who was called Raxman. He contributed largely towards the
sled. He spoke to me in a manner different from the rest, he
was a great admirer of nature, and seemed in many things to
anticipate my own feelings. My thought, and I do not know
but I must say my affections, turned towards him with the
quickness of the needle to the pole. All at once I fancied that
in him my ideal was complete. But I am only telling you a
common love-story, Margaret.
It is all new and strange to me, Rose, do tell me
everything
.
But Raxman was base and unprincipled. I was
horror-struck
,
stupified at his conduct, I know not what, I must have
fainted and fallen, I only remember being borne into the house
of one of our town's folk; and then walking home. A crowd
of people met me in the way with taunts and hisses. I seemed
to lose my self-control, I became confused and maddened. I
did not answer my own parents coherently. I was summoned
before a magistrate, and condemned to stand in the pillory
with a rope on my neck, and have a significant red letter
sewed to my back. My father most earnestly interceded for
me, and only the latter part of the sentence was executed.
Raxman fled. There were a thousand rumors afloat about
him and me. He had money, good looks and some
accomplishments
,
and his company had been in considerable quest;
whether it was envy or morality, or what not, the people turned
most violently against him, and I came in for my share of
censure
.
I was reduced to a state bordering on distraction, I
would make no confession, I repelled and scoffed at the whole
world. I tore the detested badge from my shoulders. I was
caught in the streets by my own playmates, I was carried to
women who had once loved me as a daughter, and by their
own hands was it replaced. My father interposing in my
behalf lost credit with the parish, old difficulties were renewed,
and by this head of opposition he was swept from his influence,
his salary and his pulpit. He died soon of that disease with
which his daughter will soon follow him, a broken heart. My
mother, always of a delicate constitution, enfeebled by the
excitement of the times, was not long behind my father, she
too died. My sister became insane. I alone watched by her
in her fearful ravings; I prayed that I might become insane
too. My old friends all deserted me, my sister at length took
the mood that I was her enemy, and I was obliged to leave
her; she was carried to the Poor-house. On me no door was
opened, to me no friendly face was turned. An example, they
said, must be made of the Parson's daughter, `her will must be
humbled;' `if she escapes, contamination will spread in all
our families.' I could not yield. All the energies of my
being rebelled. In addition, let me tell you, my father was
a believer in the doctrine of Election and Reprobation. What
he preached I found myself compelled to carry out in practice;
I believed myself thoroughly reprobated. In my earliest years
I was very thoughtful, it was said that I often experienced the
strivings of the Holy Spirit, I was under conviction three
months, and at last obtained a hope, and was admitted to the
Churchyou do not understand these things, Margaret, your
education has been so different
Only tell them, Rose, and I shall understand them.
I was not at ease; the first flush of youthful enthusiasm
was spent, and pious people no longer satisfied me; the
singing
of hymns and going to Preparatory Lectures became
irksome. I sought in books and the woods what I did not
find in religion. My father's sermons, my mother's private
admonitions had no effect upon me. I found myself growing
hard as a rock to all serious impressions. Being negligent in
my Christian duties, I became the subject of Church
accusation
and reprimand. I felt badly to be disgraced, I have wept
bitter tears when I thought of my mother's tears, but religious
considerations had not a tittle of weight with me. In this
situation I was when I encountered Raxman, on the one hand
yearning for an indefinite good, and most sensitive to all
impressions
of beauty; on the other, reduced by a consciousness
of religious dereliction, and wholly indifferent to the state of
my soul. The sequel of that acquaintance I have told you.
Disgraced, discarded, bereaved, I lost all self-equipoise, I
boiled over like an Iceland geyser, I recoiled upon myself with
such violence as seemed to rend me in tatters; with Job I
would have cursed God and died, I was alternately a hurricane
of passion and a Dead Sea of insensibility. I went to an
uncle's of mine, in a distant town, a kind-hearted man, who
sought, as he said, to bring me to repentance, and restore my
Christian peace, by an application of the truths of the Gospel.
I could not listen to him, I could not endure his family
prayers; I hated the God he invoked, I hated that name of
Christ, by which alone he said I could be saved. I knew of
a cousin of my mother, the Widow Wright, who had once
been at our house; I knew her temperament and habits, I
knew how secluded she lived, and thinking that I could at
least die with her, if not live, and that I could render myself
so useful my support would not be a burden, hither I came.
I learned of my sister's death before I left my uncle's. Here
you behold me, as I told you, a broken-hearted girl, a wreck,
a mutilation, a shadow!
Rose, poor Rose, dear Rose, outspoke Margaret,
come to my heart, lie down in my spirit, return to your
sorrow's home in my soul. A prophetic unconscious sensation
is fulfilled in you! An unknown aching correspondency of
feeling is satisfied! You shall be renewed in my arms, you
shall live in my love.
Oh Margaret! replied Rose, I am vile, I am sinful.
Your pureness appals me. Yet if I might but die, and be
buried here, it were all I should ask. The prayers of my
innocence I can utter no more, the dreams of my childhood
are fled, the happiness of youth is gone, the inner strength of
virtue I no more feel, on the face of Beauty I wish no more
to look, the bloom of nature is transformed to darkness and
dread, the voices of birds fill me only with remorse. Man and
woman I loathe, God is not. Yes, I have become an atheist,
I believe nothing, and at times I fear nothing.
Your sorrowful pathway, Rose, I am sure I have followed,
I have overtaken you to be only your own sad sister. Why
did you not speak of these things before?
Only, Margaret, because I wronged you. I felt that I
never could speak of myself to any one. Who could sympathise
with me! Who could bear the burden of my heart! But when
I knew that you too had suffered, when I saw your own heart
25*
innerly moved, I could no more restrain myself.I am
sometimes
light-hearted, or I should say light-headed, blithe and
free, and sometimes dejected beyond recovery or reasonall
this you have seen and wondered at.
I have seen ityesbut Father Democritus I think will
explain it. `The spirits,' he says, `are subtil vapors expressed
from the blood,' and these coursing backwards and forwards
between the brain and the heart produce all sorts of feelings.
Besides, Rose, this melancholy of yours is not of the black
kind, but very white, and I think it may be cured. `
Exercise
,'
is recommended, `good air, music, gardening,
swimming
,
hunting, dancing, laughing,' all these we have. `Spoon
meat and pure water,' he says, are excellent; balm and
annisseed
tea he says will drive away dumps and cheer the spirits,
and these your aunt the Widow will furnish. You never read
the Anatomy of Melancholy, it is a most wonderful book, and
will cure you immediately.
You are good, Margaret, if you do banter me. If I were
any body else but what I am, I should more than half
believe what you say to be true. That I can laugh you know,
that I love Chilion's music you also know. I would dance if
I had an opportunity. I used to think it a sin, but all qualms
of that sort are gone forever.
Eat some of the plums, Rose.
I will, for Mr. Evelyn's sake.
Eat them for my sake, for their own sake. You would
not see Mr. Evelyn!
No, I could see nobody but you. I was too, too much
ennuye, too wicked.
Eat the plums, and perhaps I have a story to tell you,
of
Mr. Evelyn?
No, but of somebody. I shall not tell you who, Mr.
Anonymous.
Really, Margaret, I am anxious to hear. What have
you
to say? Where did you see him?
Here at the Pond, my story is not so long as yours, and I
will begin with what I know. Scarlet coat, white breeches,
Napoleon hat, sparkling black eyes, large black whiskers
meeting under his chin, like a muskrat.
Raxman!
Raxman! what do you mean?
It was he. A soft, pleasant voice?
Yes.
Raxman; the very same.
I do remember his echoing your name in a strange way,
when I told him such an one was in the neighborhood.
I did not think of it at the time, but I can recollect a sort
of suspicion I have had that he was here. Obed told me of
his rencontre on the Head. But what with his fear and his
ardor, his perceptions were not very clear, and all he
remembered
was the black whiskers. I have suspected too, that my
aunt knew of him, but she is a very queer woman, and I do
not pretend to sound her. Were you not afraid?
No more than I am of the cows, who are ever disposed to
yield the path, when I am ready to demand it; this I have
been trying to teach Isabel, who always runs from them.
Obed's tempestuousness may have hastened his departure, but
it did not secure my safety. Indeed, he interrupted me sorely,
and I lost my patience. It was Court week you know, and I
supposed it was some lawyer, or other stranger in town; he
came two or three times, his manners, as Mrs. Beach would
say, were excellent. Yet I was perfectly alone even while he
was present, he was no company to my thought, and when at last
he broke in upon my solitude, by kneeling before me and
saying
something about adoration, he so far recalled me to myself
and attracted my attention, that I cried out at the intrusion.
And so you wonder, said Rose, that my name and his
should ever be brought together, that I could have been drawn
towards him. You will blame me, more than you pity me.
Why should I blame you?
For loving Raxman.
Ought I not to honor you for that? What else, as a
Christian
could you do, if he were the pitiful wretch you describe?
Death and forever, Margaret! Don't you know I am no
Christian, that I abhor and eschew the name; you know I mean
something different from such an affection.
What do you mean?
An absorbing concentration on some one object, an
intense
movement to a single point, a gravitation of your whole
being around a solitary centre.
Is that what you mean by love?
Yes. You think of nothing else, dream of nothing else,
care for nothing else, as you do for that one object.
And all this you felt for Raxman?
No, no, no! I wanted to feel it for some one. I wanted
some Infinite to come and take up my soul, and he, a Devil,
disguised as an Angel of Light, appeared and deluded me. I
cannot tell all I felt for him, it was something, it was too much,
but it was not
that
. His dress or looks did not captivate me.
He did express a sort of sympathy for my tastes, and my
solitariness
.He
made no impression on you, and me he affected
deeply!
How shall I blame you for that? What you now tell me,
Rose, is new, anagogic, mysterious
Wholly so?Nay, tell me, Margaret.
How urgent you are, Rose!
Is there no oneness, no individuality, to all you feel or ever
have felt?
I love Chilion, and Isabel, and Job, and Rose.
Nothing more?
Christ.
You torture me. I told you not to mention that name
again. I mean a man.
Not a woman?
Yes, a woman either, if you will have it so.
Mr. Evelyn?
Yes, Mr. Evelyn.
Mr. Evelyn!
You echo the name as if it had no place in your heart, but
only in your speculation.
Mr. Evelyn.
CHAPTER VI.
THE HUSKING BEE.
The
full Fall of the year had set in. The leaves of the trees,
merging from their bright dappled colors into a dull uniform
brown, had dropped to the earth, and were swept by the winds
in dusty crackling torrents. The crops were harvested;
potatoes
garnered in the cellar, apples carried to the cider-mill,
corn stacked for husking. A part of Margaret's work for the
season was gleaning from the bounties of forest and field, and
aided by Rose she gathered several bushels of walnuts and
chesnuts, and many pounds of vegetable down. The family
had formerly depended upon such wild animals as the woods
afforded to meet their extraneous expenses, but Chilion was no
longer able to pursue his calling, even if the supply itself were
not diminished. What a poorly cultivated farm afforded could
no more than keep them in food and clothing. Pluck had done
little as yet towards the final redemption of his estate. Nor
could it fail of observation that Solomon Smith had rendered
himself quite conspicuous of late in urging the suit of his father
with Mr. Hart. It was evident he regarded Margaret, and
through her, the whole house, with a pointed interest, a mixed
feeling of aversion and esteem. Ever since the unfortunate
issue of the gold-hunt, he seemed to look upon her as his evil
genius, and yet one of that sort, who would abundantly
compensate
by its person for its mistakes. At least we know that
at the time in which this chapter opens, the affairs of the family
were not a little involved. There were sundry items at
Deacon
Penrose's, a large item of Rum, interest money, expenses
accruing at the Hospital, etc., and but a beggarly account of
offsets. Nimrod might have afforded some relief, but his habits
were reckless as his temper was volatile; he tended bar,
groomed, raced, peddled, smuggled, blacksmithed and what
not, but saved little money. The drafts on Mr. Girardeau
were regularly made and conscientiously devoted to Margaret.
What she earned during her few weeks of school-keeping,
Pluck refused utterly to employ on his own necessities, but
insisted
she should lay it out for clothes. Mistress Hart,
originally
a good weaver, fell off in her care and her business
together
,
and drank more, and was more irritable than ever.
Through the intercession of Deacon Ramsdill and Master
Elliman
,
Esq. Beach consented to receive Margaret as private
tutor, for a few weeks, to his children; a duty upon which she
was expecting to enter immediately after the Husking Bee, the
great annual family Festival. Before attending to that, let us
go back in our narrative for a moment. The early infantile
relations of Margaret cannot have been forgotten. What
became
of Mr. Girardeau? Had he no knowledge of Margaret
these many years? It may not be out of place to state the
following
.
The year previous to that of the present chapter, there
came to the Pond an old man wearing a wig, and dressed in
other respects like a clergyman. When he entered the house,
Brown Moll, who seemed to have an intuitive dread of the
cloth, disappeared, and the stranger was left alone with
Margaret
.
He asked for a cup of water, gave her a close perusal
with his eye, enquired the road to Parson Welles's, mounted his
horse, and rode away. This was Mr. Girardeau. His object
in this transient visit is not disclosed.
At the Bee, which fell on a pleasant evening in the early
part of October, were collected sundry people, male and female,
from the several districts bordering on Mons Christi; there
were also present the Master, Abel Wilcox, Sibyl Radney, and
Rose, who if she had become an inmate, as Margaret promised,
of her heart, was almost equally so of her house and bed.
Nimrod was also at home, and for his honor in part this
occasion
was supposed to make. The corn was piled in the centre
of the capacious kitchen, around the heap squatted the huskers.
The room was abundantly as well as spectrally lighted from the
immense fire-place briskly glowing with pitch knots and clumps
of bark, which it became Margaret's duty, as occasion required,
to renew; she was also waiter-general to the company, and sat
on a three-legged stool in the chimney-corner. Opposite her
was Chilion, quietly busy, platting a basket, which he now and
then laid down for his fiddle, as better suited to the hour. The
workmen varied their labors with such pleasantry as was natural
to them and the occasion; and great ardor was displayed in
pursuit of the red ear, for which piece of fortune the discoverer
had the privilege of a kiss with any lady he should nominate.
The much coveted color at last made its appearance in the hands
of Solomon Smith; but Ambrose Gubtail said that Solomon
brought it in his pocket, while Smith himself was equally
certain
he found it in the heap. Relying upon this assurance he
announced that Margaret should kiss him; a favor which she
very properly delayed until it should be ascertained how he
came by the ear in question; and thus for the present the
matter
dropped. The pile was finished, and the shining golden ears
carried into the loft occupied by Margaret, and stowed under
the eaves. Next came a brief relay of food and drink. This
was followed by a dance, in form and spirit befitting the
character
of the company and that of their musician. Even Rose
dismissed her gloom, exchanged smiles with Margaret, when
Master Elliman, in full-blown wig and large ruffle cuffs,
sought her for a partner and bowed her to the floor, with the
precise courtliness and bland mannerism of the Old School.
Next succeeded a scene which promised greater entertainment
than anything before. A long table of rough boards extended
through the room, was laden with the fruits of the season,
apples
,
pears, peaches, plums; pies of all kinds; pewter platters of
dough-nuts and gingerbread; bottles of porter and wine, jugs
of distilled spirits; and prominently, the silver family tankard
of cider. These were in part the contribution of the Master,
Nimrod, and the neighbors who in this matter were either
returning
or anticipating obligations in kind. Pre-eminent above
all in the centre of the table was a grotesque piece, a
pyramidal
pile of pumpkins, each one emptied of its core, perforated
with sundry holes, and containing a piece of lighted candle;
and the whole representing a very comical sort of lantern, or a
monstrous beast bestarred with glaring eyes. Pluck sat at the
head of the table having Rose at his side, Master Elliman
occupied
the foot; the others were disposed about on blocks of
wood, backs of chairs, the shaving horse, the kit, some on their
feet. Margaret having lighted all the candles in the pumpkins,
and symmetrized the pile, resumed her station by the fire.
Brethren and Sisters, began Pluck, who was evidently
somewhat excited by liquor, this is not the house of God, but
of Gods; and it behoveth us to proceed with due solemnity; St.
Anthony, St. Crispin, and Bacchus are with us, and a host.
We have a text inspired and inspiring from a Bibblecal source;
`Give strong drink unto him that is ready to perish, and wine
to those that be of heavy hearts.' Pass the goblets, as it is
elsewhere
said,
`Come fill up a bumper, and let it go round,
Let mirth and good fellowship always abound.'
Most venerable Pater divum hominumque! exclaimed
the Master, thou art too presumptuous, thy zeal excelleth
thy piety. The prefatory oblation. Let all service begin
with reverence meet and becoming to our supreme.
Pluck
. In yonder pumpkin shrine burn the fires of our
Divinity, fed by mutton tallow. Rising all, in meek obeisance
due, pressing the bottom of our soles, worship we his Majesty.
Thy health we drink, thy name we praise,
Great King of
Puppetdom
! defender by the grace of God of England,
France and America; with the most serene, serene, most
puissant, puissant, high, illustrious, noble, honorable, wise
and prudent Burgomasters, Counsellors, Governors,
Committees
and all demigods of thy powerful and mighty realm.
Now, brethren, since the Gods help them that help
themselves
,
as Poor Richard says, let us verify the promise, by
laying hold. In the words of my Bibblecal son,
Maharshalalhashbaz
,
`I feel that in my flesh dwelleth no good thing.'
Rose, dear, have an apple, a pearmain, here is no curse; it
shall wed your face to your name; pity it is, as the old
Indian
said, Eve had not left the apples to make cider with.
S'death! how pale you grow. Take some genuine Bacrag.
That's charming. What a nice example you set to our
Molly.
`When I drain the
rosy
bowl,
Joy exhilarates my soul.'
Abel Wilcox
. The toasts, Sir, the toasts! I have eaten
enough and should like to drink.
The Master
. Fides et veritas, faith and truth! thou art
no wassailer, Abel, or thou wouldst drink without bawling so
about it. Here are Burgundy, Rhenish, in comfortable
supply.
Abel
. I don't hold to getting drunk, I believe in drinking
just enough. Besides, what there is left Deacon Penrose has
promised to take back, and perhaps it is all we shall get.
We, we
, Sir, did you know the old man was going to make a
partner of me, and I am going to marry Matty Gisborne?
The Master
. Thou art no man, Abel, but only a boy
niggard, and there is no law authorizing copartnership with
such an one. Thou art the shadow of an homunculus, Abel,
an expletive among puppetic entities.
Pluck
. `How pleasant 'tis to see
Brethren to dwell in unitee.'
You shall have the Toasts; twelve regular ones, the number
of the Twelve Apostles.
FirstMargaret, here; you wrote these, but I made them,
blow me, if I didn't. You shouldn't spoil a man's thoughts in
the copy.
Margaret whispers her father, who proceeds:
First; Ourselves, and all that pertains to us
Second; The Constituted Authorities of every man's body
and mind.
Third; Freedom of speech, thought, touch, sight, smell,
taste, earth and air.
Fourth; Jemima Wilkinson, Consul Napoleon, Dr. Byles
and St. Tammany.
Fifth; Success to our arms.
Sixth; The Memory of the brave Johnny Stout.
Seventh; The Patriots of the Pond, No. 4, Breakneck
and Snakehill.
Eighth; Perpetual itching without the benefit of
scratching
to all our enemies.
Ninth; All true and upright Masons, who saw the East
when the light rose, and, by name, the Right Worshipful,
Past Grand Deacon, Bartholomew Elliman, pedagogue; with
a tear for all brother Cowans.
Tenth; All Pumpkin-headed, mutton-tallow-lighted Gods
and Goddesses, Priests and Lawyers.
Eleventh; The liquor of Jove.
`Anacreon, they say, was a jolly old blade,
Good wine, boys, said he, is the liquor of Jove.'
Twelfth; The Officers and Soldiers in the Present War.
Abel Wilcox
. Now that the Regulars are disposed of, I
begin with the volunteers.
Death to the Excise Laws.
Joseph Whiston
. The memory of Eli Parsons and Daniel
Shays, with a tear for Bly and Rose.
Brown Moll
. General Washington, Jonathan Trumbull
and John Hancock.
Pluck
. King George III.
Mr. Tapley
. Samuel Adams.
Tony, the Barber
. The honorable Profession of all
gentlemen
.
The Widow Wright
. Death teu quacks and success teu
the gennewine sientifikals.
The Master
. Mistress Margaret, C. B. Custos
Bibbleorum
.
Many voices
. Margaret, Margaret!
Pluck
. Let this be drank standing.
The Master
. Nay, good friends, be not too hasty.
Feminam
et vinum, Margaret, C. B. and the Bey of Muscat.
Rose
. Do Margaret drink with us. It is beautiful.
I havn't felt so well this long while. Do join us this time.
You have been dull long enough.
The Master
. Jam satis nivis; mea discipula,
Nunc est bibendum, nunc pede libero
Pulsanda tellus.
Pluck
. Come, Molly, pretty dear; no black-strap to night;
no switchel, or ginger-pop. Brown Bastard, Aqua Clestis,
Geneva, Muscadinehave your choice; come crush a glass
with your dear Papa; and all this nice company. You have
skinked quite long enough.
The Master
. I hold under my thumb and finger the
veritable
Lachrym Christi, just what you are in search after,
Mistress Margaret.
Rose
. You will taste a little, Margaret; it is better than
Democritus for driving away the dumps, don't you see how
gay we all are?
26
Margaret
. Tears of Christ! Can it be that name is
given to any? Who could have thought of the idea? I could
drink a barrel of those tears.
The Master
. The unsophisticated, megalopsychal,
anagogical
Lachrym Christi!
Rose
. I am glad you tasted. Isn't it delightful. Who
would not drive dull care away?
Pluck
. The songs, gentlemen and ladies, the songs,
Chilion, Molly, Grace, Deacon Elliman, come. Sibyl, what
are you doing there with my second born, knock off your
heel-taps, and lend us your wind-pipe.
They sing.
If life's a rough path, as the sages have said,
With flints, and with weeds, and with briars bespread,
Where the scorpions of envy and adders of hate.
Concealed in close ambush to wound us await,
It surely is wisdom to soften the scene
By strewing the roses of pleasure between.
The Master
. One stanza of the New England Hymn in
memory of our distinguished friend and the prince of
Paronomasiacks
,
Dr. Byles.
All sing
. To Thee the tuneful Anthem soars,
To Thee, our Fathers' God, and ours;
To Rights secured by Equal Laws,
From Persecution's Iron Claws,
We here have sought our calm retreat.
Pluck sings
. God bless our king
And all his royal race;
Preserve the Queen and grant that they
May live before thy face.
Brown Moll sings.
These shouts ascending to the sky
Proclaim Great Washington is nigh!
Let strains harmonious rend the air,
For see, the Godlike Hero's here!
Thrice hail! Columbia's favorite Son!
Thrice welcome, Matchless Washington!
Pluck
. You've got the fogs broke; come now let us have
a few select pieces. Sweet Sibyl begin. What shall it be
give us `Lovewell's Fight.'
Sibyl Radney sings.
Of worthy Captain Lovewell I purpose now to sing,
How valiantly he served his country and his king
'Twas nigh unto Pigwacket, on the eighth day of May,
They spied the rebel Indians soon after break of day.
Our worthy Captain Lovewell among them there did die,
They killed Lieutenant Robbins, and wounded good young Frye,
Who was our English Chaplain; he many Indians slew,
And some of them he scalped when bullets round him flew.
Pluck
. A stiff corker on that. Grace, thou Apostolic
child, give us some of the pathetic. Chilion, you must change
your key, try some Malaga, my son.
Grace Joy sings.
Come listen all, while I a mournful tale do tell;
John Clouse, poor youth, in wicked ways he fell;
Nor had he reached his twentieth year and three,
When he hung on the awful gallows-tree.
'Gainst Abr'ham Dade his murderous envy moved,
In youth's soft years they'd oft together roved
At dead of night he seized his axe, and swore
Ere morning light Abr'ham should be no more.
Pluck
. Now it is Beulah Ann's turn; some of the
sentimental
,
Beulah. Some new cider, Chilion, soft and sweet.
Beulah Ann Orff sings.
Hard is the fate of him who loves
Yet dares not tell his am'rous pain,
But to the sympathetic groves,
But to the lonely listening plain.
Ye Nymphs! kind spirits of the vale,
Zephyrs! to whom our tears are dear,
From dying lilies waft a gale,
Sigh Strephon in his Delia's ear.
Pluck
. We want a little mixture of the heroic. Molly,
the Indian's Death Song; you like the Indians, show them off
to the best advantage. Silence all.
Margaret sings.
The sun sets at night and the stars shun the day,
But glory remains when the light fades away;
Begin, ye Tormentors! Your threats are in ain,
For the Son of Alcomack shall never complain.
I go to the land where my Father has gone,
His spirit shall rejoice in the fame of his son;
Death comes like a friend to relieve me of pain,
But the Son of Alcomack shall never complain.
Pluck
. That's beautiful! See how the Pumpkin Gods
grinAnother brimmerNow scrape away, Chilion. Egad!
what a breeze we are getting into. Hoora! for the Old
Bastile
,
I goes ahead, keep up who can;
They're for hanging men and women,
They're for hanging men and women,
They're for hanging men and women,
In the Old Bastile.
Then the Priests should be the hangmen,
Then the Priests should be the hangmen,
Then the Priests should be the hangmen,
And do the bloody work.
Pulpit Priests are the Baalams,
Pulpit Priests are the Baalams,
And the People are the Asses,
Whom they ride to death and hell.
Ho! neighbors, a hurdy gurdy. See the puppets caper.
There's two priests, in sailors' rig, black-balling one another.
Phew! That's Religion you see next, in Harlequin's dress;
with Faith and Repentance playing Punch and Judy. Six
Pumpkin Gods after a poor nincompoop sinnerGrind away,
my boy
Margaret
. Pa is going off, Nimrod; what shall we do?
Nimrod
. Never mind; he'll come to. He flakes and
scatters like hot iron; get some water, that will cool him.
Pluck
. Haven't you learned your Manners yet, Miss
Molly. `Speak not at the table; if thy superiors be
discoursing
,
meddle not with the matter. Smell not of thy meat, turn
it not the other side upward to view it upon thy plate. Talk
not in meeting, but fix thine eye on the minister. Pull off thy
hat to persons of desert, quality, or office.' Hem! you'll never
do for Miss Beach in the world till you learn your rules.
Don't interrupt the sport. Knuckle to, my good fellow. Ha!
ha! King George and old Johnny Trumbull playing foot-ball
with the head of the people. Look sharp, Rose. Land!
what's this? Old Nick himself in a coach and two, with the
Parson's wig and bands; the Archbishop of Canterbury on the
box; St. Peter and Whitfield outriding. Give them the long
oats, Old Sacristy! Jack Pudding baptizing four Indians in
the river Jordan; souse them under, they'll be damned if you
leave a hair dry
Margaret
. Don't let him go on so; shall I sprinkle it in
his face?
Nimrod
. Hand me the gourd; I'll make him sober as a
walrus.
Pluck
. Don't refuse a penny, my boy,Glory! Didn't
Coachee throw the silk handsomely, Rose? Don't have such
a show every day. By the Living Jingo! it grows cold and
dark. Don't I shiver? Has it rained over night? You are
all here, ladies and gentlemen, hope none of you are wet.
Molly, pile on the chips. Hand down the pipes; who will
smoke? Give your dear Mamma the tobacco. Here is for a
game of cards, Old Sedge; the Most Worshipful Deacon, my
bibblecal son, Nimrod, and the Divine Widow, come. Grace,
you stand flasher. Cut, my son. It's the Divinity's deal, we
shall have fair play. Clubs trump, knock down and drag out.
You are flush, Nimrod, in your face, if you an't in hand.
The Widow Wright
. You'll have teu put mugwort in
in yer stampers, Old Crisp, before ye ketch me this time, I
kalkilate; I'm high, low.
Nimrod
. I'm jack and game.
Pluck
. You are two and. Round again.
The Master
. That is not conformable to syntactic rules.
Conjunctiones copulativ conjungunt verba similia
Pluck
. Molly dear, stir the embers, we want some light
on this subject. What are you doing with Sol Smith in the
corner? Is he giving you lessons in the bibblecal Art?
The Master
. Studium grammaticum omnibus est
necessarium
.
Pluck
. Come Molly, unravel this skein of the Master's.
Solomon Smith to Margaret
. You shan't go, Peggy, till
you answer me. Let the buffle-heads work out their own
game. Say, will you?
Rose, aside to Chilion
. There, Chilion, it is just as I told
you. The rake-shame, put a caveson on him. I would not
endure it a moment if she were my sister.
Chilion
. Sol is a bad fellow. He has no music in his
soul, and such I have heard are fit for any villany. He has
not forgotten the wild-goose chase after gold, and now he
wreaks his disappointment on Margaret.
Pluck
. Quantinupio tentrapiorum quaggleorum, rattle
bang, with a slap dash? It is your play, Sir Deacon.
26*
The Widow Wright
. I'm up teu snuff, I can tell ye.
The Master 'll have teu kiss the cook this time; he han't
enough left for the cat teu lick.
The Master
. I am suffarcinated, in a very thlipsis. Such
philogicide, such amaurosis. Where am I? By what rules is
the game played?
Nimrod
. He holds on to his cards like the whooping
cough; he is as long coming round as the seventeen years
locusts.
The Widow
. I wonder how he 's on 't for face cards; ha!
ha! He's hauled up with the rheumatiz; give him a dose of
water-treffile and burdock root. So pesky slow, we sha'nt git
through teu night.
Pluck
. It's my stack this time; you begged before, my
son. Show out, can you, Mistress Divinity? Then you will do
better than most gods do.
Rose to Chilion
. Can you, a brother, abide such
insolence
?
I am not so bewildered by drink but I can see his
design
.
I believe she struck him; Oh, Chilion, you know not
what we have to suffer.
Pluck
. Beg, will you, my son?
Nimrod
. Yes, like a cripple at the Cross.
Pluck
. No, I will give you oneI am ten, four, three
game. Show your face, my pretty fellow, JackI'm out.
The Master
. I am aababsqueabsquatulated
Nimrod
. ification. He 'll play the rest of his tricks
on the floor with the cockroaches.
The Widow
. I'll stump ye teu another game.
Nimrod
. Ho, Abel, Grace, Beulah Ann, will you play?
Pluck sings, accompanied with a violent thumping of his fists
on the table,
We have a sister scarcely growne,
For she is such a little one
That yet no breaste hath she,
What thing shall we now undertake
To doe for thys our sister's sake
If spoken for she bee?
Rose
. Heavens! Lend me your file. I would stop his
wicked presumption!
Chilion
. I 'll jog him a little with it. Wait a minute till
I have fixed this screw. Let me get my strings in order, and
perhaps we shall see some effect in music. He is more than
half drunk, and I am not sure as Margaret is altogether
herself
.
Sol is a cunning knave, and I would not care to offend
him, since he might do us much evil.
Rose
. How slow you are, there, there, see that.
Chilion
. We are both as drunk as the rest, Rose. I can't
see what I am about here.
Rose
. Oh, Chilion, do something to save Margaret.
Chilion
. He isn't fit to live. I will stop him.
The instrument with which Chilion has been at work is
thrown towards Solomon Smith, the disorderly action of Pluck
overturns the table, and with it the pile of pumpkins; Smith
falls to the floor with the blood spirting from an artery of his
neck.
CHAPTER VII.
THE ARREST.THE PEOPLE OF LIVINGSTON DELIBERATE ON THE
STATE OF AFFAIRS.
The
next morning dawned dismally and darkly on the Pond
and over the town. Rumor of what had fallen out at the
husking
party was rapidly distributed through the region. Early
in the forenoon an inquest was holden on the body of young
Smith, at No. 4, and it was declared that he came to his death
from violence inflicted by one or more members of the family of
Pluck. The uncertainty of the affair, aggravated by the
bewildered
state of the witnesses, rendered it expedient to arrest
the entire household. Shortly on the Brandon road, which,
but a few days before Margaret and Mr. Evelyn had traversed
with so much serene hopefulness and in the midst of such
inspiring
beauty, appeared the Constable, Captain Tuck, armed
with a warrant, and supported by a large body of people,
bearing
sundry instruments of offence, and hastening along with
mingled imprecations and laments. At No. 4 were still greater
confusion and alarm; and there turned up the Delectable Way
a multitude large as once bore Margaret in triumphal
procession
over the same ground, who now were in pursuit of her
and her friends with tempers exacerbated by the recital of
atrocious deeds, imaginations inflamed by horrific suggestions,
and a purpose which nothing short of her own life or that of those
dear to her, could qualify or extinguish. From the Via
Salutaris
and Via Dolorosa poured in numbers more with swords,
axes and pitchforks, who halting at a distance, and forming a
cordon of defence and affright about the premises, awaited the
arrival of Capt. Tuck. The several parties mutually reinforced,
commenced their approach to the house. Those behind
pressing
forward with a zest and courage proportionate to the
interval
between them and the scene of danger, the mass became
wedged about the door which was opened without the usual
formality of knocking, or pulling the string. Sibyl Radney,
who stood barring the door with her back, obliged to yield to
the energy with which the entrance was made, was the only
moving person they saw. Pluck and his wife, stupified by an
intoxication that had probably been enhanced after the fatal
event was understood, Sibyl had dragged to their bed. The
wantonness and disorder of the night she endeavored to correct,
and was busily employed gathering up the fragments of food,
broken bottles and decanters that strewed the floor. Over
the decayed and blackened embers of the fire, sat Margaret
and Chilion in rigid silence and haggard immobility; his face
dropped into the palms of his hands, she with her arms closed
about her brother's neck into which her head was sunk. Hash
was discovered, overpowered by his fears and his potations,
under the bed in the garret. Nimrod and Rose, the Widow
foremost in execration of the family and loudest in clamor for
vengeance, declared had fled on horseback together during the
night. The Master was found in a thicket near the water,
whither in his own frenzy and the turbulence of the hour he
had betaken himself, plunged to his knees in mire and shaking
with cold and alarm. Margaret and Chilion, without
remonstrance
or delay, prepared to obey the summons of the officer, and
went forward a-foot. The other three were carried in a cart to
the Village, where they were all consigned to the Jail, there
to lie until the returning senses of the inebriated should justify
an examination. The Master was taken to his bed, where, with
fever superadded to his surfeit, he had a prospect of remaining
for some time. The people, a portion of them, staid about the
Jail, in earnest conference on what had transpired; others
went to their old resorts, the Meeting-house steps, the Tavern,
the Barber's Shop, and the Store of Deacon Penrose. In the
Counting Room of the latter collected Parson Welles, Judge
Morgridge, Dr. Spoor, Deacons Hadlock, Ramsdill and
Penrose
,
Esquires Weeks, Beach and Bowker, the latter a junior
member of the profession, and recent settler in Livingston,
Captain Tuck, Ex-Captain Hoag, Mr. Adolphus Hadlock, Mr.
Whiston a Breakneck, Mr. Pottle a Snakehill, and other
citizens.
Mysterious is the Providence of God, outspoke Parson
Welles, the first to break the dubious and oppressive silence.
Some are appointed to damnation by a just indeed and
irreprehensible
,
but incomprehensible judgment of God; some he
brings to repentance unto life. Let us not rebel against his
most righteous sovereignty. In what has now eventuated, my
brethren and friends, we behold the Scripture verified, that the
carnal mind is enmity against God. And let all of us, whose
desert is the same, not be high-minded but fear; let us humble
ourselves before the mighty hand of God, who in this
administereth
a needed rebuke for our manifold sins.
Can any one tell us how this melancholy affair was brought
about? enquired Judge Morgridge after a pause.
Deacon Penrose
. As I learn from Mr. Wilcox, who was
providentially present and able to make a distinct report, it
was an unprovoked and malicious attack of some members of
that depraved family on the unfortunate young man.
Esquire Beach
. I think I can inform your Honor more
explicitly, that it is probably a result of anterior and long
cherished
animosities on the part of the persons named in the
precept
against the family of Mr. Smith, arising from indentures
in the hands of said Smith of grants and convenants, on the
part of said persons, yet unfulfilled and for a considerable
period
delayed.
Deacon Hadlock
. Why do we mince the matter? I can
tell you all it is owing to defect of justice; that we havn't
heavier penalties, tighter execution, more wholesome laws. If
these persons had only been kept under, or been enough broke
by the chas
tise
ments they have already had, they never would
have come to this. Truly we can say, we let the wicked go
unpunished. Magistrates are set for the terror of evil doers;
our commissions enjoin us to look arter the good and safety of
the State. For their Sabbath-breaking, their disobedience
to rulers, their unbelief, their blasphemies, their hardness of
heart, their stiff-neckedness and perverse ways, has this come
upon them. They have fallen into a pit which their own hands
have digged. And for our sinful remissness has this judgment
lit upon the town. We ought to have hewed to pieces these
Agags before the Lord. God teareth them in his anger who
hate his church and despise governments. We have been
slower
in rendering justice than the Almighty in executing his
fierce wrath; we have spared the rod and spoilt the child.
Parson Welles
. It behoveth us in truth that we
consider
of our wicked declensions and great provocations before
God, whereby he hath reached forth to us this bitter cup of
shame and sorrow. And, brethren, is it not meet that we
appoint a Fast, touching this matter, as has been the practice
of our Fathers in all calamitous visitations?
Little Girl
. Daddy wants a quart of pupelo.
Deacon Penrose
. Mr. Wilcox, wait on this child, and
when you have done that, bring in some glasses and a measure
of our best New England.
Captain Tuck
. We had a heavy frost last night, the air
is raw and piercing this morning, and this is trying business.
I well remember during the War standing sentry by the
General's Markee half the night, in the depth of winter, on
the solid snow, barefoot, with never a drop to cheer or warm
one with.
Deacon Ramsdill
. It takes two to make a quarrel, and I
count there must have been something hard said or done on
t'other side.
Esq. Beach
. Our worthy Deacon would do nothing that
should prejudice the case, or compromit the parties
concerned
;
nor interpose obstacles to the due process of justice
and impartial effect of the laws. His generous feelings we
know always tempt him to act in behalf of those who may be
called to suffer; but he should remember that Law,
Law
is
the essence of the Deity, the genius of the Bible, the
guardian
Angel of humanity; and that Law ever must be and ever
shall be sustained.
Deacon Ramsdill
. I don't know much about law, but I
know something about nater. A cow won't kick when she is
milked unless she has either core in her dugs or chopped
teats, and is handled roughly; and she always knows who is a
milking of her. Cappen Tuck speaks about the last War.
I
re
collect when we was in the Provinces down to Arcady,
where the Black Flies come out as thick as birds arter a
thunder-storm, they won't let you feel the sting till arter you
see the blood. I guess there has been a Great Black Fly
about here, and now the blood has come we begin to feel the
sting.
Parson Welles
. We have convened on a serious
intendment
,
and Brother Ramsdill would be in the way of Scripture
to avoid foolish jesting which is not convenient, and whereby
the brethren may be offended.
Judge Morgridge
. Is it understood how many persons
are supposed to be involved in this crime? Is it thought the
younger female member of the family is to be accounted
either principal or accessory? I know not that, in the present
stage of the affair, I ought to make this inquiry; nor,
considering
my own position, whether it becomes me to raise any
question at all. I do it, not on my own account, but for the
sake of others.
Deacon Hadlock
. I know of no vessel of wrath more
fitted for destruction than that gal. She is so hardened in
iniquity that any abominable conduct is to be looked for in
her. We have compassionated her ignorance, but it is of no
avail; we have done all that could be done for her, but she
braces herself agin God, despises divine truth, breaks the holy
Sabbath.
Deacon Ramsdill
. Sows over-littered eat their own pigs.
Perhaps you have done too much for her, Brother Hadlock.
Mabby she hasn't forgot the bed you spread for her when she
was down here to Meetin' a few year ago, and when she had
the School this Summer past.
Deacon Penrose
. Will the Parson taste a little of our
New England? We call it a prime article, and think this
the
very best we ever manufactured.
Abel Wilcox
. It has as handsome a bead as I ever saw;
and
we
think it possesses a flavor very much like the West
India.
Parson Welles
. Truly, in the words of Scripture, we
may say, Give strong drink unto him that is ready to perish,
and wine to those that be of heavy hearts. We need
something
to make our faces shine these dark times.
Deacon Penrose
. Gentlemen, help yourselves.
Deacon Ramsdill
. Down to Arcady, when a rattlesnake
bit one, his comrade sucked out the pizen; if he didn't, the
fellow died. I think we had better try and see if we can't
get some of the pizen out of these poor folk, instead of taking
it into our own bodies. I know it's a cold morning, but sap
runs best arter a sharp frost, and my blood, old as it is, is
enough moved without any urging.
Deacon Hadlock
. Dark times, indeed, Brother Penrose;
we have contempt in the Church, as well as abuse in the
State. Things are getting worse and worse every day. We
are all at loose ends. Judgment follows judgment. The
Christan religion itself is just tottering to fall. The
Universalists
I heared yesterday had appeared a little to the west of
us, at Dunwich Equivalents; their preacher, John Murray, is
drawing away people by hundreds. The Socinians have
broke into the fold at the Bay. But for the elects' sake, who
should
be saved! The good man is perished out of the earth,
there is none upright among men. We cannot trust in a
friend or put confidence in a guide. We know not on whom
to rely.
Judge Morgridge
. It is an old story, Deacon, that the
times are deteriorating; I have heard it ever since I was a
boy. The world has stood some pretty hard shocks, and it
seems to be able to survive a good many more. So the old
Worthy Fuller records, more than a century ago, `I have
known the City of London forty years,' says he, `their shops
did ever sing the same tune that trading was dead; and when
they wanted nothing but thankfulness, this was their
complaint
.'
Let us be patient, Deacon, and the coming tide will
lift us from the rocks. The hand that has smitten will heal
our wasted and torn condition.
Deacon Ramsdill
. Time is the stuff that life is made of,
as Poor Richard says. I think if we would spin and weave it
better, we should not have so much raggedness to complain
of; and things wouldn't be falling to pieces so.
Captain Tuck
. Raggedness and ruin! what do
gentlemen
mean? Have we not had a glorious War! Are we not
independent! Isn't this a great country? Was there ever an
era like the present, and will there ever be another such a
one? Isn't America the envy of all worlds, and isn't it honor
enough to have fought her battles even if we had lost our
all? Does she not shine like the meridian sun in his
splendor
?
Our children will sigh and pine for the golden period
in which we now live.
Esq. Bowker
. I think, if I may take the liberty to
express
my thought, that I partially agree with our friend
Captain
Tuck. We discern indisputable signs of improvement.
There is an amelioration in the order of events; there is a
softening of the crude and undigested matter with which the
breast of the ages has been so long gorged; Influence has
a vigorous but better regulated pulse, gladness and love are
on its countenance; History is emerging from its corruptions
and appears in a regenerated form; there is a tendency to
individualization and perfection; if there be a breaking up in
what is about us it is the Preparatory movement towards the
great Unity; the iron and mailed hand of Public Opinion
greets you less violently; the strictures of Organization are
less heavy and embarrassing; Prerogative is disposed to
relinquish
some of its self-will and austerity; Literature is
beginning to replenish itself from the infinity of Virtue;
Religion is becoming more humanized; and we can scarcely
hope to enter upon the new century that is now opening to us,
without leaving at the threshold much trumpery and
feculence
,
and bearing with us abundant elements of a renovated
condition.
Deacon Hadlock
. Alas the day, that I should come to
this! Alas the day, that my old eyes should see what they
now see! I stand like a man cutting the grave-stones for his
own wife and children. I sarved under the old king, I fought
agin the Spanish, the French and the Indians; I buckled to
among the first for our liberties, I gave a hand through all the
tug of the War, I have helped build up our Constitution and
Laws, and now we are worse off than ever. Woe is me! A
sorer pest than any before has overtaken us.
Mr. Adolphus Hadlock
. What, Uncle, what, the
Small-pox
has not broke out anew? Aristophanes, my son
Deacon Hadlock
. No, Adolphus, worse than that; worse
than Throat Distemper, or Putrid Fever, or anything else.
The Jacobins, the Jacobins are in amongst us; all the
blood-hounds
of the French kennel are let loose upon us,
Free-thinkers
,
Illuminatists, Free-Masons, Papists.
Judge Morgridge
. Don't you remember, Deacon, when
the news of Braddock's Defeat, in the year '55, was brought
here, what an alarm we had? Every man, and woman, and
child, ran out of their houses to learn the news, all was
despair. `The country is betrayed by Government.' `We are
undone, they have sold us to the French.' `They'll make
Catholics of us all,' were cries that filled the streets; and
your father, a greyheaded old man, and our good minister,
then a young man, spoke to the people from the
Meeting-house
steps, and told them not to be afraid, but put their trust
in God. We recovered from our reverses, and have passed
safely through a good many difficulties since. The French
indeed have done us much good, and in the War we courted
their alliance and were glad of their aid.
Deacon Hadlock
. I know what you say, JudgeI never
liked the French, I was always agin that contract. But we
never had such trying times as these; so many
intarnal
as
well as extarnal foes to our peace and prosperity. Things
never looked nigh so dark.
Mr. Whiston
. I agree with the Deacon exactly; he has
put the case right on its own legs. For one, I am near about
27
done for. I havn't hardly a hair left to my hide, or a pewter
fip in my pocket. Taxes, taxes are eating us all up; taxes
upon your whole estate, then on the parts of it, horses, carts,
tools; taxes on all you eat and drink; taxes paid by taxes,
taxes breeding taxes; and when all is gone, then tax the body
and lug it off to Jail.
Deacon Ramsdill
. Misery makes us acquainted with
strange bed-fellows, Judge.
Judge Morgridge
. You see, Deacon Hadlock, into what
company you fall; Mr. Whiston is one whom I believe you
committed for being concerned in the late disturbances in
these States.
Deacon Hadlock
. Just as I say, Judge, we are too
lenient, we didn't put on the screws half hard enough. The
Insargents ought to have been hung, or banished from the
country, or else condemned to imprisonment for life. The State
was not cleansed of the plague that was upon it, and the sore
waxes fouler every hour.
Mr. Whiston
. 'Tis true I harbored the men; 'tis true I
fell in with the movement; and I wish to heaven we could
have a rebellionI will say it here if I have to swing
to-morrow
for it. I wish Shays could have carried the matter
through all the States. I helped throw off one government,
but I little calculated how I was going to be sucked in by
another. Courts, lawyers, sheriff-fees, constable-fees,
justice-fees
,
imposts, excise, stamp-duties, continental bills, paper
tender, forced sales, have swept off everything. The grubs of
the law have gnawed into us, and we are all powder-post.
How many actions did you try in one term, Judge? Was it
less than a thousand?
Judge Morgridge
. Well, let that go, Mr. Whiston; it is
past, and we will endeavor to forget it.
Mr. Whiston
. I shan't let it go, it an't past, and it can't
be forgotten. Can I forget the cries of Bly and Rose, up
there in Lenox? Not so easy. We fought for liberty in the
War, and if a man hasn't liberty to own his own, to use his
own, to be his own, what are our liberties good for?
Government
is Lord God Almighty, and skin-flint besides. Where
is my title to my estate? Government has got it. Where is
my income? Government has got it. Where is the disposal
of my person? Government has got it. Where is the
control
of my actions? Government has got it. Where are my
boys? Gone to fight the Government battles agin the Indians.
Where are my gals? Spinning out taxes for Government.
What is the Government for? To protect me, you say; yes,
as the wolf did the lamb, by stripping me of all I have. We
help make the Government? No. Didn't we petition to have
the Constitution altered, some of the courts abolished, and the
under officers set aside? And were our petitions granted?
No, they were not admitted; Government spurned us and our
petitions together. Such bungling and frippery never were
seen. I wouldn't give a fiddlestick's end for all the
governments
in creation. They take the best of everything, and
leave us only the orts and hog-wash. Times are mopish and
nurly. I don't mean to be scrumptious about it, Judge, but I
do want to be a man, if I am a Breakneck, and havn't so
much eddecation as the rest of you.
Judge Morgridge
. It is getting warm here; we shall be
called to the trial soon, and we need all calmness of mind.
Mr. Whiston
. I am ready to stay and argufy the matter
out with anybody. I have no notion of hushing it up so.
Dr. Spoor
. More parties than one have been implicated.
I think our worthy Deacon named the Free-masons, a
Fraternity
to which I deem it an honor to belong.
Deacon Hadlock
. Yes, I did mention them; they are
rising in France, Germany and England; they are leagued
with the Jacobins on both sides of the water, and threaten the
destruction of all this 'varsal world.
Dr. Spoor
. They acknowledge the three cardinal
doctrines
of Faith, Hope and Charity.
Deacon Hadlock
. I know it, they are as bad as the
Socinians
;
under cover of religion they would destroy religion
itself. Hasn't Tom Jefferson threatened he would burn up
all the Bibles in the land, if he comes in President? Isn't he
the jaw-bone of Jacobinism in this country? Havn't there
been town-meetings called agin Jay's Treaty? Hasn't John
Jay himself been burnt in effigy? Yes, in Boston he was
carted through the streets, with a watermelon shell on his
head, carried past Governor Adams's house where they made
him salute the old man, and then took and burnt on the
Common
.
Houses were broken open, persons assaulted. What is
all this but playing into that whale's hands, Buonaparte, and
he means to swallow us all up?
Captain Hoag
. These things are jest so. We heard in
our part of the town last week, that he had taken the city of
London, and was burning over all England; that he had made
the Pope God of the whole airth, and that they were both
coming to America, were going to put us all into the
Inquisition
,
and then set fire to't.
Deacon Ramsdill
. You eat nothing if you watch the
cook; I think we had better be thankful for what we have,
and God will give us what we want.
Mr. Pottle
. I believe the Deacon made a fling at the
Universalists?
Deacon Hadlock
. They are the seed of the old Sarpent;
they are leagued with the Devil himself; they take advantage
of the natural heart to entrap us with their soul-destroying
doctrines;
they
make a fling at the righteous justice of God.
Mr. Pottle
. For one I must say, my eyes have been
opened; I an't a going to be hood-winked any longer. I
do not believe God is a wrathful being, I do not believe he
will keep us in red-hot Hell to all Eternity for what we do in
this short life.
Deacon Hadlock
. Oh! oh! What will come next?
We are undone,I am the man that has seen affliction.
Mr. Pottle
. I believe the Atonement is broad enough to
cover the whole race.
Parson Welles
. God be praised, his decrees shall stand
against all the lying deceit of man!
Esq. Weeks
. We do indeed seem to be quite in a toss.
I have said nothing hitherto, because I have had so many
other things to think about. There are sometimes domestic
and personal calamities which seem for the moment to
out-weigh
all public concerns; and how many in our midst are at
this moment, we must believe, in deepest affliction. But I
cannot well let what has been here expressed pass without at
least offering a word of encouragement and hope. I agree
with Mr. Whiston, that our Government is not all we could
desire. I did not vote, as you well know, for the
Constitutions
either of the State or the Nation. But having been
adopted by a majority of the people, I am willing to give them
my cordial support.
I have confidence in the people;
and
believe that they will right what is wrong, and better what is
bad. I concur in the old maxim, that that government is best
which governs least, and I think the evils we deplore will be
remedied in time.
Esq. Bowker
. There is a principle of health in Time
itself, agreeably to which we may hope that the diseased body
politic will ultimately recover, the tumid aspect of society
subside, noxious sentiment be thrown off, and the clouded
atmosphere of our public life clear away.
Esq. Beach
. There are
some
gentlemen who have all the
urbanity of the Original Tempter himself; who pursue by
indirection what they dare not openly propose, and under the
guise of flattery harbor the deadliest intent. Heavens! has it
come to this! shall driveling be substituted for sound reason,
phrenzy for dispassionate conduct! Oh, Humanity, where is
thy blush! Oh Virtue, where hast thou fled! Was it not
the firmness of President Washington in resisting the
overtures
of the French, that saved us from that gulf? Was it
not the explosion of Randolph's connection with Fauchet that
prevented the worst of calamities? Are not French
emissaries
scattered through the land, corrupting our citizens, and
disturbing our politics? Have we not seen the Tricolored
Cockade, that emblem of massacre and blood, voting at our
polls? Has not France twice dismissed our envoys with
ignominy? No Festival is so celebrated in this country as
the Birth of the Dauphin; yes, we revere the birth of a
Monarch more than the virtues of Washington! You cannot,
gentlemen, have forgotten the refined patriotism of one of our
Judges, who recently invested the city of Providence with a
regiment of soldiers, and endeavored to arrest the Celebration
of the Anniversary of our Independence, and prevent the
Ratification of the then ninth pillar of the Federal
Constitution
,
New Hampshire. The Gazettes of that clique are
distributed
with a diligence worthy a better cause. Our own
mails, yes, to my shame and sorrow I repeat it, the mails of
this good old Federal town of Livingston are loaded with their
prints; Chronicles, Auroras and Arguses are circulated in our
midst, through which the great Monster of Evil belches forth
his falsehoods, seditions, blasphemies and calumnies upon our
population. This Anglophobism is the most malignant and
incurable of all diseases.
Esq. Weeks
. Yes, enough of it worse than
Gallophobism
.
We have no dastardly Refugees voting at our polls
no. Reams of Russell's Gazettes, Courants, Centinels, Spys,
are not every week brought to our villageno. They are full
of truth, religion, candor, sweetnessyes. We have no
readers of Porcupine's Gazette, a writer who is an avowed
British subjectno. The Editor of the Aurora was not
recently whipped in the streetsno. How many Black
Cockades
could I count in this room? But, soberly, Sam Adams's
threadbare coat must give place to John Hancock's lace and
ruffles. Our ladies must have negroes to bear their trains
through the streets as their mothers did. Captain Hoag,
here, would have us kneel to his Spread Eagle and Blue
Ribbon, and we must barter our old-fashioned pewter for
27*
Cincinnati plates, and cups and saucers. We must import
mustard, muffs, tippets and Flanders lace. We must baptize
all things into the mild spirit of Federalism; we have a
Federal Congress, Federal Gazettes, Federal Hotels, Federal
Theatres, Federal Circuses, Federal Streets, Federal
Ware-houses
,
Federal Flour, Federal Babies; we have long had a
Federal Gospel, no offence to our good Minister, and must
look for a Federal Heaven.
Esq. Beach
. I shall make no reply to matters like these;
I know we are somewhat diverted from the objects that
brought us here. But one thing I would have impressed on
all minds; there are three political sects in the United States.
The first in number, as well as in sense, without umbrage to
Brother Weeks, are the Federalists, who believe mankind are
in need of the restraints of good government. The second
are the Jacobins, who see in every book of acts and resolves,
gibbets, pillories and jails. But there is a third sect, who are
less despised and yet are more contemptible, the Illuminatists.
These will have it that government is unnecessary. They
want common sense to such a degree, that they do not know
their want of it. They are under-workers to the Jacobinical
purpose of power, plunder and vengeance.
Abel Wilcox
. 'Lexis Robinson is here again with his
notes, Sir.
Deacon Penrose
. I dare say. He is punctual to a day.
He holds some of the Consolidated Notes and Quarter Master
General's Certificates, and comes every year to dispose of
them. I offered him eight and six pence on the pound; then
as they depreciated four shillings, and at last when they were
good for nothing, in pure compassion, I told him I would give
one and six; but he wouldn't be easy without the full face.
He might have taken advantage of the Funding.
Mr. Whiston
. That is what we tried to bring about, a
means to pay the old soldiers; but we could not do it. Poor
Lex, his face half gone, his wits nigher done for, his old sores
still a runningwell if the country for which he fought can
give him sward enough to cover his bones!
Deacon Ramsdill
. He that lives upon hope will die
fasting
,
as Poor Richard says; if this belongs to 'Lexis I guess it
will apply to some other folks. What is the hour, Judge?
Judge Morgridge
. I think we had better give attention
to the prisoners. The warrant was issued from your office,
Squire Bowker, I believe; shall we not adjourn there?
Parson Welles
. God send the right.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE TRIAL.
The
magistral investigation resulted in the discharge of all
the family but Chilion, who was committed to answer before
the Supreme Court, which would sit the next week. The
testimony of the witnesses was varying and confused, as their
observation had been uncertain and indistinct. What with
the trepidation of the moment, and the clouded condition in
which the catastrophe found the party, it took no small sagacity
and patience in Esq. Bowker, who seemed disposed to conduct
the case with entire candor, to distinguish, resolve, and average
the singular materials that were submitted to his attention.
Chilion himself would make neither confession nor denial.
He was seen with a file in his hand, an instrument without an
haft, and consequently pointed at both ends. Ambrose
Gubtail
testified he saw him throw it towards young Smith, and
that immediately thereupon the deceased cried out. Beulah
Ann Orff said she saw Margaret cross the fire-place, and take
the file from her brother's hand; but Obed and Abel Wilcox
both declared they were sitting near, observing her passages
with Solomon, and that she did not move from the chimney
corner. The connection of Pluck with the affair hovered for
a while in doubt; the Widow averring that she
did not know
but he might have seized the instrument and sent it on its
fatal errand, as she heard him wrangling at Solomon, and saw
him fling out his arms passionately; but Grace Joy said she
was looking at him, and that he was only beating the table
with his fists. The Widow also said that Rose was at the
moment walking away from Chilion towards the back side of
the room. Brown Moll, it was clearly shown, had followed
the Master in his retreat to the floor. Regarding Hash, Sibyl
Radney testified that he was employed with other missiles
than those of iron, even assailing herself with the importunities
of love; she also testified that Smith was sitting on a tottering
milking-stool, that he fell simultaneously with the overthrow
of the pumpkins and the table, that she afterwards found the
file fixed in one of the pumpkins, and another one apparently
grazed by the same instrument; and that she believed he was
upset from his stool by a pumpkin dropping upon it, and that
if the wound of which he died was occasioned by the file, she
conjectured it was diverted from its course by striking one
pumpkin and fixing itself in another, which in its descent
drove the instrument into his neck. She said in addition that
she thought the wound might have been occasioned by the
edge of a piece of crockery, since the table with its various
contents was precipitated at the same moment with the
pumpkins
,
and fragments of glass and other things quite covered
the body. To rebut this, Zenas Joy declared Solomon fell
before
the pumpkins did. Sibyl replied that the pumpkins,
the table, which was composed of two heavy boards, and its
furniture, precipitated upon the man were sufficient to kill
him. It was, however, the opinion that he came to his end by
the loss of blood from the jugular vein, and it was the
unanimous
sentiment of all, that that vein was opened by the direct
course and momentum of the file.
The deceased was buried the next day, and at his funeral
was exhibited every circumstance of solemn array and
mournful
impressiveness. The body was carried to the Church,
where Parson Welles preached an appropriate sermon, and
followed to the grave by a long train of people swayed by
alternate and mingled grief and indignation.
On the succeeding day Mr. Smith, the father of the deceased,
came to the Pond claiming the expiration of the conditions on
which Pluck held the estate, and ordered the immediate
removal
of the family; who were consequently obliged to look
for new homes. Pluck went off with his kit on his back to
seek employment wherever it should offer. Hash and his
mother were invited to Sibyl Radney's. Of Nimrod and Rose
nothing had been heard. Bull followed Hash. When
Margaret
had assisted the rest away, she had time to turn her two
birds and Dick, the squirrel, out of doors, and gather a bundle
of clothes and Chilion's violin, before Mr. Smith proceeded to
nail up the house. She besought her mother and Hash to
take the birds and squirrel, but the hurry, preoccupation and
irritation of the moment were too great to pamper wishes of
that sort. Up the Via Salutaris she saw her father, her
mother, her brother and Sibyl filing along, drearily, all with
heavy packs on their shoulders. Deacon Penrose sent up an
attachment on the oxen and cart which were driven by the
Constable, Capt. Tuck, down the Delectable Way. Her own
course had been resolved upon; she was going to Esq. Beach's
to seek occupation, be near Chilion, and fulfil her engagement
as Governess. She paused a moment, looking up and down
the road, and back to Mons Christi, then striking across the
Mowing, buried herself in the thickets of the Via Dolorosa.
Reaching the Village, she turned into Grove street, and went
directly to the Squire's. Mrs. Beach received her at the door,
and asked her into the parlor. She was barely seated, when
the door opened, and in poured a parcel of children.
Julia, William, said Mrs. Beach, why do you behave so
unmannerly? How often have I told you not to come into
the house with a noise, and those other boys havn't scraped
their feet.
I have got a tame squirrel here, Ma, said William
Beach.
What are you doing with that dirty thing? exclaimed
Mrs. Beach.
It's the Ma'am's, said Julia Beach, Arthur said it
was.
We found it trying to get in at the door, said Arthur
Morgridge.
She isn't your Ma'am now, said Mrs. Beach.
Isn't she going to live here, and teach us? asked
Julia.
Not as we know of, replied the mother. You take
away the squirrel, and run to your plays.
Dick meanwhile wrested himself from the hand of the boys,
and leaped into the lap of his mistress.
Take the creature away, reiterated Mrs. Beach.
Margaret interceded in behalf of her pet. I shan't touch
it, if the Ma'am wants to keep it, said Consider Gisborne.
Come, let us see if we can't get the kite up. The children
retreated with as much impetuosity as they entered.
Did you expect to bring that creature with you? asked
Mrs. Beach.
I know not how he came, replied Margaret, I left him
at home; and she might have added, that delaying on her
steps two or three hours in the woods, the squirrel, shut out of
doors, and growing tired of silence and solitude, concluded
to follow her, a trick he had more than once in his life
attempted
.
What have you in that green sack? enquired the lady.
It is my brother Chilion's fiddle, replied Margaret; I
thought it would be some comfort to him in the Jail, and so I
brought it down.
Your brother, indeed! rejoined Mrs. Beach. A sorry
crew of you. I must inform you that the Squire and myself
have judged it best to dispense with your services. We
thought it would be extremely bad to have one of your family
a member of ours. Since the dreadful things that have
happened
at your house, it would be unsafe to our property, and
perhaps to our lives, and certainly detrimental to the morals
of the children, to have anything to do with you. And it
would be wrong not to break a promise made with those who
have proved themselves so unworthy to keep it.
What shall I do? asked Margaret passionately.
It is of no use for you to practise any dissimulation, Miss
Hart. I quite wonder that you should have had the
presumption
to come at all. We were going to send word that we did
not want you. But your anxiety for your brother, it seems, has
brought you down even sooner than was anticipated! If worse
comes to worst, you can go to the Poor-house, perhaps you
can find employment with that class of people to whom you
properly belong. I am not unreasonable,for the time has
come when we can no longer tamper with low and vile
characters
.
The appearance of the lady evidently encouraged no
protestation
or parley, and Margaret withdrew. She stood on the
door-steps, with her bundle and squirrel in her arms,
disordered
in purpose, palsied in feeling, and almost blind in
vision, from this unforeseen turn of affairs. The children,
who were trying to fly a kite on the grounds in front of the
house, came around her.
Are you not going to stay? asked Julia Beach.
No, replied Margaret.
Won't the Ma'am help us fly the kite? said Consider
Gisborne.
Yes, replied Margaret.
The string is all in a snarl, said Arthur Morgridge.
Margaret, most mechanically, most mournfully, fell to getting
out the knot, then, having dropped her luggage, ran with the
string, and when the kite was fairly up, offered it to one of the
boys to hold.
She's crying, said Julia Beach. She is crying! was
the word whispered from one to another. The kite was at
once dropped, and as she resumed her burden, the children
huddled about her.
What makes you cry? said Julia.
Oh! I cannot tell, said Margaret; I have no home, no
friends, no place to go to.
Never mind the kite, said Consider. I'll carry this,
he added, seizing the sack containing the violin; I don't care
if she did put me on the girl's side, she is the best
School-Ma'am
I ever went to.
I will carry this, said Arthur, taking the clothes-bundle
from her hand.
I want to have the squirrel, said Julia.
Let me take hold with you, Arthur, said Mabel Weeks.
Where are you going? asked Margaret.
I don't know, said Consider, we wanted to help the
School-Ma'am.
I am going to take the violin to my brother who is in the
Jail, he loves to play on it. Perhaps you wouldn't like to go
there.
Deacon Ramsdill was at our house, and said he didn't
believe he
meant
to kill Solomon Smith, said Consider.
I remember what you said when you kept the school, that
we musn't hate anybody, said Arthur.
Ma said people wasn't always wicked that was put in Jail,
said Mabel.
Preceded by the children bearing their several loads,
Margaret
went towards the Green. Approaching the precincts of
the Jail she found her way impeded by large numbers of
people
,
who were loitering about the spot, of all ages and sexes.
Some sat on the Stocks, one stood on the top of the Whipping
Post, several had climbed into the Pillory. She was greeted
with sundry exclamations of dislike, and the aspect of the
people was not the most inviting. Even threatening words
were bestowed upon her, and some went so far as to jostle her
steps. She stopped while the children gathered closer to her,
and then they all proceeded in a solid body together. The
crowd parted, and she went through a long file of people. I
can see the Devil in her eye, said one. The whole family
ought to be hung, said another. Poor Mr. Smith's heart is
most broke, said Mistress Hatch. How Damaris takes on!
said Beulah Ann Orff. I always knew Chil would come to
a bad end, said Mistress Hatch, there were spots on his
back when he was born, and his mother cut his finger nails
before he was a month old. There was a looking-glass
broke at our house the week before, said Mistress Tuck.
I had a curious itching in my left eye, said Mistress Tapley,
and our Dorothy dropped three drops of blood from her
nose. There was a great noise of drums and rattling of
arms in the air, just before the Spanish War broke out, said
old Mr. Ravel. The Saco River run blood when the last
War begun, said Capt. Hoag; I was down in the Province
and saw it. He beat his head all to smash with a froe,
said one boy. No, it was with an axe, said another; Biah
Tapley told Aurelius Orff, and Aurelius told Myra Dunlap,
and Myra told me. They are the most dangerous wretches
that ever walked God's earth, said Mr. Cutts. Coming to the
porch of the Jail house, Margaret took the baggage into her
own hands, dismissed her guard, who ran back to their sports,
and sought of Mr. Shooks admission to Chilion's cell. The
reply of that gentleman was brief and explicit. Troop!
gump, said he, don't hang sogering about here, you
sauce-box
.
Havn't you smelt enough of these premises? It will be
your turn to be hung next. Pack and be off. She turned
from the door. A hundred people stood before her, they
closed about her, she encountered the gaze of a hundred pairs
of eyes, dark and frowning; Mr. Shooks, by the application
of his hand to her shoulder helped her from the steps to the
ground, where she seemed almost to lose the power of motion.
What do you ax for that are beast? enquired one. That's
Chil's fiddle she's got there in that bag, said Zenas Joy.
That'll help pay for what the dum Injins owe daddy, said
Seth Penrose. Come, you may as well give it up.
You shan't touch it, outspoke Judah Weeks. I'll stand
here, and if anybody wants to put his tricks on her, he'll have
to play rough and tumble with me a while first. She an't to
blame for what her brother did. While he was speaking,
Sibyl Radney elbowed herself into the midst, and seizing the
bundle under one arm, and Margaret under the other, bore
her off through the crowd who retreated before her. Sundry
boys still saw fit to follow; who again closed about Sibyl when
she stopped with her load. There is Deacon Ramsdill,
shouted one. We'll have some fun out of him if we can't
out of the Injin, cried another.
Well, my lads, said the Deacon, limping in among them
with his insenescible smile, what have we here? You must
truss up a cow's tail if you don't want to be switched when
you are milking; if there is any mischief here we must attend
to it. Come, Molly, you must go with me. Out of the way
boys, a cat may look upon a king; I guess you will let a
squirrel look at you.There, Molly, continued the Deacon,
leading her across the Green into the East Street, we have
got through the worst of it, and we praise a bridge that carries
us safe, even if it is a poor one.
I thank you, Sir, I thank you, said Margaret; but, oh,
let me be, let me die, let the boys kill me.
Dogs that bark arter a wagon, replied the Deacon,
keep out of the way of the whip; I guess the boys wouldn't
hurt you much. The people are a good deal up, and when
the grain is weedy we must reap high, we must do the best
we can. I have seen Judge Morgridge, and he thinks you
will be safest at my house; Squire Beach says he can't
employ
you, and I think you had better go home with me. The
Judge says his Susan wants to see you, and it wouldn't be
best for you to go to his house now, because he
is
Judge.
Freelove will be glad to see you. When you was at our house
before, you was gone so much you didn't hardly give her a
taste.
There is nothing left to me, said Margaret; I am blank
despair.
The finer the curd the better the cheese, replied the
Deacon. They are cutting you up considerable smart, but
it may be as well in the end. What you are going through is
nothing to what I saw down to Arcady, when we went to
bring off the French under Col. Winslow. We dragged them
out of their houses, tore children from their mothers, wives
from their husbands, and piled them helter-skelter in the
boats. Then we set fire to everything that would kindle,
burnt up houses, barns, crops, Meeting-houses. They stuck
to their old homes like good fellows. One boy we saw
running
off with his old mother on his back into the woods, and
we had to bring him down with a bullet before he would
stop. We took off nigh eighteen thousand of them. When
we weighed anchor, their homes were in ashes, their woods
all a fire, and the black smoke hung over the whole so
funeral-likethey set up such a dismal yell as if the whole
airth was going to a butcheryyours an't a feather to it,
Molly.
How could you do such things! exclaimed Margaret.
Oh, they was Papists and French, it was political, I
believe
,
I don't know much about it. Here is our house, and
the fifty acres of land I got for that job. It has lain powerful
hard on my conscience, I have struggled agin itI don't
know as I should ever have got the better of it, if the Lord
hadn't a come and forgiven me. Freelove, I have found the
gal. She will pine away like a sick sheep if we don't nuss
and cosset her up a little.
The Deacon's, to which Margaret was not altogether a
stranger, was a small, one-story, brown house, having a garden
on one side, a grass lot on the other, and a corn-field in the
28
rear. Over the front door trailed a large luxuriant woodbine,
now dyed by the frosts into a dark claret. What with the grant
of land, a small pension continued until the Revolution, the
Deacon, maugre his lameness, had secured a comfortable
livelihood for himself and wife, which was the extent of his
family. The usual garnish of pewter appeared in one corner
of the room into which Margaret was led, in the other stood a
circular snap-table, between the two hung a black-framed
looking glass supported on brass knobs blazoned with
miniature
portraits, underneath the glass was a japaned comb-case,
and a cushion bristling with pins and needles, on one wall
ticked a clock without a case, its weights dangling to the floor;
against the opposite wall was a turn-up bed, over the
fire-place
were pipes suspended by their throats and iron
candle-sticks
hanging by their ears; there was a settle in the room,
an oval-back arm chair which the Deacon occupied, while his
wife, in mob-cap and iron-rimmed bridge spectacles, sat
knitting
in a low flag-bottomed chair by the chimney corner, and
Margaret had her place assigned opposite in a large stuffed
easy chair. For dinner Mistress Ramsdill prepared tea for
Margaret, which she poured from a small, bluish,
gold-flowered
,
swan-shaped china pot into cups of similar character,
and the Deacon roasted her some apples with his own hands,
and both insisted upon her eating
something
, to which she
seemed in no way inclined.
Why do you treat me so much more kindly than other
people? said Margaret, when she resumed her seat in the
easy chair.
I don't know, replied the Deacon, except it's nater.
By the grace of God, I yielded to nater. I fought agin it till
I was past forty; when what Christ says in what they call his
Sarmon on the Mount, and a Colt brought me to. I will tell
you about the Colt. Mr. Stillwater, at the Crown and Bowl,
had one, and he wouldn't budge an inch; and they banged
him, and barnacled him, and starved him, and the more they
did, the more he wouldn't stir, only bob, and fling, and snort.
He was an ear-brisk and high-necked critter, out of Old
Delancy. It kinder seemed to me that something could be
done, and they let me take the Colt; I kept him here in the
mow-lot, made considerable of him, groomed him, stroked
him, and at last I got him so he would round and caracol, and
follow me like a spoon-fed lamb; he was as handy as the
Judge's bayard; just like your squirrel there, he is do
cile
as a
kitten. I had this nater when I was arter the Hurons under
General Webb, and it shook my fire-lock so when I was
pulling the trigger upon a sleeping red-skin, I let him go.
And when we were in the ships coming away from Arcady, it
made me give up my bed to a sick French gal, about as old
as you, Molly, and nigh as well favored; yes, it made me take
her up in my arms, rough, soldier-like as I was, and lay her
down in my hammock, and she thanked me so with her eyes;
she couldn't speak English
What became of her?
She had a lover, I believe, in the other vessel, and when
we got to the Bay, it wasn't political to have them put in one
place, he was sent away, and they put her in a Poor-house,
where she fell off in a decline. One of them old French
Priests that I helped tear away from the blazing altar of his
church, used to come round hereabouts peddling wooden
spoons, and I declare, it made the tears come in these eyes to
see him, and nater got the upper hands, so I gave him lodgings
once a whole month. I fought agin nater, I tell you, and a
tough spell I had of it. I read in the Good Book what
Christ said about the Blessed Ones, and it wan't me, and
Freelove said it wan't her. It went through us like a
bagonet. I was struck under conviction here alone one night,
when our little Jessie lay in the crib there by the fire. I
looked into her sweet white face as she was asleep, and knew
Christ would have blessed her, and that she belonged to the
kingdom, and it all came over me how I had slided off from
what I was when I was a boy, that I had been abusing nater
all my life. When Freelove come in I told her, and she said
she felt just so too. I tried to pray, but nater stood right up
before me, and prayed louder than I did, and I couldn't be
heard. The arrows of the Almighty stuck fast in me. We
lay one night on the floor, fighting, sweating, groaning. We
were not quite ready to give in. We tried to brace up on the
notions and politicals, but nater kept knocking them down.
Then the Colt came, then I saw it in Old Brindle, our cow,
then I saw it in the sheep, then I remembered the French Gal
and the Indian; and at last we give in, and it was all as plain
as a pipestem. When I went out in the morning, I saw it in the
hens and chickens, the calves, the bees, in the rocks, and in
all Creation. There is nater in everybody only if it was not
for their notions and politicals. The Papists, the Negroes and
the Indians have it. Like father like child,I believe we all
have the same nater. I have heard Freelove's grandfather
tellhis father told him, he was cousin of Captain Church,
and sarved in the expedition how when they went out arter
the Pequods, and had killed the men, and burned the women
and boys and gals in their wigwams, they found one woman
had covered her baby with the mats and skins, and then
spread herself over to keep off the blazing barks and boughs;
and when they raked open the brands there was the roasted
body of the woman, and under her the little innocent all
alive, and it stretched up its baby handsbut the soldiers
clubbed their firelocks
Oh! these are dreadful stories, I cannot bear them now.
There is nater agin, Freelove, just as we always told one
another. What is bred in the bone will never be out of the
flesh; it is only kicking agin the pricks, wrastle with it as
hard as you will.
I can never think of myself again, said Margaret; but
my poor brother and Mr. Smith's family
I stuttered up to No. 4 yesterday arter the funeral, but
they are so grown over with rum there, you can hardly tell
what is nater, and what is not. I read out of the Bible to
Mr. Smith's folk, and tried to pray with them, but they
couldn't bear it. That agin is part rum and part nater. You
know, Freelove, how we felt when our Jessie died, we didn't
want to see any one; all their words couldn't put life into her
cold dead body. I should have gone up to see you at the
Pond, but I can't get round as I used to before I was hamstrung
on the Plains of Abr'am, under General Wolfe. It's dreadful
business, this killing people, it's agin nater; I followed it up
a purpose, and have killed a good many in my day. Christ
have marcy on me! If I had my desarts I should have been
hung long ago. Rum too is dreadful business, Molly; and I
guess it had a good deal to do with that matter up to your
house.
The Deacon was a great talker, and in modern parlance
might have proved a bore, if his wife had not jogged him, and
said, the gal had not had any sleep for three nights, and she
guessed she had better try and see if she couldn't get some.
The bed was lowered, and Margaret laid upon it, where she
was quiet if she did not sleep most of the afternoon. In the
evening, Susan Morgridge came to see her. Susan's manner
was calm, but her heart was warm and her sentiments
generous
.
She told Margaret that nothing had been heard from
Mr. Evelyn since his departure for Europe, and that Isabel
Weeks was still at the Hospital slowly recovering from a long
fever which had succeeded the Small-pox. But the absorbing
topic was Chilion and the death of young Smith. Susan told
Margaret there were some who would do all that could be
done in the case, but that her father apprehended her brother
could not be saved from the extremest penalty of the law.
Margaret replied that the whole affair was to her own mind
enveloped in mystery, that Chilion would reveal nothing to
her, and that she had hardly equanimity enough to give the
subject any cool reflection. Finally, for this seemed to be a
part of her errand, Miss Morgridge proposed that Margaret
should see Esq. Bowker, who she said was a valued friend of
hers, and that he would be happy to do her any service in his
power in the approaching crisis; and that gratuitously.
The moment the nine o'clock bell dropped its last note,
Deacon Ramsdill spread open a large book on his lap, put
glasses on his nose, while his wife deliberately pulled off her
glasses, drew out her needle from the sheath and laid her
knitting carefully aside. I have got the Bible here, said
the Deacon, and we want to praythat is, if you can stand
it. When you was here in the Summer, you staid out so
much we couldn't bring it about. I saw you once laughing at
what was in the Book, and I took it away, because I knew
you wasn't prepared for it, and hadn't got hold of the right
end. Freelove and I have talked this matter over; and we
know how it is with you; we know how you feel about these
things up to the Pond. A hen frightened from her nest it is
hard to get back, and you was handled pretty roughly down
here to Meeting once. We musn't give a babe strong meat,
the Book says, and nater says so too; and folks that tend
babies musn't have pins about them. Then agin you can't
wean babies in a day; it takes some time to get them from
milk to meat. Praying, arter all, isn't a hard thing; its
nater. I used to pray when I was a boy, but I left it off in
the Wars, and didn't begin it agin till nater got the upper
hands once more. I have seen the Indians pray up among the
Hurons, and they couldn't say a word of our language. It is
speaking out what is inside here, it is sort o' feeling up. It
comes easier as you go along, just as it is with the cows, the
more they are milked the more they give. I hope, Molly, you
won't feel bad about it. It is time to reap when the grain
becomes shrunk and yellow, and I think you look nigh in the
same case; and it seems time to pray.
I shall not feel bad, replied Margaret; you are so good
to me, and I love Christ now, and should be glad to hear
anything
he says.
28*
The Deacon proceeded to read from the Gospels, then with
his wife knelt in prayer. Margaret also by some sympathetic
or other impulse also kneeled down, and for the first time in
her life united in a prayer to the Supreme Being; and we
cannot
doubt the effect was salutary on her feelings. She slept
that night in the other front room, where was the spare-bed,
with red and blue chintz curtains over square testers, and a
floor neatly bespread with rag-mats. The next morning she
expressed great anxiety about her brother, said she wished
either to see him, or have his violin conveyed to him.
Things are a good deal stived up, answered the Deacon.
People's minds are sour, and I don't know, Molly, what we
can do. It's nater you see, one doesn't like to have a son
killed
.
Then the politicals are all out of kelter, one doesn't
hardly know his own mind, and all are afraid of what's going
to be done. I suppose they won't allow you to go into the
Jail, they think you and your brother would brew mischief
together
,
and perhaps he would break out. The building is old
and slimsy, you know. I am going to the Barber's to be
dressed
,
and I will take the fiddle along with me, and see what can
be done. But don't you stir out of the house, I don't know
what might happen. It is no use reasoning with the people,
any more than with a horse that is running away.
The Deacon took the instrument under his surcoat, and went
to the Barber's, where the bi-weekly operation of shaving and
powdering was performed. When he was alone with Tony,
he propounded the wish of Margaret; to which the negro
replied
that he would do what he could. The same evening,
Tony, with his own and the instrument of Chilion, presented
himself to Mr. Shooks. You know, said he, that at the
last Ball, I couldn't play because my strings were broke, and
the Indian is the very best man this side of York to fix them.
And then this gentleman is learning a new jig, and he wants
the Indian to try it with him.
You can't go in, said Mr. Shooks. We have got the
rascal chained, and mean to keep him down. And there is no
trusting any body now-a-days. Who knows but all the
vagabonds
in the country will rise, and have the government into
their hands the next thing we see?
If Mister Shooks would permit this gentleman to bestow
so much honor on him as to go into the Prison, and take the
Indian's fiddle, he would shave Mr. Shooks and powder him
with the most patent new violet, crape and roll Miss Runy in
the most fashionable etiquette, and give her an Anodyne
Necklace
,
all for nothing, all for the honor of the thing.
You may go in once, replied Mr. Shooks, but don't
come again, and Tony, whispered the vigilant warden, see if
you can't find out if the villain means to break Jail. I would
not lose having him hung for a thousand pounds.
Tony being admitted, remained a short time with Chilion,
left the violin, and was summoned away.
The next day Esquire Bowker called on Margaret, informed
her of the usages of Courts, and while he tendered his services
on behalf of her brother as Counsellor, he urged the necessity
of a more complete acquaintance with the case than he then
possessed
;
but Margaret replied that on all points she was as
ignorant
as himself. That night, impatient of a profitless delay,
anxious to approach nearer her brother, at a late hour when
the streets were vacant of people, having asked the Deacon's
consent, she sallied out, and crossed the Green to the Jail.
Presently
she heard the familiar voice of Chilion's music,
proceeding
from a low and remote corner of the building. Climbing
a fence, and reaching a spot as near the cell of her brother as
the defences of the place would permit, she again listened;
then in the intervals she made sounds which she thought might
be heard by her brother; but no token was returned; only
she continued to hear low, sad, anguished notes that pierced
her heart with the most lively distress. Dick, it appeared, had
again followed her; perhaps in the midst of strangers he could
abide her absence with less composure than ever; and soon
she had him in her arms. He too heard the sound from the
prison, the familiar tones of his Master; it required little
urging
on the part of Margaret to send him clambering over the
palisadeup the decaying logs of which the building was
framed he must have gone, and into the cell of Chilion; for
soon Margaret heard a changed note, one of recognition and
gladness; and soon also the creature came leaping back on to
her shoulder. Glad would she have been to leave him with her
brother, but it would be unsafe for him to be found there;
glad was she thus to communicate with him at all. A new
thought struck her; she hastened back to the Deacon's, and on
a slip of paper wrote to her brother, then returned to the Jail,
and fastening her billet to the body of Dick, renewed her
former experiment with success; she also sent in a pencil and
paper for her brother. The next night pursuing this device,
she had the satisfaction not only to transmit something to her
brother, but also to receive a word from him. This novel
species
of Independent Mail she employed the few nights that
remained
before the trial. On one point she could draw nothing
from Chilion, that of his relation to the murder. She kept
within doors most of the day, and only ventured abroad under
cover of midnight; she saw little or nothing of her own family;
and heard nothing of Rose and Nimrod.
The day of the dreaded trial came at last. A true bill had
been found against Chilion, and he stood arraigned on the charge
of murder. Margaret heard the Court-bell ring, and her own
heart vibrated with a more painful emphasis. Leaving her at
the Deacon's, we will go up to the Court-house; the tribunal
was organized with Judge Morgridge at the head of the bench.
Chilion was brought in, his face, never boasting great color or
breadth, still paler and thinner from his confinement, and darkly
shaded by a full head of long black hair. The right of
challenge
he showed no inclination to employ, and the
empanneling
of the jury proceeded without delay.
To the Indictment, charging, that not having the fear of
God before his eyes, but being moved and seduced by the
instigation
of the Devil, feloniously, wilfully and of his malice
aforethought, he did assault, strike and stab Solomon Smith,
thereby inflicting a mortal wound, etc., the prisoner arose and
pleaded Not Guilty; then sat down and threw his head forward
on the front of the Box; a position from which neither the
attentions
of his Counsel nor any interest of the trial could arouse
him. The building was thronged with curious and anxious
spectators from Livingston and the towns about. The
examination
of the witnesses went on. The substance of the
testimony
was similar to that given before the Justice. It bore
increasing
proofs of a general belief in the guilt of the prisoner;
first impressions had been corrected by subsequent reflection,
doubts moulded into conviction, and whatever was obscure
rendered distinct and intelligible. Sibyl Radney was the only
one whose evidence tended to exonerate Chilion. Indeed Esq.
Bowker and Deacon Ramsdill, during the week, went to the
Pond, and with Sibyl examined the scene of the fatal event.
But those little circumstances on which the guilt or innocence
of the prisoner seemed to depend, Sibyl herself had partly
destroyed
in her haste to restore order in the house; the pumpkins
had been cast out of doors and consumed by the hogs, the
broken crockery was removed, and there remained nothing but
the boards of the table, the milking-stool and the file. Nor
was there much left to Esq. Bowker, but to employ his labor
and skill, his arts and cunning, if such he had, in the invidious
cross-examination. In addition to causes operating in the
immediate
circle of the prisoner, the newspapers of the country
came in filled with details of a Shocking and Brutal
Murder
in Livingston, and in one instance, it was pertinenly
hinted that the present afforded
another
opportunity for the
exercise of Executive Clemency. Obviously there was a
clear conviction of the guilt of the prisoner in the public mind,
and the testimony before the Court went far towards
establishing
the soundness of that feeling. Night closed the scenes and
nearly finished the results of the trial. After dark, Margaret,
whose sensations during the day can as well be imagined as
described, sought a breathing place in the open air; she went
into the street, she turned her steps towards the Green; but
the shadows of men moving quickly to and fro, the echo of
excited
voices drove her back. As she retreated, she was
stopped
by the sound of her own name; Pluck called after her,
evidently moved by other than his ordinary stimulus. It is
all over with Chilion, said he, unless we can get the Judge
to do something; he can set the Jury right in his charge, or
do something; you must go right up and see him.
Margaret, by a cross-path, sped her way to the Judge's; she
met Susan at the door, to whom she stated her errand. Susan
sought her father in the library. No, replied the Judge,
let me not see the girl. There are points in the case I do
not understand, but the evidence against the prisoner is
over-whelming
.
Oh, father, replied Susan, what if she were
me, or her brother our Arthur! Speak not, my child, our
duties are imperious, our private feelings are borne away by a
higher subserviency. The public mind is much excited, God
knows where it will end, or how many shall be its victims.
But, if my dear dead mother were her mother, or if you were
his father! Go away, my child, let me be alone, let the
girl not come near me, let me not hear her voice, let not her
agony reach me, leave me to compose myself for the awful task
before me. Go out, go out, my child.
Stung by this repulse, terrified at the prospect before her,
Margaret passed a sleepless night, and before day-break she
left the house, and directed her course towards Sibyl Radney's.
She had not gone far when she met many people hastening
down to the closing scenes of the trial. This diverted her
into
the woods, and so delayed her that when she reached Sibyl's
they were gone from there, excepting Bull, who ran fondly
towards her, and was caressed with tears. With the dog, she
went down to the Widow Wright's, whose house was likwise
vacated; and she continued on the Via Salutaris to her own
home. Here were only silence and desolation; one of her birds
she found frozen to death on the door-stone. Restless, anxious,
she returned towards the Village by the Via Dolorosa. She
hung on the skirts of the Green with an indeterminate feeling of
curiosity and awe; seating herself on a rock in the Pasture, a
chilling desperation of heart seized her, and with an agitating
sense of the extinguishment of hope her eye became riveted
on the Court-house. Presently she saw persons running
towards
that building, which was now an object of public as well
as individual interest. She knew the hour of final decision
had arrived. With a rapid step she descended the West Street,
turned the corner of the Crown and Bowl, and soon became
involved in a crowd of people who were urging their way into
the Court-room. The Judge is pulling on the Black Cap,
was the cry reported from within. Tight squeezing, said
one, and your brother will soon be thankful for as much room
to breathe in as this I guess. Won't you let me pass? said
Margaret. We can't get in ourselves, was the reply. The
Injin's dog has bit me, I'm killed, I'm murdered, was an alarm
raised in the rear. Drub him, knock him in the head, was
the response; and while the stress relaxed by numbers
breaking
away in pursuit of the dog, who had followed his Mistress,
Margaret pressed herself into the porch; wimble-like, she
pierced the stacks of men and women that filled the hall.
What, are you here, Margery! exclaimed Judah Weeks,
with an undertone of surprise. Do help me if you can,
was the reply. She sprang upon the back of the prisoner's
Box, seized with her hand the balustrade, and resting her feet
on the casement, was supported in her position by Judah, who
folded himself about her. Her bonnet was torn off, her dress
and hair disordered, her face and eye burned with a
preternatural
fire. This movement, done in less time than it can be
told, had not the effect to divert the dense and packed
assem-blage
,
who were bending forward, form, eye and ear, to catch
the words of the sentence, then dropping from the lips of the
Judge. Her brother who was standing directly before her,
with his head bent down, remained unmoved by what transpired
behind him. The Judge himself seemed the first to be
disturbed
by this vision of affection, anguish and despair that
arose like a suddenly evoked Spirit before his eye. He halted,
he trembled, he proceeded with a stammering voice  you
have violated the laws of the land, you have broken the
commands
of the Most High God; you have assailed the person
and taken the life of a fellow being. With malice aforethought,
and wicked passions rife in your breast No! No!
out-shrieked
Margaret. He never intended to kill him, he never
did a wicked thing, he was always good to us, my dear
brother
.She
leaned forwards, grasped her brother's head and
turned his face up to full view.Look at him, there is no
malice in him; his eye is gentle as a lamb's; speak, Chilion,
and let them hear your voice, how sweet it is.Stop! Judge
Morgridge, stop!Order in Court! cried the Sheriff.
Down with that girl! It's nater, it's sheer nater; just so
when I was down to Arcady, exclaimed Deacon Ramsdill,
leaping from his seat with a burst of feeling that carried away
all sense of propriety. The Judge faltered; there was
confusion
among the people; but the jam was so great it was
impossible
for any one to stir, and those in the vicinity of
Margaret
who attempted to put into effect the commands of the
Sheriff were resisted by the stubborn, and almost reckless
firmness of Judah. But Margaret throwing herself forward
with her arms about the neck of her brother, became still.
The popular feeling, only for a moment arrested, again flowed
towards the Judge, who, in the midst of a silence, stark and
deep as the grave, went on to finish his address, and pronounce
the final doom of the prisoner. He came to the closing words
be carried to the place of execution, and there be hung by
the neck till you are dead, dead, when with a sudden
convulsive
shriek, Margaret raised herself aloft, extended her arms,
and with a startling intonation cried out, Oh God, if there
be a God! Jesus Christ! Mother sanctissima! am I on
Earth or in Hell! My poor, murdered brother! Fades the
cloud-girt, star-flowering Universe to my eye! I hear the
screaming of Hope, in wild merganser flight to the regions of
endless cold! Love, on Bacchantal drum, beats the march of
the Ages down to eternal perdition! Alecto, Tisiphone,
Furies! Judges bear your flaming Torches; the Beautiful
One brandishes an axe; Serpents hiss on the Green
Cross-Tree
;
the Banners of Redemption float over the
woe-resounding
,
smoke-engulphed realms of Tartarus! she relapsed
into incoherent ravings, and fell back in the arms of Judah,
who bore her senseless body out through the gaping and
awestricken
crowd.
CHAPTER IX.
MARGARET AND CHILION.
Margaret
was carried to Deacon Ramsdill's, where she was
bled, and after lingering for three or four days in comparative
exhaustion, she recovered so far as to be able to go abroad.
There was no precedent that forbade a man, under sentence
of death, the sight of his friends, and, what she had so much
at heart, she at length attained, permission to visit her brother.
In the Jail-house, her dress and person were strictly searched
by Miss Arunah Shooks, maiden daughter of the Jailer, who
stripped her of every article by which it was supposed the
death or escape of the prisoner could be compassed She
found her brother hand-cuffed, and locked to the floor by a
chain about his ankles; a precaution some might think
unnecessarily
rigid, but one to which her own conduct had
contributed
;
since a scrap of paper had been discovered on
Chilion, and Mr. Shooks suspecting something out of the way,
suggested the matter to the Sheriff, General Kingsland of
Dunwich, who ordered the additional confinement of the
wrists. The cell was small, dark, cold and infested with many
descriptions of noisomeness. Her brother rose as she entered,
she heard the clanking of chains; she stood for a moment
like one stupified, then rushed forward, and wrapped herself
about him. They sat down together upon the edge of the bed.
My brother! O my brother! poor Chilion! and other
similar
out-bursts of a deep sisterly affection were all she could
utter. She had many tears to shed, and many sighs to dispose
of, before she could speak with connection or composure.
It is all over with me, said Chilion at length.
I know it, I know it, said she.
I knew it must come to this, said he. I have been
making up my mind to the worst. If I could only put my arms
around you, Margaret, I would ask no more.
Dear, dear Chilion! lean against me. I can hold you.
When you was little I carried you in my arms, and how I
have loved to lead you through the woods! If it were not for
you, Margaret, I should not care so much to die. Let me feel
your face.
Tony gave me some Nuremburg salve to rub on your sores;
but they took it away because they thought it was poison.
Would that it were, and that you could kill yourself at once.
Your foot is dreadfully swollen.
That is the foot I lamed when I was in the woods after
you, Margery; I suffered more that night, when I thought you
was dead, than I have here in the Jail.
Poor, dear Chilion; I will sit on the floor and hold your
feet. The chain has worn through your stocking. Let me
put my hand under.
That feels easierbut don't you sit there, my pains will
soon be ended. If you smooth my hair a little I should be
glad; I have not been able to lift my hand to my head these
four days, and it is all touzled.
You look deadly pale,or is it the light of the room? and
you have lost almost all of your flesh.
I have not been able to stir about any, I used to walk the
length of my chain, till it hurt me so much.
I will hold up the chain and see if you cannot walk a
little.
No, no, Margery, I am content to sit here by the side of
you. It is but a little while we have together, and I feel as if
I had many things to say to you.
To say to me, my dear brother! How little we have
spoken to one another. Why do you tremble so?
O Margaret, Margaret! I have loved you, so loved you as
no words can tell. All my heart has been bound up in you;
and all that I care for now is, that I must die and leave
you.
Speak, Chilion, tell me all you feel; you have always been
so silent.
I know I have, but only because I could not talk, or did
not know what to say. And since I have been in prison things
have labored in my mind, and I have been afraid I should die
without seeing you. When I have been silent I have thought
about you the most, and loved you the most. When you came
a little baby, I loved you; I used to feed you, play with you,
sleep with you; I rocked you to sleep on my shoulder, I loved
your sweet baby breath; I set you on the grass and watched
you while I spooled on the door-stone for Ma; I took you out
in my boat on the Pond, and got Bull for you to play with.
When you grew older I led you into the woods, I made you a
canoe and taught you how to paddle it; I made a sled for you
to coast with in the winter, I let you run about in the summer.
29
You loved to do these things, and I knew it would make you
strong, healthy and bold. I grew proud of you, you had better
parts than I; and when the Master used to come to our house,
he took a good deal of notice of you, and when he brought
you books, he said you learned so well, better than a great
many did. I told you the names of the birds and the flowers,
and songs of the birds. As you grew up, I followed you in my
mind, and with my eye every day, every hour.
Why have you not told me this before, Chilion? I always
knew you loved me, but you never expressed your feelings to
me.
It was never my nature to talk much; I did not seem to
have the use of words as others did; and I never knew what
to say. Perhaps I took a kind of pride in seeing you go on;
you went farther than I did, you had more thoughts than I;
that I knew when I heard you talk with the Master, and I was
willing to be silent. You seemed to have a mysterious soul,
anagogical, the Master calls it, and all I could do was to
play to you. I played myself, my feelings, my thoughts to
you.
So you did, Chilion, and I knew you felt a good deal.
Almost my only comfort in this world has been you and
my fiddle. Our family were once in better circumstances, we
have not always lived at the Pond; but that was before you
were born. Pa did something wrong and lost his ear, and he
never has been himself since. We have followed drinking,
and that has ruined us. Ma has lost her courage, Pa doesn't
care what he does, and Hash is not what he was when he was
a boy.And we were all in drink that dreadful night.
Can you not now, Chilion, tell me something about what
happened then?
Solomon behaved bad to you?
He only asked me to kiss him.
Was that all?
He said if I wouldn't he would turn us out of house and
home; but I knew he was drunk, and did not mind him.
Did he do nothing more? Rose said his manner was
insulting
.
Perhaps it was; but you know I tasted some, and it went
into my head so, I hardly knew what was done. But do tell
me if you did murder him?
If I tell you all I know, will you sacredly promise never to
speak of it till after I am dead.
I will promise anything; but your manner frightens me.
What is coming?
Rose, Margery, you know, loves you as much as I do.
She is happy only with you; and she feels for you as for her
own sister. That night she told me what Solomon was doing,
and she was very much excited about it. We had both taken
too much, and hardly knew on which end we stood. I was at
work on my violin with a file, and she told me if I did not
throw it she would
Then you did not do it, you will not be hung!
Hear me, Margaret, I had murder in my heart, I should
have been glad at the moment to have seen Solomon shot dead.
I know it was a wrong feeling, but I had it. I have not had
right feelings towards him for some time. Rose told me how
he followed you
I was never afraid of him; if he was drunk I knew I could
get out of his way, and if he was sober he would not dare to
touch me.
That may be, but Rose is very sensitive about what might
happen, she seems to look upon most men as a kind of devils.
Poor Roseyes.
I knew Solomon had a spite against you, because he could
not find the gold; and Rose told me of his saying you should
marry him, or he would turn us out of doors. He has been
rough with me, he cut down some nice ash-trees he knew I
had marked for basket-stuff, and once when I was shut up a
long while he bored a hole in my boat and let her fill with
water. Rose kept urging me, and saying if I didn't do
something
she would. I took aim towards him with my file, I
thought I would see how near I could come to him and not hit,
as the Indians do; then I thought I would strike his arm.
The pile of pumpkins you know was very high, and he was
right under them; I saw one jutting out from the rest, Pa was
shaking the table, I thought they would all soon fall, then I
remember thinking I would knock the loose one on to
Solomon's
head. Rose shook my shoulder, I threw the file, and I
know no more about it.
Then you did not intend to kill him?
The law holds people answerable when they are sober for
what they do when they are intoxicated. Besides, the Judge
laid down that if death followed an act done with intention to
injure, it was murder, as much as if there was an intention to
kill. That is all I know about it, and we have no help but to
wait for what is before us.
There was so much noise and hurly-burly in the room, I
saw nothing till I heard him scream out and the tables fall.
Pa leaped up and down, and began to fling the chairs about.
I took him by the arm and led him out doors to the Cistern.
When I came back, they had carried Solomon away, and most
of them were gone. What did Rose do?
They cried out that I had done it. One and another said
they could swear they saw me do it. I seemed to come to my
senses; I saw how it was. I might have tried to get away,
but I was lame and could not run; if I took Nimrod's horse
I knew I should soon be caught. Besides I knew somebody
must suffer. Rose said it was her act, and she would abide
the consequences; and told me to go. When I refused, she
said she would stay with me. We told her that it was of no
use, that one of us must abide the result; and if she stayed
they might take us both. She fell on her knees and pleaded
to stay, said she did not wish to live, and that perhaps my life
would be saved. I could not listen to her, I told her I wanted
she should be a comfort to you, Margaret, if I should be taken
away. She flatly refused to go. At last, Nimrod got his
horse, and as he sat in the saddle, Sibyl dragged Rose out of
the house, and lifted her up into his arms, and they rode
off.
Poor Rose!
She grew very dear to me, Margaret; I could almost say,
if it were possible for me to say such a thing, I loved her.
One day she told me something of what she had been through.
She loved to hear me play, and I knew the music made her
happier and better. I would die a hundred deaths, before a
hair of her head should come to harm. I have now told you
all, Margaret, I could say nothing before. Esq. Bowker
questioned
me a good deal, but I was afraid I should injure Rose,
and I held my peace.
Have I not loved you, Chilion? Have I not been kind to
you? Yet not so much as I ought to have been. I remember
once you asked me to dig you some worms, and I went off
into the woods, and did not do it. Can you forgive me for
that? And now you are going to die, it seems as if I had
not been half so good to Pa and Ma, and Hash and Bull, as I
ought to have been. I thank you for telling me about that;
do, Chilion, tell me some more about yourself.
What I think more of than anything is you, my dear
sister. I seem to have had strange hopes about you. I
remembered
the dreams you had when you was a girl, you have
seemed to me sometimes destined to good things. There is
something about you I could tell, but if you live, you will
know all, and if you do not,well, let it go. I have brought
you up to Music, Margaret, I have taught you the notes, and
as much of the Art as I know. The Master always insisted
you should have books, though I did not care much about
them. There is a great deal in Music. I have played myself
to you when I could not speak it.
Alas! And where shall I hear any more Music, or
another Chilion!
Let that go now.Those who can be reached by nothing
else are reached by Music; at the Balls and dances, I have
seen this.
I thought things went strange sometimes, and I could not
account for it.
I could raise a storm, and then still it. It was given me
to perceive this power when I was quite a boy. You
remember
the brawl at No. 4, one Thanksgiving, we cured by a
song. I cannot explain it, I only saw it was done.
It must be what Deacon Ramsdill calls `nater.'
There is nature in it. I have seen the Old Indian stop
against our door a long time when I have been playing.
Rose was completely subdued, and at times wholly
transformed
by your Music.
Yes, and how we could manage Dick; and when they
brought you up out of the woods, I had them all a dancing,
even what the Master calls the saints danced, and the
Ministers
looked on and smiled.
Is not Music what the Deacon calls praying? He says it
is `feeling up.'
Yes, it is that. I have done all my praying with my
fiddle. I had a tune almost ready for the Lord's Prayer, which
I was taught a good many years ago. When you talk with
people their prejudices close their ears against you; when you
play it seems to open their hearts at once. Music goes where
words cannot. And Music makes people so happy, and when
they are happy, they love one another. Music takes away the
bad passions, and people are not envious or quarrelsome while
you play. All this I have seen, and it would always be so, if
it were not for the drinking. If I could have got ready and
played, as I was going to do, I think Solomon would not have
been rude to you, as you say somebody tamed wild beasts and
savages by Music
Orpheus, you mean, who subdued Pluto and rescued
Eurydice with his lyre?
29*
Yes, Orpheus. But I threw an iron instead of a musical
point, and here I am! There is something else, it has seemed
to me that Music might be a good thing for the world. I
have sometimes thought if I were not lame, and we were not
so poor, I would travel off and make Music. You, too,
Margaret
,
can play, you can sing songs, your voice and ear are
most excellent. You know how we are at home, you know
what people think of us; it has seemed to me that we might
make our way up among folks by Music. I have had many,
many thoughts about you and Music, and the world, more
than I can speak of. You yourself have a certain unknown
connection with Music, which I cannot tell. Then I do not
mean mere fiddle-strings, because when you told me about
your Dream of Jesus, he seemed to me like a Harp, it had
the same effect on me that Music does; then in one of your
Dreams you said you heard invisible Music. It is not all in
catgut and rosin. There has been a certain Something in
my mind, which I have not words to explain. It has been
coming upon me for several years. I think it is one thing
that has closed my mouth so. My heart and thought have
gone out to it very often. And now I am cut off in the midst
of my hopes
O sad condition! O most inexplicable existence! I am
sunk lower than our bottomless Pond in doubt and fear. I
can now feel as Rose does what a dreadful thing our life is.
The Fates have left us the solitary comfort of a tear!
Let us, my dear sister, bear up under it as well as we
can. You will live if I do not; Apollo's Lyre, as you call it,
I bequeath to you.
Pitiful Fiddle! Here it lies broken-hearted like its
Master. When I heard you playing the other night, it
sounded to me for all the world, as if Rose's heart had been
set in musical motion like a wind-harp. It will never, never
play another tune.
I hear the bolts opening, they are coming for you. Parson
Welles and Deacon Hadlock were here yesterday, but I could
not say much to them. I wish you would ask Deacon
Ramsdill
to come, and the Camp-preacher. He prayed so for you,
when you was lost in the woods, I can never forget him. I
want also to have Dick stay with me, if they will let him. If
you see Ma, I wish you would ask her to bring me a clean
linen shirt, and my best clothes, those I wore to Balls, I had
rather be hung in them.
Oh, Chilion! Oh, my brother!
Be quiet, Margaret, as you can: Let us hope if our sins
are forgiven we shall meet in a better world.
Margaret was obliged to leave her brother. She
represented
his wishes to Deacon Ramsdill. The Parson and
Brother Hadlock tell a hard story of Chilion, I know, replied
that gentleman. But we should not judge too hash. Down
to Arcady they said the French were savages, that their
crosses bewitched the people; but they were a dreadful
harmless
set of folk. And we must take care too, Molly, what
we
think. The Parson has a good deal of nater in him, only it
is all grown over with notions and politicals. You give your
cows tarnips and you taste it in the milk; now he has been
feeding on tarnips all his days, and I count your brother don't
like the smack of him. Besides, Chil is what we were saying
the other day, a baby in these matters, and he ought to have
the very sweetest and best of milk, and if you put in a little
molasses it wouldn't hurt him. Brother Hadlock has nater too,
nobody in the world would sooner do you a kindness. But he
runs of an idee that things are about done for, that there is no
use trying any more. But, if we would fetch the butter we
must keep the dasher a going; if you stop, you know it all
runs back. Yellow-bugs have been the pest of our gardens
for two or three year; now I have noticed that in new-burnt
ground they don't appear at all. If we should get burnt over
a little, perhaps we could raise better squashes and
cucumbers
than we do now. The Preacher is more nateral, but he
is as wild as a calf dropped in the woods. When you wind a
ball of yarn you make little holes with your thumb and finger,
and as you wind along you cover them up, and when you are
done, the ball has a great many of these holes. So folk get
all wound up with their notions and politicals and
harem-scarems
,
but they are still chock full of these little holes of
nater. Speaking of holes, I have seen mice make their nests
in rocks, and then the bees came and used these nests for
hives, so that arter all, we got nice honey out of hard rocks
and mischievous mice. I will try to get the squirrel to your
brother. Down to Arcady, the little gals cried as if their
hearts would break because we wouldn't let them bring away
their moppets and baby-houses; I can't forget that.
During the interval between the Trial and the Execution, a
period of ten days, Margaret was allowed to visit her brother
two or three times. Soon as possible after the sentence, under
the auspices of Deacon Ramsdill, a petition was got up, and
privately circulated, for the pardon of the prisoner; it was
sent to the Governor with about half a dozen signatures, at
the head of which stood the name of Judge Morgridge. This
movement was unknown to Margaret, and on the whole
without
consequence, since the answer was in the negative. The
day preceding the Execution she went to have her final
interview
with him. The sheriff having taken up his quarters at
the Jail-house, and a guard being kept about the premises at
night, it was deemed safe to knock the chains from the
prisoner, and allow him a more commodious and better-lighted
apartment. He had on the dress he ordered, a pearl-colored
coat, buff-swansdown vest, white worsted breeches and
stockings
,
all somewhat worn and faded. Margaret brought a new
linen stock the Widow Luce made for him. Tony the Barber
came in to perform his last office on the condemned.
Don't know but I cut you, said the negro. I am
getting
old, and my hand is unsteady.
You stand a chance to wash off the blood, replied
Chilion.
Cold, gusty day, said Tony, can't keep the water out
of these eyes. Never shaved a man going to be hung the
next day, since the War, and them was wicked Tories.
Neck as fair as Mistress Margery's. Sheriff Kingsland wanted
to get this gentleman to play the drum to-morrow. Can't
degrade
the profession soGod bless Chilion, good bye, my
brotherForgot my rose-powderTherethrew the towel
out of the window for the soap-paper. I am growing old and
forgetful.
Margaret and Chilion were left to themselves.
Let me kiss your neck, said she. I would put my
hands about it, an amulet to keep off the ugly rope. Hold
your face to mine, let me feel it, and keep the feeling as long
as I live; look into my eyes that I may have your eyes also.
I want some of your hair too. How shall I get it unless I bite
it off. I had a pair of scizzors in my pocket, but they were
taken from me.
There, Tony has forgot his razor too. He laid it on the
bed. You can use that.
What a tempting edge! said Margaret.
Don't hold it up to me so, replied Chilion, I shall be
tempted by it.
I had a thousand times rather you should take your own
life than be hung by the Sheriff to-morrow. How easy for
you just to slit a vein. I would catch the blood with my own
lips, you should expire in my arms. See your stocking is
bloody now, where the chains were. If Rose was here she
would call this wicked business, and put a stop to it very
shortly.
It is considered wrong to kill one's self, replied Chilion.
They hold it right to kill me because I killed another.
Right and wrong! right and wrong! I am all confusion,
Chilion. There is no truth or nature in anything. I am
losing all clearness, all sense of consistency.
God have mercy on you, Margaret, and on me too.
Throw the razor out of the window. Let us not keep it, or
talk about that.
I will, Chilion. I would not trouble you. A brief hour
alone remains to us. Our wretchedness and our communion
shall be alike undisturbed.
I wish for your sake, my dear sister, I could live longer.
You are all I care for. You have made our home happy.
But I do not know as I would stay in this town. I would go
elsewhere, and perhaps you will find some to love you. I
should like to go up and see the Pond once before I die.
Can I leave it, Chilion, its water, its woods, my little
canoe, our house, my flowers, the dear Gods, Mons Christi,
that we had given to the Beautiful One? Whither in this
wide wicked world shall I go? If I were going to be hung
with you I should be glad. Mr. Evelyn is gone, Isabel is
sick, and perhaps she too will die, the Master is sick, and
Roseshe, after all, is worse off than I. Why do I complain.
And Damaris Smith I know loved her brother, and he too is
dead!
Be composed, Margaret. There are things not quite so
bad in my case as in some others. Dr. Spoor says he will not
take my body for dissection, and Deacon Ramsdill says he will
have me buried in the grave-yard. Don't cry, Margaret, don't
cry, if you do I shall cry, and here is little Dick looking up into
your face as if he meant to cry too. I want you to go to Mr.
Smith's and ask their forgiveness for me, and the little
willow-basket
I made to hold your sewing work, I want you to give to
Damaris. My boat I want you to sell to pay Deacon Penrose
for some screws and a chisel; and some red-lead I got to
paint your canoe with, and some silk Ma had to mend this
waistcoat. I have eight or ten baskets ready made which he
will take. My Fiddle I wanted you to have, but I think you
had better sell it to pay some of Pa's debts; Tony I guess
will give six or seven dollars for it. You will find, Margaret,
in the bottom of my chest, up garret, five dollars and a
quarter; it is what I got several years ago, for some wolf
skins; I have been saving it to buy you a Guitar; but you
must take it to help pay for my coffin; and I want you to go
up to the Ledge to Mr. Palmer's, and get a plain slab of
marble
to put on my grave. He has always remembered you
kindly, and I think he will let you have it for a low price. Mr.
Gisborne was in yesterday to take my measure for the coffin;
he said if he could not get his pay any other way, his wife
would be glad to have you do some weaving for her. This is
a good deal to ask of you, Margaret, but when I am dead and
gone, I don't want people to lay up little things against me.
Speak, Margaret, don't you feel so bad. Get up from the floor.
I can't raise you, but I can hold you in my arms. There, there,
Margaret.
I will do anything, all you wish; but when it is ended, I
only ask to be laid under the same sod with you.
You may live for good. God only knows. You may see
Mr. Evelyn again; if you do I want you to give him a lock of
my hair, and tell him as my dying words, that I truly forgave all
men, and wished to be forgiven of all. The lady's slipper that
I made a box for, I want you to give to Susan Morgridge, for
Esq. Bowker's sake; he is going to marry her, and this is all
I can do for his kindness to me. On the slab I want Mr.
Palmer to mark `
Chilion
,' simply. I should like to have it
said, `Here lies one who tried to love his fellow men'but
that cannot be.I hear Pa a-hemming. Let us try and be as
still as we can.
There entered the cell the prisoner's father and mother,
and his brothers, Hash and Nimrod. Margaret receded to
the foot of the bed, where she sat with her face folded in her
hands. The bloated frame of Pluck surged and trembled, on
his bald crimson pate stood large drops of sweat, in most sober
and earnest grief he embraced Chilion; with a quivering lip,
and a faltering accent, he said, Farewell, my son, farewell
forever; and turned away and wept like a child. My
Chilly! exclaimed the mother, falling upon her son's neck,
My youngest boywould God I could die for thee. My
young hands welcomed you in your fair babyhood, now these
old arms send you away to the gallows. You were beautiful
for a mother's eye to look upon. You have been a comfort to
your mother, weak and sinful as she is. I have sometimes
hoped for better days, but all is over now. She sunk to the
floor and sobbed hysterically. Good bbb was all Hash
could utter. I have not always been patient and kind
towards
you, said Chilion; can you forgive me, my dear
brother? Stuff it out, like a red Indian, said Nimrod.
The Hell-hacks would crack to see you flinch. Your lips
are white as a fox'syou are sick, Chilion, you can't stand,
let me lay you on the bedthey'll have to hold you up to hang
you, like a stuck sheep. If you should die betwixt this and
to-morrow, twelve o'clock, how many mourners you would get,
more than you have nowI feel as if the rope was round my
throathemI'm chokingEcod!I was going to be
married
to Rhody next thanksgivingChilion will not be there
I have been wickedI am going to try to do better.
Margaret
broke into louder weeping, and the room was pervaded
with an uncontrollable and shattered wail. In the midst of all
appeared Rose, like a pale and sudden Ghost, she ran forward
to Chilion, she clung frantically about his neck; He shall
not die, I did it, I did it, I will be hung, she said in a wild
passionate tone. Nimrod was obliged to interfere; she
resolutely
persisted; by force he unfastened her grasp, he carried
her struggling in his arms out of the apartment. Deacon
Ramsdill and the Preacher came in; all knelt while the latter,
in heart-felt earnestness and tender solemnity, commended the
soul of the prisoner to God and the forgiveness of his grace.
Smiles and good humor fled the face of the Deacon, whose
deep and variegated furrows were filled with tears. Other
persons entered to say their farewells, Judge Morgridge and
his daughter, Esquires Beach, Bowker and Weeks, the Widow
Luce and her son Job, the Widow Wright and Obed, Mr. and
Mistress Wharfield, Sibyl Radney, and a few who had known
Chilion; when Margaret was again left alone with her brother.
These final moments of the two, so tenderly attached, so
mournfully
separated, we will not intrude upon.
CHAPTER X.
THE EXECUTION.
The
morning of the Execution, like that of the Resurrection,
brought out both small and great, a multitude which no man
could number. They came from the East and the West,
the North and the South. Highways were glutted with
waggons
and horses, by-ways with foot-people. They came from
distances of eight, twenty, and even forty miles. Booths, carts,
wheel-barrows supplied a profusion of eatables and
drinkables
.
A man with a hand-organ in cap and bells, hawkers of
ballads, a Lion from Barbary, Obed peddling his nostrums,
gaming tables, offered attractions to the crowd, and
contributed
to the variety of objects with which the Green brimmed and
overflowed. At an early hour Margaret left the Deacon's;
where, whatever might have been her inclinations, she could
hardly have found accommodations, since the house was filled
with people from the fourth up to the fourteenth shade of
connection
,
including half a score of infants. Taking what on the
whole seemed to be the most feasible route, whereby to escape
the annoyance of the multitude and horrors of the day, she hid
herself in the deep bed and under the decayed foliage of Mill
Brook. Slowly sauntering up the channel of the stream, she
found herself on the open road, and close by the premises of
Anthony Wharfield. Ruth espying her as she was on the point
of fleeing again into the recess of the water-course, crossed the
road, took her by the arm and endeavored to persuade her into
the house. Am I too late for the hanging? said a man
stopping to take breath. I havn't missed of one these thirty
year, and I wouldn't, any more than Sunday. Thee had
better
go and see, was the laconic reply. Aristophanes, my
son! Holdup, knave, you graze the limbs of my dear
daughter
,
was the hurried language of Mr. Adolphus Hadlock. I
have been to cousin Sukeyanna's to bring down the children.
I am fearful we shall not be there in season.Socrates, your
sister is slipping from the pillion. Triandaphelda Ada, my
daughter, how could you suffer your brother to do so. I would
not have you fail of this opportunity on any account. It has a
most happy effect on the mind of children. Your mother, dear,
is waiting for us; she says seeing a man hanged is the most
interesting sight she ever beheld.I can't endure this,
said Margaret. Well, then, come into the house, said the
woman. Anthony will succor thee; he is sorely troubled
for thee.
Leaving Margaret at the Quaker's, let us follow up this
current
of general attraction. The bell tolled, and the prisoner,
supported by Sheriff Kingsland, was conducted to the
Meeting-house
,
under a guard of soldiers. Parson Welles preached a
discourse, a printed copy of which, with its broad black margin,
and vignette representing the gallows, now lies before us. The
following passage occurs, which illustrates the style of the
Parson's
ordinary pulpit exercises.
Let the improvement be lastly to the wretched man who is
now before us. God says, `Whoso sheddeth man's blood, by
man shall his blood be shed.' The just laws of Man and the
holy Law of Jehovah call aloud for the destruction of your
mortal life. Alas, miserable youth, you know by sad, by
woeful
experience, the living truth of our text, that the wages of Sin
is Death. As we have shown under our third proposition, by
man's disobedience many were made sinners; and under our
fourth, Mankind are already under sentence of condemnation.
But there is a door of hope. As God demanded a perfect
obedience of the first Adam, the second fulfilled it. Jesus
Christ made a Propitiation. He endured on the cross the
vengeance
of a broken law, he was punished by an insulted
Divinity
.
We can do nothing of ourselves. But take the Lord
Jesus by faith; trust to his merits, repent, Oh, repent. Lay
hold of the hope set before you. This is the last day of mercy
to your poor soul. But if you refuse these offers of grace,
your departed soul must take up its lodgings in sorrow, woe
and misery. You must be cast into the Lake that burneth
with fire and brimstone, where deformed Devils dwell, and the
damned ghosts of Adam's race.
The religious solemnities being concluded, the procession
for the place of execution was formed. The prisoner with the
coffin was placed in a cart, having on either side the Sheriff
and his Deputy; while lines of bayonets bristled before and
behind. A band of music accompanied them, playing Roslin
Castle, the shrill piping of fifes pathetically blending with the
muffled and measured boom of drumsnot Tony's, for he
declined serving on the occasionand that which had been
Chilion's life now became his death-dirge. The multitude of
the people followed, in numbers rated at the time as high as
twenty thousand. The Gallows was erected on a plain in the
North Part of the Town, about three miles from the Green,
whither had already been removed stores of refreshment and
minor objects of interest. The spectators were kept in a ring
by the soldiers, prayer was offered by the Parson, and the
prisoner
asked if he had any thing to say. He replied no. He
requested that the cap might not be drawn over his eyes, nor
his hands tied. You will seize hold of the rope and hinder
the execution, replied the Sheriff. No, I will not, said
Chilion, I had rather die free. We understand it,
answered
the officer; you are determined not to die.
30
The drop fell, on the part of the spectators a gasp, a sudden
blink of the eye, a suffocating sensation in the throat, a sicker
one in the stomach, responded for a moment to the struggles
of the dying man, and, on both sides, all was over. The body
was decently laid in the coffin, and, under the superintendence
of Deacon Ramsdill, borne to its last resting-place, in the
grave-yard. The crowd dispersed to drink, to game, to riot,
to wrestle, to race horses, see the Lion, hear the hand-organ.
Margaret, unable to contain herself in the house, anxious if
possible to find her own family, plunged again into the woods.
She clambered up the rocks and steeps that threw such a
charm over her ride with Mr. Evelyn, in the direction of the
Pond. Night was coming on, she hastened through the
Maples
.
A light startled her, the fumes of smoke arrested her
senses. She crossed the Mowing towards her old home. In
the West, and over Mons Christi rolled up dark, cold clouds,
but in the North-east, beyond the forest that immediately
skirted the Pond, the heavens were distinctly illuminated. She
saw smoke rising and occasional sprits of flame. While she
was looking, a swarthy giant form stood before her. It was the
Indian and his grand-daughter. He seized her arm, and silently
and unresistingly led her forwards. He took her by an old and
familiar path up the Head. What had been a streak of light
in the horizon, they now beheld a boiling angry river of flame.
The woods on the North of the Village, an extensive range of old
forest, were on fire. The Indian, without speaking, slowly
raised his arm, and pointed steadily at the scene of the
conflagration
.
Each moment the effect increased, and the fire driven
by a brisk northerly wind seemed to be making rapid progress
towards the Green. Sheets of sluggish smoke were pierced
and dispersed by the nimble yellow flames which leaped to the
tops of the tallest trees, assaulted the clouds, and threw
themselves
upon the solid ranks of the forest as in exterminating
battle. Beyond the fire, and up in the extreme heavens, was a
pitchy overshadowing blackness; the faces of the three shone
in a blood-red glare; behind them gathered clouds and
darkness
;
below, the water, the house, the Mowing, the road, were
immersed in impenetrable shade. Margaret gazed with a
mixed expression of anguish, surprise and uncertainty. The
Indian stood majestically erect, with one arm folding his
mantle
,
his countenance glowing with other than the fire of the
woods, his pursed and wrinkled features dilating and filling
with some great internal emotion. The girl looked quietly
and smilingly on. The wind shook the tall white feather in
the old man's head, threw Margaret's bonnet back from her
face, and quivered in the long black locks of the girl.
Daughter! said the Indian to Margaret, almost the first
words she ever heard him utter, as the flames seized and
crunched the gnarled top of an old dead tree, Behold
Pakanawket
,
grandson of Pometacom, great-grandson of Massassoit,
the last of the Wampanoags! Ninety winters have passed over
him, he has stood the thunder-gust and the storm-shocksee,
the fires consume him!
Daughter, hear! The great Pometacom, called in your
tongue King Philip, who rose to be the liberator of his
country
,
was hacked in pieces by your people, his head exposed
twenty summers in one of your towns to insults of men, and
the laughter of women. His wife, Wootonekanuske, and his
son, my father, were sold for slaves. My grandmother
pounded
corn for the whites, she bore on her breast the brand of her
master: but she whispered into Pakanawket's ear, the purpose
of his grandsire, she charmed him with the spell of the Great
Spirit. My father, escaping from slavery, and my mother,
perished with the Neridgewoks. Swift as a deer, still as the
flight of an owl, I have gone from the Kennebec to the
Mississippi
;
I have visited our people on the Great Lakes; I have
fought against French, English and Americans. Pakanawket
gave a belt to no tribes of the whites, he sat at no council-fire
but those of his own countrymen. His wife was murdered by
the French, his children scalped by the English. His old arm
grew weak, the strength of his people had perished. The
Snowheron
came and built his lonely nest in the green Cedars of
Umkiddin; there he has dwelt with the little Wootonekanuske,
in your tongue Dove's Eye. I have put my ear to the ground,
I hear the tramping of horses and the noise of battle; he whose
eye never sleeps is on the trail of the red-man; Wyandot,
Seneca, Delaware, Shawanese, all have fallen. The white man
throws his arm about the Great Lakes, he gathers into his
bosom the Father of Waters. The red man drags his canoe
across the graves of his Fathers; the feet of his children are
sore with travelling in the long wilderness.
Daughter, listen! I saw your song-brother struggling in
death; pleasant has been his viol to me, pleasant the sound of
his voice. My heart wept for him, memories gushed forth.
Where are the brothers, fathers, sons, friends of Pakanawket?
Massassoit, the generous, the noble, died as the caged Eagle
dies. Jyanough, the fair and gentle, wasted in swamps where
your violence had driven him. Miantunnimoh was cast as a
bear to appease the wolf you had enraged. Mononotto,
Nanunteenoo
,
Annawon, Tispaquin, Paugus, Pumah, Chocorua,
Logan
,
Hendrick, Pontiac, Thayendanaga, Sagoyewatha, where
are they? Burnt, beheaded, hung, tortured, enslaved, exiled!
Daughter, listen! I was taught to read by a French Panisee;
I have read your books, I know what you say. The Bashaba
that lived in the East, that great Pirate of the seas, gave away
to his men our country. He made grants of our land and our
waters, our meadows and our fisheries, our woods and our
plains, our fowls and our beasts, our gardens and our houses,
our towns and our villages, our precious stones and our
minerals
.
You have called us savages, dogs, heathens, devils,
monsters
;
we welcomed the strange men to our shores; cold and
hungry, we nourished them in our houses. When their
children
were lost in the woods we found them, when their poor
people wanted corn we gave it them. They stole our young
men away and sold them for slaves in unknown lands. They
built forts upon our grounds, they offered bounties for our
scalps. When our children were burning, they gave
thanks-giving
to their God. They slept in our wigwams and defiled
our maidens. They asked us to their Council Fires, they
blinded us with rum. When we resisted, they declared war
upon us. There is no brother among the Indians, they have
turned our hearts against each other. When we were weak,
they subdued us.
Daughter, look! The fire goes on, the flames are consuming
their Church. The Spirit of Wrath scowls above their village.
I saw your elder brother asleep in the woods, his pipe had
kindled the leaves; these hands heaped together the faggots,
this mouth blew up the flames. Ha! Manitou fights with
Jehovah, Areouski strikes down their Holy Ghost! See, the
steeple burns. Men shall mourn to-night, children shall be
houseless. But where are the Pequods, the Narragansetts, the
Nipmucks, the Massachusetts? Prate they of Quaboag,
Pekomtuck, Cherry Valley and Wyoming? Where are
Pakonoket
,
Mystic, Mettapoiset, Monaheganic, Wessagusgus,
Knawaholee, Kanadaseega, Kendaia, Kaniandaque, Genessee?
Between sea and sea there is not a field, a hill, or a brook, we
can call our own. Pakanawket utters his voice, no Indian
answers. He looks over the homes of his fathers, he sees only
the faces of his enemies. The leaves have fallen from the
trees, his strength and hope have fallen too. Wootonekanuske
has no brother, no friend, no country, no people, no home.
The eyes of a Dove are red with weeping, she looks towards
the stars. Manitou calls, we go to the Spirit-land. In my
belt is a weight of gold, the bribe that sought for Arnolds
among the Indians. Let it do what it was designed for, finish
the Last of his race. In yonder woods Pometacom had
sometime
his home, on these waters he sailed with his little son. I
have come hither to die. Daughter of the Beautiful, take this
Heron's Wreath, wear it for Wootonekanuske's sake; she
never forgets a kindness. Take this land, this hill, these
woods, these waters, they are yours. Sometimes in your love,
your happiness, your power, remember the poor Indian!
The Chief, taking his grand-daughter in his arms,
deliberately
advanced to the edge of the rock, balanced himself over
the abyss, leaped off into the dark waters, and borne down by
the weight of his girdle sank beyond recovery. We are told
of one, who, being broken on a wheel, after the first blow,
laughed in the face of the executioner, his nervous sensibility
becoming so far extinguished that subsequent inflictions created
no suffering. Our moral nature has its analogies in the
physical
;
and Margaret, already stricken by the events of the day,
heard the fearful resolution of the Indian, and witnessed his
appalling act without discomposure; she looked coolly for a
moment at the fire, she saw the tall spire of the Church totter
and fall, she folded carefully in her hand the feathered
ornament
the Indian gave her, and descended the hill. Entering
the Via Salutaris, she was accosted by the voice of Sibyl
Radney, coming on horseback from the opposite direction.
Is that you, Molly? said Sibyl. What in creation are
you about? We have hunted every where for you. Your
folks are up to our house; Rose is there too. Rufus Palmer
has come down, and you are all going to the Ledge. Rufus
and I rode down to the Green after you, we went to Deacon
Ramsdill's, but couldn't find you. Then I went up to the
Quaker's, somebody said they saw you going that way, Ruth
said you came off this way. Get up, we must hurry on.
There is a stump, now spring. Rufus staid helping Tony get
the things out of his shop. The fire took in Judge Morgridge's
woods down back of our house; it went through Aunt Dolphy's
piece, and so down to the Horse Sheds; then the Meeting
House caught, and the brands blew from that to the Crown
and Bowlthe Lord knows where it will stop. They are all
drunk as beasts, and wild as bedlamites, down there. They
traversed the semi-luminous shadows of the wood, till they
came to the junction of the Via Salutaris with the West road
from the Village. Here Sibyl halted her horse; at this point
30*
the scene of the devastation was frightfully distinct. The fire
was still at its work; before them was a long line of blazing,
crackling forest; down the road, beyond Mr. Adolphus
Hadlock's
,
the stream of brightness and ruin extended more than
a mile. They beheld the old Church, its huge oaken timbers
resisting to the last extremity, yet presenting a Laocoon-like
spectacle of serpent-flames coiled about it and stinging it to
death. The Tavern was fast sinking beneath the devouring
element, and the roofs of the buildings beyond were shooting
out flames. Multitudes of human forms, in dim red coloring,
they saw on the Green, some violently gesticulating, some
leaping wildly into the air, some running to and fro, some
standing in evident stock-still amazement. Whatever might
be the interest of the scene, it did not detain them long, and
they made the best of their way to the house of Sibyl. Here
Margaret found all her family, her mother the image of frozen
despair, Pluck trying to laugh, Nimrod trying to whistle, Hash
stupidly intoxicated; she and Rose buried themselves in each
other's embrace. Presently Rufus Palmer came up from the
Village. There were a thousand people there, I should
think, said he; but three-quarters were drunk, and the rest
were so scared they didn't know what they were about. The
prisoners in the Jail yelled like Devils in burning hell. The
Jail-house was on fire, and we could not get in that way, and
we stove in the fence, ripped out the bars, and let the poor
dogs out through the windows. We saved Tony by the skin
of his teeth; the flakes lit on his shop, but we made out to
smother them. As I came along a drunken crew got hold of
the Stocks and threw them into the fire, then they tore up the
Whipping-post, pulled down the Pillory, and they followed, and
I left them blazing away among the Jail timbers. It hasn't
rained for six weeks, and the buildings were dry as tinder, and
burnt like a heap of shavings. The Court House and Tavern
were down, and the frame of the Meeting House fell just as I
got up the hill. Heaven save me from such another sight!
Rose ran away from our house yesterday. Father sent me
down, and said I must bring her back, and mother sent word
for Margaret and Nimrod to come right up there.
It is beginning to rain, said Sibyl, and you can't go
to-night.
The storm, which had been threatening through the day and
evening, broke at last, it rained violently, and if it interrupted
the plans of this party, it also served to check the farther
progress
of the fire. Regarding the origin of the last, it appeared
as the Indian intimated, that Hash, in the course of the
afternoon
,
saturated with liquor, went with his pipe into the woods.
Relapsing into stupor, his pipe fell from his mouth, and the
fire was set. The Indian, crossing the forest from the scene
of execution, supplied materials for its continuance and spread.
A long Autumnal drought, a blasted vegetation, a thick coat
of new fallen leaves, heaps of dry brush, a strong breeze, bore
forward the result to the final catastrophe. However the
action either of the Indian or of Hash shall be estimated, the
former was beyond the reach of inquisition; and the latter,
Sibyl had the strength to rescue from personal danger, and the
tact to preserve from detection by consigning the secret of the
affair to her own breast, and that of those whom she deemed
trustworthy to receive it.
They fared the night at Sibyl's as they best could, and the
next day Rufus and Rose, Nimrod and Margaret, rode to the
Ledge, a distance, as we have had occasion to observe, of six or
seven miles. At Mr. Palmer's Margaret with her friends was
received with a liberal hospitality and unaffected good will.
The family remembered the service she had done for them in
former years, and Mistress Palmer made a deliberate work of
endeavoring to divert her mind by sitting down, with her box
of snuff open in her left hand, and explaining with her right,
how they had been able to bring the water directly into the
house, and that Mr. Palmer had made a new marble sink, and
Rufus had carved a marble stem, with a sheep's head, from
the mouth of which a living stream perpetually flowed.
Roderick, her oldest son, had married Bethia Weeks, joined
the Dunwich Genessee Company, and gone to the West,
where also Alexander was about to follow Rufus, his mother
declared, was a good boy, and said she believed he had great
parts; in proof of which assertion as well as for the
entertainment
of Margaret, he was ordered to show the toys he had
made, consisting of sundry vases, images, imitations of flowers
and trees, done in marble. At the same time Margaret could
not avoid associating and contrasting that first prosperous
adventure
of her childhood with her present mournful condition.
In addition to any claims on their kindness which the family
of Mr. Palmer might have felt disposed to reimburse, there
existed other grounds for the friendliness of the parties.
Nimrod and Rhody, between whom an attachment and
quasitroth-plight
had for a long time subsisted, were expecting to
marry; indeed, their nuptials were assigned to the present
season. In the absence of his other sons, Mr. Palmer proposed
to Nimrod, that if he would forswear his errant habits, and set
himself to steady labor, he should have a share in his farm,
and a home in his house. He himself was a good deal
occupied
at the quarry, and Rufus, he said, was always dropping
the plough, and running after the mallet. But in the recent
calamity which had befallen his family, Nimrod said he had
given up all thoughts of marriage for the present, and avowed
a determination to wait at least until Spring; in addition, for
reasons which did not transpire, he declared that it had become
unexpectedly necessary for him to go to the Bay, before that
event, and take Margaret with him.
When Rose had Margaret alone, she recited her history
from the night of the Husking Bee. She said she and Nimrod
wandered in the woods one or two days, that they at last went
to Mr. Palmer's, where she was taken sick, and recovered on
the eve of Chilion's execution, and that only so far as enabled
her to adopt some desperate resolution for his delivery; that
she stole away from the house and made all haste to town,
Borne out from the prison by Nimrod, she was carried to
Sibyl's, where they kept her until the crisis was over.
Margaret divulged Chilion's last wishes, and was solicitous
for their accomplishment. In the prosecution of this object,
events fell out in a manner that she could not have anticipated.
Rufus volunteered to furnish the grave-stone; Mr. Palmer said
he would become surety to Mr. Smith for the liabilities of
Pluck, until Nimrod returned from his jaunt, so that the family
might again be gathered in their home. Nimrod was
despatched
on the other errands. The lady's slipper he carried to Miss
Morgridge; Chilion's boat was bought by Sibyl Radney, who
seemed desirous to have it preserved for the use of the family.
What with the baskets and the money in the chest, all debts
were paid without disposing of the violin, which was retained
as a keep-sake. The duty at Mr. Smith's, Margaret found it
more difficult to perform; and what they told her of the state
of that family at length decided her to postpone her task, until
time should have moderated their grief, or give her sufficient
strength of spirit to encounter it.
Preparations for their intended journey were now all that
remained to be done, and these the advancing season, not less
than certain concealed motives of Nimrod, admonished them
to accelerate. Rose could not be detached from Margaret,
and she too must go, at whatever rate. But for this also a
means was provided, the nature of which we will disclose.
The Widow Wright, as perhaps is well known, had long
cherished extensive expectations of her son Obed, and not less
of her business, and, we might reasonably add, of Margaret.
Whether she aspired to riches or fame, let those answer who
can best judge; but of this we are certain, that she desired to
experiment with her commodities in a larger theatre than
Livingston and its neighborhood afforded; and when she
learned the plans of Margaret and the wishes of Rose, she
eagerly sought the privilege of joining with them Obed and
his horse Timan arrangement that could not but prove
satisfactory
on all sides, since it provided a method of conveyance
for Rose without additional cost. Whether any other design
crept into the lady's mind than to make Obed acquainted with
the world, and the world acquainted with her art, one would
not hesitate to guess, when it is related that she gave her son
explicit and repeated instructions to watch with all diligence
and scrupulousness the movements of Margaret.
To the new object Margaret and Rose addressed
themselves
with diligence, and we may imagine without reluctance.
They had no wish to remain on the hands of the Palmers,
however generous or well-affectioned might be the disposition
of that family. They were glad to escape the deep, and as it
would seem ineffaceable gloom that now not only shrouded the
Pond, but penetrated the whole town. In a fresh atmosphere
they could find a breathing place for their stifled hearts, and
among novel scenes they might be diverted from those
associations
that were sapping the foundations of existence itself.
CHAPTER XI.
MARGARET GOES TO THE BAY.
When
all things were ready, one cool but pleasant morning
in the early part of November, they took their final start from
the Widow Wright's,  Obed and Rose on Tim, a thick-set
animal of small stature, who in addition to his load bore a pair
of large panniers, stocked with the Leech's simples and
compounds
;
Nimrod with Margaret, on a horse of his own, and
one, in the estimation of his master who piqued himself with
being a good judge in such things, of admirable proportions
and other desirable qualities. Margaret passed her old home,
now deserted and dead, with some sensation. She descended
the Delectable Way and the Brandon road with quite a
complexity
of emotions, and came to the Burial Ground, where
they all stopped their horses, went and shed a silent tear on
Chilion's grave, and proceeded on their way. Halting,
without
dismounting, at the Widow Small's, to inquire after the
Master, that gentleman himself appeared at the door in a loose
gown, with a cap on his head, and wearing a look of evident
sickness and debility. He seemed quite overcome at seeing
Margaret. Vale, vale, eternumque vale, O mihi me
discipula
carior! was all he could say, and covering his eyes
with his red bandanna handkerchief, withdrew. As they rode
up the street, Job Luce came out to shake hands with them,
and Mistress Weeks with several of her children, who said
Isabel was getting better. Tony also had his adieus to make,
and certain commissions for Nimrod to execute. Most of the
people they met looked sorrowful and anxious. The Green
presented a melancholy aspect, the entire West side was in
ruins; the church lay smouldering in its own ashes; what
had been a beautiful grove, sweeping down the acclivities on
the North, was now a waste, as if a black winter had overtaken
it, half-devoured trees, charred stumps, roots unearthed, lean
and hollow, a soil of sackcloth grey. Some little children
came scudding and shouting across the Green to speak with
Margaret. They entered the East Street, and made their last
call at Deacon Ramsdill's. The old man gave Margaret a
letter, superscribed Mrs. Pamela Wiswall. It's for sister
Pamela, said he; I thought it might do you some good.
She is a good-hearted critter as ever lived, if she is my sister.
I don't know where she is now, I havn't been to the Bay
since the War, and things have altered some since then I
suppose
.
She used to keep lodgings next door to Deacon Smiley's
Auction Room, a little over against the Three Doves. There
are people enough there that know her,  ask for the Widow
Wizzle, and anybody will tell you where she lives. I can't
blame you for wanting to get away. When our Jessie died,
we thought we should have to pull up stakes. Freelove
couldn't bear to make the bed up where she died, and I had
to do it. I guess she didn't go into the room full a month.
I had to put off Jessie's sheep; she had a cosset that used to
follow her. Freelove couldn't bear the sight of it. We are
all down, on the Green. People don't know what to do. But
old sward wants turning under once in a while, and if land
lies fallow a year or so, it don't hurt. The Lord knows what
is best for us. We had preaching in the Town Hall last Lord's
Day, and I guess there wasn't a dry eye there. Good bye,
Molly, God bless you all.
They continued on the East Street, crossed the River, and
entered the region beyond. The sun which has shone upon
all ages and countries alike, and dispensed its ministrations
of life, hope, and joy to every suffering heart equally on this
many-peopled globe, shone brightly upon them; the
atmosphere
was clear, fresh and invigorating; the scream of the
red-hammer, the brown herbage, the denuded forest,
harmonized
with their feelings. Margaret had never been beyond
the River before. Looking back she beheld what had formerly
been esteemed a beautiful prospect, the village, its environs,
the rising grounds beyond, and, crowning all, the Indian's
Head; but it suggested at the present moment any other
feelings
than those of gratification and delight, and she was not
sorry to find herself rapidly receding from Livingston.
Touching
the objects of this sudden excursion Margaret and Rose
were alike ignorant and indifferent; and they went on only
anxious to be a-going. Margaret had been able to procure
suitable clothing; she wore a black beaver hat, and a dress of
cambleteen. In her hair was fastened the Indian's gift, an
aigrette of white heron's feathers. Rose had on her blue silk
bonnet, and a queens-stuff habit of the same color. In Nimrod
appeared the transition from the old style to the new. He
wore a round-rimmed hat, straightbodied coat with large pewter
buttons, and a pair of overalls buttoning from the hip to the
ankle. He was more dressed than usual, and the caparison of
his horse corresponded with the elegance of that animal;
circumstances
denoting rather the weakness of Nimrod, than
any pecuniary ability. Obed bore up the olden time, and
showed his respect for the memory of his father and the purse
of his mother, in his tattered cocked-hat, broad-flapped drab
coat, leather breeches and silver buckles. His red hair was
powdered and queued, and on his nose were his brass-bowed
bridge spectacles. The habits of Tim, who resented all
approach
of strangers, might have interrupted the sociability of
the company, or even proved hazardous to life or limb, unless
Nimrod had suggested to Obed a method of prevention, which
the latter executed by cutting squares from the sides of his
hat, which he fastened as blinders to the head-stall; a step
Obed had been slow to undertake save that his mother
promised
him a new hat on conditions of fidelity and success in
this expedition. This movement served another effect, which
Nimrod probably had not overlooked; this, to wit, of animating
the gloom of Margaret and Rose, whose smiles, having long
been worried by the contrast of the parties, their horses and
accoutrements, were now provoked into open laughter, in
which neither the finesse of Nimrod, nor the habitual dignity
of Obed, allowed those gentlemen to join. Margaret had
sometime in course of her life said she could manage Tim as
well as his master. To put this point to test, and make an
exhibit of his own dexterity, when they stopped to breathe
the horses Nimrod proposed that Margaret should touch the
animal. She called his name familiarly, as she must have
often done before, and he suffered her to lay hands upon him
and stroke him, with the docility of a cat. But whenever
Nimrod approached, the ears of Tim were seen to fall, his
heels rose, and Nimrod retreated. Sometimes the girls walked
long distances. Again Nimrod, who knew the whole region
as well as his own mother's kitchen, led them about by-paths
that afforded the best views of the country and the towns. So
in various ways, with a generous if not the most discreet
attention, he contrived to relieve the monotony of the ride,
and move their spirits, which he said were binding, and the
renovation of which he declared was one purpose of the
journey. It was not difficult to observe that in all this Nimrod
consulted what was due to his own state of mind also, and
the girls were sometimes obliged to recall him from reveries
into which the scenes of the last month might have plunged
one even more light-minded than himself. As regards the
region they traversed, in some of its aspects, if any one is
curious to compare former times with the present, he might
be guided in his inquiries by a passage from the letters of
Wilson
,
the Ornithologist, who was over the same ground a short
time afterwards. Every where, says he, I found
school-houses
ruinous and deserted; the taverns dirty, and filled with
loungers brawling about politics and lawsuits; the people idle
and lazy. They arrived at Hartford that evening, where
Nimrod declared he had business of an express nature, and
Obed was desirous of finding a market. They left the next
morning, Obed in fine humor, having been able, by Nimrod's
assistance, to turn some of his goods for a new hat. On the
afternoon of the fourth day, having accomplished a journey
which can now be made in almost as many hours, they arrived
in the suburbs of Boston, at a place then and we believe now
known as Old Cambridge. Here, if they had not intended to
stop, their course must have been arrested by a great swell of
people, who crowded about the tavern, and seemed to check
all progress except in a northerly direction, whither multitudes
were hastening.
Ho, Nim, cried a burly fellow from the crowd in a
tarpaulin
and blue jacket, who evidently recognized an old
acquaintance. What are you so loaded for? Break bulk,
box-haul, and make sail in company. We are going to have a
pull-all-together up here.
How fares ye, Hart? said another. You liked to be
late at the feast. Always expect to see you when anything is
going on. Didn't see you at Plimbury Roads. Turn the
ladies in, warm your nose with Porter's flip-dog, and follow on.
Great stakes. Old Highflyer himself, out of Antelope;
grandam
,
Earl of Godolphin's Arabian.
Well, said Nimrod, if you have got anything here
equal to Tartar, out of the Scarboro Colt, nephew to the late
Hyder Ali, and first cousin to Tippoo Saib, I should like to
see him, that's all.
My old fellow, said one addressing Obed, don't you
wan't to see the fun? Four horses, one greased pole to climb,
two sheared pigs to catch, and a silver punch-bowl the prize.
It will do your old heart good to see it.
Nimrod, subject to a vacillation of spirit and passion for
novelty, that had both chequered and vitiated his life, might,
without surprise to the girls, have been tempted by the
inducements
now spread before him, and gone off with the
crowd, if he had not anticipated anything of the sort, or even
had these very scenes in his eye when he started from home.
However this might be, he kept his own counsels, told the
girls he should soon be back, threw his purse to Margaret,
intimating
there were pickpockets among the people, had them
shown to the parlor of the Inn, and rode off. Obed also,
whose ardor was inspired by the prospect of trade, soon
followed
.
Margaret and Rose, left to themselves, occupied the hour
examining the contents of the room, looking from the
windows
.
Finally they went into the street, walked through the
College grounds, saw the buildings and the students. The day
was nearly spent, people returned from the races, the tavern
rang with their noise and revels. Nimrod and Obed came
not. They grew alarmed; they overheard reports from the
race, intimations of brawls and constables. Pushing their
inquiries
,
they learned that two strangers had fallen in a drunken
dispute, done some mischief, and been carried to prison. They
31
waited awhile, till there could be no doubt the delinquents
were Nimrod and Obed. Ascertaining the direction and
distance
of the city, they took their bundles and started forward.
Night was coming on, but of that they were not afraid. They
had a three miles' walk before them, but the habits of
Margaret
and spirit of Rose were equal to it. They came to the
bridge. The long tiers of lights stretched across their vision,
like a protecting or an embattled array of stars, according as
their moods should work. The dim outline of the State
House they mistook for a mountain. They came suddenly
upon a fence that arrested their progress. This was the
draw-bridge
,
which some one in the same predicament with
themselves
said would presently be lowered. For this result they
must abide in patience. They passed over; a voice hailed
them, Toll, Ma'ams, toll. They avowed their ignorance,
and asked how much it was. Tuppence, tuppence a head.
While Rose was satisfying this voice, which like death seizes
upon all, Margaret asked, Where are we now? At
Pest House Pint, replied the man; not very pleasant
intelligence
to our travellers. Some other inquiries were made, and
Margaret asked, Where does the Widow Wizzle live? I
don't know, but you can find out up the way, rejoined the man.
They pursued their course along Cambridge Street, through
what was little better than a morass, and furnished with an
occasional lamp, that shone like fire-flies in a swamp. Can
you tell us where the Widow Wizzle lives? said they,
applying
to an old man whom they next encountered. Go by
Lynde's Paster, down Queen's, turn Marlbro, then follow your
nose till you come to it, he answered, and disappeared down
a cellar. They might reasonably be expected to be bewildered.
They had anticipated finding the house of the lady in question
without difficulty. It was late, and not many persons abroad,
and these passed them with such speed they found no
opportunity
to interpose their inquiries. Their hearts almost sunk.
At last they stopped by a lamp-post, planted themselves against
it, as if to make a regular attack upon the next one that
appeared
.
Nor did they wait long before a young man came by.
Can
you
tell us, Sir, where the Widow Wizzle lives? said
they, the light dropping full in their faces, and revealing
countenances flushed with earnestness. I am going partly
in that direction, replied the man, and if you will follow
me I think I can set you on the right track. They went on
with him some distance, by one or two turns, and through two
or three lanes, when, stopping at a dark corner, their guide,
saying that business drew him in another quarter, pointed out
the course they should pursue. They were overtaken by
another man, who, overhearing the point of inquiry, said he
was going by the house and would conduct them directly to
the spot. This one they followed till they were opposite a
large house, retired somewhat from the street, having the
entrance
to the yard by an iron gate. This, said the man,
is Mrs. Wiswall's, and opening the gate to the ladies,
departed
.
They crossed the deep front yard, mounted a flight
of stone steps, knocked at the door, and were received by an
elderly, kind-looking woman, who put all their troubles at rest
by announcing herself the woman in question. She took
them into a pleasantly lighted parlor, where they found
opportunity
to warm themselves by a coal fire. The letter which
Margaret brought was produced. Yes, said the lady, from
my good brother Simeon. When did you leave Livingston?
He says Freelove complains of pain in her back, a trouble
incident to advancing years. Miss Margaret, lost your brother,
I am sorry for you. Miss Rose, hope you are well. Make
yourselves at home while you stay here; and I hope you will
afford us a good long visit. Havn't seen any of Simeon's
folks this great while.
A cup of tea was soon ready for our travellers, they were in
rooms furnished with some degree of elegance, they found the
lady pleasant and talkative, and in many respects reminding
Margaret of the worthy Deacon. Two young ladies came in,
one of whom their hostess introduced as her daughter Bertha,
and the other, whom she called Avice, she said was a boarder.
They were shown to a pleasant chamber, where they had a
good night's sleep. The next morning, after interesting Mrs.
Wiswall in the fate of Nimrod and Obed, and gaining
assurances
that their friends should be looked after, having
ruminated
awhile on the succession of events that had fallen so
thickly and portentously upon them, they were at liberty to
observe what was about them. The parlor offered to their
eye an aspect of splendor and elaborate embellishment, as it
might to some of our readers that of antiquity and an obsolete
taste. The wainscotted walls bore the fading vestiges of that
passion for royalty and blood possessed by some of our
ancestors
,
and the tarnished gilt of the lion's head was in good
keeping with his broken tail. There were fluted pilasters
sustaining, on burnished capitals, a heavy frieze, in which deer
were seen sporting among flowers. The ceiling was divided
by whisks of flowers, with a margin of honey-suckles. From
a rosette in the centre depended an Argand lamp. On either
side of the chimney stood marble columns, once the trunk of
busts, now surmounted by vases of living flowers. Above the
manteltree, was a painting of Dog and Dead Game, which
seemed to occupy a place once devoted to a larger piece.
Faded French curtains festooned the windows. There were
Dutch chairs in the room, with tall backs and black leather
cushions; the lounge where they sat had a covering done in
red and blue tent-stich; there was a dark oval mahogany
table, with raised and chased rim, loaded with books. In a
back parlor, entered by a broad arch, they saw a tesselated
floor, and through the windows appeared an extensive garden,
with rows of shrubbery and flowers, a decaying barn, an old
Turkish Summer-house, vines trained on high walls. In the
front yard were green cedars and firs interspersed with
mountain
ashes laden with their familiar red berries. Where are the
Three Doves? said Margaret. That is gone long ago,
replied Mrs. Wiswall. New houses occupy its place.
Boston
is becoming a great city, nothing old remains long. We
have now more than twenty thousand inhabitants. Bertha,
Avice, show Margaret and Rose your books. They both call
me mother, and you shall too, that is, if you are the good girls
Simeon says you are. There are the Adventures of
Neoptolemus
,
The Fatal Connexion and Lord Ainsworth, said
Bertha. You have read The Girl of Spirit? No,
replied Margaret. The Fair Maid of the Inn? No.
I think she would like the Marriage of Belfegar, said
Avice, and The Curious Impertinent. The Loves of
Osmund and Duraxa are perfectly bewitching, rejoined
Bertha. There were books enough at all events to serve them
either in the way of selection or perusal for a long time.
For several days Mrs. Wiswall said she could gather no
intelligence of their friends, and they resigned themselves as
well as they could to their lot. They spent most of the time
alone together, and in good part in their own chamber, a
pleasant front room, which their hostess kindly provided with
a fire. They read, they talked, they saw much that was new in
the streets. Two or three gentlemen boarding there appeared
at the dinner-table, but they chose their own society before any
they saw about them, and in this preference they suffered no
molestation. From their windows they saw ladies in black
beaver, purple tiffany, pink satin, melon-shaped and
cupelo-crowned
hats; short cloaks of all materials and colors, with
hoods squabbing behind, known as cardinals; muffs and
tippets
of every species of fur; pink satin, yellow brocade shoes,
supported on clogs and pattens; gentlemen in coats of all
colors, and Suwarrow boots, some in scarlet over-coats; and
altogether Boston seemed to them a gay, happy place.
You must do something to amuse your sisters, said Mrs.
Wiswall to her daughters. Avice, Bertha, you can show
them what there is in the city, the Museum, the Circus, or
something of the kind.
They were taken to the Museum at the head of the Mall,
near the Alms-house, over a Cabinet-shop, in the centre of
Park Street Church. They saw Young Ladies in Wax, the
Guillotine and Assassination of Marat, alligators, &c., and
were regaled with the Musical Clocks. Their next excursion
was to the Circus in West Boston; the singular docility of
the horses, the extraordinary feats of the men, the grotesque
wit and manners of the clown, afforded them occasion for
wonder and a smile. Margaret wrote to Deacon Ramsdill she
was more happy than she could have foreseen, and applauded
the benevolent conduct of his sister.
I guess you must take the girls to the Theatre to-night,
said Mrs. Wiswall. I don't know of what party you are.
We have a Federal House and an Anti-Federal. We are
of no party at all, said Rose. It is all one to us. It is
just so with me, said the lady. How does Brother Simeon
stand now? He thinks there is some good on both sides,
replied Margaret. He does not approve the excesses of
either. That's Sim, all over, responded Mrs. Wiswall.
But at the Federal they havewhat is it, girls? Pizarro,
replied Bertha. At the Haymarket they have The Castle of
Almunecar. Yes, added the lady, the dungeons, and
strange noises and sights. I would rather see Pizarro,
said Margaret. I prefer the Black Castle, said Rose.
That is it, said Mr. Wiswall. Both be suited, one go to
one, the other to the other. We cannot be separated, Mrs.
Wiswall, replied Margaret. I want to go where Rose
does.
To the Haymarket they went, near the South end of the
Mall, and were shown to a box not very remote from the
stage. The piece that had been the subject of discussion,
sombre in its scenes, terrific in its imagery, the storm at sea,
the wreck, grim towers, dark chambers, apparitions, hollow
voices, Rose declared suited her exactly. It is myself, she
said to Margaret. But I suppose you see a smooth haven,
and the light of true life coming of it all. It has all been
31*
in me, replied Margaret, only if it is not of me, I shall be
glad. But surprise combined with other reflections when
they beheld their hostess's daughter, Bertha, moving amid the
fearful scenes of the play. And in the pantomime that
composed
the after-piece, they again saw her as Joana and Avice
as Columbine, along with Harlequin and Punch, and they
thought they detected the features of one of the gentlemen
boarders figuring under the cap of Scaramouch. But the
delight mingled with a variety of sensations this piece afforded
Margaret, was such that she forgot everything else while she
saw represented the parts, characters, buffooneries, dresses and
forms, that constituted a lively part of her father's drunken
vagaries, and had disclosed to her eye the origin of a certain
description of allusion and sentiment that predominated in
Master Elliman, and which she never before understood.
They spoke to Mrs. Wiswall of seeing her daughter on the
stage. I suppose you think it very bad, she replied. O
no, said Rose, I only wished I was there, that I could have
been in the darkness with her. My good brother the
Deacon would probably be opposed to it. I never heard
him speak of it, replied Margaret, nor did any one ever
say anything to me on the subject. Bertha, continued
the lady, took a passion for the stage, and I humored her in
it. There is little that she can do, poor child; and she seems
pleased with this. Some of our gentlemen are interested
there, and they help her what they can. Avice plays with
them sometimes. How I wish I could join them, said
Rose. Should you like to? asked the lady. Yes, better
than anything else. Bertha, here, Miss Elphiston says she
should like to have a part in your playing. I am sure I would
not oppose the young lady's feelings. We want some one
for Lady-in-waiting to Lady Teazle, in the School for
Scandal
;
it is to be brought on next week; replied Bertha. I
don't care what it is, said Rose; though I should prefer
the Black Castle. That is to be repeated in a fortnight,
and perhaps they will give you a place in it; rejoined
Bertha.
Sunday came, Margaret and Rose were listening to the
chime of bells, and watching the passers-by. I am a good
deal troubled with the gout, said Mrs. Wiswall, and don't
get out to Meeting very often. The girls were so late at the
rehearsal they are not up yet. I suppose you keep up the
good old way in the country, and are always at Church; and
would miss it if you did not go?
I never went to Meeting but once in my life, said
Margaret
.
Indeed! rejoined the lady. Can it be possible? Does
Simeon allow of such a thing?
I believe he is satisfied it would not do me much good.
Yes, I know, answered Mrs. Wiswall. It is not all
one could wish. I have no doubt my brother feels the evil as
much as I do. Perhaps Rose would like to go.
No, said Rose, I
have
been to Church, and I think for
the last time.
Is there not, asked Margaret, a Church in the city
called King's Chapel? I think I have heard of it. Mr.
Evelyn, Rose, said something to me about it. That is the
name, I believe. I have been feeling this morning as if I
should like to go there once.
One must be a little cautious where one goes to Church,
now-a-days, said Mrs. Wiswall. Would not brother Simeon
prefer that you gosay to the Old South?
I am persuaded he would wish me to go wherever I
desired
,
replied Margaret.
Yes, indeed, said the lady. It is in Tremont Street,
corner of School.
If you would be willing to let the servant show me there,
I should like to go, said Margaret.
Certainly, answered Mrs. Wiswall; anything you wish
while you stay here.
Margaret was soon ready, and conducted to the Church in
question. She was awed as she entered by what presented
itself to her eye as the magnificence of the place; its massive
columns, its lofty vault, its symbols, its monuments, its silence,
its richness, were so different from anything she had seen;
she seemed to have dropped into one of the palaces of her
dreams. The mysterious peals of the organ united to subdue
her completely. The people were set, when she arrived; she
walked up the centre aisle, an elderly gentleman opened his
pew to her. Hardly was she seated when she knelt
instinctively
,
and wept profoundly; and not without difficulty was
she able to efface the traces, or prevent the renewal of her
emotion. The prayer excited sentiments she had never
before
felt, and raised the decaying energies of her aspirations.
The music tranquilized her like oil, and penetrated her with
a solemn strange transport. The Minister, the Rev. Dr.
Freeman, then in the prime of life, had that day among a
multitude of hearers whom extraneous interests are wont to
distract, or long familiarity harden, one that devoured his
words, and was melted by his address; while with manner
becoming his subject, he discoursed from the words of the
Prophet, Comfort ye, comfort ye my people. If he had
known how much good in that single instance he was able to
effect, it might have recompensed him for any amount of
laborious endeavor, and sufficed for successive seasons of
fruitlessness. Margaret lingered on the closing steps of the
service, and by the singularity of her demeanor even drew the
attention of the occupants of the pew. These consisted of
the elderly gentleman, a lady who might be his wife, two
young ladies, and a young gentleman, their daughters and
son. The face of the last recalled to Margaret the
street-lamp
,
and floated in with her first impressions of relief the
night she entered the city. You are welcome to a seat with
us, said the elderly gentleman. I thank you, replied
Margaret, and mingled with the retiring congregation. The
afternoon she spent with Rose in their own room.
The next week she aided Rose in the part assigned her for
the stage. During the same time, at an Assembly in Concert
Hall, to which the Theatrical Corps were invited, Margaret
and Rose became parties. Here they found what seemed to
them a brilliant and imposing collection, of lights, hangings,
persons, dresses, figures, music. They declined action, and
were content with the spectacleladies sweeping by in
silver-gauze
tunics, showily pinked, crape and silk velvet dresses
glittering with gold spangles, depending skirts twinkling and
rattling with silver and gold, short sleeves sporting voluminous
ruffles, waists riding the shoulders; hair frounced and puffed
and garnished with flowers; gentlemen in fancy colored coats,
with powdered hair, white stockings, with long garters
streaming
like a ship's pennon, shed a shower of perfume, as they
passed.
On the night of the representation, Margaret was
permitted
to accompany Rose behind the boards, where she
helped dress the Lady-in-waiting, and fortified her friend
for the delicate and novel adventure to which she was
committed
.
The piece was received with applause, and
Margaret
and Rose, out of the small part they enacted,
contrived
to eke considerable amount of self-gratulation. The
play was repeated, and Rose bore herself so well she had the
promise of being advanced to Maria, which Bertha took, who
was going off in Lady Teazle. The succeeding Sabbath,
Margaret repaired again to King's Chapel, thus exhibiting
the somewhat anomalous sight of a virtual stage-player, and a
devout church-goer; but she was witless of any
contradiction
.
Admitted to the secrets of the Theatre, as we gather
from her conversations with Rose, her first impressions
gradually
dulled. Not to speak of other things, she remarked,
that her ideas became sadly disarranged by observing the
superficiality
of that on which so much consequence depended.
Pasteboard, paint, hollowness, heartlessness, she said, were
inadequate
for such an effect. I looked into the pit, said she,
there were tears, and smiles, and fervid passion, while here
Avice was fretting because her shoes pinched, Bertha in the
farce was down-sick with a cold, and one gentleman died in
the tragedy, and was brought off drunk. The Theatre seems
to me almost as bad as the Church; it is all Puppetry alike.
I know it, Margaret, replied Rose, but what shall we
do? I suppose you will call me a Puppet too; if not acting
one's self constitutes a person such, then I am a Puppet. And
that is just what I want, to get away from myself. Yet when
the Black Castle comes on I will show you real acting.
Dear Rose, how sorry we are for ourselves, are we not?
But how can I consent to such methods of arousing people's
attention, and moving their affections?
At whatever judgment she might have been destined to
arrive
on these subjects, she was not long in finding new topics
of speculation. Returning that night at a late hour from the
Theatre, with Rose and their company, she stopped a moment
to look at the effect of a bright moon on the high tide waters
that filled the bay west of the Common, a conjunction it had
not fallen to her lot before to witness, and one that insensibly
detained her while the rest were a long distance ahead. Let
fly your sheets, there! the bite is after you! was a loud blunt
cry that startled her ears. What! what! she exclaimed.
Run, run, shouted the voice. She stood under the shadow
of a tree, and before she could collect herself, or comprehend
the cause of this sudden alarm, a hand was upon her; but no
sooner did she feel it, than it left her; and turning she beheld
a man struggling in the grasp of another man. Climb the
rattlings, mount the horse there, cried the last man, while I
make the cull easy, you are in danger, Margaret, that's Obed's
horse, up with you. She beheld the veritable Tim, standing
close by, she called his name, she sprang upon his back; and
directly after her mounted the man whose voice she had heard.
No sooner were they seated, than the other man rushed
forward
,
seized the stirrup, the crupper, or whatever he could lay
hands upon; the horse flung out, and galloped away. When
Margaret recovered herself in this sudden flurry, she
recognized
in the man with whom she was riding, the sailor who
accosted Nimrod the day they reached Cambridge. He said
his name was Ben Bolter; and in a dialect mongrel and strange,
he gave Margaret to understand, as well as he could, that he
was an old friend of her brother's; that Nimrod and Obed
after a short confinement were released from prison; that
Nimrod having searched the city in vain for her, went back to
Livingston to see Deacon Ramsdill about her; while Obed
remained
,
both to find his friends, and sell his wares; that he
himself was also on the lookout for her; that enjoying a
furlough
,
he had engaged the use of Tim, who he declared was
the worst craft he ever sailed in; and finally, being at the
Theatre
that night, he thought he discovered her behind the
curtains
;
and following the matter up, he came upon her just as
one, whom he characterized as an old enemy of his, and whom
Nimrod did not like, seemed to take advantage of her being
alone to do her an injury.
Hastening forward to Mrs. Wiswall's, Margaret found Rose
standing alone at the gate. How you have frightened me!
exclaimed the latter, I thought you were with Bertha. They
were telling me of a new playI went back after you, you
must have taken another street, I thought you were lost.
Have you been anchored here? said the sailor. What
place is this?
Mrs. Wiswall's, answered Margaret.
I guess Nimrod cast the name overboard, before he got
here, or something, replied the sailor. But I don't like her
build. What flag does she sail under? What's her crew?
Oh, Margaret! outspoke Rose, I have suspected
something
wrong. I don't like Mrs. Wiswall's face. Some old
remembered
villany sleeps in it. She is not the Deacon's sister.
It has seemed to me sometimes, as if all was not right,
said Margaret.
I wouldn't stay here, said the sailor.
What shall we do? cried Rose; whither now shall we
flee. I will never step my foot into this house again.
I know where a certain family lives, not far from the
Common
,
said Margaret; I am willing to go and throw myself
upon them for to-night.
Ben Bolter, said Rose, take us to sea with you. Carry
us out of the world.
They went, however, as Margaret proposed; they came to a
house lying, like Mrs. Wiswall's, off from the road; it was a
late hour, there were no lights to be seen; but the resolution
of Rose and the confidence of Margaret led them straightway
through the yard, and up the steps. The sailor did the
knocking
in a manner easy enough to himself, but such as might have
wrought violence on the peace of others. They had not long
to wait, when the door was opened by one whose face was now
familiar to Margaret, and which Rose might perchance
remember
having seen, the young man whose father gave
Margaret
a seat in Church, and to whose house she now fled for
refuge. They stated their errand and their distress, in which
was contained their apology.
Come in, said the young man. I will speak to my
sister
;
the knocking I think has saved me the trouble of calling
her from her bed. I was already up.
They were taken into the parlor, and the young man soon
returned with his sister whom he introduced as Anna Jones;
she made him known as her brother Frank. Preliminaries
were speedily settled, and our wanderers shown to their bed.
They met in the morning with a kind reception from Mr. and
Mrs. Jones, and another daughter, Winifred. These five
composed
the family, between whom and Margaret an interest had
already been reciprocated from their casual rencontre at
Church, and which did not fail to extend to Rose. The ring
on Margaret's finger seemed also to find old acquaintances,
and served to recall the name of Mr. Evelyn, who the Joneses
said, was an intimate friend of theirs, and they expressed
pleasure
in seeing one of whom he had spoken in terms of
commendation
.
Our wanderers here entered upon quiet but shadowy
days, the family using every method to domesticate them;
Nimrod was gone, and Obed was a peddler about the town;
they must in patience possess their souls. Mr. Jones had been
a prosperous India merchant; his house contained many things
to interest them; Paintings  Christ bearing the Cross by
Raphael divided Margaret's attention with a Magdalen at
Devotion
by the same hand; a Lady taking the Veil, and
Murillo's
Prodigal Son engaged Rose; there were Tenier's
Rent-Day
Feast, Landscapes by Claude, Abraham receiving the
Angels by Il Mudo, and others; they were introduced to
rooms furnished with superb mirrors, satin-wood tables, French
chairs, tamboured lounges, marble busts, etc.; the Library
rich in its architecture, more in its books; they ate from gold
and silver plate; they slept under sumptuous satin curtains;
their tooth-brush case was inlaid with gold and silver; they
reveled in a Conservatory of rare and beautiful flowers. What
especially delighted them was a piano played with skill and
effect by Anna, while with a strong but latent peculiarity of
feeling, Margaret listened to a guitar, the instrument of
Winifred
.
Frank Jones they learned was a student of Theology,
in which science he supplied them with his views. They were
also introduced to a mother of Mr. Jones, a very old woman,
who entertained them with tales of ancient time. So two or
three days wore pleasantly away. One morning, Rose cried
out that Obed was coming! There he is with his saddle
bags and new hat mounting the steps. Margaret sprang for
the door. Hold, said Rose, let us get under the curtains,
and see what he is after, if he knows we are here. They
concealed
themselves and Obed entered.
Don't want teu buy some of my things, I kalkelate, deu ye?
Be seated, Sir, said Anna, and let me see what you
have.
Han't seen nothin' of Molly, have ye?
Molly, Molly! I have not heard of such a person.
I'm feered she's kilt, or pizened, run over, lost, or
drounded.
Who is she, your daughter, Sir?
No, she's Molly, Pluck's Molly, one of the Injins, what
lives under the Head, next the Pond, and neighbor of Marm's.
Nim and I brung her teu the Bay, and Rose; I run arter a
shoat at the races, and caught him; I couldn't hold him, he
was so greasy, and they wouldn't let me have the cup; they
wouldn't let Nim have his beat, and we knocked um down,
and they knocked us down, and put us into Jail; and when we
went back, the gals was gone. This is an orful place. One
woman said she would call the pleese, and have me took right
up, cause I went inteu her house, and threw a broom at me,
cause I wanted teu sell her something. They've kilt Molly,
and drounded her under the bridge.
I am sorry for you. You should not have left her.
Marm telled me teu look arter her; she was always good
teu me, and helped me dig roots, and kept Bull off.
Then you want her to work for you. Can't you find
somebody else for that?
I dun know; she's a right smart consarn, Marm says.
When she was at home, I could always find her, if she warn't
gone inteu the woods. If I know'd where she was, I could
find her now.
What would you give if I would help you find her?
I dun know, I've axed all the folk, and they never seen
her; and there she lives close by our house, and the Master
knows her, and she can read eeny most as well as Parson
Welles, and she is the only man in the world can go up teu
Tim, only me and Marm. If you would find her, I'd stay and
sleep with ye, and let you have some flag that is good teu chaw,
and some salve what'll cure the itch. Don't you want teu buy
some of the sientifikals, some of Marm's
Nommernisstortumbug
?
I've sold more than nine hundred boxes, since we
found it out. It'll cure yer croup, chopped hands, ager,
coughs, burns, sores, cuts, scalt-head, measle, small-pox, worms,
piles, sore-throat, tetters, felons, jaunders, toothache, dropsy,
headache, backache, tongue-tye.
What a wonder!
That an't half; Marm told me all; rumatis, hypo, gluts,
blue-skin, plague in the vitals, lock-jaw, St. Vitus dance,
palsy, wind-gall in yer horses, loss of cud in the cows, drive
rot out of yer sheep, keep the wind out of yer babies, kill
bed-bugs;here is the paper what the Master wrote about it.
`Sudorific, anamnetic, detergent, scorbutic, tonic, febrifugous,
vermifugous, stimulant, sedative, aromatic, antiseptic, narcotic,
refrigerant, antispasmodic, demulcent, expectorant, stypitic,
cathartic, emetic,'that is what he says, and he knows every
thing.
`Garrulousness,' he has down.
Yes it cures that; that is the larnin'sore-tongueswab
out your mouth with quince core jell, I've got some in my bags,
and take a spoonful of the Nommernis when you go teu
bed.
`Acrasial Philogamy?' Brother Frank, what is that?
That, replied Frank, is an incurable malady to which
young persons are subject.
Yes, the Master said 'twas takin', and Marm said it was
an orful complaint, she knew. Take pennyrial, pound up sweet
cicely root, and bile with henbane and half an ounce of the
Nommernis till it's done, and it'll break the fever.
What is this, `Cacoethes Feminarum'?
That's humors. Elder-blows'll drive um out.
`Dita et oratio est optima medicinadiet and prayer
he says are the best medicineswhat does that mean?
Them is the sientifikals; one of the ministers took teu
boxes of the Nommernis when he read that, he liked it so
well.What is that noise? Ye han't got anything shet up
here?
32
Nothing that will hurt you.
I don't like yer housen; they are full of bull-beggars and
catamounts. Marm'll scold at me like nutcakes, if I can't
find Molly. She's kilt, they've drounded her under the bridge.
What are you going to do with her?
Don't know, Marm han't said. They are all broke up
down there since the murder. Marm said if Molly come teu
our house she might have the best bed. But she don't want
Pluck nor Hash; they are an orful set. I can't stay, I can
hear um snickerin' at me as they did up teu tother house, and
Marm wouldn't like it.
Rose and Margaret burst from their retreat with a loud
laugh, and gave Obed a hearty greeting; which he, bemazed
and extacized, returned as handsomely as he knew how. Obed
confirmed the account given by the sailor, and said Nimrod
promised to return as soon as he could see Deacon Ramsdill,
and that he was looking for him every day. To the great joy
of all, the next morning Obed with Ben Bolter appeared,
conducting
Nimrod and Deacon Ramsdill to the house.
This beats old Suwarrow, said Nimrod. You have kept
as shy as young partridges.
A pretty tough spell you have had of it, gals, said the
Deacon. But you know, Molly, you always find the
chesnuts
arter a biting frost and hard wind. Some good may come
of it,the Lord knows. A little butting agin the bag cures
the core.I havn't no particular business here, but Freelove
thought I had better come down, and see what was to pay.
We are all broke up at home, about the Meetin'-house and the
Parson and everything. Some want a new Minister, they won't
help about putting up the house. We have had several Town
Meetings, but there is a good deal of disorder, and some hard
feeling. I count, it's best for every one to paddle his canoe his
own way, and when he hasn't a canoe, then let him go a-foot.
There an't no two spears of grass alike, and you can't make all
people think alike, only I count they might live in peace
together
in the same field. But Brother Hadlock wouldn't listen
to me, and when you can't do nobody any good, then you had
better let them alone. It's no use talking agin the grain. When
hens are shedding their feathers they don't lay eggs; and one
can't look for much among our folk nowso I thought I had as
goods come away.But the hotter the fire the whiter the oven;
if our fire will be of any service the Lord knows.I have been
arter sheep through brush and ditches, before now, gals, and I
commonly found them in better feed than their own close,
ha, ha!
They have found a good birth, said Ben Bolter, looking
about the room. But I should like to fall upon them Algerines.
There has been some singular mistake or mischief at
work, said Mr. Jones. There must have been an error in
the name, or something of that sort, I think.
The old fox, weazle, or what not, I am determined to dig
it out, said Nimrod.
I have been to Pamela's, said the Deacon, and she says
she hasn't seen anything of you; and she wants you to go right
round there.
We will all go together, said Mr. Jones.
Accordingly they went to the Widow Wizzle's, the sister
of the Deacon, whom they found a different person in some
respects from their old acquaintance her namesake. Nimrod
and Ben Bolter exhibited strong desire to visit the late hostess
of the young ladies, and Nimrod said they must go with him;
their repugnance to such a measure was overborne by the
Joneses, who supported Nimrod, and offered to be of the
company
.
In force, now numbering seven persons, they
proceeded
to the house of their late residence, were ushered into the
parlor, where they found Mrs. Wiswall evidently much agitated,
and a very aged man sitting leaning on his staff from which he
hardly raised his face. Whatever might have been their method
of address, or the purport of this visit, they were met by the
apparition
of a human being, in large black whiskers, deathly pale,
leaning on the arm of Bertha, and emerging from the back
parlor
.
Raxman! involuntarily shuddered Rose, and fires that
had long consumed her heart flashed into her face, and retired;
and she hung convulsed on the arm of the younger Jones.
Nope him on the costard, said Ben Bolter.
Keep still, said Nimrod, and let us see what the fellow
has to say.
He, to whom all eyes were now turned, as if he had come
in on some such errand, thus spoke,
I am, said he, a sick and dying man. Your violence,
Ben Bolter, comes too late; the blow from the horse has done
the work. Miss Elphiston, Miss    Margaret, can you
forgive me. I have wished to see you to ask this last earthly
favor. It was I who led you to this house, it was through my
instigation you were detained here, it was my wishes that
regulated
all behavior towards you; nor would my mother, whom
you see before you, or my sister, have consented to such a
transaction as this must appear in your eyes except through
me. If my motives were selfish, they were not so disgraceful
to you, Miss Hart, as to me. I cannot unfold it all now; that
shall be done at other hands. I am weak, I am dying. I have
only strength to ask, ladies, will you forgive me. Miss Elphis
ton, to you I make no apology, I ask no charity, my conduct
admits of no qualification. I only crave your forgiveness; a
sheer wretch, I entreat it; at your feet I implore you to forgive
me. Your beauty, ladies, ensnared me, an uncontrolled
ambition
has led me on, your virtues and your sufferings have
brought me to repentance, and not, I trust, the fear of death
alone.
There was breathless silence, then a discordant tremor
pervaded
the room;the old man shook audibly on his cane, the
group in the centre worked with a varied phrenzy. Margaret
was the first to break this singular perplexity. I forgive
you, said she, I forgive all your wrong to me, whatever
may have been its intention.
Never,
never
, said Rose, can I forgive you.
It is late shutting the door when the mare is stolen, said
Deacon Ramsdill; but when she comes back of her own
accord, you had better let her in. Besides, Rose, the Good
Book says, `Forgive, and ye shall be forgiven.'
I have foresworn the Bible, answered Rose. He and
it have alike damned me.
Don't speak so, Rose, said Frank. He seems to be
sincerely penitent. It would be a relief to his last moments
to have your forgiveness.
I cannot, I cannot! she rejoined.
O that Miss Elphinston would forgive my brother, said
Bertha, weeping.
You see, Mr. Jones, said Mrs. Wiswall, addressing the
senior of the name, the wretched mother of two wretched
children. But where is pity for her to be sought or received!
In that son and daughter you behold the tokens of all my sins,
and all my sufferings. Have you, Sir, been ignorant of my
course? My vanity was allured and my confidence betrayed
by a British Officer. One, in whose house we now are,
instructed me in the arts, and unbridled me for a career of
deception. When he left the country, and could make no
farther reparation for his injuries, he gave me the title to his
estate. I followed the American camp; I was cajoled by
your own officers. I became a runner between the two armies,
when the British held New York. And when it is his turn to
speak that sits there, she said pointing to the old man, he
will tell you more. I returned after the War to this house,
and here I am; my unhappy children pleading in vain for that
mercy which another's infamy might justly implore, and which
their guilty, miserable mother, the cause of all their calamities,
can never bestow. Who, Miss Elphiston, ever asked my
pardon
?
Who ever knelt for my forgiveness? What dying man
has flung me the poor boon of his remorse? By whose
penitence
has my own conscious load of sin been lightened? My
relentings, were they ever so great, had been lavished on the
winds; my commiserations had been squandered on scoffs
and jeers; my love, which even the guilty sometimes feel, and
it is a relief to the abandoned to exercise,
has been
answered
by the frowns of the honored and the repulse of the prosperous.
Here I am, freshly awakened to a sense of my enormities, and
denied the privilege of seeing one gleam of peace fall upon the
heads of my poor children. My own guilt seems to augment,
and they are plunged into still deeper distress. Miss
Margaret
,
my conduct towards you must appear equivocal,
suspicious
,
and fraught with duplicity. But the crime belongs
rather to the means than the intent, and I have been too long
familiar with the ways of the world, to haggle at the manner
when the end is desirable. I had reason to believe that my
son's purposes were honorable, however his action must
forever
degrade him in your eyes. In what a world do we live!
By what steadfastly increasing evil are our steps pursued!
Our life is but the ministration of woe and ruin by man to
man! He who rules all things for the best, permits some to
fall where others rise. Your beauty, which princes might
covet, shall bear you aloft, like the star of Evening, diffusing
glory all about you, and cheering your own existence. Mine
sinks beyond recovery, the darkness of disgrace adding new
deformity to the waste of years; and the lost innocence of
my childhood returns to shed vengeance on my enfeebled
age!
Ho! hemmed Ben Bolter; I must overhaul my
coppers
,
and get my head on another tack.
I do forgive you, said Rose, and may Heaven forgive
me too.
While these scenes were transpiring among the principal
parties in the room, one might have detected Nimrod in
earnest
whisper with the old man aside; Not now, sir, not now;
this is enough for once; wait till we get away, we will go to
Mr. Jones's.
32*
The company returned to the house whence they started.
Meanwhile, Mr. Jones taking Margaret by herself, said he
would open on a subject of some interest to her. He doubted
not, he added, that her good sense would receive what he was
commissioned to declare without confusion, and the fortitude
she had displayed in adverse circumstances would not forsake
her under more agreeable events. What was coming, she
might well ask, that required such a preface. Have you a
grandfather, he asked; she replied she knew of none, that she
supposed the parents of both her father and mother were dead.
I have the pleasure, then, continued Mr. Jones, to inform
you that your grandfather is living, and the old man we saw
at Mrs. Wiswall's is he. He then proceeded to put her in
possession of what the reader already knows, that she was the
adopted child of Pluck and Brown Moll, that her own father
and mother died in her infancy, that she had been disowned
by her grandfather, who, nevertheless, had contributed supplies
to her comfort, and in a word that she must prepare to receive
him the following day.
The next morning, Nimrod and Ben Bolter, accompanied
by the old man, Mr. Girardeau, came to Mr. Jones's. The way
having been prepared, little remained but for Margaret to
embrace
her grandfather. The old man laid his hand on her
head, looked in her face, and with a voice broken by age, and
husky with emotion, said, Jane, Jane, my own Jane, my
Jane's own? Summoning Rose, he held them face to face,
and said, This is your cousin, Margaret, the grandchild of
my wife's sister; and Nimrod, continued he, is not your
adopted brother only, his mother is the daughter of my only
sister. Others have asked your forgiveness, but who needs it
more than I? I turned you off in helpless infancy, I have
greatly sinned against you and others too, more than I can tell.
But Nimrod and Ben Bolter will inform you of what I cannot.
Let me be forgiven, and you shall know my wrong doings
afterwards.
Sit down, Sir, said Nimrod, and I will tell all I know
about the matter, and he proceeded to relate his first
connection
with Margaret, and his taking her to the Pond.
Yes, added Ben Bolter, it is all true. Nim and I were
messmates. I was there when he brought you off; I helped
stow you away; I dandled you when he was asleep; I lowered
you down when he left the sloop; you was a good looking
cock-boat, but make a spread eagle of me, if you havn't grown
into as handsome a merchantman as ever carried a bone in her
mouth. But, blow me, if Obed's horse, hadn't bunged the
cull's puddings, I don't know where you would have brought
up.
God's hand is in it! said Deacon Ramsdill, who came
in during these disclosures. You know we read that when
the lost one came home they danced and made merry. And
you
re
collect, Molly, when they brought you up out of the
woods, the Preacher prayed before the dance begun. I feel as
if I should like to pray before we get on to the rejoicings.
Whereupon they all joined with the Deacon, who, in simple,
heart-felt manner, made thanksgiving to Almighty God.
Leaving these persons to recapitulate details, exchange
congratulations
,
and make such demonstration of joy as was
natural to the hour, we must go with our readers to places and
times somewhat remote, and bring up a brief account
illustrative
of events that have now been recorded.
CHAPTER XII.
THE HISTORY OF MR. GIRARDEAU.
During
the period of our Colonial existence, the American
Planters were in the practice, not of importing black slaves
from the coast of Guinea alone, but also white servants from
various parts of Europe. Among the proprietors of the
Simsbury
Copper Mines were several Frenchmen, the wealthy,
enterprising, exiled Huguenots. It became an object with
these gentlemen to combine in their establishment those who
could speak their own tongue. About the year 1740, there
arrived in Norfolk, Virginia, a cargo of servants, and of the
number were some from Jersey, an Island belonging to the
English Crown, but inhabited in good part by a French
population
.
A purchase was made including a portion of this last
description of persons. In the lot, were Jean Waugh, and
Marie his sister. Jean was a young man of some ambition.
He was ready to exchange poverty and oppression in the Old
World, for temporary vassalage in the New, with the prospect
of ultimate enfranchisement and possessions. He threw
himself
,
with his sister, into the hands of an American shipmaster,
consented to be advertised with coals and salt in the public
prints, to be knocked off at public vendue, and for the
consideration
of twelve pounds paid the importer became the subject
of indentures binding him to the Simsbury Company for six
years, the term affixed by law to those of his age. Jean was
master of the French and English languages; he could read
and write, he was spirited and active. He wheeled ore with
blacks, he labored with the pick-axe, he drilled rocks. By
the regulations of the peculiar institution to which he was
subservient
,
he could not marry, none could trade or truck with
him, he could not leave the premises, he was ineligible to
office. In the result it appears, he became tired of his
condition
,
one indeed not congenial with the spirit of the present
age, and the vestiges of which can only be traced in an
obscure antiquity To relieve himself, be ran away, a
criminal
offence, for which he was publicly whipped. Returning a
blow upon the executioner he became liable to two years'
additional service. He again contrived to abscond. He
connected
himself with a gang of counterfeiters, and the Bills of
Credit issued by the Provinces in periods of alarm became
encumbered and perplexed. He fled the region, and a few
years afterwards reappeared in New York, associated with
brokers, smugglers, and that class of men who contrive to
reap advantage from public distress or private credulity.
Here he took the name of Girardeau, and, as such, has already
been introduced to our readers.
It so happened that a little boy, who dwelt in the
neighborhood
of the Mines, and often played about the grounds, was a
witness of Jean's punishment, and from a habit peculiar to
his nature, took sides with the delinquent; and ultimately
gave him essential support in his attempts to escape. This
lad was Didymus Hart, familiarly known in this Memoir as
Pluck. Marie, the sister of Mr. Girardeau, seduced by an
Overseer at the Mines, died in giving birth to twin daughters,
one of whom Didymus subsequently married, and the other
became the Mrs. Wiswall mentioned in the foregoing chapter.
To digress a moment on the history of Pluckafter Mr.
Girardeau was in circumstances to recompense his benefactor,
as well as show his attachment to the child of his sister, he
made liberal grants to Mr. Hart; and even aided him in
becoming
established in some mercantile pursuit. But Pluck,
abandoning himself to his cups, dissipated at once his good
name and his estate; and for some misdemeanor losing one of
his ears, he became still more reckless and thriftless, and
finally succeeded in completely estranging the affection of
Mr. Girardeau, as he had already forfeited the respect of his
fellow citizens. He removed to Livingston, where he
supported
his family awhile by tending bar for Mr. Smith at No.
4, and at last took up his residence at the Pond.
Mr. Girardeau married a sister of the grandmother of Rose.
The acquisition of wealth became the engrossing passion
of this man. This object he clutched with a miserly and
inextinguishable activity; and with that singleness of aim and
sagacity of calculation which rendered elusion impossible.
In this pursuit, he sacrificed every generous sentiment of his
nature, inflicted unhappiness on his family, sent his wife to a
premature grave, would have wrecked the virtues as he finally
contributed to the death of his child. When imposts were
high he contrived to smuggle his commodities; when premium
was exorbitant, he had money to lend. If trade was
interrupted
in one quarter, he opened channels for it in another.
As fortune is said to aid the bold, when the ports were closed
what should happen but his own well-laden ships were already
in the offing. During the first alarms of the War, when
multitudes
deserted the city, he became chapman of their estates;
confiscated property he bid in for a trifle. He trafficked in
public securities, and realized much, where many lost their
all. Mr. Girardeau was master of the German, either by an
original acquisition, or from intercourse with that portion of
our immigrant population; thus supplied with three important
dialects, he held a position superior to most of his
contemporaries
.
This language he also taught his daughter, who, it will
be recollected, was able to discourse with Brckmann, the
young Waldecker, in his own tongue. During the War, for
purposes humane or military, large quantities of gold and
silver were transported backwards and forwards between the
adjacent country and the city. Much of this passed through
the hands of Mr. Girardeau, who did not fail to take due
brokerage. He was a Patriot and a Tory, as was most
convenient
;
and if he accommodated his coat to the hue of the
parties with whom he dealt, its facing retained but one color,
that of their common gold. In these negotiations he also
employed the services of his other twin niece, Mrs. Wiswall
and her little boy, called Raxman, whom at the close of the
War, it has been related Nimrod found on the premises of Mr.
Girardeau. The acquaintance of this woman on both sides
of the line, the protection afforded by her sex, the
harmlessness
of the lad, were circumstances of which he did not fail
to avail himself. Introduced to the secrets of the contending
powers, he made adventures with a safe foresight of the issue.
The agent of factions and intrigues, he never violated his
trust except when driven to what is termed the first law of
nature, to which he had timely recourse. The public good he
satisfied himself he carried, where others have borne important
sections of the country, in his breeches pocket. At the close
of the War he purchased city-lands, which in the progress of
time doubled and quadrupled on his hands. In Politics he
became what is known as a trimmer, and his sails were set to
catch the breeze from whatever quarter it blew. In the game
of public life, leaving to others offices and honors, place and
power, he managed to sweep the banks into his own drawers.
When war threatened with France, he obtained foreign
exchange
at a discount, and after the disturbance sold it at an
advance. He speculated in continental bills; he profited by
the wars of Europe. Such was Mr. Girardeau. At the
expiration
of the century, the Jersey servant had arisen to a
fortune, estimated at the time, as high as two millions of
dollars.
But old age had already overtaken him, and death was not
far off. Palsy, without a figure, loosened his hold of his gains,
and he could not be indifferent to the destination of an estate
amassed with so much painstaking. From the depths of the
ocean come up bubbles that sparkle on its surface. In Mr.
Girardeau appeared some symptoms of an imperishable
humanity
.
His daughter he had persecuted even unto death.
He began to refreshen his memory with some thoughts of the
grandchild. He discovered the place of her abode, and, in an
assumed costume, appeared at the Pond. He certified himself
of her existence and identity and departed. Why did he not
then make himself known? Nimrod, whose parentage was
disguised, when he first became the servant of Mr. Girardeau,
exceedingly provoked and irritated him. Pluck, having once
pitied, he could never forgive. To Brown Moll, his niece, he
attributed a share of her husband's misfortunes. But we
cannot
explain what we do not understand, the labyrinths of the
human mind, nor can we relate all the operations of that of
Mr. Girardeau. It suffices to know that he did relent, at least
so far as his grandchild was concerned, and embraced
Margaret
in his munificent intentions. Raxman had continued in
his grand-uncle's employ in the capacity of a clerk, an office he
fulfilled with the fidelity of a child and the industry of a slave.
But this young gentleman's conduct with Rose, having reached
the ears of Mr. Girardeau, gave him great provocation. At
length, however, the apparent reformation of Raxman induced
him to offer him a liberal endowment if he would
marry
Margaret. To effect this object Raxman made a journey to
the Pond, where his success has been related. Here also he
found an unexpected obstacle to his wishes in the presence of
Rose. It needs also to be told that he applied to the Widow
Wright, and sought, by means which he found most
acceptable
with that lady, to gain her to his purpose; which had now
become two-fold, that of securing Margaret, and withdrawing
Rose. But the Widow, who had her dreams about Margaret,
when she found she was likely to lose her to herself,
immediately
changed her tactics, and endeavored to detain
Margaret
,
and insisted that he should marry Rose. Raxman left
the Pond, and returned to New York, where he found
Nimrod, to whose assistance, in these embarrassing
circumstances
,
he appealed. But Nimrod had no friendship for
Raxman, and a very strong one for Margaret. Now at this
time, Mr. Girardeau himself began to exhibit signs of
penitence
,
he avowed a most benevolent interest in his grandchild;
and assured Nimrod that everything should be done for the
good and felicity of Margaret, if he would render aid to
Raxman. Accordingly he was hired to take her away from
the Pond, a measure which he undertook in the manner
described
.
He was to meet Raxman at Hartford; great was the
disappointment of the young man to find Rose of the
company
.
He suggested the continuation of the journey to
Boston
.
He hastened on before and acquainted his mother with
his designs. He was in Cambridge when the party arrived
there; he had intelligence conveyed to the girls of the
imprisonment
of Nimrod and Obed; he hovered on their steps
as they entered the city; he knew of the letter to the sister of
the Deacon; he came up with them as they parted with Frank
Jones; and muffled in a cloak, disguising his voice, he
conducted
them to his mother's; who in truth was sometimes
called Wiswall. He remained about the house, but was not
seen in it. The attachment of Margaret and Rose was a
difficulty
not easily surmounted; various methods were taken to
detach them, but all failed. At length the accidental
withdrawal
occurred as they returned from the Theatre. Raxman
endeavored to improve the occasion; but a new balk to his
projects offered itself in the person of Ben Bolter. The
result
is known. Tim, whom the Sailor sported on all
occasions
,
dealt the young man a mortal blow. It might appear
that Ben Bolter himself had some secret antipathy to
Raxman
;
but of this we have no farther knowledge than his own
words imply. Mr. Girardeau, learning what had befallen his
relative, immediately came to Boston.
Such is the narrative to which the preceding chapter has
given rise; and now that whatever relates to these accidental
personages has been told, and the thread of the story is
evolved; let us return to the principal subject of this Tale.
A new sphere of interest was open to Margaret, and one in
which, notwithstanding her need of quiet and repose, she set
herself to making immediate exploration; we refer to the
circumstances
of her own birth, and the history of her father and
mother, Gottfried Brckmann and Jane Girardeau. Sedulous
and minute were her inquiries on these points; and she found
her grandfather as well as Nimrod disposed to communicate
whatever they knew. Frank Jones, then in correspondence
with Mr. Evelyn, wrote his friend, who was expecting to visit
Germany, to make inquiries concerning Brckmann and
Margaret
Bruneau, in Pyrmont and Rubillaud. Mr. Girardeau
had religiously preserved the relics of his daughter and her
husband, and said he had in his possession the flute, books
and sundry papers, which they left. The bulk of his estate
he made over to Margaret, reserving annuities for his niece,
Mrs. Wiswall and Bertha, in amount sufficient to rescue them
entirely from their present mode of life; Rose also received a
gratuity equal to a moderate fortune. They were summoned
ere long to fulfil the last duties of humanity upon Raxman.
It was decided that Margaret and Rose should spend the
winter in Boston. Deacon Ramsdill, Nimrod and Obed
returned
to Livingston; the latter handsomely laden with gifts,
and the profits of his enterprise, Nimrod furnished with the
means of redeeming the estate at the Pond, and also of
executing
his proposed marriage. The father of Margaret being
a German, and having left books and manuscripts in that
tongue, in which also her mother was skilled, she must also
attempt its acquisition; an exercise in which she was assisted
by Frank Jones. She devoted some time every day to music,
that of the piano and guitar. There were not wanting
benevolent
persons in the city, who, apprised of her good fortune,
endeavored that she should turn it to the best account. New
bonnets, new ribbons, the latest style of dresses, were topics
on which she was duly enlightened. To balls, theatres, routs,
card-parties, her company was incessantly solicited; but this
proved an attention it was not in her power to answer. A
concession on the part of Rose afforded her unmingled
pleasure
;
she agreed to go with Margaret to Church; and having
gone half a day they went a whole day; and from going
occasionally
they went constantly. Spring came at last; and
Margaret and Rose, with Frank Jones in company, started on
horseback for Livingston. The sadness with which they
approached the town, did not abate when they entered the
still desolate Green. They returned the greetings of their
old friends, and hastened to the Pond. The whole family
came out to welcome them, Bull, Dick and all. Chilion was
not there! Here the compiler takes leave of Margaret,
submitting
to such as would pursue the sequel of her life, the
Part which follows.
33
PART III.
WOMANHOOD.
LETTER FROM MARGARET TO ANNA JONES.
Mons Christi
My dear Anna
:You told me to write you everything; but
how shall I utter myself? How can I give shape or definition to
what I am? Easy were it for me to tell you what I am not. Has
a volcano burst within me; has a tornado prostrated me? If you
were to excavate the Herculaneum that I seem to myself to be,
would you find only the charred semblance of life, the skeletons
of old emotions, the very slaves of my hopes stricken down in
the act of running away? With Rose, I would forget myself,
that to which this writing recalls. She says I can endure the
prospect better than she. If this be so, it must be attributed
to its possessing the merit of novelty. I am in ruins, and so
are all things about me. Yet in the windfall some trees are
new-sprouting; invisible hands are rebuilding the shattered
edifice. View me as you will, I think I am somewhat
improving
.
Do I begin existence wholly anew, or rise I up from the
fragments of an earlier condition? What is the transition
from myself to myself, or from myself to another? What is
the link between Molly Hart and Margaret Brckmann, can
you tell? In which of the climacterics do I now exist? I am
witheringly afflicted. Chilion is not!
Te sine, v misero mihi! lilia nigra videntur,
Pallentesque ros, nec dulce rubens hyacinthus!
The vision of those days distracts me, the remembrance of my
brother turns the voices of the birds into wailing, and the sun
is pale at mid-day. In Scotland are deep caverns, where
invisible
streams of water make subterranean melodies. They are
called Caves of Music. I am such a Cave. Chilion flows
through me, a nethernmost, mournfulest dirge. Then, too, Ma
is so silent, her features are so rigidly distressed. She smokes
and weaves, hour by hourI fear she will never smile again.
Pa has lost the glow of his countenance; he has grown
absolutely
pale; and where he sits working, I see tears drip on his
leather apron. Hash is so sober, so soft, it frightens me.
Nimrod comes down from the Ledge, and does his best to
enliven us, but his gayety has fled, and he knows not how to
be mournful. Bull had one leg broke at the time of Chilion's
trial, and hopples out to Chilion's boat, where he sits by the
hour. Rose is soothing and active, but she has a load at her
own heart, which in truth I need help her bear. Isabel comes
up almost every day, full of sympathy and generous love.
Deacon
Ramsdill, Master Elliman, Mrs. Bowker and others have
made us some kind visits. Sibyl Radney comes down, and milks
the cow, and does some of my other little chores. Yesterday,
Rose and Isabel went with me to the Burying Ground. Good
old Philip Davis, the Sexton, came one night, so I have been
told, and neatly covered Chilion's grave with green sod. It is
by itself apart, in one corner of the grounds. Few persons
have gone near it, and the tall yellow grass has grown rank
about it. I threw myself upon it and dissolved in weeping.
Murmur I could not, an inarticulate, ungovernable anguish
was all I could feel. O my brother! I knew not I had such
a brother, I knew not I loved such a brother! We found a
dandelion budding on itwhen I was little he taught me to
love dandelions! Rose folded me in her arms, Isabel prayed
for me. I thought of the blood-sweating agony of Him, the
Divine Sufferer; it penetrated and subdued mine. Mrs.
Bowker gave me a lady's slipper taken from the plant Chilion
sent her. There is a fancy that flowers die, when those who
have tended them do. Will Chilion's flowers live? there are
many of us who will fulfil his love towards them.
We live at home as we were wont to do, only Rose is ever
with me. I share with her my bed in the garret. I love the
old house, more than all places, and what matters it? I seem
to myself to be deep as our own bottomless Pond. The
Indian
and his child lie
there;
in me the last of many ages and
races of hope and life seem to have perished.
Clamavi de
profundis
. Yet, yet, the sun swims through me, and I hear
Jesus walking on the troubled waters above. Peace, be
still; yes, be still. How sadly does suffering make us
conscious
of ourselves. I knew not that I had any depth. Now
shaft opens into shaft, and the miners are still at work.I
hear my chickens peeping, and I must go feed them. Rose
comes in from a sail on the water with Bull. Her beautiful
33*
smile greets me afar. Thanks, dear Anna, for yourself,
thanks for your flowing hair, your blue, brimming eyes, for
your royal spirit that daily visits me. Your brother Frank
was immeasurably good to us. He has written Rose, who
blesses him in her own soul, if she can in no other way. She
will write him.
I had a melancholy commission to execute at No. 4, on
behalf
of Chilion. Since the death of Solomon, Mr. Smith's
affairs have gone on disorderly. The Still took fire one night
and was consumed. He himself drinks to intoxication every
day, and I did not see him. Mrs. Smith and Damaris were
taken wholly unprepared by my errand. The idea of
forgiving
Chilion had never entered their heads. And indeed it
would not restore Solomon to life! I showed them the willow
basket Chilion wished me to give them. Damaris cried, and
we all cried. At length she said she would forgive Chilion,
if I would forgive her for striking me when they were digging
in the Pines. How complicate is our life! When I came
away I made them a present, small for me, but large perhaps
for them. I offered also to put up a monument for Solomon.
But, ah's me! I have since been told, Mr. Smith declares it
shall recite the fact that he was murdered by Chilion, or he
will have it done himself. Can it not be avoided? Yet I will
submit.
In the town the greatest excitement prevails. They cannot
decide about rebuilding the Church. Then, Isabel says, there
is a preliminary and deeper question. Some are anxious that
Parson Welles should have a colleague, and they also stipulate
that he shall be a very different man from their old minister.
On the one side are Judge Morgridge, Deacon Ramsdill,
Esq. Bowker, Esq. Beach, Esq. Weeks, Mr. Whiston, Mr.
Pottle; and on the other, Deacon Hadlock, Mr. Adolphus
Hadlock, Deacon Penrose, Dr. Spoor, Mr. Gisborne, Mr.
Shooks; among the more prominent ones. All these persons
I believe I spoke to you about, in answer to your world-wide
inquiries, a point in which you excel any one I ever knew. I
have not been to the Green, or Desert, as Isabel says it is.
Your loving but afflicted
Margaret
.
ROSE TO FRANK JONES.
My dear Frank Jones,
I cannot forget you, I live in your approbation, I thrive
under your care. Many obligations for your kind note. I am
externally more calm, my nerves are less susceptible, I sleep
more soundly, and Margaret says there is some color in my
cheeks. If we were composed of four concentric circles, I
can say the three outer ones approximate a healthy and natural
state. But the fourth, the innermost, the central one, the core,
what can I say of that? I dare not look in there, I dare not
reflect upon myself. One thing, I have no real
guilt
to harass
me; I only call to mind my follies. My ambition ever
centred
upon a solitary acquisition, and for that alone have the
energies of my being been spent,
sympathy;
an
all-appreciating
,
tender, great, solemn sympathy. Begniled by this
desire, I mistook the demonstrations of a selfish passion for
tokens of a noble heart. Betrayed beyond the bounds of
strict propriety, I became an object of the censure of
mankind
.
Too proud to confess, or too much confounded to
explain my innocence, I suffered the penalties of positive
infamy
.
It always seemed to me that I was placid by nature,
and moderate in my sensations. This opposition created in
me a new nature; my calamities have imparted heat to my
temper, and acrimony to my judgment. I became impetuous,
vehement, and as it were possessed. A new consciousness was
revived, both of what I was and of what the world was. Up
to that time I had floated on with a tolerable serenity, trusting
myself and others, and ever hoping for more. Then
commenced
my contention and my despair. I became all at once
sensible of myself in a new way; as one does in whose bosom
literal coals of fire shall be put. My heart swelled to
enormous
proportions; it became diseased, and dreadfully painful.
It spread itself through my system, tyranuized over my thought,
and fed upon the choicest strength of my being. My intellect
was darkened, I became an Atheist. Under these
circumstances
,
which you already know something about, after having
long kept it hidden, I declared myself to Margaret. She had
penetration enough to understand me, and sufficient
magnanimity
to love me; she awed me by her superior, uniform
goodness. I availed myself of a moment when she was in
tears to unfold the cause of my own. I rejoiced in her
weakness
,
because I thought thereby I could find entrance to her
greatness. The melancholy, to me most melancholy events
of her brother's death, I need not recapitulate. When we left
Livingston, I seemed to be driven on as by the elements;
whither or how I cared not. I had some tact, and my
connection
with the Theatre, it was said, would be an advantage
to the company. Indeed, it was hinted that I might become a
Star! My God, how I should have shone! This new life
glittered before me, and into the prospect I threw whatever
power of resolution or hope I had remaining. Margaret
agreed to abide ever with me, and aid me as she could; while
I was to earn the livelihood for us both. One good I did
derive
from this adventure, self-forgetfulness. I attained a sort
of ecstasy of outward delight; and, will you believe it, I grew
better. This external happiness sank into my being deeper
and deeper; it chased away my regrets, it healed my
morbidness
.
My evil and distress seemed to diminish. I was
becoming cleansed and purified. Can you understand this?
The happier I waxed the more reconciled I became, and the
strife between what I was and what I would be, between my
hopes and my calamities, ceased. Self-forgetfulness the road
to virtue! What will you Divines say to that? All at once
we were thrown into your house, where all is so elegant, so
serene, so pure, so affectionate.
Your
goodness, Sir, startled
me. I dare not be left alone with you. When you spoke, it
agonized me. You
recalled me to myself
. If you had been
only good, I believe I should have died, or run away. Anna
came to your aid. You were a man. Can a man understand
a woman? Margaret says they can. I have denied it. I
needed more than your goodness, I needed sympathy,
sympathy
with my feelings, my wretchedness, my wickedness even.
Could you render it? I had a woman's need of sympathy;
could any man give it? Many and painful were the
struggles
I underwent. Now that I am away from you I can speak
more freely and composedly, as I know you will and must
allow me to do. Margaret says my smile bewitched you; a
game it has more than once practised. How fervently have I
prayed for a Medusa-face! But it was not that; it was that
your kind feelings, as of old, took me in. Then your good
minister spoke so discriminatingly and benevolently to me.
Truly I can say, never
man
spake like that man. But could
you reach my heart, could you underlie my deepest feelings,
could you sustain, heal and assure that which your presence
animated into painful life? Let me not disquiet you by
questions
like these. But I have no alternative, either I must
describe my whole estate, or retreat from you forever. You, in
effect,
demand
a disclosure, and Margaret urges me to make
it in full. I have not seen a great deal of the world, but I
have
felt
enough of it. I have become suspicious of men,
not of their motives altogether, or of their wishes, or
kindness
;
but of their
moral capability
. Then whatever benefit
the theatre afforded, I am deriving in a purer manner and with
a larger measure here. All kinds of diversion are at our
command
.
We have purchased horses, and can ride; we have
boats, and can sail; we have woods, and can walk. We work
too, weed the garden, drive the cow to pasture, feed the
poultry, wash dishes and wind spools. We have leisure and
books, and can read. Beyond this, am I prepared to
encounter
the world in the particular manner you propose to conduct
me to it? I have left it, I have bade it a long adieu. I will
not say I hate it, only I will have nothing to do with it.
Margaret
,
with all that oppresses her so sensibly, is still elastic,
hearty, luxuriant. She has a great being, and evil floats
through her and passes away. I am so contracted and small
it all lodges in me, and propagates itself through my whole
existence. Or at least, so great is her power of
self-recuperation
,
that if the whole globe were heaped upon her she would
make her way up through it; and not only that, she would
assimilate its elements to her nature, and convert its forces to
her uses. A cloud that drives me home for shelter against the
rain, only enhances the beauty of her Universe. Then her
compassion is so quick, and her ministries so gentle, while I
am cold and stubborn to the wants or woes of all. She too
is a believer in Christ, which I am not, or at least in the sense
that she is. Her faith is life-giving, soul-penetrating, noble,
luminous, purifying. Mine, all that I ever had, was a
mechanical
,
artificial, vulgar sort of calculation. I was once
converted indeed; but I have sadly fallen away. At the best
I am but a poor Christian truly. Margaret, I know, never
sinned. I have sinned day by day. I say not these things to
commend her, but to reveal myself.
Shall I turn to the other more significant, and so far as this
question is concerned, more weighty reflections,  the
formidable
fourth circle I mean; a combination of impressions,
characteristics, substances, of not the most auspicious nature.
Forgetting you, I forget that. With you, that revives. It is I
would fain believe drawing to a diminished diameter; its
action is reduced, it beats with a less audible pulse. It is a
woman's broken heart, a woman's despair; it is a woman's
feebleness, acute delicacy, shrinking sensitiveness, high
sentiment
of honor and low consciousness of disgrace, all thrown
in together. What would you do with it? What would it do
with you? What would you do with such a woman? There
is a bird, Margaret says, that crosses sheets of water on the
leaves of the floating lily; can you cross me so? There is
another bird that refuses to drink of streams and pools, and
only catches the drops as they fall from the skies. I have
refused to quench my thirst at common sources, and whither
shall I look? Dearest Frank, I must yield to your judgment
what I dare not to your love  myself. You will have need
of strength as well as affection if you take me. On your
soberest discretion I can alone rely. Seeing how I am, is it
in your power to make me what I should be?
How we long for Mr. Evelyn's return. I am sure Margaret
loves him; when I tell her so, she smiles, and says, Yes,
and Frank Jones too. But I know she desires my consent
to your wishes, and I think she would feel badly to have Mr.
Evelyn marry abroad. But what an admirable wife she would
make you; this
entre nous
. Perhaps we shall both set up a
Convent here, and feed poor children. Margaret is all there
is left to me in this world; and I, who am the whole cause of
her sorrows, still live on her bounty. I am a last year's leaf
that I have sometimes seen on the beech trees blanched and
dry, still cleaving to the brightness and bloom of her
Spring-time
.
Your very dutiful and truly humble
Rose
.
EXTRACT FROM ROSE TO FRANK.
Mr. Evelyn has come! The effect I am sure was not small
on Margaret. The night before she did not sleep a wink, for
she kept me awake till morning. Pa and Ma, as I call her
father and mother, were for fixing up a little, but she would
allow of no changes. She half smiled and half cried by
turns; her face went through all the variations of the prism.
Mr. Evelyn had forwarded a kind note, saying he would like
to see her alone. She took me with her down the Delectable
Way to an old haunt of her's, where she first encountered
him. I would have withdrawn, but she held me fast. We
heard his horse coming up the hill. This is a strange
feeling
,
said she; is this what you mean by love, Rose? She
never looked more beautiful. Her heron's wreath set off her
rich dark curls, she wore a simple muslin, her expression
might have ravished an angel. Mr. Evelyn left his horse and
came forward. Hardly could she articulate my name in the
introduction. By an instantaneous and almost invisible act,
their hearts, so long one, sealed the unison. I had anticipated
something, but I was excited and enchanted. Margaret has
fair, womanly proportions, Mr. Evelyn is tall, and of so noble
a carriage;to see them in that pure embrace, and with such
an interpenetration of soul and spirit, quite overpowered me.
Deacon Ramsdill came limping along with one of his
queerest
of all smiles  Sheer nater, just so when I was a
youngster
,
said he, and so diverted us from a fit of crying into
which I am sure
I
should have fallen. Mr. Evelyn was then
introduced to Pa, Ma, and Hash. He made inquiries after
Chilion, which we could only answer by our tears.
We have sometimes wondered that he never wrote
Margaret
,
but he says his letters were lost on the way. She
showed him some autumnal leaves and flowers she gathered,
and has kept in remembrance of him. These were her letters
to him, dumb signals, that she preserved in the garret! She
has
loved him, I do insist; but that lively
pain
of love we
girls are so wont to indulge, perhaps she has not felt. This
may be partly owing, such is my solution, to the strange,
rapid, distressing scenes she has been through since she first
saw him.
Mr. Evelyn has taken the spare room at Aunt Wright's.
There is a cause for sorrow in that family, which, I fear, will
not soon be removed. Aunt has long had her heart set on
Margaret for cousin Obed. This interest did not abate on
Margaret's accession to fortune. Though I believe Obed had
if not his hopes damped, at least his ideas of things very much
chastened by his trip abroad. The world is so large, and there
are so many men in it, I think he had relinquished whatever
thoughts he may have entertained of Margaret. In addition,
her connection with Chilion has of late inspired him with a
secret dread of her. But none of these things availed with
his mother, who has rendered herself positively annoying by
urging the fulfilment of certain promises she says Margaret
made in years gone by. However, the matter is settled now,
and Aunt freely consented to admit to her house the rival of
her son, when she found there was prospect of an handsome
remuneration.
EXTRACT FROM ROSE TO WINIFRED JONES.
The marriage came off last night. The service was done
by Parson Welles, who really seemed to be as happy as the
rest of us. How delighted we were to have Frank and Anna
here! There were also present a few other of the select
friends of the family. We assembled in the kitchen. It was
my office to light up the great fire-place; Frank was master of
ceremonies. Mrs. Weeks sent us up some cake for the
occasion
;
there was wine for our friends; all we ourselves have
eschewed spirituous drinks. I need not say how
some
of us
were reminded of another night and other scenes. It was, to
my own eye, a scene within a scene, beauty, love and life
haunted by profanity, revelry and death. Deacon Ramsdill
was almost beside himself with joy, and Master Elliman with
joy and wine. Mr. Girardeau seems to be very much pleased
with the disposition Margaret has made of herself, and Mrs.
Wiswall and Bertha think there is nobody like Mr. Evelyn;
so do I, excepting of course Frank.
What can I say of your dear brother, and now my own love?
He is all I wishedwished? all I needed. I shall begin to
believe with Margaret, that love is more powerful than all evil.
He risks much in taking me, not that I am much, but that I
am mean. He promises to sustain all my feeblenesss, and
renew
my defects. He bears me in his own arms to the Infinite
arms. Through him, streams upon my soul the long hidden
light of God. The Christ whom he preaches I begin to love
and adore. He does understand my heart, and composing with
uplifts my whole nature into serenity and peace.
Margaret and Mr. Evelyn are going on a journey; in the
mean time, we clear out the work-shop, and fit it up for their
return.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
Our excursion was rich and blest indeed. In New-York,
we saw the room where I was born, and the bed even
whereon
my father and mother died. Nimrod was with us and
showed us every thing. The Clergyman who married my
dear parents is dead, but in Baltimore we found his
daughter
,
who bore me to her father's, and nourished me like a
mother. My grandfather's abode, the shop where my mother
tended, the room where she slept, we saw. In one of the
cemetries their graves were shown to us, near that of my
grandmother
;
the monument bore the names, Gottfried Brckmann,
and Jane Girardeau. My grandfather, when he knew not
where I was, became sorrowful on his daughter's account, and
had her remains removed where they now lie. My dear, dear
mother! The inscription says she was twenty years old; so
near her poor orphan daughter's age! New fountains of grief
are opened in my soul. I am persuaded the pale beautiful
lady of my childhood dreams, was none other than my mother.
She has watched over her child, she has blessed the
earth-wanderer
!We
went up the Hudson, whither Nimrod and Ben
Bolter carried me; we stopped at the same landing-place; we
found the Irish woman who nursed me, and I was glad to be
able to repay her kindness. We went to Windenboro, Rose's
native town, but found little to relieve the impressions that may
have occupied us. To our inquiries about their old minister
we received but few warm-hearted replies. The successor of
Mr. Elphiston, while he preaches a milder form of dogma,
exhibits
less benignity of feeling. I hesitated about speaking of
these things to Rose; but she said she could bear anything,
that that part of herself once devoted to these painful
reminiscences
,
through successive processes of anguish, remorse and
penitence, had become
hollow
.
We have a manuscript life of my father, done in English,
with my mother's correction; also, in several forms, my
mother's hand-writing. We possess likewise several letters
from Margaret Bruneau to Gottfried Brckmann, and some of
his to her, which Mr. Evelyn found in Rubillaud. The clothes
of my father and mother, his flute, violin and several other
little things are here. Mr. Evelyn visited the grave of
Margaret
Bruneau, which he found covered with flowers. Her letters
are full of sweet simplicity and holy love. All whom he saw
extolled her virtues. In Pyrmont, he found a brother of my
father's, whom we hope to be able to persuade to come to
America. Withal, in our travels we heard of a German
soldier
in the interior of Pennsylvania, who served in the same
corps with my father. Him also we visited. I have been
travelling in search of my childhood! An unknown history
opens to me. I have been living here how unconsciously with
Ma, who is the cousin of my mother. Yet she has treated me
as her own child. I was confided especially to the care of
Chilion, whom Nimrod told my mother about. How well he
executed his charge! The change in my grandfather's name,
and that of Nimrod, prevented all recognizances for many
years. I know not that Ma ever understood the relation
subsisting
between us. This past, how precious to me! Hidden
event scattered over many years, and many countries, become
a part of my biography. It has taken a whole century to give
me birth! Time, like mother Carey's chickens, bides the
blast, rocks on the gulphy wave,
bearing her eggs under her
wings
, which she deposits at length on the broody shore. In
me shall these transactions be cherished into life! Do I
deprecate
34
the evil that has befallen me and mine; that shed itself
on these by-gone years? Dust sometimes falls with the purest
snow discoloring the face of Winter, but it enriches the growth
and enhances the beauty of Spring. Shall I become better, as
a new season of existence opens to me?
Our house is begun, but it must necessarily move on slowly.
We hope to be able to go into it, or some part of it, in the
course of twelve or fourteen months. It stands on the
Delectable
Way, near the Eastern margin of the Pond. It will
command
a more extensive Western view than we now enjoy,
taking in the whole length of the Pond, the Brandon hills, and
Umkiddin. Through avenues that we shall cut in the Maples
will be seen the Village, the River, the Meadows, the
champagne
country and mountains beyond. At the South will be
opened the valley of Mill Brook and the neighboring highlands.
The space between the house and Butternut is to be converted
into a garden. It is to be constructed of granite, of which an
abundance, and that of the finest quality, is found in the
neighborhood
.
We have an architect from New York, Mr. Palmer
from the Ledge is master workman. Of the style I shall say
but little, nor repeat the discussions we have had on the
subject
.
Mr. Evelyn knew more of the world, and it was right I
should yield to him. His travels abroad have tinged, and
perhaps
moulded his taste. It will have, I fancy, a slightly
castellated
appearance; so at least it looks on paper. It is to be
two stories high, and ample in all its appointments. Mr.
Evelyn talks of effect, the high grounds, woods, and all that;
entire
simplicity he objects to. Without ever giving any
reflection
to the matter, I found Master Elliman had in fact
indoctrinated
me with a love of the plain Grecian. But not as a
dwelling-house, and here, Mr. Evelyn says, only as a Temple
or Church. We are to have a room for Music and Art, one
for Natural History and Philosophy, a Library, Conservatory,
Aviary, and all that, and a plenty of rooms for our friends.
There are also extensive barns and out-houses. We have
gained a title to the whole of Mons Christi, by purchasing the
complete environs of the Pond, and a square mile of territory
on the North and West. We are clearing away woods, and
bringing many acres of excellent soil under cultivation. There
are nearly one hundred men employed in all departments, and,
if you will believe it, I do not think they consume more than
three gallons of spirit a day. We are widening and grading
the Delectable Way into a carriage road. Pa and Hash have
both left off drinking, and are busy and happy as need be.
Hash and Sibyl Radney will be married as soon as we shall
have finished their house. Hash superintends the farm;
Nimrod
and Rhody are anxious to remove here; it is his ambition
to take care of the barn and horses. He has become our jockey,
and went out lately and made us a purchase of some beautiful
Narragansetts with draught and carriage horses. Master
Elliman
comes up, stares about, applies his red handkerchief to his
nostrils, and the other day frankly confessed there were
realities
in the universe. People from the Village, Avernus, and all
parts, visit us, and gaze wonderingly upon our works. Joyce
Dooly, the Fortune-teller, was here the other day with her five
black cats. She mounted a rock, in presence of the
multitude
,
and harangued them, declaiming on her own merits.
She said
she
had brought about this change, had foretold it
all, and seen it in her cats. Rufus Palmer, who is really a
genius, is engaged on statuary, from plates Mr. Evelyn brought
from Europe.
Side by side, in the midst of the noise of hammers, the
shouting of teamsters, on the beach, lie in lonely silence my
canoe and Chilion's fishboat. His viol hangs in our room,
unlike
St. Dunstan's, it makes no music! In Nova Zembla, it
is reported, men's words are wont to be frozen in the air, and
at the thaw may be heard. In a cold grave, and colder world
are all Chilion's sweet melodies frozen, will they ever be heard
again?
They are building a Church in the Village. We furnished
the balance of the subscription for that purpose, and they have
adopted a model suggested by Mr. Evelyn. The Church will
suit me, it is pure, that is to say, elegant, Grecian. It is now
decided to form a new society, and one with which Mr. Evelyn
has connected himself. It is called Christ-Church. The house
stands on the East side of the Green, under two stately elms;
and forms a prominent object from our dwelling. The Free
Masons, in full company and costume, laid the corner stone.
Deacon Hadlock, the main pillar of the old Church, is
inconsolable
,
and inapproachable. Mr. Evelyn went to see him, but
he would not be persuaded. We offered them a sum of money
towards rebuilding the old Meeting-house, but it was rejected.
I need not tell you all the gossip that is afloat between the two
societies, or write how
our
people say the
others
are
endeavoring
things to their prejudice. There is probably some wrong
feeling on both sides. The Master was here to-day, and said
they had had several meetings of the old Church, reported
grievances, appointed committees, and ordered an examination
of the derelicts; and finally excommunicated Deacon
Ramsdill
and Esq. Weeks, and suspended Judge Morgridge and
Esq. Beach. He laughed himself into a perfect dry convulsion
fit, when he told me. That android sanctissimus, said he,
referring to the Rev. Dr. Brimmerly of Kidderminster, is
moving. That gentleman, he said, had held several private
conferences with Parson Welles. Reports unfavorable to the
reputation of Mrs. Wiswall, who has taken a house in town,
and of Bertha, and also of Rose, have reached here, and we
are called a harboring place of unprincipled persons, a
community
of
Deacon Ramsdill was here this afternoon; he has not been
deprived of his good cheer. They have picked us out, said
he, and thrown us to the hogs. But arter all, he added,
rotten apples are the sweetest.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
What shall you think of Frank being our Minister, and
Rose our Minister's wife! On the election, there could have
been but one sentiment, as you know there was but one voice.
His views and feelings, and the character of his discourses,
precluded much disputation. We had some difficulty in the
Ordination. A Council of Clerical and Lay Delegates, from
the County, assembled, examined the candidate and rejected
him. Parson Welles I believe was at first disposed to have
Frank for a colleague, and retain a pastoral connection with
Christ-Church; but he was diverted from these inclinations by
causes which I do not understand. The Church was reduced
to the necessity of adopting other measures. The Rev. Mr.
Freeman of your city, was sent for, and the Rev. Mr. Lovers
of Brandon, who had expressed a willingness to aid us. Mr.
Lovers preached the sermon, and the ordaining prayer with the
imposition of hands was made by Mr. Freeman. Thus, Mr.
Evelyn says, through Dr. Freeman, who was himself
Episcopally
ordained, and derives his authority from a succession said
to remount to the first ages of the Church, we have an
Apostolic
Bishop ordained over this Diocese of Livingston! The
new spacious house was filled, and many came in from abroad.
At the close, the Sacrament of the Lord's Supper was
administered
to the congregation.
I joined in the participation!
With what sensations I cannot now relate. Springs of new
water welled within me, the soul of Jesus oppressed and
charmed
my soul. Poor Rose sat by me trembling like a leaf.We
have ordered an Organ from London, and I suppose it will
fall to me and Rose to play it, for the present at least. Tony
the Barber plays the violin for us. He has not touched his
instrument before since Chilion's death. How we miss
Chilion at every step!
Frank and Rose are boarding at Esq. Bowker's; a
Parsonage
I suppose will be built for them next year, on Grove
Street. Rose says the only feeling she has, or of which she
is at present capable, is humility; and that whether she
estimates
her duties to the world at large, or reflects on the favors
received in her own soul. She relies much upon Frank, who
will nourish, renovate and guide her. If she can at all
embody the graces, or disseminate the love of Christ, in whom
her faith is confirmed, she says she shall be satisfied. She
says she is like those trees, which fall over on the banks of
rivers, and grow with the roots upwards; but if she only grows
she does not care how. She is fair almost to fragility; she has
at times, a most mysteriously spiritual look, like the Moon
shining through white window curtains. There are those in
the Church who truly love her, and will tenderly treat her.
In Mrs. Bowker and Isabel Weeks she finds a most according
friendship. To Frank she is all in all. How good and great
in him to love her so! Her unnaturalness has gradually
subsided
,
and the sweetness and freshness of her youth begin
rapidly to unfold. Christ, that makes us all children, Frank
says, has reproduced the morning of her childhood, and she
advances to beautiful perfection.She had often been to the
Communion before, she says, but never with such feelings.
She never before realized what our new Bishop said it was, an
inter-communing with the soul of Jesus. She is succulent as
the Widow's house-leek, and would thrive I believe if she
were only attached to the shingles of Christ-Church. Like
the dodder, her rooting in the old world is destroyed, and she
now winds about goodness and mercy, which she is destined
I think ever to adorn. Dear Rose, she has been to me a
child, a sister, a lover. She will always be near mecan we
be too happy? For all, how much are we indebted to Frank
and Mr. Evelyn! The friendship so long subsisting between
our husbands, how delightfully is it consummated!
34*
MARGARET TO ANNA.
Our house is finished, and what has been a long story to us,
I shall make a short one to you; which can be done the more
readily, since I hope you will soon come and see all things for
yourself. The expense within and without Mr. Evelyn says
has not been less than one hundred thousand dollars. We
have imported some things, not that Mr. Evelyn would not
have preferred domestic articles, but many we could not find.
Besides what matters it. I am made up of all nations, some
German, some French, some English, some American; and it
is only dealing with my countrymen, trade with whomsoever I
may. You should not have introduced me to
your
house unless
you supposed I was more or less than human. Our plate
certainly
does not equal yours; our linen is home-made; our
curtains and hangings are very beautiful, thanks to your good
taste. Mr. Evelyn brought from Europe a valuable library,
some elegant maps and engravings, and a few choice pieces of
sculpture. We have since ordered more of these articles.
In addition, Rufus Palmer has been engaged on statuary for
us these two years. He is now in Europe, and when he
returns
,
we have promised him in exchange for his productions,
our Isabel; that is if they will consent to take up their
residence
at Mons Christi. We have busts of the old
Philosophers
,
a copy of the Venus de Medici, Apollo Belvidere,
Antinous, Belisarius, a Psyche and Butterfly, a Prometheus
and others, and some excellent Paintings; we have a parlor
organ, a piano and guitar, in addition to my father's flute
and violin; also an excellent set of chemical, philosophical
and astronomical instruments. At the head of the Delectable
Way stand statues of Peace and Truth; under the trees in
front of the house, are Faith, Hope, Love and Beauty. Near
the Tree-bridge, in the Via Dolorosa, we design to put
Penitence
and Fortitude. On the Via Salutaris stands Humanity.
A Ceres has been set up in our cornfield. In Diana's Walk
is her own Ladyship with the Golden Bow. On Feronia's
Isle and in Egeria's Haunt we propose to place something,
and if the white birches are not sufficient of themselves, we
shall add marble Muses. My Pantheon, that Mr. Evelyn
used to banter me about, still remains, and my bubbles
have taken marble forms. Between the Butternut and the
old house is a broad opening conducting to the foot of Mons
Christi, which we call The Avenue of the Beautiful. In this
is a Temperance pouring water from a goblet into a marble
trough. It is supplied from the same spring-head that has so
long furnished the water of our Cistern, and is designed both
for man and beast. On it hangs Pa's silver tankard, which
he himself put there, the only relic of his former prosperity,
and which he is glad to have diverted from its customary use.
This water, always a copious stream coming down from the
highlands back of Pa's, serves for a fountain in the garden,
where its jet and spray may be perpetually seen, and flows
thence to our house and barn in quantity sufficient for all
needs. When we formerly made our escape from Mons
Christi to the Ledge, Rufus showed me a figure on which he
had been hammering at his leisure, designed to represent me
as I was when I found the water; this he has since
completed
.
It is a perfect Molly Hart, in short gown, pinafore
and gipsey hat. Ma wanted it put in the old house, but
there seemed to be no room for it. We have it in our
drawing-room
;
and near it are the cherry plate, bowl and spoon
I used to eat bread and cider and bean porridge with, and
also the wolf's bone knife and fork Chilion made me. The old
Chesnuts, which were already in decay, have been cut down,
and the bounds of the Mowing enlarged, which gives us a
beautiful green lot in our front view. North of the Mowing
is an extensive young orchard of various kinds of choice
apples, pears, quinces and peaches. Our Aviary, which is
large, and well furnished with shrubbery, we intend to stock
with native birds. In the Conservatory we have some foreign
plants, and shall experiment more with the domestic. We
have a room called the Prophet's Chamber, which our Bishop
frequently occupies, and where he writes some of his
sermons
.
In the garden is a large Bee-range. The old house
remains as it was, saving repairs. There Pa and Ma live.
The loom and wheels have been restored to the work-shop,
and there sits Ma, in her short-gown and naked arms,
smoking
and weaving us blankets. She cannot be induced to
forego any of her old habits. Pa, who never suffered from
what the Master would call a cacoethes laboris, loves and
enjoys his ease. He has made us some stout walking shoes,
which is the most he has done for a year. On the
chimney
are my marble kitten and flower-pot. About the house
still grow my beans, hops, virgin's bower, eye-brights,
blood-roots
,
and other flowers Chilion helped me rear. Chilion's
clothes, fishing tackle, gun, powder horn, shot-bag,
occupy
their old places on the walls of the kitchen. The suit in
which he was executed, his violin, a partly finished basket
with some partly finished spools, he was making, hang in
the work-shop; Ma will not allow them to be touched. Some
of his hair she has wrought into a ring, which she wears on
her finger. Margaret, my peach tree, is dead, but a young
Margaret is growing in the same spot. Dick, my squirrel,
and my birds are dead, their empty cages hang in the old
place. Bull, whose heart, as well as his leg, was broke, when
Chilion died, totters backwards and forwards from house to
house. So have perished some of the dear fellow-fixtures and
comrades of my life! Beyond Pa's, stands Nimrod's house,
and a little farther up the way live Hash and Sibyl.
Grandfather
,
who is exceedingly interested, and I believe pleased,
in all we do, divides his time between us and Aunt Wiswall.
Judah Weeks has promised marriage to Cousin Bertha.
Speaking of this reminds me to tell you, that Obed has
married
Beulah Ann Orff. Mrs. Evelyn, the good mother of
Charles, has also come to Livingston, and lives with us for the
present.
You inquire what our household arrangements are to be.
Our regular family is composed of Mr. Evelyn, myself, Sylvina
Pottle and Dorothy Tapley. Then we have more or less of
our friends with us a good deal of the time. Mr. Pottle has
a large number of children, and at Mr. Tapley's they are very
poor, and those people were anxious their daughters should
come and live with us, and earn something. Our food is
simple; I never had any other, and what is bred in the bone
will never be out of the flesh, as Deacon Ramsdill says; and
Mr. Evelyn is not particular. I still enjoy a dish of bean
porridge
with Molly. I always got up early, and could not easily
be taught new tricks. Then I have been out in the air so
much I must still be out. We have prayers every morning,
and Mr. Evelyn explains the Scriptures to us. We have
breakfasted this Summer at six and an half o'clock, dined at
twelve, and taken tea at five. So we are doing at present.
Our hired men board with Nimrod and Hash. Ma has woven
a working suit for Mr. Evelyn. We have both had our hands
full getting the house in order. I look for leisure this winter
to read more, and practice music more.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
I must tell you of a delightful change that has come over
No. 4. You remember how the place looked the first time
you were through it. The people were notorious for their
indolence and dissipation; and their estates were mortgaged
to Mr. Smith, who held the inhabitants as fiefs, and
sometimes
harassed them. Mr. Evelyn had their houses repaired
and painted, sent men to help them clear out their intervals,
planted a row of trees along the street, and had a beautiful
statue of Diligence set up at the corner. He then assumed
their debts, and said he would give them no trouble for three
years, provided they would pay the interest punctually. He
also contributed to a School-house that was erected half way
between No. 4 and Breakneck. In six months the Gubtails,
with what work they did for us and hay they brought us,
cleared themselves entirely. Mrs. Tapley and Mrs. Hatch
wove for us, and Mr. Hatch and Isaiah made our iron work.
Old Mr. Tapley, a very sot, has labored unremittingly on his
farm. When they had new door-yards, the girls began to
ornament them with flowers and shrubs. We let Dorothy
go into the woods two days for this purpose; and that
hamlet has now a truly picturesque appearance. The people,
I think, do not drink any ardent spirits. The Still, that Mr.
Smith undertook to rebuild, Mr. Evelyn purchased for a barn,
which those people found they needed. Mr. Smith himself, I
am told, has amended his habits; he has at least renovated
the exterior of his house. Avernus should rather be called
Elysium; God made it a beautiful spot, and man has restored
its fallen image. Nor is this effect confined to No. 4; it has
reached the village, and is more or less distributed into every
part of the Town. Our Bishop says Temperance is a
Christian
grace, and has preached strongly against the Sin of
Intemperance. In this he is also joined by Parson Welles,
who still preaches in the Town-house. Many have abandoned
drinking, and four distilleries have stopped. Mr. Readfield,
our new merchant, keeps no ardent spirits, and Deacon
Penrose
must have found his sales materially lessened. Esquires
Beach and Bowker both say their duties, as Justices of the
Peace, have greatly abated. Mr. Stillwater has converted his
new bar-room into a reading-room, and says his profits are
nearly equal to what they were before. On Sunday you will
see the No. 4's flocking down to Meeting with a constancy
only equalled by their former negligence, in which they were
quite of a sort with ourselves.
At the time they were upon rebuilding the Jail, Mr. Evelyn
proposed to the Commissioners if they would consent to an
establishment on an enlarged scale, with rooms more
commodious
,
windows more numerous, and better conveniences
for warmth in winter, he would bear the additional cost.
Judge Morgridge, Esq. Bowker and others, thought it would
be an excellent plan; and it was consented to. The building
stands a little back from the old site. Each room, Mr. Evelyn
furnished with a good bed, books, lights, looking-glass,
washstand
and flower vase. The windows have green blinds,
which by a simple contrivance the prisoners can open and
shut at their pleasure. The horrors and discomforts of the
old Jail I have myself too sensibly realized. A new keeper
has been appointed in place of Mr. Shooks. At the last Town
Meeting the Selectmen were instructed to look after the
moral condition
of the prisoners. What with the site of the
old Meeting-house smoothed and grassed, the burnt woods
improved
by Mrs. Wiswall's house and grounds, a new
School-house
,
new Court-house, Tavern and Jail, the Green has
reassumed
some of its former beauty.
Christ-Church have made choice of three Deacons, Esq.
Bowker, Joseph Whiston and Comfort Pottle. Deacon
Ramsdill
was getting old, and Judge Morgridge and Esq. Beach,
who have served in that office, thought they had better choose
some young men.
You would sometimes have tempted me to live in your City.
But, dear Anna, do you not come under the jurisdiction of
Master Elliman's Puppetdom? Are you not, measurably,
simulacra hominum feminarumque? Are you foot-free,
tongue-free
,
soul-free? The
representation
of the Theatre seemed to
me to be carried through the City; all were acting not
themselves
,
but their parts. Perhaps I judge wrongfully.
You
, I
know, are natural and real. But what will you say of Mr.
Boxly, Mrs. Winchen, Miss Lees and others whom I saw at
your house? I would not do them injustice, and I know I am
incompetent to give an opinion, but how could I live among
such people! I remember once looking at the sea near the
wharves in January. The water and the cold were in deadly
combat. The waves winced, bellowed and agonized. But
the cold kept steadily at work, as a spider, and with threads
of ice, the Borean monster glued and entangled the whole
surface
,
and soon it all lay a sullen, ghastly, adamantine heap.
Such seemed to me to be the strife between fashion and
nature; and such, alas! it is, Mr. Evelyn says, the world over.
Give me leave to yawn when I am tired, wonder at what is
admirable, and wear a shoe that fits my foot. I fear the
Cacoethes Feminarum is a deeper disease than Obed's elder
blows will cure, and that you will have to take a good many
boxes of his nostrum before you are well quit of plague in the
vitals. The whole world belike, says the Father from
whom I learn all my wisdom, should be new-moulded, and
turned inside out as we do hay-cocks, top to bottom, bottom to
top. For the present I am contented to
keep away
, not from
you Anna, but from what is about you; and if you push upon
me I shall run as far as there is land-room on the Continent;
and if worse comes to worse, I shall make my expiration in the
words of one of old;
Discedam, explebo numerum, reddarque tenebris.
Have we not here what his Grace, the Duke of Devonshire
might envy; pleasure-grounds, rich meadows, the
embellishment
of a full grown plantation, beautiful lawns, many a
paddock. We are in the midst of a royal hunting ground,
packs of hounds are in the neighborhood; we have plenty of
game, and an unlimited right of common, in which in their
season are excellent wild-turkey and grey-squirrel shooting;
admirable fox-chases; a full command of the view up and
down; a capital kitchen garden; our estate is well watered;
gravel walks intersect our grounds, and lead in all directions.
We see live Hippiades every day; we have a perpetual
advowson
to the living of Mons Christi, and are subject to no ground
rent. For rustic ruins I can show you an abundance of
reverend stumps, garnished with grape-vines, and studded with
fungus. In Italy are palaces ventilated by wind-mills; we
resort to no contrivances of that sort. Guianerius, out of my
author, recommends the air to be moistened with sweet-herb
water, and the floor to be sprinkled with rose-vinegar. We
take the air as it comes, wet or dry, hot or cold, and find that
blowing across Mons Christi to be always exhilarating and
salubrious. In Summer it is charged with the freshness of the
earth, the aroma of woods, the music of birds. In Winter it
glitters with health and life.Then we all work, not take
exercise, but
work
. The Turks, so says Democritus Junior,
enjoin all men, of whatsoever degree, to be of some trade or
other: the Grand Seignior himself is not excused. Mahomet,
he that conquered Greece, at that very time when he heard
ambassadors of other princes, did carve spoons. There is
some difference, peradventure, between the habits of Turks
and Christians! Through idleness, continues my authority,
it is come to pass that in city and country, so many
grievances
of body and mind, and this ferall disease of Melancholy so
frequently rageth, and now domineers almost all over Europe
amongst our great ones. The ancient Germans plunged
idlers into the thickest marshes, leaving them to perish by a
death that resembled their own dispositions. Without
executioners
to expedite the matter, all of that class do so perish
now-a-days, nillywilly. Friction is recommended. Think of
our farmers stimulating their skins with flesh-brushes to keep
up a circulation! Nay, verily, we must work. Fowls do not
appear ready spitted, Deacon Ramsdill says, and we must
work for them too. The Lacedemonians had such an idea of
liberty they could not reconcile it with any manual labor.
One of them, returning from Athens, said, I come from a
City where nothing is dishonorable. Work shall be no
disgrace
at Mons Christi.
We have our sports too, hawking, fowling, fishing, riding,
berrying. To walk amongst orchards, gardens, mounts,
thickets
,
lawns and such like pleasant places, like that Antiochan
Daphne, brooks, pools, ponds, betwixt wood and water, by a
fair river side, ubi vari avium cantationes, florum colores,
pratorum frutices, to disport in some pleasant plain, run up a
steep hill sometimes, sit in a shady seat, must needs be, as
my benevolent author observes, a delectable recreation.
This we enjoy. Then there are our indoor diversions, music,
dancing, chess and various games. In winter, we sleigh-ride,
coast, skate, snow-ball. No, Anna, let me stay here while I
may.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
The end of my being is accomplished! The prophecy of
my life is fulfilled! My dreams have gone out in realities!
The Cross is erected on Mons Christi
!! Yesterday, the
Anniversary of our National Independence, was the event
consummated. It was made by Mr. Palmer, from a superb
block of the purest marble, which he got from his quarry, and
is fifteen feet high, with a proportionate breadth. We met
near the Brook Kedron on the Via Salutaris. There were all
the members of Christ-Church, the Masonic Corps and a
multitude of others. I was to lead the procession, supported
by Mr. Evelyn; they had me seated on a milk-white horse,
dressed in white, and a wreath of twin-flowers vine on my
head. Then followed the Cross, borne on the shoulders of
twenty-four young men; next came the Bishop and wife, the
Deacons and their wives, Christ-Church members, two and
two, man and woman; these were succeeded by the Masons,
and the line was closed by the people at large. On the Head
was a band of Christ-Church musicians playing the Triumphs
of Jesus, which we got from Germany. We came over the
brook Kedron, traversed what we have made the broad, and
ornamental Via Salutaris, and entered the Avenue of the
Beautiful. At the foot of the hill I dismounted. By a winding
gravel-walk I went upwith a trembling, joyous step I went
followed by the Cross-bearers. Reaching the summit, I wound
the arms and head of the Cross about with evergreens; the
young men raised it in its place, a solid granite plinth.
Returning
,
we assembled under the Butternut in the Avenue of
the Beautiful, where Frank made a discourse to the people;
some idea of which I would like to convey to you. He had
for his text, God forbid that I should glory save in the Cross
of our Lord Jesus Christ. The Cross he said stood to us in
two aspects; first the end of Christ's life, and second, the
burden
of his life. Of the first he said it was the termination of
his career, the finale of a distinguished course of mercy and
love; hence as the finishing stroke of his life, he said it
represented
his whole life. As the stars and stripes stand for our
country, our government, our liberties, our national all, so he
said the Cross stood for Christ's all. He said a Christian would
glory in the Cross of Christ as a citizen glories in the flag of
his country. But more than this, he said the Cross of Christ
had a deeper significance than was implied in merely his
decease
on Calvary. He said it referred to what transpired
before
his death, to events of his personal history and experience,
in a word, to the burden of his life. He said that Christ
bearing his own Cross, his telling his disciples to take up their
cross and follow him, Paul's expression I am crucified with
Christ, the declaration that he died unto sin once, all
denoted
that he underwent a crucifixion in his life-time, a
crucifixion
to the world, to sin and all evil; that his resistance to
the diabolical temptation, his strong crying and tears, his being
touched with the feeling of our infirmities, his agony and
bloody sweat, were such a crucifixion; that his watchings,
his labors, his deprivations, his rebuffs, the intrigues of his
enemies, the desertion of his friends, were a cross; that
meeting
evil with good, repulse with kindness, insults with
forbearance
,
his blessing those who hated him, his grandeur in the
midst of what was low, his effulgence in the midst of what was
dark, his singleness and sincerity in a period of calculating
35
expediency, his advancement that overleaping his own,
synchronized
with all ages and squared with an unlimited future,
his incarnation of God among sin-possessed men, his attempts
at the transfusion of himself into the race, and such things,
were all a cross. He said we bore the cross when we reversed
the practices of a fallen world and adopted those of the highest
humanity; when we shone as lights in the world; when we
were blameless and harmless in the midst of a crooked and
peverse nation; when we forbore one another in love; when
we were ready to be persecuted for righteousness' sake; when
we obeyed God rather than man; when we lived unspotted
from the world; when we put off the old man with his deeds,
and put on the new man; when we became the pillar and the
ground of truth; when we returned blessing for cursing,
and good for evil; and so whatever obstacle we overcame, or
impediment encountered in our progress towards perfection,
or in the extension of the kingdom of God in the earth, he
said was a cross. He said glorying in the Cross of Christ
would be the selectest ambition of every Christian. We have
adopted the Cross, he said, for our emblem, because it is so
good an exponent of Christ, and of our character, purposes
and principles as Christians. In allusion to the green
flowering
aspect of the Cross, he said that betokened the Final
Triumph, the Conquest over Sin, the destruction of the Evil
by the Good; and also the bloom and lustre of Virtue.
While he was speaking, a milk-white Dove from our cot
flew and alighted on the top of the Cross. Hardly could we
contain ourselves; a most delicious tremor ran through me.
The Dove, said he, is the symbol of the sweet love, and pure
effluence of God!I cannot tell you all he said; I repeat his
principal topics. That certain unction of his, that holy
medium
in which his mind moves; that rosy sun-light of love
that tinges the peaks of his thoughts, that creative effect of
pure goodness wherein lies his forteall this you will
understand
better than it can be told. After the address, we went
into the woods to Diana's Walk, and had a collation, when the
Lord's Supper was administered, and hundreds partook.
Returning
,
Mr. Evelyn embraced me with tearshe does not
often weep. Christ has also embraced me with tears, and I
too must weep. The heart of the Beautiful One is touched,
and what can I do? I dreamed of him the other night, lying
prostrate under the Butternut. His Cross too had fallen, and
the flowers were withered. I am aweary, said he, I have no
place to lay my head. I am a stranger in the world, and no
one takes me in; I am sick, and no one visits me. My heart
aches, Margaret. My locks are wet with the dews of the night.
I was bruised for their inquities, but they are iniquitous still.
From Calvary I have wandered over the earth. From age to
age I have been an outcast. My agony in the garden was too
true, too real; I was overshadowed by my destiny. I could
not bear the insupportable load.I do not see the travail of my
soul. I have come hither to die, Margaret. He leaned upon
my arm; he looked as he does in Moralez's Ecce Homo,
stricken with a divine grief, wasting under an inexpressible
disappointment. I brought him water from the spring
Temperance
,
and his spirit came again; his look changed into the
Transfiguration of Raphael. I sprinkled water on the
cross-leaves
,
and they revived. Our marble group, Faith, Hope, Love
and Beauty, appeared from under the trees, living, and
ministered
unto him. He came into our house, I dreamed, with the
Sisters, gave a pleased glance at the rooms; said, I dwell
with them that dwell with me, and vanished.
Explain to me, Anna, what do these things mean? Have
Christians treated Christ so badly? You recollect the story
circulated when I was in Boston, that the French had torn
Raphael's Tapestries from the Vatican, and sold them; and
some one purchasing that which bore an image of Christ, burnt
it to ashes, for the
gold and silver
he hoped to get from it!
Does Christ haunt the world like Fionnulla, the daughter of
Lir, sighing for the first sound of the mass-bell that was to be
the signal for her release? Was his light hidden under ground
at the time of his death, and does it there burn eternally, like
the lamp in the Tomb of Pallas? Tell me, what is the
significance
of this distress? Whither has fled the Redemption of
Man?How far are we called upon to submit to an
irretrievable
order of events? Was Christ done, eighteen hundred years
now last past? Were Calvary and Tyburn Hill alike as two
peas? Are the Star Chamber and Fanueil Hall the same? Is
it all one whether I pick strawberries on Mons Christi, or dance
a rigadoon in a raree-show? whether I am a geode or a
Milliner's
baby? Eidepol! God is one, but man is many, and the
soul is none.
The green-wreathed Cross towers afar. It can be seen from
the Green, and beyond the River; at No. 4, Breakneck,
Snakehill, Five-mile-lot; and I presume in half a dozen towns.
From my window I see it piercing the clouds, which are its
perpetual aureola. The stars shall crown it; the sun shall
stoop to do it reverence. I mean to train over it a Boursalt
rose, and in winter drape it with running club-moss.
This Cross has travailed in my soul, Anna; I could not rest
till it had gone forth in substance. We have trimmed the path
up the Head with rose-bushes, amaranths, angelicas, thyme,
bitter-sweet night-shade, and here and there a thorn. Can you
realize how much Christ has been to me? How much of
beauty, goodness, virtue, love, peace, hope, light, strength, I
owe him! I do find his yoke easy and his burden light. Even
when I knew him not, he blessed me. I could not be more
happy if I had had my birth in his soul. The Eider Duck of
Heaven, he lines the nest of his offspring with down plucked
from his own breast. He offered himself for our sins; he
suffered
for us. The voluntary Prometheus, he bound himself to
the Caucasian rock of humanity, his heart was preyed upon by
all the evils of the race. He sympathizes with us. Why is
the world so insensible to him! Venus, bewailing the death of
Adonis, changed his blood into the wind-flower. Christ,
bewailing
the death of man, would have changed his blood into
beautiful soul-flowers. ButVenus running to the aid of her
boy, pricked her foot with a thorn, and that blood changed the
white rose into the red. Christ pricked his feet with thorns,
the roses of the woods are red, humanity still welters in its
blood.
To Mr. Evelyn and Frank how much I owe. They have
removed the dross, the dogmatic obscurity and wanton frivolity,
that attached to the New Testament; and made it a luminous,
divine book to me. When Mr. Evelyn was in England, this
was told him. Lord Northwick had just brought from Italy a
picture of St. Gregory, by Annibal Caracci. For some cause
connected with the troubles of the times, in order to get
possession
of the picture, a poor dauber had been hired to paint
over it in body-color, an imitation of some inferior artist.
When it was opened, his Lordship's friends, who had been
looking for something admirable, stared in mortified
astonishment
.
It has got soiled, I see, said his Lordship, give me
a sponge. Whereupon, with a sponge, he began to rub the
piece, nor had he long done so, when out peeped the head of
St. Gregory; soon the attendant Angels were seen, and in a
short time the whole of that magnificent picture became
visible
.
So the Bible has been daubed over to my eyes. I have
seen in it not the work of God, but the production of some
poor artist. I have turned from it as a miserable travesty.
The sponge has been applied; the false colors removed, and the
original is inexpressibly beautiful.The Gospels are the Word
of Christ, as he was the Word of God. Before the Gospels,
Christ was. He shines through them. They stand in him,
like the Apocalyptic Angel in the Sun. Mr. Evelyn reads
them to us from the Greek, whereby, he says, he himself has a
better sense of them, and can impart a better sense.
Come, Anna, come to Mons Christi. Come and
see
our
happiness, come and feel it. I am running over. I wish there
was a silver pipe reaching from here to you, such as I once
saw let down from the blue sky, that you might draw off and
be surcharged like me. I wish from the great spring-head of
Jesus, an aqueduct could be laid that should fill your beautiful
Common with fountains! And, Oh, I wish all hearts might
become gardens of fountains, like what Mr. Evelyn saw in the
Tuilleries at Paris. I never feared death. I was never troubled
about the hereafter. I have an immortality each moment of
my life. I am inundated with ages of bliss. I could die
tomorrow
,
and feel that I had lived forever. I could live
forever
,
and never be sensible of an addition to what I now have.
Rose is here playing one of Beethoven's Waltzes; it is a jet of
music spriting into my ecstasy. My life is hid with Christ in
God. The One circumflows and in-heavens us. The Infinite
Father bears us in his bosom, shepherd and flock. I
feel
that
all good beautiful souls live forever. Rose says she begins to
feel so too. She brought me a bunch of flowers from the Via
Dolorosa! The birds are jubilating in the woods. I see Pa and
Mr. Evelyn at work in the garden. Come and spend the
Summer
with us.I am but a child. I feel only a child's feelings.
I lie on the grass, and frisk with my hands and feet, a mere baby
in God's Universe. Come, and you shall instruct me.Let me
be Jesus' child; I ask no more.
For the nonce, I sign myself,
Margaret Christi
.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
We have a new Cemetery. It lies back of Grove Street, south
of Deacon Hadlock's Pasture, and is intersected by the Brook
Kedron, and covers part of the wooded slope on the descent of
Mons Christi. It possesses a variety of surface and of trees,
and the ornaments of walks and shrubbery. On either side of
he Brook is a willow-shaded gravel path. When Mr. Evelyn
was in Europe he visited the Cemeteries of Naples, Pisa, and
Pre la Chaise at Paris, and here he would reproduce the
effect. We cannot imitate all architectural and princely forms,
35*
but we can do that which pleases ourselves. Several of the
citizens have already put up tasteful monuments. Rufus
Palmer helps us in this, as in other things, and he has two
young men studying and practising with him; one of whom,
Socrates Hadlock, gives excellent artistical promise. Mr.
Girardeau
has a lot, and to it have been brought the remains of
his wife, my own father and mother, his sister Marie, and
Raxman. Rose also intends to remove here her father and
mother, and sister. The kind Arab wish, May you die
among your kindred, we shall in some sense realize! We
have been concerned about Chilion, his dying request we
supposed
it impossible ever to execute, and had kept it graven on
our own memories. At last, however, we ventured to speak of
it to the people, and in full town-meeting it was asked if they
would consent to the carrying out of Chilion's wishes. All
who spoke, answered affirmatively, and whatever denials
existed
kept silence. The plain marble shaft, Mr. Palmer first
made, now stands over his new grave; on it is his name,
Chilion, and underneath are these words, Here lies one who
tried to love his fellow men,words I know that were near
his heart, and are now gone forth to the world. Mr. Smith,
when the transfer of graves was had, allowed that Solomon's
monument, on which has so long stood the dreadful word
Murdered, should be changed for another. The old burial
ground remains; the ancient head-stones, those which are
identified, as the spot itself is, with the early history of
Livingston
,
keep their primitive places. The Cemetery seems to us
mournful and attractive; an iron fence surrounds it, but its
gates are always unlocked. With dove-like, Pleiadian melody,
the Brook Kedron flows through it. Mr. Evelyn has striven to
diffuse a taste that prevails in Europe, and already are many of
the mounds and lots blooming with flowers. People walk there
a great deal, and on the Sabbath it is thronged. It shears
death of its terrors, spiritualizes life, and hallows affection.
There
is
a Fountain reaching from Mons Christi to
our
Common! It is fed by the Brook Kedron, and rises in the
centre of the Green. It springs by graceful impulses, and
breaks into beautiful attenuations. The Green is encircled by
great elms, and here is a little liquid elm in the midst of them.
Mr. Stillwater has changed his Tavern to the Cross and Crown.
Col. Welch, who left here during the War, has returned. He
addressed a letter to Judge Morgridge, the brother of Mrs.
Welch, intimating a wish to come back and end his days
among his old town's people. At a meeting of the citizens,
the subject was considered, and they declared unanimously for
his request, and voted moreover to reimburse his expenses
hither, repair his house and renovate his grounds. Col.
Welch's, the Poor-House, the Pock-House, or whatever it be, is
ineffaceably associated with my first knowledge of Mr. Evelyn,
and with a morbific career of no uncertain character. Mr.
Evelyn has said he did not know as he should have ever
married
me, if he had not first given me the Small-Pox. (?) Col.
Welch's is a commanding situation, and one of the finest on
the Green. His family of sons and daughters, becomes a
great acquisition to our circle of friends.
You are acquisitive of all the news, Anna, and I must tell
you, Csar Morgridge and Phillis Welch, Tony Washington
and old Dill, are married; and Master Elliman is betrothed to
Miss Amy! How this last was brought about I can hardly
say; only it was natural that a matter of thirty years standing
should come to a head at last. He told me, laughing, that he
was now heir-apparent to the tottering throne of Puppetdom
in Livingston. He has long occupied the sacerdotal office of
Parish-clerk, he says, and now aspires to higher degrees in
Anagogics. But, soberly, I think my good, fast, tender-hearted,
queer old friend has changed somewhatnot in his dress,
for he wears the same nankin breeches, shovel hat, fringed
vest, tye-wig, as of yorebut in his feelings and interior self.
He consents to reality and nature more; he exhibits a cordial
interest in life, men and manners. I am under irredeemable
obligations to him. He instructed me largely in the
form
, but
kept me away from the
heart
of things, the common heart I
mean; and left me wholly to find a heart for myself, or make
such an one as I could. This, Mr. Evelyn says, was a great
service.
Training-days have provoked a good deal of talk. Their
innumerable evils we all felt. Pa himself was brought home
drunk from a recent muster-field! The question took a serious
form among the people. Parson Welles, sensible of the
growing
skepticism, preached to his, now so small, congregation,
in behalf of the practice. This had the effect to deepen
inquiry in the general mind. Christ-Church members, went
one day in solemn, mournful procession, men, women and
children, to their Oracle, the Gospelsfor such they
emphatically
are;they went with as much perturbation of curiosity
and weight of concern as ever Athenians did to the Delphian
Tripod. Christ says so and so, responded the Bishop, at
whose house they met. The next training-day, Capt. Tuck
came forward, and with a speech quite in his vein, threw up
his commission. The subaltern officers followed the example
of their captain, the soldiers went into no balloting, and the
Livingston Company was not. Capt. Hoag said also that his
mind had changed. Deacons Penrose and Hadlock with some
others, sought to reorganize a band; but they were too old for
such a purpose themselves, and they could not find young men
enough even to form an Irish company. General Kingsland,
of Dunwich, ordered our people to attach themselves to the
Dunwich Company. One or two muster-days passed, and
nothing was done. At last he sent in an armed body, of fifty
or a hundred men, to take our people to Dunwich, without
fail. In work-shops, mills, farms, offices, the citizens
continued
their ordinary pursuits. These soldiers dispersed
themselves
in all parts of the town. I was riding in the Meadows,
when they came there. Several of our people were at work,
and among them, Judah Weeks, who was mowing. Don't
you intend to go with us? said the soldiers, after explaining
their errand. I am very busy, replied Judah, I could not
possibly go to-day, neither do I care to at any time. I am
empowered to force you, said one of the troop. Very well,
replied Judah, and continued his mowing. The soldier seized
him by the collar, but Judah, who is very strong, still kept his
scythe swinging, until he had drawn the soldier one or two
rods into the grass. I will shoot you, said the soldier, if
you don't obey. That is it, hey? said Judah. If I am
to die I wish to do so with my wife and child. Call Bertha,
some of you, he said to the people who began to flock around.
His wife and child were brought. Now I am ready, said
he. The soldier raised his musket, and lowered it. I know
not that he had any intentions of shooting. The soldiers went
off, and Judah resumed his work. We next encountered them
carrying a young fellow, who proved to be my old pupil,
Consider
Gisborne. Four of them had him by his arms and feet.
He kicked lustily, and got away. An affair occurred at the
Mill, of which there have been several accounts. I will give
you the version we received from Captain Tuck himself.
General Kingsland in person, a Captain and Lieutenant, all in
field costume, came to the Mill, and sent in a message that
they had express business with Capt. Tuck. The Captain
went to the door, told them he was much hurried, that all his
stones were running, and several people were waiting for their
grists; and politely asked them in. However loth, they
dismounted
,
entered the Mill, followed the Captain, who was
actively
employed from hopper to hopper. The place was
floating
in the dust of meal, which presently found lodgment on
their plumes, blue coats and sashes. The General became
uneasy and urgent, the Captain replied that he was very busy,
and at the same time demonstrated the nature of his business
by emptying a meal-bag, from which fumed up any quantity of
the fine white effluvium. Whereupon, in the words of Captain
Tuck, the General and his forces made a precipitate
retreat
.
Sprinkled with flower from crest to spur, they
mounted
their horses, and by most private ways withdrew from
Livingston
.
The Captain vaunts himself much on what he calls
his
ruse de guerre;
and declares that meal-powder is more
effective than gun-powder.
We are menaced with fines, but our people say they had
better pay them, than train. Indeed, a levy was made, some
property put up at auction, but no bidders appeared.
However
the whole matter is to be carried before the State
Legislature
,
and we are looking forward to their action with no small
solicitude.
The world rattles about us, like wood-peckers in the forest.
If any thing rotten or defective can be discovered, well for us,
we will have it cut down.I have certified myself of the
meaning
of that very anagogical word, world; it signifies any
thing that is not Livingston, or out of Christ-Church, or below
Mons Christi. We means us, and they them. How very
pleasant
to be brought plump up against the fence of the not you!
By being ourselves we have developed another being, quite as
long and as broad, and inclined to pugilism withal. I used
not to be, and nobody else was. Mr. Evelyn first scared me
with this idea of the world. But our world grows larger
every day, and I lack not for company, though theirs grows
pari passu
. How will either come out in the end?
Some of our people walk carefully, as birds on ice. Soon
I trust they will find the earth, or wings wherewithal to leave
it.How good a thing it is, in all our doubt and uncertainty,
that we have an oracle to which we can appeal, I mean the
Gospels. In the wreck of so much that is excellent, why have
they not perished also? When the Persians destroyed the
Temples of Greece, they did not dare touch that of the Isle of
Delos, it was so sacred. Has the extreme value of these books
saved them from pillage? Therein, through the vices of men
let me discern their virtues.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
Our Sabbaths are delightful days; they always were to me;
because I did not have to go to Meeting; now, because I do
go. They were ever, liberty, rest and recreation to me, now
they bring a higher spiritual enjoyment. We go to Church,
forenoon and afternoon, and sometimes dine in the Village, at
Frank's, or elsewhere. In Summer we walk, in Winter ride.
We all go, Pa, Ma, Hash and Nimrod, with their families, and
whoever is living with us. There is a
mellowness
about the
sky and air, that day; which is all the difference I perceive.
People tell me what a drearily solemn day, it used to be to
them. It was a despit pinched up sort of a time, said Mrs.
Whiston to me awhile since, as if God was asleep and we had
to go tip-toe all day, and couldn't speak above our breath for
fear of waking him. We all carry flowers to Church, not
quite so extravagant a bunch as I once got a rebuke for. The
death of Deacon Hadlock, and the infirmities of Parson Welles,
have quite thinned off the old society, and Christ-Church
includes
almost the whole town. Indeed, the old Parson
himself
,
with such of his flock as chose to accompany him, was at
our Church, a few Sabbaths since. Zenas Joy is our chorister,
and Dorothy Tapley, who has fine musical powers, plays the
organ. One half of the hymns are sung by the whole
congregation
;
this, Deacon Ramsdill says, is as it used to be, and so
the old folks are pleased, and the young ones too. The Feast
of the Lord's Supper occurs every month. Our Communion
days are so Christ-giving, so abounding in what some are wont
to call soul-food, so contributory to the Divine Atonement,
they seem almost the best days. We all eat that bread and
drink that wine whereby we mean to show the Lord's death
until he come; that is, as our Bishop says, until Christ
perfectly
comes in our souls, and over the earth. The children
many of them are Communicants; the excellent teaching they
have in the Sunday school, prepares them for this higher
Church order. At noon, the people go into the Cemetery, and
eat their dinner on the seats near the Brook Kedron. At night,
scores and sometimes hundreds come to Mons Christi, visit the
Cross, walk about our grounds; sometimes they come into our
drawing-room, where we have religious conversation, and sing
hymns. How much there is in the religion of Christ to talk
about, and
I
have become sanctiloquent as any of them. That
word Love, of which St. John says, he who has it dwells in
God and God in him, how much there is in it! It has already
given us a new Heaven and a new Earth, and goes on creating
stars, nebulae and milky ways, without number. It would
astonish
you, Anna, to hear some whom you would consider most
jejune
and sterile, talk. The graces of the Spirit, joy, love,
peace, goodness, &c., have thrown up tropical islands in these
wastes of brine. I shall have many things to tell you, more
than I can write.Last Sunday, Obed brought his child to
be baptized. It received the name Bartholomew Elliman!
The Master and the Widow, I understand, have made peace,
or suspended hostilities. The Master promised an annuity to
the child if it might be named from him. Frankly, Anna, I
must confess, the Widow is the most purely selfish woman I
ever heard of. Some would get drunk, some were bigots,
some fanatics, some intolerant, but all had a spice of honesty
at the bottom. But she is a hypocrite to the core. She has
given me some trouble, and done me some good, perhaps; for
which all thanks. An ambitious avarice has been her ruling
passion. Will you believe it, the day of the Erection of the
Cross, when we were having the sacrament in the woods, she
was there, so they say, with her pockets filled with her
Nommernisstortumbug
,
which she endeavored to truck among the
people. Nimrod never could endure her; he always said she
followed Church-going the same as black-birds do the
plough, to pick up the worms. Our Bishop has had a sober
talk with her, as every good Christian should do. And this
admonishes me, that I perhaps am somewhat at fault in what I
say. I have dealt too roundly with her. Words do so cover
the whole field of our vision while the object shall go half naked.
He says she has some incorrupt nature, that she is not
wholly
dead in the old Adam, sin: and declares that Christ may yet
make her live. He says, Christ and the Gospels are sufficient
to destroy any amount, and any inveteracy of evil, in the heart.
If the Leech can be touched, we must all believe so too. The
Bishop says the Gospel must find something in our natures
similar to itself
before it can have effect; that roots feel
feel their way into the earth in search of nutriment,
homogeneous
and corresponding, each root for itself, that of wheat for one
substance, and that of sorrel for another; so he says the Gospel
feels its way in the human heart. As music addresses and
develops
the musical sentiment, so Evangelical love and truth address
and develop the sentiment of love and truth. In this way he
acts; he gains access to the heart, makes sure that the floor
will hold him, then commences an onslaught on the unclean
spirits, drives them out, with old Adam at their head; brushes
away the dust and cobwebs of meanness; opens the shutters,
and lets in the light of God, and the clear shining of the Sun
of Righteousness. Such are many of the wonders God hath
wrought by him in Livingston! Can he succeed with the
Widow? In all countries moss grows, the ice-bolstered rocks
of the Arctic are green and soft with it. There the
merganser
spends its summer, the snowbird rears its young, and
our own robin sings. Shall we despair then of these
temperate
regions? The Master says Whitfield did more to
puppetize and dehumanize New Englanders than any other
man; that he seized upon the idea of total depravity and
sowed it broad cast in the Churches; and that Parson Welles,
while he agreed with him in doctrine, was so averse from his
measures, that he would never have him in Livingston. This
for your private benefit, Anna. You ask many questions
about matters and things, and I can only return you such
answers as I am able to pick up. Address your next inquiries
to Mr. Evelyn; he will give you more satisfaction. When
our troops went to the attack of Louisburg, Whitfield gave
them this motto, Nil desperandum, Christo Duce; an
admirable
one for our own flag.I am forgetting, like many
other sinners, the Sabbath. It is the Lord's Day to us; in the
most exalted sense, it is Christ's own day. All days are holy,
this seems to be the cream of the week. On the spiritual
river where we would ever sail, the Sabbath opens into clearer
water, a broader bay; and we can rest on our oars to get a
distincter view of the blue heavenly hills whither we tend.
Is it not a good thing, this hebdomadal renovation of skin and
clothes? You know the old saw; Cleanliness is next to
Godliness. Our Bishop preaches on cleanliness, carnal and
spiritual; and if it be a true sign, I think you would count us
a very godly people. Houses, rooms, yards, fences, streets, as
well as persons, in all parts of the town, look wonderfully
clean, neat, tidy; No. 4 would grace Hyde Park. You would
also see, on the Sabbath conspicuously, greater simplicity in
dress; there is taste and some ornament; but gaudy
apparel
,
has almost entirely disappeared, as unbecoming those
who profess Godliness. That transition in fashion with
which a foreign connection so afflicts your city, is here neither
frequent nor abrupt. In an intermixture of styles from one
season to another, the variety is not sufficiently marked to
prevent our wearing out the old without disquiet, or adopting
the new at our convenience.
The other night at a party at our house, Deacon Bowker
danced with Miss Amy, I should say Mrs. Elliman; a thing
she has not done this two score years. Col. Welch said he
was falling into his second childhood by renewing his youth,
sooner than he anticipated. A dance on cold water he
pronounced
strange, but excellent. Deacon Ramsdill declared
he should live an hundred years. It's sheer nater, said he,
it is just like soap, the longer you keep it, the better it
grows. If Chilion could only play for us! William Beach
proves a first rate violinist, so does Abiah Tapley.
We make much of music, and it does well by us. I wish
to see unfolded and embodied the entire musical capability of
the town. We have an instrumental company called The
Chilion Band. They play on the Green, Summer evenings,
and in the Cemetery; they have gone to Breakneck,
Snakehill
and all parts of the town. They frequently come to Mons
Christi, play in our groves, and on the Head. The effect of
this last is indescribable. It reaches the village, and the
inspiring melodies, like morning light, irradiate over wood,
valley and mountain. Mr. Evelyn has written some Christian
Hymns, very beautiful, and combining some lyric fire. These
hymns you will hear in many a house, in the fields, and the
children sing them at school.
Our Schools are doing well. There were formerly but two
in town, we have now six. Hancock Welles, grandson of the
Parson, after he left College, was engaged for a permanent
teacher in the Grammar School, for which a new and
commodious
house was erected on the Green, in place of the one
that was burnt.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
We have digested and adopted a system of Christ-Church
Festivals. Mr. Evelyn observed the extent and influence of
these things in the Old World, and, after due sortings and
siftings, we thought something of the kind might be produced
in the New. The idea, he says, is a good one, but the
manner
in which the thing has been managed is open to
reprehension
.
Festivals, he says, have been instituted by Kings and
Popes, for Machiavellian purposes, or any other than Christian
or human; that they have never been the offspring of a free
and enlightened mind, but either the enforcements of arbitrary
power, or the expedients of priestly art. Christ-Church
Festivals
have at least this merit; the people were cognizant of
their incipiency, assisted in each step of their progress, and
36
gave their suffrages to the entire plan. Ecclesiastical
Holidays
,
Mr. Evelyn says, are also open to exception in their
subjects
.
Why should we observe the Purification of the Virgin
Mary, St. Michael's Day, or Ash-Wednesday? Or why,
neglecting more affecting and spiritual events, should we make
use of the Circumcision of Christ? We cannot, of course,
with the English Church, keep the Gunpowder Plot and King
Charles's Martyrdom. Our Festivals are twelve in number, one
for each month of the year. Three of them are such as have
already become national or at least New England, the Spring
Fast, Independence and the Autumnal Thanksgiving; three
more are founded on the Beatitudes, and are named as follows,
the Festival of the Poor in Spirit, that of the Peacemakers,
and of the Pure in Heart. There is the Festival of Charity,
or Christian Love, from I Cor. xiii. Then from the life of
Christ, are Christmas, drawn from his birth, etc. Childmas,
which refers to his holy Boyhood and Youth; the Festival of
the Crucifixion, which comprises his strong crying and tears
in the flesh, his temptation, his bearing his Cross, his agony
in the garden and his death; that of the Resurrection, which
includes his transfiguration, his spiritual anastasis, his being
the Life of the soul, and his rising from the dead. Then we
have the Festival of the Universal Brotherhood, taken from
Christ's interview with the Samaritan woman, and the
declaration
of Paul, that in Christ all are one. We have also twelve
other Festivals in the monthly recurrence of the Holy
Communion
.
Our Bishop has also prepared a system of Sabbaths,
which he pursues with tolerable regularity. He has given us,
Baptismal Sunday, founded on Christ's Baptism; Children's
Sunday,his blessing the little children; Unity Sunday;
Atonement
Sundaythat they may be one in us; Regeneration
Sundayexcept a man be born again; Repentance Sunday,
etc. etc.
Christmas, if you please, leads the signs in our evangelical
Circle, is the beginning of the Christian year; this falls in
September; the Pure in Heart, in October; Thanksgiving in
November; the Festival of the Universal Brotherhood, which
also includes All Saints, is given to December. In January is
the Peacemakers, when we decorate the Church with
evergreens
,
have the Lion and Lamb symbolized, and make our
endeavors for private and universal Peace. We seek
forgiveness
and proffer restitution. To February, the Poor in Spirit
is assigned; the Crucifixion to March; and in April is Fast.
May gives us Childmas, which is peculiarly for the children;
June, the Festival of Love; July, Independence, social,
political
,
mental, moral, religious; this is also the Anniversary of
the Erection of the Cross. The year closes in August, with
the Resurrection.
The time of Christmas was changed for the following
reasons
;that
the month and season of our Saviour's birth are
not known; that the 25th of December, the Calendar day, is
of Gentile origin, which indeed were not an insuperable
objection
,
provided it were recommended by any intrinsic
propriety
.
But this is not the case. The Festival to which that
day refers, obtaining among Northern nations, is only adapted
to a Northern latitude. The sun's annual return, which they
were wont to celebrate, gave them a cause of gratulation, at
the expense of their trans-equatorial brethren, who at the same
moment are mourning its withdrawal. Such an arrangement
would not be cosmopolitan and universal enough for
ChristChurch
.
Therefore we selected an equinoctial point when it
shines with the same strength on all portions of the globe.
So far as Livingston is concerned, there were few or no
preexisting
Ecclesiastical prejudices to be affected, and the people
were at full liberty to select what time they chose. This
Festival
with us is not taken up solely with the Birth of Christ, it
contemplates in addition his Second Coming, i. e. his spiritual
revelation in the hearts and lives of his disciples. So looking
both backward and forward, it may well occupy some central
point.
On most of our Festivals, there is a short religious exercise
in the Church. The Poor in Spirit is a season of sober
introspection
,
humility and prayer. The Crucifixion has for its
objects to effect within us a crucification to the world and of the
world to us. We become truly partakers of the sufferings of
Christ, his temptation, his reproach, his cross-bearing, his
dying. Childmas, in May, gives several holidays to the
children
.
They have a May-pole, May-dances, and a Queen of
May. They go into the woods for evergreens and flowers.
In the evening the Band play for them, and they dance with
their parents on the Green. You will see them, going down,
in the morning, from Breakneck and Snakehill, blithe as the
birds about them; the girls dressed in white, and the boys in
blue-checked linen. This Festival is also devoted by the
people at large to ornamenting the streets, replenishing the
flowers of the Cemetery, and planting shrubbery about their
houses. Independence day, the 4th of July, we have an Oration,
a rural dinner and a dance in the evening at the Masonic
Hall. This is a superb room, over the Town House, which
the Masons have freely relinquished to our use whenever we
want it. They always unite with us in keeping this Festival.
The Resurrection, in August, seeks to realize for us that
spiritual resurrection from sin which St. Paul strove to attain,
and which Christ so perfectly enjoyed. It also looks to the
final elimination of the spirit from the body. The Festival of
Love in June would advance us in that love which thinketh
no evil, beareth all things, is the bond of perfection, the seal
of our being born of God, and fulfils the law. The Pure in
Heart among other things, is devoted to a general School
visitation
.
The School-houses are filled with parents and friends;
the scholars examined, and addresses made. The election of
the May Queen is made to turn somewhat on these
examinations
.
She who received the crown this year was Delinda,
daughter of Zenas Joy. Peacemaker's, coming the first of
January, is supplied with whatever of interest attaches to that
day. Thanksgiving is observed agreeably to immemorial New
England usages, bating the Turkey-shoot at No. 4, and
Horseracing
,
which are abolished; and the Ball at Mr. Smith's has
been supplanted by a general dance at the Masonic Hall.
Our Festivals are not put by for Sunday, but when they fall
on that day, which not infrequently happens, the Bishop
prepares
discourses accordingly. Thus is the whole year
interwoven
and girded about by our beautiful Festivals; some of
them exceedingly joyous and gay, others more sedate and
reflective
.
What Herbert says of them I dare not;
Who loves not you, doth in vain profess
That he loves God, or Heaven, or Happiness.
Yet we do love them, and that,
because
we love God, and
Christ and Happiness.
The sectaries have sought to introduce themselves among
us. Our Bishop freely offered them his pulpit, but they refused
to occupy it; he has proposed exchanges, but those they
declined. They would not join in our Communion, although
the emblems are tendered to all who love the Lord Jesus
Christ. They kept aloof from our festivals. We have all
been baptized, and nearly two hundred the Bishop has
immersed
.
What could they want! They came, nearly forty
of them, preachers and all, from Dunwich, one night, to
Snakehill. The superintendent of the Schools in that
District had orders to open the School-house to them.
Our Bishop, Mr. Evelyn, Deacon Bowker and several went
up; the room was full. Our Bishop said we should be glad
to hear anything they had to say, and hoped they would
express
themselves freely. One began to say something, but he
appeared embarrassed and stopped. Then one of their leaders
fell upon his knees, and said, Let us pray, and pray he
did, nearly half an hour, and with a most stentorian voice.
Such a prayer may it never be my lot to hear again! He
argued with us, philippized us, denounced us, and as Nimrod
said, whipped us over God Almighty's back! Has the
Prince of Puppetdom in reserve a more horrid piece of
drollery
?
Deacon Whiston could not contain himself; like
Elijah of old he mocked them, and said, Cry aloud, for he is
a god; either he is deaf, or is talking, or is on a journey.
There is no voice, nor any that answereth, added our
Bishop. The effect was irresistible. The meeting was
broken up, and those most misguided people mounted their
horses and made all haste to depart. They would convert us,
from what? Christ himself! To what, in the name of all
that is good? To John Wesley, or John Calvin! They
would save our souls. These are already saved, or at least
Christ is doing that work for us hour by hour. They have
been in various parts of the town endeavoring to ply the
ridiculous enginery of God's wrath and eternal damnation.
They are eighteen hundred years behind the age, our
Christian
age at least. As Nimrod says, they are barking up the
wrong tree. I have no grudge against these people. Some
of them have excellent private qualities. Whatever there is
of the Christian in them I like, and there we and they agree,
and that ought to be a common foundation broad enough for
us all to stand upon. But the Ism is the difficulty. This
governs their action, this they would thrust upon us. Their
Ismaticalness conceals and extrudes the Christian. We meet
them as Christians, they meet us as Ismatics. It is Christ
versus
Isms. Which shall prevail?
Lycurgus forbade the entrance of strangers into Laconia,
and the departure of his subjects. He was afraid of
contamination
.
The gates of Livingston are ever open, come in, go
out, who will. The Lord encampeth round about them that
fear him, was our Bishop's text last Sunday. We have thus
far been delivered from serious evil. We are not afraid of the
world, only the world must expect to get most condignly
meal-powdered
,
if it undertakes mischief against us. We have, in
Livingston, nine hundred members of Christ-Church, bold
36*
hearts, true hearts, completely clad in the armor of God, ready
for any battles of the Lord; and equally ready to die at the
stake, if needs be. If the Lord were pleased to kill us, he
would not have received a burnt-offering at our hands, and
showed us all these things, our Bishop says. Cursed cows
have short horns, Deacon Ramsdill says. And plantain
thrives best when it is most trod upon, that I know. Pray
for us that we may be able to go safely through all fiery trials.
It is related that the Cyclops for their savageness and
cruelty were condemned to Tartarus; but that Tellus, the
Goddess of the Earth, persuaded Jupiter it would be for his
interest to employ them in forging thunder-bolts, and other
instruments of terror with a frightful and continual din of the
anvil. When I call to mind certain kinds of preaching I
remember to have heard, and which I am told everywhere
abound, I reflect that Christ banished all such things from his
kingdom; but the gods of this lower world have persuaded
themselves it would be for the interest of the Supreme to have
these Cyclops recalled, and our pulpits are full of their din!
Where, alas! where is the sweet, gentle, loving voice of
Jesus, a voice that would not lift itself up, nor cry, but did
sometimes weep!
The Preacher, he whom I first heard in the woods some
years ago, acts singularly. He hovered about Livingston,
peeping in upon us, and then running away. He said he
believed
the Latter Days were come; then he hid himself in the
woods, and nobody heard from him for a long time. At last
he came to the village, is now an attentive waiter on our
Bishop's ministrations, and says he is resolved to become a
Missionary, and disseminate the principles of Christ-Church in
the world.
We have had various sorts of people among us within two
or three years, and with an equal variety of motives;
Congregationalists
,
Presbyterians, Episcopalians, Catholics, Armenians,
Russians, Greeks, Jews, Mohammedans, Hindoos. The latter
were foreigners, gentlemen travelling the world in pursuit of
knowledge. We had most of them at our house. What
should happen one Sunday, but a venerable Presbyterian
Doctor of Divinity, a Jew, and the Mohammedan, should set
in the same pew in Christ-Church, and as it was Communion
day, they all partook of the Sacrament together, and after
service
,
came to Mons Christi in company! The Doctor
remarked
he had always preached faith in Christ, and the
regeneration of our natures, but I declare, said he, I
never understood these things before, or saw them so happily
exemplified. The Jew said, laughing, if it were not for our
pig-pen, he believed he should be a Christian. The
Mohammedan
published an account of his travels, and from Teheran
in Persia, I received a copy done in Arabic. We taxed our
wits, and at the same time gratified our vanities, in translating
it. The chapter on Livingston would amuse you. The
author has even given a description of me! This is a
precious
tidbit, and I shall not endanger it by committing it to
the post-rider. You shall see it, when
you
visit us. One of
the Hindoosthere were two of them in company, and
Brahmins
,
I believesaid he would leave with us words from their
sacred books; as follows. Truth, contentment, patience,
mercy, belong to great minds. A man of excellent
qualities
is like a flower, which whether found among weeds, or
worn on the head, still preserves its fragrance. An Episcopal
Bishop was here, and he said that sooner than deny the
Apostolic
authority of our Bishop, he would forego his own. He
said this to us, but whether he wished it to go abroad to the
world, is more than I know. Such are some of the pleasant
records of visits we have had. That other things of a very
different nature have been said and done, I cannot deny. But
I should tire you by reporting all the evil there is in the world,
or the want of love which many betray, who come here.
Father, forgive them, they know not what they do! What
a prayer was that! Let us aspire to it.
Here is another affair for you. One day there came to our
house a gentleman with a letter from his Holiness Pope Pius
VII, addressed to us as his dear children, and recommending
to us the bearer, and his objects. The bearer was a Roman
Cardinal, and his objects thus appeared. He said the Pope
had learned that we had erected the Cross, and that he hoped
to find us obedient children of the Holy Catholic Church.
We told him that we belonged to that Church. He said he
hoped to effect our affiliation with the
Roman
Catholic Church.
We told him that we fellowshipped all churches in which was
the spirit of Christ, and that so far as the Roman Church
possessed
that, we were happy to belong to it. He then said
something about allegiance. What, said Mr. Evelyn, to
Pope Pius? Not exactly that, replied the gentleman.
To the Council of Trent? persisted Mr. Evelyn. I
perceive
I have made a mistake, said the gentleman, and
making
a very polite apology started to leave. Give our sincere
respects to the Pope, said Mr. Evelyn, tell him we pay him
the allegiance due to him, that contained in the Apostolic
direction, to honor all men. If he should come this way we
hope he will give us a call. The Cardinal had not reached
the door when an Armenian Prelate was announced from
Syria. He said he had understood we were Monophysites,
and came to see if we were not a lost branch of their Church
established in this country centuries ago. While he was yet
speaking a Patriarch of the Greek Church came in. He said
he had been told we denied the Procession of the Holy Ghost
from the Son, and hoped to find us identified with his order.
Presently we had them all three seated and pleasantly talking
together. We sent for our Bishop, and they all dined with us.
The Greek made the sign of the cross with three fingers, the
Armenian with two, and the Catholic with his hand
indiscriminately
.
We took them in our carriage to the village and
about the town. They passed the night at our house. We
had other friends with us, and could not give them each a
room; and the Roman Cardinal and Greek Patriarch slept in
the same bed; an event, Mr. Evelyn said, that had probably
not happened since the year 1054, when Pope Leo X. and the
Patriarch Cerularius excommunicated each other. At our
devotions in the morning, the Greek read the hymn, the
Armenian read the Scripture, and the Catholic made the
prayer. They left us, and we have heard nothing from them
since. I hope, when these gentlemen reach home, they will
not suffer, as did that Timagorus; who, sent on an embassy to
Persia, for conforming to some of the usages of that Court,
on his return, was put to death by the Athenians, who thought
the dignity of their city compromised by his conduct.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
We have had a more considerable alarm, the causes and
course of which I will speak of. Livingston you know has
been the subject of public remark, and perhaps some scandal.
The conduct of our people in military matters has gone
abroad to their prejudice; in addition, Judge Morgridge has
been accused of remissness in duty; it was said that he had
not sent so many convicts to the State Prison as formerly, and
that he shortened the term of such as were committed to the
Jail. It was intimated that we had rendered ourselves
obnoxious
to Legislative severity, and some punitive action on the
part of the government was apprehended. A memorial to the
General Court was got up, and signed by nearly a thousand of
our people, men, women and children, setting forth our
condition
and most earnest wishes. Deacon Bowker was our
representative at the time; he read the memorial, but added
nothing, only took his seat, and as he said, prayed God to aid
the issue. The Legislature, in a manner that does credit
equally to their prudence and humanity, ordered an
investigation
of the case; and a Committee was raised to visit
Livingston
,
and report at the next session. Two gentlemen with
plenipotentiary powers of inspection came amongst us. They
were here frequently, and in fact spent several weeks of the
year on their object. We sought neither to meal-powder nor
gold-blind them, but showed them the civilities due to all, and
maintained the uniformity due to ourselves. They tell the
story of a young painter, who being very poor, was reduced to
the necessity of converting one of his pictures into lining for
his jacket; and thus exposed his genius by wearing it on his
back. Livingston wears its virtues on its backand in its
heart toowhere they can be seen at a glance:but to our
history. The Committee made up their report, which having
been printed swells into a large pamphlet. I will give you a
syllabus of it. They say our roads are in fine order, in fact
none are better in the State; that the whole town has a striking
aspect of neatness and thrift; that during all the time of their
visit they saw not one drunken man, while in most towns such
characters appeared without looking for them; that the
consumption
of intoxicating drinks has diminished from six or
eight thousand gallons annually to a few scores; that the
amount paid for schools has risen from three or four hundred
dollars to two thousand; that all taxes laid by the State and
County have been promptly paid; that our poor have lessened
three quarters; they say also, that the value of real estate in
Livingston has advanced twenty per cent., and that wholly
exclusive
of the improvements on Mons Christi; and that the
mania for removing to the West, which prevails all over New
England, has here subsided. On the charges preferred against
Judge Morgridge, so far as his connection with this town and
vicinity are concerned, they report in the first place that fewer
criminal actions have been brought before him than formerly,
and those of a less malefic nature; and that the number of
prisoners in the Jail has fallen from forty or fifty to eight or
ten, and only one of these belonged to Livingston. They next
inquire if these facts are to be attributed to the official
negligence
of the Judge, or to the actual decrease of crime. On
this point, which is elaborated with considerable care, thanks
to those gentlemen, I will give you the results of their
observation
.
They say that during the last four years since the
enlargement of the Jail, the addition to the comfort of the
inmates, and the practice we have of visiting them frequently,
and attending to their moral condition, the
recommitments
have
almost entirely ceased; whereas in former times these
constituted
nearly one half of the subjects of prosecution; and
they consent that our mode tends really to reform the prisoner,
and restore him a useful citizen to the State; and they say
they see not cause for censuring the Judge who sends convicts
rather to the Jail, where their morals and manners are
amended, than to the State Prison where the reverse is wont
to befall. The Committee came evidently possessed with the
suspicion, which some have taken the pains to create in the
public mind, that we shielded our criminals, and snatched
them from public justice. They say they have canvassed the
whole town, explored by-places, gone into private dwellings,
watched about taverns, traversed the streets by night, and
cannot find any criminals;
that the people appear to be
industrious
,
time-saving, minders-of-their-own-business, and free
from the ordinary tokens of guilt. They speak also of the
absence of petty offences, which exist almost everywhere; and
we could tell them once flourished here, such as unhinging
gates, hanging cart-wheels on trees, plundering gardens and
hen-roosts, shearing horses, etc. etc. They add, pleasantly
enough, that, while they have been in a hundred houses, at all
hours of the day, they have not heard a woman speak scandal,
or scold her children. They remark that a petition for
divorce
from Hopestill Cutts and his wife, formerly pending
before the Legislature, has been withdrawn; and here, as all
along, apprehensive of some collusion, they declare they made
such an investigation as perfectly satisfied them these people
were living in harmony and love.
Regarding the nature and extent of the penalty, they say
Judge Morgridge has generally adopted the minimum point of
the law, which he thinks has proved itself to be adequate both
for the protection of the community and the punishment of
the offender. They report a visit to the Jail, where, they say,
they found what appeared to be a radical change going on in
the minds and hearts of the convicts. The fact that none are
recommitted indicates, they say, that the accommodations of
the Prison do not offer a premium on crime. Another
circumstance
which demonstrates to their minds the actual
cessation
of offences, is the abolition of the use of intoxicating
drinks. The able-bodied poor, who used to waste their time
and aggravate their indolence by liquors, they found soberly
working, and wisely economizing. Our merchants also told
them the people traded as liberally and paid more punctually
than ever, and that they had less occasion for prosecutions.
Thus, in various ways, the Committee profess themselves
satisfied
that there is a diminution both in the causes and the sum
of criminality; and they report a resolve which entirely
exonerates
the Judge from the charge of infidelity to the laws, and
carelessness of the good of the state.
As regards military drills, our people made a solemn exhibit
to the Committee of what formerly existed here, the intoxication,
profanity, gambling, horse-racing, brawling, dissipation of time,
wreck of morals, etc. the offsprings of those occasions; and
furthermore, they protested, that, as members of Christ-Church,
as Christians, as believers in the Gospel, they could not
conscientiously
engage in taking, or preparing to take, the lives of
their fellow-beings, in premeditated battle. I lost my all in
one war, said Captain Tuck, and am prepared to do the
same in another. Take our property, consign us to dungeons,
load us with chains, but do not compel us to violate our
consciences
.
I am under orders from Lord God Almighty, Jesus
Christ is my Commander-in-Chief, in their service I shall
deem it my highest honor to live, or to die. Our people
affirmed, in addition, that the military expenses of the town,
taking the matter in all ways, had not been less than one
thousand dollars a-year; some said two thousand; and that
they needed the money for other purposes. They added that
they were willing to pay such taxes as the government imposed,
and they only sought the ability to pay. These facts the
Committee
reported without comment. They were present at
several of our Festivals, at Christ-Church on the Sabbath, at
our Town Meetings, and dances, and expressed a general
satisfaction
in what they saw.
And now what is the good news I have to tell you?this,
that in the ultimate decision of the Legislature, it was voted,
nearly unanimously, by both houses, that Judge Morgridge
should not be disturbed in his office, and that the Town of
Livingston should be exempt from all Military duty! It was the
Summer Session, when the resolve was finally passed, and
Deacon Bowker arrived with the glad intelligence
Independence
day; our fears took flight in raptures, and our ordinary
good cheer creamed like a tankard of beer. Master Elliman's
toast was quite characteristic; Our Legislature, a convert
from Thomas Aquinas to Duns Scotus.
There has been a multiplication of travel hither, the influx
of strangers is incessant and great. One advantage the people
say they begin to realize from their mode of life; that is
money. Mr. Stillwater says his tavern profits exceed by far
those of other years. The people generally speak of increased
sales, on this score. Many orchards, formerly miserable
rumlots
,
have been converted into productive fruiteries. We have
imported grafts, and new seed, and now they raise choice
apples, pears and peaches, that find a ready market anywhere.
Some of the people, who cannot confine themselves wholly to
cold water, make cider, by an improved process, which Mr.
Evelyn says is equal to the purest wines of France. Dr.
Johnson
tells a story of Steele to this effect. The essayist having
one day invited to his house several persons of quality, they
were surprised at the number of liveries that surrounded the
table. One of the guests inquired of Steele how such a train
of domestics could be consistent with his fortune, for he was
known to be poor. He frankly confessed they were fellows of
whom he would very willingly be rid; and being asked why
he did not discharge them, declared they were bailiffs, who
had introduced themselves with an execution, and whom, since
he could not send them away, he had found it convenient to
embellish with liveries, that they might do him credit while
they did stay. How much of the equipage, the appointments,
the furniture, the dress, of the world, is a sort of liveried
bailiff, who as soon as the feast is over will take every thing
from you! Whatever decorations Livingstonians exhibit, are
their own, their debts are paid. Mr. Evelyn has accomplished
a good deal with the somewhat rugged soil of Mons Christi.
Last year he sold, in New York, four hundred bushels of apples,
at an average of seventy five cents per bushel. He raised
also six hundred bushels of rye, corn and oats, potatoes and
other things as many as we want. We have six cows, and
such cream, and butter, and cheese, did you ever taste better?
Our sheep, hogs, turkeys, ducks, hens, are innumerable. In
the Saw-mill, at the Outlet, we have put a run of stone, and
grind our own grain. The Notch through the hill from the
Via Salutaris to the Outlet is now a fine road, and a fine
drive; and that wild and superb scenery back of the highlands
is accessible to all. Balboa, he that discovered the Pacific
Ocean, when he came in sight of it, fell on his knees and
thanked God; then plunging into the water up to his waist,
with his sword and buckler, took possession of it in the name
of his sovereign. We have just reached the edge of this
illimitable
,
whale-bearing, sky-cleaving Nature; with hoe and axe,
microscope and alembic, love and health, we take possession of
it, in the name of God and Christ, amen. The Chinese carry
their gardens and rice-fields to the tops of their mountains.
What may yet become of New England! The Indians
indeed
are gone; what do we in their stead? This suggests to
me that the remains of Pakanawket and his grandchild, after
reposing so long in the depths of the Pond, at last rose to the
surface. We had them buried in the woods which he pointed
out as the home of his grandfather; and over them we put an
antique monument of red sand-stone, on which are sculptured
their effigies in the style of the Middle Ages. In the darkest
woods they lie, but their shrine has as many visitors as that of
Thomas a Becket. What more, what better could we do?
MR. EVELYN TO ANNA.
From the tone of your letters, I gather that Margaret, in
what she writes you, treats of her own agency in these matters
Livingstonian, in a manner somewhat obscure. I shall take
the liberty to elucidate this point briefly. I do not intend to
overtax her modesty, or involve her singleness of heart, beyond
what is meet; but in truth I must declare, the first person in
her letters would be more fitting and exact, than any second;
it is she herself, and not we, who is, under God, and in Christ,
the soul of all that which we now behold. This may be as
frankly avowed, as it is sincerely felt. Nor do I fear inducing
a dispute with my dear wife, by saying as much. She knows
that I know it, and if she has not confidence enough in herself
to confess the fact, she has in me to yield to it. If she has not
a consciousness of her own strength, it is because it is so
absolutely
and plenarily great that she lacks the contentions and
annoyances of weakness which reveal to most of us the little
strength we do possess. Wherein she is conscious of her
strength, she so expends it in action as to leave no carking and
petted residuum to trouble her with. Her self-consciousness
is not, what we sometimes behold, a crying infant, but a
grown-up
sister; it resides quite as much with her industry as in her
heart, and she is not obliged to quit her work and rock the
cradle of herself. She thus escapes a morbid tendency on the
one hand, and a heedless one on the other; she can be
self-forgetful
and self-moved; she can love and she can labor.
37
She will not charge me with any adroit humility that seeks to
hide itself under her laurels. You have known me, Anna,
that I had some
vis
in my composition, but of that kind which
the books call
mortua
, more than the description
viva;
in
other words, that I was sluggish and lazy. I saw, and thought,
and speculated enough, I attained many correct conclusions;
but I never
did
anything. When I left College, I soon
convinced
myself, that like many other rare geniuses, I was
doomed
to be the victim of circumstances. I was not
poverty-stricken
,
but man-stricken. The forms and the spirit of error
and evil had distorted the face of the globe; but why should
I attempt to remove mountains, or change the bed of rivers?
Let me travel over the one, and sail on the other. I would
not perish where so many of my kith and kin had come to
their end, that is to say in contention. I essayed poetry, but
soon learned, that I had not only to make verses, but remodel
the standards of taste; that if I would succeed, I must first
put all the critics to death, as the Emperor Hadrian did
Apollodorus
,
for blaming the proportions of a Temple he had
erected
.
Of the Professions, Theology I could not, Law and
Medicine
I would not; and then, as a last resort, I concluded to
fall in love with a very pretty, and very poor girl, here in
Livingston
.
I knew I could
live
with her, whereas I must die in
all the world besides. Well for me that I had sense enough to
understand her, or heart enough to love her. I could always
philosophize, but lacked the energy of execution. In place
of hastening the better day, I was disposed to yield most
implicit
obedience to that direction of the Apostle, Wait until
the Lord come. Margaret's energy has inspired all my
capabilities
,
and given motion to my will. But more than this,
for example, I could sit with Phidias in his studio, and out of
ideal gold and ivory make a Jupiter, with all suitable
enrichments
.
She takes the veritable materials, and the statue
is done. Thus is our whole history; I have been able to
impart
a certain fanciful existence to Ideality; she perpetually
reduces the same to the Actual. Nor does she seem to study
her plan, with most artists, and then go to work; she goes to
work, and the plan and the result are both before you. She
seems to be only embodying herself in what is about her, her
profuse and impulsive being creates life in all things, her own
going forth is the signal for the appearance of Beauty and
Virtue
;
she translates Nature to Man; and Man to himself. I
talk like a doting husband, but this is what I am, and what
she has made me. She was reared on bread and cider, and
bean porridge; she slept in a cold chamber, she hardened her
constitution among snow-banks; her mind, never overloaded,
was always occupied; her nature would neither endure, nor
did it ever receive, the fetters of fashion, conventionality,
dog-ma
,
or world-fear. Without education, in the common sense
of the term, her faculties were matured; without instruction,
she was wise; and having never heard of Mr. Nash, she was
graceful and polite. Christianity she was unembarrassed to
receive, and in that alone has she found a master. For this
indeed she was somewhat prepared by her night-visions; but
when it came, it overpowered and aggrandized her. I never
could have imagined so perfect an incarnation of Christ, as she
is; and that without parting with any of her proper
individuality
.
She drinks in Christ as the oaks do the dews, to
replenish
herself in greater proportion and beauty thereby. The
Bread from Heaven, designed for the aliment, development,
and ripening of all souls, she feeds daily upon. I know not
that she is a Philosopher, save that she acts philosophically. Our
Philosophers, for the most part, by an industrious collation of
many facts, like travellers with heavy packs on their shoulders,
fare slowly up the hill of their conclusions. On a few facts
her conclusions rest; one fact stands with her for many facts,
and this from a certain comprehensive and nice power of
analogy
she possesses. That law by which all facts in the physical,
moral and religious world gravitate towards a common centre,
and coalesce in one, she has an intuitive perception of. Or
rather the soul of all things, the Truth and Love, of which
facts are but the signs, she understands by the correspondence
of her own soul therewith. Hence is her logic rapid, and
correct
,
and her action perfect and sure. She is perhaps more
Philosophy than a Philosopher; and if, as has been observed,
History be Philosophy teaching by example, Nature is
Margaret
teaching by practice. She also possesses much of the
Universal Heart; a variety of hearts enter into the ingredients of
hers. Hence, occupying the stand-point of the many, her sight
is extensive, her projects are feasible, and her success certain.
When I first saw her, she was more purely in a state of nature,
than any civilized person I ever encountered. To this, partly,
I attribute the power of the Gospel on her. Neither internal
sin nor external evil had deformed or diseased her, and she
was prepared, like a new-born babe, to breathe the atmosphere
of Christ the moment she came in contact with it, and to drink
the sincere milk of the word. I once wholly despaired of
seeing a Christian; she is one! I might say, I more than
despaired of fulfilling my ideal in myself; she has aided me to
do it! Christ pervades every corner and cranny of her being;
she is filled with the fullness of God. And yet she loves me,
with a most devout and child-like love. And yet? Why
should she not?In pursuing her objects in town, she is no
dry, hoarse-voiced, arrow-speeding, denunciatory, monomaniac;
she gushes up like a fountain, and having supplied her home,
has enough wherewithal to overflow, and run down the hill.
She is meek and lowly of heart in an uncommon degree.
Whatever manly qualities she exhibits, it is without
masculineness
,
and she is a woman, without effeminacy. She has no
bitterness of spirit; the only person in the world whom she
was disposed to view as thoroughly and hopelessly depraved,
was the Widow Wright; but I believe she has got the better
of that judgment. She has no blur in her own eye when she
would remove that of her brothers.
But of her connection with this Livingstonian
re-Christianization
I
say, she may report to you what
she
does, more than
what we do. This is a palpable truth. For instance, our
Festivals
;
I had witnessed their working in the Old World, I was
convinced of their utility; I could relate their history,
distinguish
their errors and defects;
while I was speaking on the
subject
, she had elaborated the system we now enjoy. Is it my
doings or hers? At the same time, standing as she does in
the common heart, corresponding with so many minds, it
seemed to emanate as much from the people as from herself.
The hierophancy that exists in all souls, needed only to be
awakened
,
to make every one a practical interpreter of Nature.
This, you will recollect, was after the extraneous habits and
factitious modes of the people had somewhat worn away, and
they were prepared to act on an original native sense of things.
How
this superincrustation, hardened by many years duration,
and even converted into the commonest uses of life, became
removed, would puzzle a greater philosopher than she thinks
I am, to tell. Its disappearance was gradual, and yet
perceptible
.
The Spirit of God entered into men's souls, and these
dead forms were uplifted, the oppressive bands were broken
asunder. Truth and Love, here as everywhere, like that
Nebuchadnezzarean tree, had their branches cut off, and its
leaves shaken off, but
the stump of the roots was in the earth
,
and needed but to be wet with the dew of Heaven, to shoot
forth in primeval, paradisian vigor and bloom. Humanity,
like a buried giant, heaved off its superincumbence, and rose
to life; Religion cast aside her Harlequin robes. Margaret
ever courted alliance with an imperishable Nature. The
sentiments
of Deacon Ramsdill, sound as they are homely, must
have assisted her. From breast to breast an electrical fire
spread itself. She subsidized all my strength, she drew your
brother into the field; and she had also a most serviceable
coadjutorship in many other wise and valiant men and women.
Her knowledge of human nature would strike you as very
great.
She
says Jesus Christ taught her this knowledge; that
since she has been a Christian, and a student of the gospels,
this intuition, or experience, has been singularly developed in
her. Our taking up our abode at Mons Christi was, on the
whole, her own suggestion; what we did for the No. 4's, and
particularly the setting up of the Statue, was for the most part
a plan of hers. A pink she once saw in one of their filthy
houses seemed to suggest the Statue; and a beautiful image
of Diligence she felt would carry a varied impression to the
hearts of those gross people, that should work their complete
reformation. And the result did not disappoint her. Many,
many things about our house, grounds, ways, and in the town
are purely her own inventions. All our superb statues are
chiefly hers. I would not applaud her at the expense of any
others. I shall not write myself altogether a puppet; your
brother has done a great work for us. He came with purposes
possibly not fully ripe, but with talents of the first order, and
a heart glowing with a Christ-like ambition. There is a host
besides of whom, if not the world, Livingston is worthy.
Of Margaret I was speaking. I have translated to her the
whole of the New Testament; and, she, I must concede,
understands
it better than I do. She has a most accurate
perception
of the general sense, she detects hidden springs of
beauty, she harmonizes varying passages and contradictory
language, she gathers what may be termed the
manner
of
Christ, his accents and emphases, his moods and feelings; she
is not constrained by those unnatural prominences which to
those of us who have been long accustomed to hear particular
topics discussed, and particular texts dwelt upon, occur
everywhere
in the Bible. A parable, a trope, an hyperbole, never
embarrasses her. There may be a reason for this, in the fact
that she understands Christ so well; she is, if I may so say,
so much in his vein. She goes deeper than the partial,
varying
human letter, even into the spirit of Jesus, and comes up
full of his meaning. Then, she brings to the Gospel so fresh
and pure a nature. Do the best I can, I still find myself
stumbling upon certain passages which have been detached
37*
from Scripture, inwrought into some human system, and
invested with a sense wholly remote from the original. She
has been troubled by no systems, and these passages, to her,
all melt down, and flow on in harmony with the great stream
of Gospel truth.
My dearest wife! I see her now on the Pond. She comes
from the Islands; and our little Gottfried is with her. Her
head is wreathed with evergreens, and the boy has a cincture
of the same. With featest stroke she drives forward her
canoe, firmly the child clutches the seat. Happy husband
and father of so good a wife, so good a child am I! Fresh
and warm is she in heart and complexion, as when I with her
first looked on these beautiful waters. Yearly does my love
for her increase, with every holy deed our souls are knitted
more closely together. She leaps upon the beach, she runs
along the grass, the little Gottfried chases his mother. I must
go and meet them, for I am made young and agile too. She
will bide what I have written; she never blushes at truth, but
only when I love her.
MARGARET TO ANNA.
From the same fountain flow tears and smiles! How
curiously
we are made. My cheeks tingle, my heart goes
pit-a-pat
.
Mr. Evelyn would not send off his letter without showing
it to me. All the world may speak well or ill of me; I take
it, as Nimrod says a horse does the bit, very coolly.
His
censure or approbation quite undoes me. What is he not to
me! When other things are so much, how much is he!
God, Christ, and Mr. Evelyn; the Infinite and the Finite, in
triune, golden chain encircle me, in one sweet heaven
embosom
me. Man is that wind-harp, through which the breath
of God sounds so softly, as in the thick pines. Mr. Evelyn
revealed Christ to me, Christ revealed God to him. Dear,
dear, thrice dear Mr. Evelyn. Does he not know how much
my strength is nourished from him, as well as from bean
porridge
?
He has not told you how I have watched him when
he was asleep; nor how I vibrate to his voice when he calls
me in the garden; nor how I wait upon his words, his
opinions
,
his judgment. When he was gone so long, and so far
away, I cherished him, as a hidden birth in my soul, which
his coming alone brought into life. Did I not tell you, Anna,
how much I loved him? Yet, you understood something of
me, and more of him, and you would not be surprised that I
did
love him. But when he left for Europe, I knew not that
I should ever see him again, and he did not write me. What
under these circumstances could a girl like me do? Why,
love in silence, the same as fishes swim. You are a woman,
and you know what that is; and we
are
women, Rose says,
and we are
but
women, I allow. It never occurred to me that
I was poor, or that I was bred in the orful wicked ways of
the Pond, as the Leech said. Yet how did I love Mr.
Evelyn? His letter, if it does not recall me to myself, does
certainly recall all my life to me. And if I have not always
answered all your questions, dear Anna, it was because I was
more apt to fill out my sheet with what was then on my hands,
than with what had slid off into my memory.But I must first
settle certain preliminaries as to what a woman is. You would
sometimes seem to admonish me lest I become a partaker of a
vague somewhat unwomanly. Yet in theory I always agreed
with you, and our differences, if there were any, only
contemplated
the details of practice. And, here, what I have to say
is formed, not from any considerable stress of logic, but out
of what lies all around me. To say We are women, means
no more at Mons Christi, than to say, We are men, and
just as much. There is the same difference, I think, between
a man and a woman, as between a black birch and a white
one. The character of woman has risen a hundred fold in
Livingston, yet are we all women still. The girls are not
boys, neither are the ladies lords. We have no amazons, or
hybrids, unless I except the Goddess of Health. Man and
woman, we are both united and elevated by the common tie of
respect and esteem, mutual deference and goodwill, love and
honor. We are boys and girls, wives and husbands, men and
women still. Man is less exclusive and despotic, woman is
less slavish and tame. Our Festivals, our dances, the general
diffusion of Christianity in town, have had the effect to
abrade many prejudices, correct many diversities, raise the
women in their proper scale, and restore the just order and
equitable arrangements of society. It seems, after all, to be a
question of beards and breeches, and since nature has not
furnished us the first, why should we be anxious to supply
ourselves with the last? Don't be afraid of Livingston!
Captain Tuck says, and in this matter, so say I.
Now, being a woman, how should, or how did I love Mr.
Evelyn. They tell of two yew trees that fell in love, but
being separated by a large extent of forest, could not speak
together. Cherishing their love in concealment, they at length
grew so tall, they could overlook the intervening trees; they
saw each other, their love was consummated. We did love,
we were separated, we at last met, and our love was
consummated
.
But,
the growing tall
, how was that? Were we
prepared
for a perfect love at the first? Did we
need
each other?
Were we of proportionate moral stature? Were there no
distances
even in ourselves requiring that we should first grow
tall before we could overlook them? Does not one need a
certain amount of self-subsistence, before he or she can
subsist
another? We are capable of loving, long before we are
capable of being loved; I mean capable of supporting the
love of another. A solemn thing is love, said Isabel, when
Rufus offered her his heart. Mr. Evelyn, as I recollect, when
I first saw him, imparted to me something of a tremor. But
what if he had then proposed to marry me? That would have
made me tremble worse and more hopelessly. His love for
me must first become a subjective part of my own existence,
it must grow up in me, it must mould me somewhat into his
image; and so too must mine for him act upon him; then
when we meet, our diversities will have vanished, we shall be
like each other, we shall be ready to live together always.
Perhaps you will say this is rather the record of my own
experience
,
than the establishment of any principle; and what is
worse, it may indicate a very dull and unsavory process. I do
believe in falling in love, spontaneously, ardently, as much
as Rose does, but I do not believe in falling into a quagmire. I
cannot approve of those marrying who have no points in
common
.
I confess indeed to the power of love in diminishing
differences, and uprooting antipathetic tendencies. But should
not their general tastes, sentiments, views, feelings, be
accordant
?
Let love set the mill a-going, but how can we expect
any good results from cogs that never fit, or from a
wheel-band
running on the barrel of a watch?Yet, are we not
Pythagorean half-souls? Men or women, do we not all need
our mates? Do we not float through the world, like loose
planets, till we are caught in the attraction of some other orb?
I must have Mr. Evelyn, Rose must have Frank, Rhody must
have Nimrod, Sybil Hash, Isabel Rufus, you Mr. Greenwood;
and so, vice versa. This at least is Rose's doctrine, and I
leave it with her to carry on the discussion.
Marriage is proposed as the cure of love; Get them
husbands
betimes, says my oracle. We find marriage the
sustentation
and enrichment of love. When did I love Mr.
Evelyn more than to-day! That we have diversities is
certain
;
but what shall we do with them? Wink them out of
sight; agree to disagree; bear with one another in silent,
consuming
pain? No. Let them be thrown into the common
crucible of our affection, and fused together into some
tertium
quid
, some new homogeneous form. We have been married
seven years. Twice,for they say I have an excellent
memory
,
and I cannot very well forget the times,twice he has
distressed me, agonized my heart beyond description; I could
have died. I thoughtI cannot tell whatit is past now.
Only I fancied he did not do me justiceit was a little thing
it was not that I was a woman and he a man, for he has
never failed not only to love but even to honor me. It was
two souls becoming dark to each other, veiling their faces.
We were hidden only a short time; the dew of sadness that
was upon our windows became beautiful, and then vanished.
Yet when he chided me, he loved me. You look from a
welllighted
room through a window when it is pitch dark abroad,
and you see your own image out in the darkness. He was
dark, but in his soul was my image; he tenderly cherished
me, and I had to ask to be forgiven. The Apostle prays that
we be perfect in love. In love we go on to perfection, in
perfection
we go on to love. Are we not illimitable and
immortal only in love? asks my father of my own dear
mother. God dwelleth in him that dwelleth in love. He
dwells in Mr. Evelyn and me. His Shekinah is our house and
our hearts. Our trees and our flowers grow larger and more
beautiful every year; so does our love. God is the same
forever, he never grows old, he is never common place; nor is
our love ever dull, having its roots in the Infinite. To the
eyes of love all things are new.
I too am a mother, so is Rose, so are you. Gottfried
Brckmann is four years old, Jane Girardeau, two. Rose has
the prettiest little blossom you ever beheld; she daily waxes
more happy, more strong. How pleasant to multiply the
avenues into which the Divinity may pour itself! You used,
sometimes, to raise questions about miracles. Let us cease
wondering, and become wonder-workers. The ways of nature
are the true anagogics. Gottfried is brown as a nut, and I
see Jeannie rolling on the grass. They are hale and hearty,
and do not grow under a board; they eat lustily three times a
day, and sleep well o'nights. The root called pie-plant, just
before it shoots from the earth in the Spring, is the most
beautifully
tinted thing you ever beheld. Remove the soil, and
there you have disclosed a most exquisite rose flesh color,
deepening into the purest carmine, and alternating with
vermilion
and gold. Children that germinate with a plenty of
mother earth about them, come out in the fairest hues. Cloth,
as Ma used to say, is sometimes killed in coloring; but those are
artificial dyes. The tints of nature betoken vigor and heart.
Rhody has a son whom they call Chilion; Isabel a
daughter, Margaret hight. Rufus has built an elegant marble
Italian Villa, on the north eastern brow of Mons Christi.
Thus we form an extensive community. I am not afraid of
our children becoming contaminated
here
. Hash and Nimrod
are really new men in Christ Jesus. You would hardly
believe
that they have daily prayers with their households; which
is nevertheless the fact. Our Bishop has urged the duty of
family religion, and great is the change in this respect, in all
parts of the town. I can hardly describe my astonishment,
when, the other morning, going into Pa's, to find that once
blasphemous, atheistic old man, soberly reading the Scriptures
with Ma, and devoutly praying! But what shall become of
our children, in aftertimes, and elsewhere? Livingston seems
to us, like Arranmore to the Irish, where, in clear weather,
they fancy they can see Paradise. The world is dark and
sinful, and how can we adventure our children in it! Pa
takes a great liking to the little ones, and they often run over
there. The old man is still mercurial; but his pot-valiantry
is gone; cold-water is his only fog-breaker; for Anacreontics
he sings Christian hymns. He only wishes he had two ears.
Ma says Jeannie looks like me. And I was a child once.
The other day I rowed across the Pond, and leaped off into
the water where I used to bathe, and chase the sand-pipers.
The rocks, the shadows, the vines were there, and I was there,
in my little canoe. I forgot the Universe, and my life, and my
children, to be a child once more. Presently Mr. Evelyn
came, with Gottfried and Jane, and we frolicked in the
water together, and were all children as one. How should a
child punish a child; I mean, how should I punish my
children
.
Are parents never in the wrong? Are children never
in the right? Nurses should not have pins about them,
said Deacon Ramsdill. Do not parents, by their own pride
and ignorance, often prick their children, and then whip them
for crying?
The bones of an infant, says Dr. Buchan, are so soft
and cartilaginous, that they readily yield to the slightest
pressure
,
and easily assume a bad shape. Hence it is that so
many people appear with high shoulders, crooked spines, and
flat breasts, having had the misfortune to be squeezed out of
shape by the application of stays and bandages from their
birth. The world abounds in what Comenius calls Deformed
and Monstrous people, in both a physical and moral aspect;
all squeezed out of shape in their infancy. Can you fail to
understand how men become depraved? Laissez faire, says
Mr. Evelyn. We would encompass our children by the
influences
of the Good and the Beautiful, which is all they can,
primordially, understand of God. Let their characters have
an imperceptible development, like rose buds.
Mr. Evelyn would make you believe that I have been
personally
interested in this rejuvenescence of the town; so mote
it be. After all it is God's work, and we are only his
subalterns
.
You are surprised at the result; I am not. There
are 2,304,000 pores in the human body; so many avenues, I
might say, has God to the heart; and if we will but be
co-workers
with him
, we can find access also. God follows, or I
should say, makes nature his mode of entrance and influence;
we have but to go in by the same way, and work after the
same pattern. Not but that there have been difficulties; but
the greatest one, after all, was to find God's stand-point of
Nature. What the people of Livingston needed, I could but
see; what they would receive, may, at times, have admitted
of some questioning. Their vices were not indeed peculiar,
they shared in the common backsliding from God; their
cisterns
,
drained of water, held only sediment, for which they
were ready, at any moment, to do battle. I remembered the
feeling that prevailed here when I was lost in the woods; how
good everybody was, self-sacrificing, and self-forgetful; I
remembered
my dreams. There were the many things Deacon
Ramsdill told me; there was my experience with the
children
,
when I kept the School, where I learned more of the
infinite susceptibilities, wants, tendencies of our nature, than
could in any other way have been presented to me out of
myself
;
there was what Chilion told me about Music; there was
the geode, and the incrusted crystals. Ever too was myself,
I could but be sensible of my own wants, and what would do
me good. There was the revelation of Christ to me, by Mr.
Evelyn. There was the well at No. 4, of which he speaks,
clear water, a subterranean Heaven in that greasy, odious place,
and along with it Dorothy's pink, that seemed to me like
another little Heaven in the deep degradation of humanity.
There was also a strong conviction that the sin which I saw
in the world was unnatural and self-destructive, that much of
the folly of men was preposterous and remediable. So in
many ways I was taught the Will of God. I know not that I
was ever conscious of any mission to this people; but after our
house was done, I could not be satisfied till something else
was doing. Our, or my, if you please, first experiment was at
No. 4, as he has told you. The effect was almost
instantaneous
,
and quite magnificent; that the Scripture might be
fulfilled
where it is written, though they have lain among pots,
they shall become as the wings of a dove covered with silver,
and her feathers with yellow gold.
I have a fortune indeed; and some would fain make
themselves
believe that we have opened a battery of systematic
bribery
,
that we have got into the human heart, as Philip did into
the Athenian walled-towns, by our gold. You would be
surprised
to know how little we have bestowed in a mere
eleemosynary
manner. We gave nothing to the No. 4's, except
what took an ornamental form. Their solid comfort and
prosperity
is wholly to be attributed to themselves. It was not
largesses they needed, but industry, economy, temperance and
love. We bought them a barn, when their hay and corn
began to increase; but they have since repurchased it. I gave
Abiah Tapley a clarionet, and Isaiah Hatch a bugle, that they
might join our Band; Dorothy we have educated. In the
town at large we have done little for charity; our money
indeed has gone freely, but more in ways -thetic and
religious
than anything else. It has aided in the erection of a
Church, a Cemetery, a Fountain, School-house, remodelling the
Jail, planting trees, setting up Statues, etc. etc. To Judah
Weeks we made a loan, on an importation of sheep, cows,
fruits and seeds, he was bringing from England; but he has
repaid it. And, I believe, at this moment, I could receive
back principal and interest, all I have laid out. The
pecuniary
ability of the people has kept pace with their moral
excellence. Land has advanced in price, strangers are
anxious
to come and settle amongst us. The people have
expended
a good deal, and they have made money. Abstinence
from ardent spirits, military duty, needless fashions, lawsuits,
have saved the town ten thousand dollars a year; so Judge
Morgridge said at our house the other night. Add to this the
recovery from idle habits, negligent dispositions and an
unproductive
uniformity, and you will see our people are able to
expend much in other ways.
Waste lands have been redeemed; sundry improvements in
agricultural and mechanical arts adopted, whereby at once is a
saving, and a profit. Education, Literature, Religion,
Recreation
,
Beauty, Music, Art, Morality and General Happiness,
are things the people enjoy, and for which they are able to
pay. They have laid the foundation for a building to serve a
composite purpose, of Library, Museum, Lecture Room,
Reading Room, &c. The Natural History of the place some
are beginning to develop and illustrate; its insects, birds,
fishes, rocks, flowers, weather and sky. Arthur Morgridge
and Aurelius Orff spent the whole of last year in
examinations
of this sort, and their book under the superintendence of
Master Elliman will be published, and two hundred copies will
be sold in Livingston. Hancock Welles, the Principal of the
Grammar School, spends one whole day in the week with his
scholars, studying the world about them; I mean the
Livingstonian
world, of wood, earth and water. Of our
extraneous
public taxes some of the people complain a little. Mons
Christi paid a general tax last year of two thousand dollars.
Mr. Evelyn says the State has helped Livingston somewhat,
and if Livingston can help the State out of its difficulties, it
will be better for all in the end.
Speak of wealth, Anna? Mr. Evelyn says our country expends
for military and warlike purposes, in all ways, at the rate of
80,000,000 dollars a-year, for intoxicating drinks 50,000,000
more, and for vain and hurtful customs enough to carry the
tale to 200,000,000! What if this sum could every where be
devoted to Christ, Beauty and Happiness; you would cease to
wonder at what is done in Livingston.
What time, what labor, what money is laid out in the great
world on what is known as
Fashion!
Vice is ugly, and yet
you embrace her; if she were beautiful, that might be an
excuse
for your conduct. Can anything exhibit a more hideous
mien than Fashion? The French Milliners are a more
dangerous foe to the race than French arms. Madame Laponte
threatens a worse evil than Napoleon. She has actually
invaded
America, and thousands of females have fallen victims
to her arts. Your grandmother said I should certainly lose
my symmetry if I did not wear a whalebone corset, which
she showed me, and one that would have weighed I should
think three pounds. Your friend Miss Lees, said I should
lose caste if I did not carry my waist up over my shoulders;
long waists she said were fast going out of fashion, or worn
only by the vulgar. Is it not, after all, only a circular race
between Tippee and Twaddle? Tippee is now ahead,
Twaddle
38
soon overtakes her, Tippee falls behind; so round and
round they go; which leads, or which is beaten, who can tell.
Can that be Beauty which lowers your corsage to-day, and
raises it to-morrow; which flaunts a furbelow one year and
denounces it the next? Your ladies seem to me more jiggered
than dressed; they are tasty, but not neat; they struggle for
good keeping, but attain no harmony; they are bespangled
without ornament, and fashionable without beauty. Mr. Evelyn
has a volume with plates illustrative of our ancestral costumes;
and I am persuaded that if the Indians had appeared in an
attire which has been the glory of Christian belles, it would
have been set down as the proper accompaniment of Barbarism,
and the Greeks in such dresses would never have advanced
beyond the woods of Attica. One department of our Museum,
devoted to Antiquities, I recommend to have supplied with
garments showing the fashions of our own and other times;
as suitable a relic as we can transmit to posterity. The
Spartans forbade all colors but purple. If we do not restrict
ourselves to that extent, we will at least become more moderate.
A robe,
a la Grecque
, has been introduced into town, is greatly
admired, and somewhat worn. But alas for the persons of
quality who have wens on their necks! You contrive to hide
this deformity by your cardinal-hoods. But what will you do
with the next person of quality who has monstrous ankles?
The wen must then go bare! Our people have got the good
graces of the Quakers! four of whom have come to reside
here, with hands full of industry, and purses full of money;
and they are interested members of Christ-Church.
We have had the staunchest concurrence, a munificent
sympathy, a most effective aid. Names, which if it could be,
I should like to have published to the world, are blazoned
here on Livingston hills, and storied in Livingston hearts;
Judge Morgridge, Deacon Ramsdill, Deacon Bowker and wife,
Esq. Weeks, Isabel, Judah and Mabel Weeks, Esq. Beach,
William and Julia Beach, Mr. Stillwater, Abiah and Dorothy
Tapley, Captain Tuck, Consider Gisborne, the Pottles, the
Whistons, Anthony and Ruth Wharfield, the Palmers, Tony
Washington, Arthur Morgridge, Mr. Readfield, the new
Merchant
,
Job Luce, Grace Joy and Beulah Ann Orff, Zenas Joy,
Captain Hoag, Socrates Hadlock, Hancock Welles, Kester
Shield, Philip Davis; and many, many others, whose names
are writ in the Lamb's Book of Life.
How has it been done? I will tell you. Dorothy Tapley, you
know, lived with us. She used frequently to be in the room
when I was playing the piano. She was not long in disclosing
a deep musical aptitude. I gave her what little instruction I
could, and sent her to your city to be perfected. She is now,
as we judge, a singer and player of the first order, and has
many pupils in town. Again, one Sunday, there came to our
house, in company with many others, a poor, ragged boy from
the North Part of the Town. Some of our paintings were
shown to him. Again he came, and sat an hour alone, and
looked at them. In a few days, he brought us some rude
chalk imitations of a Sir Joshua Reynolds. Of course we
should assist him. His name is Elam Dater; Julia Beach
found him wandering in the streets, took him to Church,
and had him come to Mons Christi. He has taken some
portraits
,
but his forte is Landscape and Design. He has
furnished
us several fine views of Livingston, one of Mons
Christi, as seen from the Green, which I mean to send to you.
He is now engaged on an original work, the Beatitudes, to be
executed on one piece of canvass, having Christ with the
green tree-cross, in the centre, and the several groups arranged
about him. It is to be purchased by Christ-Church members,
and put in the Church. So genius, as well as real-estate, and
all good things, rise under the influence of an indomitable,
universal Christian Love. When we love God and love our
fellow-men, says our Bishop, then and only then is our
insight
clear, our judgment sound, our strength available, and
our resolve steadfast. Hereby alone we attain to virtue, are
inspired by Beauty, and moved to Greatness. The Spirit of
Christ in a man, does more enlarge the mind, develop the
capabilities, animate the will, than all other things. In the
new Heavens and the new Earth, wherein dwelleth
righteousness
,
Art, Poetry, Painting, Sculpture, taking new forms from
the divine life of the soul, shall offer to the world unexampled
creations, and transcendent grandeur. This is the secret of
what you behold in Livingston, Anna; all contained in a
nutshell
.
Music I cherish for its own sake, for my dear brother
Chilion's sake, my dear dead father's sake, and for Christ's
sake. Some of the Ancients did not encourage music, lest it
should weaken the temper of the people. The object of most
nations, Mr. Evelyn says, has been to make the citizen
subservient
to the State. Nor has it been sufficient to enslave his
strength, and drain his products, they must also prevent his
proper moral growth. Ability to prosecute wars has been the
test of a healthy national condition. Individuality of character
has been construed into rebellion, and simple happiness
stigmatized
as effeminacy. To live for the State became the
chief end of man. We discern a higher end, the glory of God.
He made man musical; Music is a Divine gift, and God works
in it.The more I reflect upon Chilion, the more am I
impressed
with his greatness. His conceptions, as I see them
now, were magnificent, and his execution powerful. But he
was chaotic and undeveloped. Only at the hour of his death
did I understand the feelings of his life. He came out, like
the sun, at the close of a cloudy day, glittered, and expired.
His music always thrilled me, as I have seen it blow many
about, like leaves in the wind. His violin was truly oracular,
orphean, superhuman. Through it, I am sure, he would have
communicated much of the hidden secrecy of the soul.
Reserved
in manner, hesitating in speech, his instrument became
his confidence, his utterance, his communicable self. An
Inexplicability took him from us! Soul of Chilion, descend
into my soul. If tears were song, I would sing thee over the
world; when I have ceased to weep, I only pray there may
remain strength enough to sing. Yet like an inapproachable
star, his light descends to me from afar. All Livingston has
caught something of his spirit. There were many, in whose
hearts he silently sank, and upon whom he scattered his wild
but divine musical seeds. Without speaking, he originated
sensations in many a breast, and without putting forth a hand,
his designs have been moulded into the beautiful forms of Art.
Many pieces which he played extemporaneously and
aboriginally
,
I remember; Abiah Tapley is able to recall others; so
that our Band is in possession, not only of his name, and ideal,
but of many of his creations. He very early taught me the
use of the violin, and in this way I have been able to retain
and distribute more of him than I otherwise should. I did not
know how good Chilion's music was, until I discovered how
much poor music there is in the world! His frozen words
have thawed, and may be heard all over our Town. Robert
Bruce, since in his lifetime he could not go to the Holy Land,
at his death ordered his heart to be embalmed and carried
thither. Chilion could not come to this our Holy Land, but
we have here his embalmed melodies.
Have you not reflected that Christ was a singer? At the
Last Supper they sang a hymn. Mr. Evelyn says he
thinks it could not have been, what some suppose, the Hillel
of the Jews. David, he says, could not compose a song for
Christ.
I
think it was an extemporaneous swan-song of Jesus.
His voice itself, as I have heard it, is pure music. Are not
the Beatitudes the highest kind of Poetry. Or I should say, I
do not think the highest kind of Inspiration to be Poetry, I
mean at least it is not rhyme. In many of Christ's words are
harmony and softness, mellifluence and music. The Gospels
seem to me truth melodized. The best parts of the New
Testament have never been thrown into a lyric form; even by
those whose profession is scripture versification. Master
Elliman
has a copy of Sternhold and Hopkins, and I had as lief
use it as Watts; notwithstanding the great distance between
them. Your Mr. Belknap is better, but he falls sadly below
the true Gospel Idea. The Gospel, if it were understood, if
with warm hearts, they descended into the depths of its spirit,
our Poets, I am certain, could turn into rhyme and beauty.
Mr. Evelyn's volume, prepared for Christ-Church, we like
very much.Nature is musical, and God in Nature; the stars,
the brooks; so must all things become, Religion, Life, Society,
Intercourse, Labor, Politics, Controversy, Reform; so speaks
my sprite. My Peace I leave with you, said Jesus. The
Peace of Jesus would be the music of the world.
Beauty also has its own end and office, is absolute and
divine. Beauty is musical, music is beautiful. God made
the trees of the garden of Eden good to look upon, that is,
beautiful. Beauty is Truth's usher, whereby it is introduced
to the heart. No Truth is received till it puts on a beautiful
aspect. The mind even seems to have the power of exorcising
Falsehood, expelling from it the spirit of Ugliness, and
transfusing
it with that of Beauty. People tell me that they never
used to make up their minds to believe Theological errors,
until they were first presented in a beautiful form. The
Widow Luce says, she was first made to see some beauty in
the doctrine of Reprobation, before she assented to it! The
old Prophets had ideas of beauty that we have lost sight of.
The Beauty of the Lord our God be upon us, says David.
Then in the New Testament, Christ is called the Beautiful
Shepherd; of the woman who anointed him he says, She
hath wrought a Beautiful work on me. St. Paul says,
Provide
things Beautiful in the sight of all men. This secret
sentiment of high moral Beauty, a Beautiful Goodness runs
through the Gospels. God is Beautiful, and Christ has ever
seemed to me the Beautiful One, beyond all created
description
or compare. His Beautiful Goodness won my unconscious
child's heart, and when I knew it not, made me its own; and
as it were when I was asleep, impressed its image upon me,
38*
which reappeared when I awoke, and still rises with my higher
existence of thought, and shall live with me forever.The
power of Beauty over what is known as the common mind,
our house and grounds, our statuary and paintings furnish
instances of, every day. This is a beautiful spot, people
say, when they come to Mons Christi. I remember
overhearing
old Mr. Shooks, the former Jail-keeper, the flintiest,
driest, crossest man I ever saw, make that exclamation; and
he really looked pleased when he said it. His heart was
touched. Innocent gladness is one of the most beautiful things
under the sun; it is the roses and pansies of humanity. Pa's
gay humor, wicked though he was, always impressed me as
something beautiful. How shall we account for this effect of
Beauty? I know of no better way than that given by my
Author. It gets in at our eyes, pores, nostrils; engenders
the same qualities and affections in us as were in the party
whence it came. The rays sent from the object carry certain
spiritual vapors with them, and so infect the observer. Our
spirits are inwardly moved by this subtil influence. In this
connection, Anna, read that what I shall call stupendous
passage
of St. Paul, where speaking of Christ, he says, Whom
beholding, we are changed into the same image, from glory to
glory. If we only beheld Christ as we should, we should be
transformed into his Divinest Beauty; there would be
engendered
in us the same qualities and affections as are in him.
Mr. Evelyn says, Christ is not preached as any complete whole,
soul and body; not as a full-orbed, deeply capacious personal
being; but only as one who, in a certain moment,
did
something
,
as one who, at the end of his life, died to execute a
certain
intention of God. Hence no body is changed into the
real image of Christ, but all are casting about to satisfy
themselves
as to the application of that single executive stroke of
his. So many paintings of a merely dead Christ, I do not
fancy. That by Giotto, from which it is said most of the
famous paintings in Europe are obtained, originated in this
way. Giotto hired a man to hang an hour on the cross, and
at the expiration of the time, instead of relieving him, stabbed
him dead, and then fell to drawing! Are we not more saved
by a living, than a dead Christ? Is there nothing in a living
Christ for a painter to draw from, and a Christian too?Beauty,
God's creation, is sinless and pure; and it helps to make us
good. In 1529, when the soldiery took Florence, and entered
a monastery for purposes of pillage, where was a picture of the
Last Supper by Andrea, they were so struck with it, they
retired without committing any violence. Such is the power
of a living Christ, such is the power of simple Beauty!
The matter of Philosophy I shall leave wholly with Mr.
Evelyn. I think when we
are
Philosophers, we shall
have
Philosophy. Or if, as he says, I am Philosophy, it is because
I am myself. Not being what we should be, our speculations
are buffoonery. Could we understand the Philosophy of
a single moment, or a single atom, we should understand the
Philosophy of Infinity. Who by searching can find out
God? Could I understand God in the structure of a single
head of fox-tail grass, I should know more than all theosophists.
Let me fall back and work the work of Nature, so shall I work
the work of God, and be above all schools. Mr. Evelyn says
the Germans will presently surprise the age with the novelty
of their views, and the grandeur of their speculations. What
avails speculation in this slouched, vagabondish world?
Eternity
is made up of moments, let me live the present moment
well, and I shall live forever well. Immensity is composed of
square rods, let me tread well where I now stand, and I shall
always have a good foothold. Christ was a true Philosopher,
let me be a Christian. Mr. Evelyn says I act philosophically;
I am only conscious of acting according to my nature. I
confess I am much less uneasy than I used to be; I am quite
a convert to the Master, and as he once told me, like a cow I
have learned to eat my grass quietly and thankfully, asking no
questions. God, says Job, giveth not account of any of
his matters. Be He monotheistic or pantheistic, as some
dispute, my duty is one, to live well. God is and I am, God
lives and I live, God works and I work, in God I shall be;
with this I am satisfied. A Universe of beauty, love, joy and
truth are before me, let me press on. So, at least, I feel
to-day, and the morrow shall take care for the things of itself.
Another distinct and stringent law of God and Nature is
recreation. Of the many kinds that are afloat, we have been
obliged to use care in our choice. What would Christ
approve
,
what is best, we ask. In what can all ages and
conditions
unite? What relaxes without weakening, is cheerful
without frivolity, and offers attraction without danger? Not
to the exclusion of other things, our election has fallen on the
Dance, a species of recreation enjoined in the Old Testament,
and recognized in the New; one practised in every age and
country, and recommended by the sanction of the best and
greatest of men. All these things our people soberly thought
of, while I had got my lesson years ago. It has Music and
Beauty for its garniture and strength. Its intrinsic value has
won for it the approval of all. We sometimes dance on the
Green, sometimes in our Hall. It is enjoyed in all families.
Parents dance with their children, husbands with wives. It
has supplanted many ridiculous games, and extirpated cruel
sports. It has broken up drunken carousals, and neutralized
the temptation to ardent spirits. Having once entered upon
it, we become straightway sensible of its advantages.
Whatever
grace is needed in person, or courtesy in manners, it
operates to perfect. And surely, as my authority observes,
it is pleasant to see those pretty knots and swimming
figures
.
It brings the people together, interests strangers, and
diffuses a serene, whole-souled harmony over the town. It
has no boisterousness and much life. It embodies the
recreative
element in the healthiest and holiest forms. Where all
unite, there is no excess. We praise God in the dances; it
is a hymn written with our feet. I would dance as I would
pray, for its own sake, and because it is well-pleasing to God.
Fenelon, when one of his curates complained to him that his
parishioners would dance after their religious services, replied,
Let us leave those poor people to dance; their hours of
happiness
are not too numerous. This was kind of the good
Fenelon, but it indicates a bad state of society, that wherein
the greater part of life is a drudgery. We are happy when
we work, when we pray, as well as when we dance.
We are great politicians, so at least President Jefferson said.
I will tell you. We were visited successively by both the
Presidents, Mr. Adams and Mr. Jefferson. Mr. Adams'
forte, Mr. Evelyn says, is the science of government, on which
topic he has written a book. Of course he and Mr. Evelyn
fell to talking politics. Said he, I have perused the history
of every monarchy and republic, the records of which have
descended to our times. Salonina, the most virtuous and
distinguished
empress that ever adorned a Roman throne,
promised
the philosopher Plotinus, that she would rebuild a decayed
city of Campania, and appoint him over it, that he might
experimentally know, while presiding over a colony of
philosophers
,
the validity and use of the ideal laws of the republic
of Plato. The history of that republic I have never seen,
until by the hospitality which has invited me to your house,
and the attention which has taken me over your town, I seem
to be all at once transported into the bosom of it!
President
Jefferson has the reputation of being less of a theorist, and
more acquainted with men as they are. Said he, You are
the very best politicians in the land; I wish the country was
full of such. You have freedom, competency, virtue. I had
rather be Mrs. Evelyn than William Pitt. Don't you blench
though all danger menaces you. The Government shall not
molest you; the nation is honored by having within its
borders
the town of Livingston!
Courage! said Diogenes to a young man whom he saw
blushing. That is the color of virtue. One needed courage
to face this battery of applause. Epaminondas, the day after
his victory at Leuctra, came abroad in squalid attire, and with
an abject look, giving as a reason that he was overmuch
joyed the day before. I do not understand that we need to
put on sackcloth and ashes because men are pleased with
God's doings, nor behave like a certain artist, somewhat
whimsical
he was, who, when one praised a statue he was making,
smote it with his hammer and dashed it in pieces. I recollect,
when I was keeping school, at Esq. Beach's one evening,
hearing
a warm discussion, a sort of grave snip-snap, about
Napoleon's
return from Egypt, Russia seceding from the Coalition,
Tom Jefferson becoming President, and what not. There
were Esq. Beach on one side, Esq. Weeks on the other, and
Esq. Bowker a sort of third party man. Indeed, you would
have thought a new geological cataclysm was at hand, and
that we were about to be submerged in some diplomatic ocean,
or swallowed by some Megalosaurian man. These men are
all on one side now, that of Christ and Love. Our people
have lost all fear of England or France, and Mr. Jefferson has
at heart
, I think, some of the noblest purposes that ever filled
a human breast. If the great Suwarrow comes amongst us
and behaves himself, he shall be welcome; but if he goes to
playing his pranks, we shall have to open our meal-bags upon
him. These Megalosaurian Men, O Anna! But in the New
Earth now in process of creation, we shall dig for their
remains
,
as we do for other fossils, and wonder, not how they
got in there, but how they could have subsisted. We do not
lean on an arm of flesh whereby we are cursed, but on that of
God; and what saith the Prophet? Blessed is the man that
trusteth in the Lord; he shall be as a tree planted by the
waters, and that spreadeth out her roots by the river, and shall
see when heat cometh, but her leaf shall be green. Who
is he that will harm you, if ye be followers of that which
is good? is the question of Christianity. Fear not, little
flock, it is your Father's good pleasure to give you the
kingdom
,
are the words of Christ. What Atheistic,
Anti-Christian
fear pervades Church and State! How much men pay,
and do, to demonstrate their infidelity!
I am writing a long, long letter. Like Elihu, the son of
Barachel, the Buzite, I could have answered and said, I am
young, and ye are very old, wherefore I was afraid and durst
not show you mine opinion. But great men are not always
wise. Therefore I said, Hearken to me. I am full of matter.
I am ready to burst like new bottles. I will speak that I may
be refreshed. I am sensible, Anna, that I have not told you
everything that your interest relates to, and Mr Evelyn urges
me on to give you
my
views and notions.
There are
individual
histories in town, each in itself
sufficient
to make a book. We read accounts of conversions; I
could recite you some here, equal to any you ever heard of.
When the Lives of our Saints, and the Exploits of our
Champions
shall be published, it will make a volume superior to any
that has issued from the press this some time. I wish you
could hear what is rehearsed at our house every week of
battles
won on the field of Evil, of temptations endured from the
world; the poor becoming rich in grace; the besotted
finding
their way up to virtue; the fearful overcoming their dread;
the persecuted blessing their enemies; the proud humbling
themselves, and such things. There is a long story to Elam
Dater; there is Miss Arunah Shooks encountering inward
foes, such as might have intimidated St. George himself; there
are the trials of Hiram Ravel, in the North Part of the Town,
that would embellish a Book of Martyrs; there is the conviction
and conversion of John Weeks, reminding you of George
Fox; there are Isabel, Dorothy, Triandaphelda Ada Hadlock,
Sylvina Pottle, and others, whose biographies ought to be
written. But I leave them for the present.
We are a united but not an identical population, Mr.
Evelyn wishes me to tell you. Striped grass, planted
with other grass, becomes of one color, an uniform green.
For one, I wish to see no such loss of individuality, and
absorption in the aggregate. Let each spear retain its own
lines, each man his own qualities, and why as Deacon Ramsdill
says, can they not all live happily and perfectly together in the
same field, the same town? I do not wish the people all to
do as we do, only I do wish to see them Beautiful, True,
Happy
,
Christian. The town is eight miles long by six broad; it
contains two hundred farms, three stores, two taverns, one
Church, six school-houses, three or four joiners' shops, a
tannery, fulling-mill, grist-mill, blacksmith shops, &c., no
distillery, no jail. A right spirit prevails with the major
part of the inhabitants; that is our identity. Each one eats
his own meals, maintains his own family, follows his own
calling
,
thinks his own thoughts, dies his own death; in this are
we separated. Unity in variety is a good motto. There are
many common interests, our Church, our Festivals, Roads,
Cemetery, Dances, Library, Schools, Music, Art, Love, Christ,
Nature, God. The inhabitants of ancient Cuma, were reputed
stupid by their neighbors. But it was found they owed this
character to their virtues. We are indifferent to some things
that engage and distract the world. But there is life, spirit,
and enterprise among the people. Sour rivalries, envious
association
,
jostling activities, are not. To perfect ourselves,
our institutions, our Town, is a life-work. If there arises a
dispute, there are trusty people enough to whom we are glad
to refer the matter. Nor can one take advantage of our
confidence
.
The spirit of Christ is lynx-eyed; or as our Bishop
says, it penetrates the secret things of darkness, unmasks the
hypocrite, and reads the heart of the designing. If we should
all become good, you said, there would nothing remain
whereby to keep philanthropy and benevolence alive. Love,
like jealousy, grows with that it feeds on; thrives on itself.
Like plants, the fruits of the Spirit mature best in a soil where
the elements are analogous. Virtue grows on God, as the
misletoe on oaks. Does God ever decay?
Of myself need I say anything more, or of my connection
with these things? Can a bee tell how it builds its comb?
Other people might give you a more satisfactory account, but
to me it seems to have grown up as corn grows. Judge
Morgridge
is about publishing a little history of our affairs, which
I recommend to your friends. The leaves of the five-finger
draw together to shelter the flower when it rains, and open when
the sun comes out. So have I done to my plans; can I tell
how? The Widow Wright taught me Utility; Not looks,
it's use, child, was her maxim. The hang-bird taught me
Caution. Mother Goose's Melodies taught me not to cry when
I could not help a thing. But more than this, if we could but
see it, there is a waiting for Goodness and Truth in all souls.
In every bone there is marrow, and beneath every jacket
lives a man, saith the Arab proverb. Then through the
world wanders the spirit of Love, though she be no more than
the chipping bird that builds a nest in the rose-bush, or a
butterfly
that shimmers over a dirty pool. Did I have dreams
which others enjoyed not? Were they mature and finished
even beyond my experience? In this also is not the Scripture
fulfilled; In a dream he openeth the ears of men, and
sealeth
their instruction. Did Christ himself come very near to
me and speak with me? As the disciples after Christ's death
understood many sayings of their Master, which were hidden
before, so have I in later years come to understand the deep
meaning of Christ to me. I must live his childhood's life; I
must grow up in his image; his life must be made manifest
in my mortal body, as St. Paul has it. When I came to
compare the inward Christ of my soul with the historical
Christ, whom Mr. Evelyn made known to me, they flowed
together, and mingled in one.
I had dreams too of Beauty and Art, a Classical Magician
waved over me his wand. Could I see the chain that binds
together, Christianity, sthetics, Heroism! But in me they
are one, in the world they are at odds. I could not rest till
these things went forth in forms and life. In purity and
love have we genius; the Gospel gives beauty to the eye, and
holiness to the soul. Our Cross, not like Constantine's which
he bore at the head of his armies, blossoms as the rose, and
heals up the ravages of war. Our Oriflamme of silver
whiteness
,
is such as the Apostle John might have unfurled when he
started on his mission of love. I am dealing with great
subjects
,
quite beyond my depth. I admire old Atlas, but I have
neither his thews nor his good nature, I cannot bear up
the world. I remember when Hash was driving a cart up a
hill, I used to trig the wheels, that is, put under a stone. If
any Demiurgic Teamster is disposed to drive the Cart of
Peace and Good Will over the Earth, I stand ready to trig the
wheels; beyond this I cannot do. My hand aches with writing,
as your eyes must with reading. Wait till I come back, Rose
is at the door on horseback, we are going to take a ride.
We went full four miles to the North Part, and carried some
supplies to a poor sick family there. How beautiful is our
town! No European village that I have heard of, no
American
village that I have seen, is so beautiful. Here are
views that would, I will engage, match you with Greenwich
Tower, or St. Mark's Steeple in Venice. The Green with its
majestic rim of elms, thanks to our forefathers, and its central
star, the Fountain; the Cemetery with its white monuments
under the green trees; the River beyond the Village, the fine
houses on Grove Street; Aunt Wiswall's, whose house and
ornamental
grounds cover the burnt forest, Col. Welch's; Mons
Christi, our house, Rufus' tasteful seat, above all, the Cross.
That Cross, seen at sunset among the gorgeous clouds,
is
superb. Rose, who used to be afraid of thunder-storms, says
she looks to that and grows quiet. In all the streets, and
many of the bye-ways are ornamental trees, elms, maples,
tulip-trees, horse-chesnuts, spruces, larches; the houses of
the town are painted white, grey, cream-color, some red. You
meet such happy, loving faces, merry groups of children; the
old people seem so warm-hearted and benevolent; the young
men and women are easy and polite. Esqs. Beach and
Bowker we saw; they had been arbitrating on a case.
This is now their principal business, and they get ample pay
for it. Even people come in from other towns and great
distances
to employ them. They say they can trust Livingston
lawyers! Mr. Adolphus Hadlock also we saw. He has twice
sold out, and moved from town, and twice returned. No poor
man was ever so frightened. But the conversion of his
Triandaphelda
Ada, and the marriage of his son Socrates to
Dorothy
,
seem to have reconciled him; and he walks the streets
now more like a man than that Aunt Dolphy. The Jail
is tenanted by a man with his family, who was originally
confined
for murder; he was converted through the
instrumentality
of our Bishop, pardoned by the Governor, and now keeps
an agricultural seed and implement store; but is engaged to
yield his rooms whenever there is any convict to occupy them.
Old Alexis Robinson, who became wholly insane, and was
confined
in the old Jail, has recovered his senses, and is supported
handsomely by the town, and has a room in the new prison,
dwelling-house, or whatever it be. Master Elliman has dubbed
Livingston L. L., Laudabilis Locus.
Holy and delightsome is the Earth! God saw that every
thing he had made was very good. I bless God for the
dandelions
that bestar the green grass; I bless him for the
song-sparrow
that sings out against my window; I bless him for the
little Jane Girardeau that is here playing with the kitten.
What an ecstasy were the golden fires kindled as the Sun went
down last night, and the polished silver dawn I saw at four
o'clock this morning, set with the Mohammedan's sign of
worship
,
the crescent Moon. The Spring, the Summer, the Autum,
the Winter, do feast and ravish me. Not that anagogical
Hebrew
Oil, compounded of stacte, onycha, galbanum, had so sweet
a perfume as that with which I am daily anointed, and which
maketh my face to shine in innumerable flowers, that fill the
woods and ways all the season through. The best prayer I can
39
offer is to use all things well; my highest gratitude enjoyment.
Sin, I cannot. All things are incense to me,the woods, the
brooks, the birds, the fogs, the dew, the clouds, the sky; I
will be incense to God; like my dear Redeemer, a sweet
smelling savor. Into me the Universe flows, from me it
returns
back to its Maker. If I cannot tell the cause of the flux
and reflux, like Aristotle on the banks of the Euripus, I will
not get angry, and die.
How singularly are we situated; on one side you approach
Mons Christi, by the Delectable Way, on another, by the Via
Salutaris; from the east, by the Via Dolorosa; across the
place runs the Brook Kedron! Names taken up in stark
caprice
,
have become animated with the deepest significance.
Our Bishop had told the people there was a street in
Jerusalem
called the Via Dolorosa, through which Christ is said to
have borne his Cross to Calvary. One Sunday Miss Arunah
Shooks, deeply impressed with a sense of her sinfulness, as she
said, in having so often offended Christ and broken the laws of
the Gospel, came up that way, alone; she said she wanted to
bear her cross to Mons Christi. And what do you think that
cross was? This, she said, that she treated me so rudely
when I went to see Chilion in the Jail, and she wanted to come
and ask my forgiveness. She said she had long struggled with
her convictions, but after the confession, she felt a load drop
off.Livingston itselfa name derived from a respectable
American familythe Living Stone, disallowed, it may be, of
men, but chosen of God and precious; the Stone cut out of a
mountain without handsmay it at least become a Mountain
great enough to fill its own place in the Earth!
I did not tell you that my old friend Ben Bolter is here.
One of his legs was shot off by the Tripolitans; he has made
a full-rigged miniature schooner for Gottfried, and they sail
together on the Pond. My boy may become a sailor after all.
Ben Bolter exhibits gratifying tokens of a renewed mind.
In the North part of the town, on the very spot where the
Gallows stood and Chilion was hung, has been erected a
monumental
piece representing
Moses kneeling to Christ
and
surrendering
the Book of the Hebrew Code; Christ appears as it
were closing the Book with his footthe action being partially
veiled by drapery. It is exquisitely done; Art is satisfied,
Justice
acquiesces, Humanity triumphs.
We have a Library indeed, but how few good books! Is it
a dream; or has some one said it, or will some one say it, or
is it my sprite that saysAmerica has not fulfilled the
reasonable
expectations of mankind. Men looked, when all
feudal
straps and bandages were stripped asunder, that Nature, too
long the mother of dwarfs, would reimburse herself in a brood
of Titans, who should laugh and leap in the continent, and run
up the mountains of the West with the errand of genius and
love. A very facetious sprite is that, whoever he be. He
reminds me of a certain Talmudic God, that spent his time
whittling sharp sticks, wherewith he was wont at his leisure to
prick the sides of mortals and enjoy their grimaces. We
have a thousand authors of all sorts, says Father Burton two
hundred years ago. But in truth I have found little to entertain
me more than The Loves of Osmund and Duraxa, I saw in
Boston some years since. So I must conclude myself a mere
block that is affected by none of them, according to the writer
aforesaid. As soon as Napoleon finds his quietus, I hope the
world will take breath again, and somebody be moved to write
a good book here in America.
We have had our crosses frequent and severe; individual
and corporate, personal and social. The last the Town was
called to endure, fell out in this wise. The following appeared
in the Kidderminster Chronicle.
Livingston
.We have long kept silence about the
movements
in this place; but the matter has become too public to
excuse any farther negligence. Over the Red Dragon of
Infidelity
they have drawn the skin of the Papal Beast, and tricked
the Monster with the trappings of Harlotry! On the ruins of
one of our Churches they have erected a Temple to Human
Pride and Carnal Reasoning. The contamination is
spreading
far and wide; and unless something be attempted, the
Kingdom of God in our midst must soon be surrendered to the
arts of Satan. It is understood that the Rev. Mr. L, of B,
has openly and repeatedly exchanged pulpits with the man,
who having denied his Lord and Master, they have had the
hardihood to invest with the robes of the Christian Office.
Brethren shall we sleep, while the enemy is sowing tares in our
midst?
Clericus
.
A convention of Clergy was soon called at Kidderminster,
before which the Rev. Mr. Lovers of Brandon, the gentleman
alluded to, was summoned. He had made three or four
exchanges
with Frank. His prosecutor was the Rev. Mr.
Orstead, of Windenboro, who wrote the notice for the paper.
The trial went on two or three days. The council was divided
on the question of withdrawing fellowship from Mr. Lovers,
suspending, or deposing him. But their meeting was brought
to a conclusion in an unforeseen way. While they were
debating
what to do, an accuser appeared against Mr. Orstead in
the person of an unmarried female, who charged upon him a
child she had recently borne. His guilt was so far proved,
that he confessed it. Mr. Lovers was saved, and Mr. Orstead
degraded. The unhappy man, despised at home, Frank went
to see, invited him to Livingston, where he has spent some
months; and I hope has become a better man.
During the excitement this affair gave our people, Dr.
Freeman
came to see us, and renew those condolences and
sympathies
he has so often expressed for us. While at our house,
he told me this story. When the Dutch in Albany, some years
since, would renew and enlarge their Church, they suffered the
old one to remain, and erected the new one about it,
completely
enclosing it. Their worship continued in the old place
till the new house was nearly done. They then tore the old
Church to pieces, and carried the fragments out of the door of
the new one, into the finishing of which they entered. Great
reforms, continued the Doctor, must be gradual. It is
easier to tear down than to build up; easier to remove an
error than supply a truth. Rome was not built in a day.
There are more Alarics than Romuluses in the world.
This was a good story, and you have it for what it is worth.
But I see, said the Doctor, you have built up far more
than you ever pulled down. I replied that we had not sought
to pull down anything, but rather to put life into what was
dead, and reinstate Christ in his own Church. He agreed
that it was so.
As regards those who oppose us, could we, as did Nicholas
Sture, that Swede, who when he was stabbed by his Sovereign,
drew out the sword, kissed it, and returned it, could we
so meet all attacks, happy were we. Tell me how I may
be revenged on my enemy? said some one to Diogenes.
By becoming more virtuous, replied the philosopher. We
are charged with Infidelity! Will unkindness, traducement,
insinuation, bleardness, never cease? Anaxagoras, the most
religious of Philosophers, was persecuted for profanity;
Socrates
was condemned for an heretic; Christ himself was
executed as a blasphemer, impostor and insurgent! When
Pyrrho, who professed indifference to all evils, was reproached
for driving off a dog that flew at him, Ah, replied he, it
is difficult to bear everything! So indeed it is; but as he
added, We must try. The Athenians constructed a Statue
from the marble which the Persians brought to raise as a
monument
to their victories. We will make no ovation out of this
signal defeat of our enemies; I feel disposed the rather to
weep over human follies.
What will become of us? If we trust in God, we have his
promise, that the waters shall not overflow us, or the fire burn
us. We abide under the shadow of his wing. That a great
work has been done here none can deny. It is said that certain
fish, when brought to the surface of the water, sometimes burst
from the rarefaction of the air. Livingston has been raised
from a lowest depth. Yet it seems to me so compact in all its
proportions, that it cannot fall asunder. The world may
wholly leave us; but the thrush sings sweetest in the loneliest
woods, and we will keep up our song in solitude. The
Spartans
were forbidden to pursue a flying foe; we shall not
follow
our retreating enemies, with any intent to kill; nor shall
we turn our backs upon them if they rally again.
Orpheus has seemed to me a natural prophecy of Christ; a
part of the groaning of the creation after the Redemption. By
the sweetness of his music he drew the wild beasts after him;
he caused trees and rocks to move; his strains subdued the
rulers of Hell; through the charms of his melody the wheel of
Ixion stopped, and even the Furies relented. His music was
at last drowned by a hoarse discordant horn. He was himself,
too, torn in pieces, and the river Helicon, sacred to him, hid
itself under ground. Our Pond I used to call the Lake of
Orpheus, at the Master's suggestion, that here those waters had
risen. I have since called it the Lake of Christ. Such Orphean
music was he. He drew after him a whole age. He stilled
the fury of man, and the malice of devils. Some hoarse
discordant
horn was raised in the Church; his music was
quenched
;
he was torn in pieces; his waters, hid under the Earth,
as I would fain fancy, have appeared on Mons Christi!
Whither now shall the Christian Helicon flow?
THE END.Livingston
,
August
28
th
, 1775.
Didymus Hart being summoned to this Committee, on the
information of sundry witnesses, that the said Hart on the
27th day of this month, had violated the laws of the Continental
and Provincial Congress, and done other acts contrary to the
liberties of the country, appeared, and after due proof being
made of said charge, the said Hart was pleased to make a full
confession thereof, and in the most equivocal and insulting
manner attempted to vindicate said conduct, to wit:
1st. Working on the Public Fast recommended by the
association
of ministers.
2d. Speaking diminutively of the County Congress, in
which they recommended to the people not to take Hick's and
Mill's paper.
3d. Not sufficiently encouraging people to sign the
Covenant
.
4th. Saying that his wife had bought tea, and should buy it
again, if she had a chance.
5th. At the Ordinary of Mr. Abraham Stillwater, with a
bowl of grog in his hand, drinking to the success of the king's
arms.
6th. Saying, `by Gd if this people is to be governed in
this manner, it is time for us to look out; and 'tis all owing to
the Committee of Safety, a pack of supple-headed fellows, I
know two of them myself.'
These charges being proved and the Committee having
admonished
said Hart, but he continuing his perverse course, it
was voted that said Hart is an enemy to his country, and that
every friend to humanity ought to forsake said Hart, until he
shall give evidence of sincere repentance by actions worthy of
a man and a Christian.
(Signed)
James Gisborne
,
Clerk
.Whereas I, the subscriber, have from the perverseness of
my wicked heart maliciously and scandalously abused the
character and proceedings of the Continental and Provincial
Congress, Selectmen of this town, and the Committees of
Safety in general, I do hereby declare, that at the time of my
doing it, I knew the said abuses to be the most scandalous
falsehoods, and that I did it for the sole purpose of abusing
those bodies of men, and affronting my townsmen, and all the
friends of liberty throughout the Continent. Being now fully
sensible of my wickedness, and notorious falsehoods, I humbly
beg pardon of those worthy characters I have so scandalously
abused, and voluntarily renouncing my former principles, do
promise for the future to render my conduct unexceptionable
to my countrymen, by strictly adhering to the measures of
Congress, and desire this my confession may be printed in the
Kidderminster Chronicle for three weeks successively.
Bartholomew Elliman
.
Test,
Abraham Stillwater,
Josiah Penrose,
Nathan Hadlock.
Livingston
,
Nov.
23
d
, 1775.Livingston
.We have long kept silence about the
movements
in this place; but the matter has become too public to
excuse any farther negligence. Over the Red Dragon of
Infidelity
they have drawn the skin of the Papal Beast, and tricked
the Monster with the trappings of Harlotry! On the ruins of
one of our Churches they have erected a Temple to Human
Pride and Carnal Reasoning. The contamination is
spreading
far and wide; and unless something be attempted, the
Kingdom of God in our midst must soon be surrendered to the
arts of Satan. It is understood that the Rev. Mr. L, of B,
has openly and repeatedly exchanged pulpits with the man,
who having denied his Lord and Master, they have had the
hardihood to invest with the robes of the Christian Office.
Brethren shall we sleep, while the enemy is sowing tares in our
midst?
Clericus
.